_id,web_url,pub_date,document_type,type_of_material,word_count,keywords,query,text
nyt://article/3bf95f1b-79a2-537a-898e-287fe964254f,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/07/16/business/june-retail-sales.html,2020-07-16T20:47:33+0000,article,News,1509,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Sporting Goods and Equipment', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (2020)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Retail sales increased 7.5 percent, but there are ominous signs that the rebound may fizzle as coronavirus cases rise through much of the country. Monthly retail and food sales -0.6% $500 billion   RECESSIONS -21.8% 400 Change from Feb. 2020 level 300 200 100 0 2006 2008 2010 2012 2014 2016 2018 2020 Monthly retail and food sales -0.6% since Feb. $500 billion   RECESSIONS 400 300 200 100 0 ’06 ’08 ’10 ’12 ’14 ’16 ’18 ’20 Seasonally adjusted Source: Commerce Department The American consumer came back last month, with retail sales increasing 7.5 percent from May as stores reopened in warm weather, shoppers shook off lockdown fatigue and the federal government pumped trillions of dollars of stimulus into the economy. The jump, which sent spending back to just below where it was in February before the coronavirus pandemic sent the country into a tailspin, seemed to be cause for celebration after a record rebound in May. “I feel like the consumers are just fed up,” said Andrew Moquin, who reopened his jewelry store outside Buffalo early last month. “They are moving on with their lives and they are saying, ‘I can’t solve these problems,’ whether it be Covid-19 or the divisiveness in the political arena. They want to be happy or they want their loved ones to be happy. You can only contract for so long before something expands.” But the looming question is whether the robust recovery is sustainable. And there are already ominous signs throughout the broader economy that the rebound may fizzle, as stimulus money, unemployment benefits and tax refunds fade away and the virus continues to spread. On Thursday, new claims for state unemployment benefits exceeded one million for the 17th consecutive week and while the overall claims remained relatively flat, they rose in California, Florida and Georgia, where infections are climbing. The retail sales report released by the Commerce Department on Thursday reflected spending in June, before the surge in virus cases forced some businesses to close down again and worried consumers anew. More up-to-date credit card data compiled by a team of researchers at Harvard University and Brown University shows that consumer spending rebounded relatively steadily from mid-April to late June, but has been roughly flat since then. Cellphone mobility data analyzed by the Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas tells a similar story, showing activity leveling off in July, and falling outright in states such as Arizona, Florida and Texas, where virus cases have been rising. An analysis of the same underlying data by the American Enterprise Institute found a particularly steep drop in visits to retail stores and other businesses. “Looking ahead to July or August it starts to become more challenging to repeat the gains we have been seeing,” said Michelle Meyer, head of U.S. economics at Bank of America. Malls and other retailers that were deemed nonessential during lockdowns reopened in June and are now facing the prospect of closing again. Apple, one of the most prominent retailers, said it closed about 100 U.S. stores for a second time in recent weeks. Walmart, the nation’s biggest retailer, joined chains like Best Buy and Starbucks this week in mandating face masks inside all of their stores, underscoring the health risks that retailers are struggling to navigate. Still, Americans spent more last month than they did in June 2019, even as unemployment reached levels not seen since the Great Depression, cities were roiled by civil unrest and the threat of the virus loomed across the country. But the pandemic has altered which businesses are receiving that money, and the monthly sales report doesn’t fully reflect the huge shifts in how and where Americans have been shopping since the pandemic took hold. The divide has grown between retailers considered “essential” and those deemed “nonessential,” and temporary closures delivered a severe blow to many large apparel chains, department stores and malls. High-profile bankruptcies since the beginning of May have included J.Crew, J. C. Penney, Brooks Brothers and GNC, and many retailers like Macy’s and Levi’s have cut corporate jobs in addition to furloughing or laying off store workers. Shifts to online shopping and pickup-only operations led to job reductions at retailers and restaurants. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “It’s a completely unevenly distributed set of numbers,” said Sucharita Kodali, a retail analyst at Forrester Research. “The good news is that this does indicate there’s an appetite for spending, but it’s people who are continuing to spend a lot on things like toilet paper and hand sanitizer rather than the discretionary items they were buying before.” On Thursday, the Labor Department reported that 1.3 million new claims for state unemployment benefits were filed last week, virtually the same number as the week before. It was a slight drop from 1.31 million in the week ending July 4 and far lower than when they twice topped six million in late March and early April. But the new claims are still persistently high. Even in the aftermath of the financial crisis in early 2009, the highest weekly figure for new claims was 665,000. “It’s shocking,” said Mickey Chadha, a senior credit officer at Moody’s Investor Service. “The economy is still very strained. But the American consumer is surprisingly resilient. This is going to be a consumer-driven recovery.” Mr. Moquin, the jewelry store owner, said that after three months of lockdown it took some time before customers returned. But over the past two weeks, it was as if a switch flipped and sales have “been on fire,” he said. With the number of coronavirus cases declining in New York, and businesses staying open, Mr. Moquin’s customers are back in force, buying “anything with diamonds.” A big driver of the renewed spending, economists say, is government stimulus. Rather than people socking away their bolstered unemployment benefits in savings, the retail sales numbers show that the money was being spent. But when many of those benefits run out, as they are scheduled to do later this month, the broader retail recovery could also fizzle, even if the virus is brought under control. “People are scared that this recovery bounce might be one and done,” said Beth Ann Bovino, chief U.S. economist at S&P Global. Retailers whose wares are suited to this particular moment, as varied as home improvement chains and bicycle sellers, are also at an advantage. For example, spending has been shifting from traditional entertainment to what analysts have called “solitary leisure activities,” bolstering sales of bicycles, coolers and drinkware for parks and beaches, and hiking and camping gear, according to a Bank of America research note this month. The June retail sales report showed a 27 percent jump in the category of sporting goods, hobby, musical instruments and bookstores, which rose even compared with June 2019, after having surged in May. Megan Searfoss, the owner of Ridgefield Running Company, a running store in Ridgefield, Conn., seems to be a beneficiary of the trend. She had made plans earlier this year to expand to Darien, Conn., in time to capitalize on excitement around the Olympics, the New York City Marathon and the high school cross country season. “All that stuff went away,” she said. But Ms. Searfoss decided to forge ahead with the Darien store, which opened on Thursday, motivated by changes she made to her operations in recent months — like virtual fittings and same-day deliveries that were faster than Zappos and Amazon — and her conviction that small businesses have become more appealing amid the pandemic.  “Big malls may be going away, but this is not, as long as a small business is investing in technology and experience,” Ms. Searfoss said. Still, she acknowledged that she was nervous about the prospect of another shutdown. Ms. Kodali of Forrester said, “The challenge is that option is still on the table for the remainder of the year for a lot of states because their numbers are just out of control.” She continued, “The idea was that the March and April time frame was the only time we were going to have to deal with it and things have gotten so crazy, it’s a viable discussion again. If it happens again, we are going to see another month like we saw in April.” Many retailers were already under pressure as the pandemic radically shifted the shopping experience well outside the bounds of what anyone would consider relaxing. Lee Peterson, an executive vice president in Columbus, Ohio, at WD Partners, a strategy, design and architecture firm, said that while there was an initial burst of interest in shopping at newly reopened stores, consumers have largely realized that the experience has become “more restrictive, more cautious and there’s so many alternatives.” Face masks, plexiglass, tape on floors and the notion that clothing must be sanitized after the fitting room are not particularly conducive to getting people into stores, he said. The retail industry has traditionally looked to back-to-school shopping in July and August as a distinct season ahead of the fall, but even that is expected to be upended as schools and colleges around the country scramble to lay out plans for either virtual or in-person instruction. More purchases are expected to be made online, and skew more toward digital products rather than apparel and traditional school supplies, according to a recent survey by Deloitte. Connie Medina is still waiting for her customers to return after reopening her shop, Your CBD Store, in Albany, N.Y., early last month. At first, a few stalwart customers did return to buy up CBD oils and edible products that are used for healing and wellness. But the foot traffic along her street and to nearby restaurants has been sparse. “People are not coming out, they are staying home,” she said. Ben Casselman contributed reporting. Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari Michael Corkery is a business reporter who covers the retail industry and its impact on consumers, workers and the economy. He joined The Times in 2014 and was previously a reporter at the Wall Street Journal and the Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery Nelson D. Schwartz has covered economics since 2012. Previously, he wrote about Wall Street and banking, and also served as European economic correspondent in Paris. He joined The Times in 2007 as a feature writer for the Sunday Business section. More about Nelson D. Schwartz "
nyt://article/9ca6c49e-1155-51a3-b943-18654cbfdc48,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/11/22/business/economy/holiday-retail-spending.html,2018-11-22T10:00:13+0000,article,News,1179,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Polls and Public Opinion', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'SurveyMonkey', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Confidence (Economic Indicator)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (2017)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Consumer confidence points to open pocketbooks in the short run. Trade tensions, market upheaval and other factors may make the new year less bright. Americans are upbeat about the economy heading into the holiday shopping season. But that good cheer may not last long.  With the lowest unemployment rate in nearly half a century, and wage growth starting to pick up, economists expect shoppers to open their wallets. A survey by the National Retail Federation, a trade group, points to 4.1 percent more holiday spending than last year, and some forecasters expect even stronger growth. Measures of consumer confidence are near post-recession highs. “You see momentum going into the season, cutting across a large range of categories,” said Stephen Sadove, a former Saks Fifth Avenue chief who is now a senior adviser for Mastercard. “It’s probably the healthiest growth we’ve seen in the past half-dozen years.” But those projections predate the latest round of steep stock-market declines, which this week pushed the S&P 500 index into negative territory for the year. It’s too soon to say whether the drop will rattle consumers. But even before the sell-off, many economists were warning that a combination of factors — including rising interest rates, a weakening housing market and a new round of tariffs set to take effect in January — could begin to slow down the economy in 2019. Last year’s holiday season was the best for retailers in more than a decade. Americans are feeling even better this year. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Thirty-seven percent of Americans say their finances are in better shape than they were a year ago, while 17 percent say they are worse off, according to a survey conducted for The New York Times in early November by the online research platform SurveyMonkey. Last November, just 28 percent said they were better off. Consumers say they are feeling even more positive about the future. Forty-one percent expect to be better off financially a year from now — versus just 14 percent who expect to be worse off — and a majority of survey respondents said “continuous good times economically” were in store over the next five years. Other surveys show similar optimism. The University of Michigan on Wednesday reported that consumer sentiment had ticked down slightly in November but that the index remained high by historical standards. That confidence is leading consumers to loosen their purse strings, said Diane Swonk, an economist for the accounting firm Grant Thornton. She noted that spending was up in discretionary categories like restaurant meals, travel and clothing. “Consumers are dressing up and stepping out a bit,” Ms. Swonk said. “They’ve got money for discretionary spending, they’re traveling a lot.” Consumers have plenty of reasons for feeling good. Economic growth is on track for its best annual performance since 2005. And crucially, the tight labor market at last appears to be translating into faster wage growth for workers. Average hourly earnings were up 3.1 percent in October from a year earlier, their fastest growth since before the recession. Households are also getting help from gasoline prices, which have fallen sharply in the last month after rising earlier in the year. “If gas prices go down, it basically acts like a tax cut,” said Joseph Song, an economist for Bank of America Merrill Lynch. Then there is the actual tax cut. The $1.5 trillion tax law that Republicans passed last year helped pump up consumer spending earlier this year, and economists said the effect is lingering into this holiday season. Over all, households’ finances are in their strongest shape in years, with low levels of debt and rising after-tax income. United States gross domestic product has posted two straight quarters of strong growth, driven largely by robust consumer spending. Most economists expect that growth to slow in the final three months of the year as the effects of the tax cuts fade. “There’s a very clear spike in sales in the middle of the year obviously driven by the tax cuts, and there’s an equally clear reversal in the second half of the year,” said Ian Shepherdson, an economist for Pantheon Macroeconomics, a research firm. “It’s the sugar rush followed by the comedown.” That slowdown, by itself, isn’t much cause for concern, Mr. Shepherdson said. But there are other hints of trouble on the horizon. The housing market has slowed markedly this year, as interest rates have risen and prices have outstripped income growth. And additional tariffs on Chinese goods are set to take effect in January, which could push up consumer prices. “Consumers are at the heart of what’s gone right in the economy the past couple years, and I think they’re going to be the biggest contributor to the slowdown,” said James Bohnaker, an economist for IHS, a research firm. Those concerns may be part of what has driven the stock market’s recent drop. Retail stocks fell on Tuesday despite strong results, as investors worried that rising costs could eat into earnings. The market turmoil could affect consumer sentiment, especially among wealthier households more likely to own stocks. The University of Michigan survey found that confidence fell more among higher-earning households in November. But falling share prices are unlikely to hurt holiday sales much, Mr. Song said. Most Americans don’t own stocks outside of their retirement accounts, and many have already set their holiday budgets — or have even begun to shop. A Bank of America survey found that about 20 percent of consumers started their holiday shopping before November, and 67 percent said they planned to shop over the extended Thanksgiving weekend. “I have a tough time really seeing this hurting consumer spending,” Mr. Song said of the market declines. “A lot of the shopping is already baked in.” Ever since President Trump took office, consumer confidence has shown a sharp partisan split, with Republicans feeling far better about the economy than Democrats. This month’s midterm elections, in which Democrats retook control of the House of Representatives, may have begun to narrow that gap. SurveyMonkey took its survey the week of the election, conducting about 4,300 online interviews on or before Election Day and 5,000 after the results were known. Among Democrats and independents, the results changed little over the course of the survey. But for Republicans, there was a clear shift in outlook: Among Republicans interviewed before the election, 66 percent said they expected their finances to improve over the next year. Among those interviewed afterward, that share fell to 59 percent. The effect was particularly pronounced among strong supporters of Mr. Trump, who showed a nine-point decline after the election in the share expecting their finances to be better a year from now. About the survey: The data in this article came from an online survey of 9,380 adults conducted by the polling firm SurveyMonkey from Nov. 5 to Nov. 11. The company selected respondents at random from the nearly three million people who take surveys on its platform each day. Responses were weighted to match the demographic profile of the population of the United States. The survey has a modeled error estimate (similar to a margin of error in a standard telephone poll) of plus or minus 1.5 percentage points, so differences of less than that amount are statistically insignificant. Ben Casselman writes about economics, with a particular focus on stories involving data. He previously reported for FiveThirtyEight and The Wall Street Journal. More about Ben Casselman "
nyt://article/786f65a1-34df-5175-9946-7a2e7d4070fc,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/03/business/china-consumer-economy-apple-iphone.html,2019-01-03T17:01:18+0000,article,News,1332,"[{'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Apple Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"HONG KONG — For years, no matter what was happening elsewhere, global companies bet billions upon billions of dollars that China’s consumers would keep spending money. Now, just when the world economy could use their financial firepower, they are holding back, worried about the country’s slowing growth, a trade war with the United States and  rising amounts of personal debt. Zhao Zheng, 26, is among the cost-conscious consumers. On Thursday, Mr. Zhao, a real estate agent, was browsing smartphones made by Xiaomi, a Chinese rival to Apple that prices its handsets at a fraction of what the American tech giant charges for iPhones. He said the success in China of Xiaomi and Miniso, a chain of low-cost variety stores, suggested that Chinese consumers were looking to get more for their money. “The economy,” Mr. Zhao said, “is definitely very bad.” A significant pullback could have a big impact on a world looking for engines of growth, on companies that counted on China’s continuing expansion and on global investors who have long viewed Chinese consumers as a steady source of profits. Stock markets stumbled again on Thursday, in part over concerns that American companies and manufacturers are starting to feel the effects from the slowdown in China and the trade war. The S&P 500 sank 2.5 percent, while shares of Apple dropped nearly 10 percent after the company unexpectedly slashed its financial forecast, citing disappointing iPhones sales in the country. The rise of the Chinese consumer is not over yet, and Apple’s disappointing numbers stem in part from the company’s own decisions. But the weakness at Apple followed reams of other data — declining car sales, faltering retail sales, a slumping property market, a tougher job market — that signal Chinese consumers may be losing their once unshakable confidence. The sagging confidence could undermine China’s efforts to redirect its economy and spur growth. The Chinese government hopes consumers will become a greater source of economic growth as the country’s longtime reliance on government-sponsored infrastructure projects and old-line industries like steel and cement pays ever-smaller dividends. In recent years, Beijing has rolled out a huge social safety net, tax breaks and other incentives to get people to spend more of their own money on the trappings of middle-class life. The spending slowdown in China could be a worrying sign for many of America’s biggest companies, too, at a time when their profits and stock prices are under pressure. Greater China — a region that includes mainland China, Hong Kong and Taiwan — is Apple’s third-largest market after the United States and Europe, accounting for $52 billion in annual sales in the company’s most recent fiscal year. General Motors, through local joint ventures, sells more cars in China than it does in the United States. Eight percent of Procter & Gamble’s total sales in 2017 came from Greater China. Other companies are also feeling the pinch. China’s auto market, the biggest in the world, saw sales fall during the first 11 months of last year. Sales of all smartphones fell by 13 percent in the third quarter of 2018. Chinese consumers continued to spend relatively briskly during other recent slowdowns, and they could still help get the country’s economy back on track. But they have reasons to be reticent now. “China is at a turning point in its economy,” said Andrew Collier, the founder of research firm Orient Capital Research. “They’ve basically been on a debt-fueled binge for a decade.” He added, “It’s difficult to turn the ship from industry to consumer at a time of rough waters.” For many people, circumstances have changed. China has too many apartments that home buyers do not want, depressing a property market that is the largest source of wealth for Chinese households. The stock market lost around a quarter of its value in 2018. And although they  have a long way to go to catch up to Americans, Chinese households are laboring under growing amounts of debt. Unorthodox Chinese lenders like the online shadow-banking networks known as peer-to-peer lenders are stumbling, giving consumers fewer places to borrow more. Declining business confidence, rising labor costs and the trade war with the United States also appear to be hurting the job market. China does not disclose reliable unemployment data. But a recent survey by Mr. Collier of job postings, recruitment ads, numbers of applicants on recruitment websites and interviews with corporate managers suggested labor demand had weakened significantly. Hiring demand in import and export industries has been hit especially hard, falling 53 percent in the third quarter compared with a year earlier, the survey found. Against that backdrop, it is not surprising that many consumers are looking for ways to spend less. Wang Xiaochuan, who made about $145,000 a year as a pharmaceutical sales representative in Yantai in 2015, now makes less than a third of that thanks to a tightening of regulations on the drug industry. He has cut back his spending, buying Clarks shoes instead of the more expensive Ecco brand, or Coach goods rather than Louis Vuitton. “I’m hearing a lot more bad news about the economy than good news now,” he said. In a country with an aspirational culture that for decades has encouraged people to get rich, Apple has long held a special place. Having a new iPhone meant its owner had made it. Seven years ago, the release of a new iPhone set off scuffles in front of an Apple store in Beijing. But price increases have put the iPhone beyond the reach of more and more Chinese buyers. An iPhone XR starts at 6,499 yuan, or about $950, just over two and a half months’ worth of disposable income for the average Chinese person. Rumors once circulated about young people selling kidneys to buy an iPhone. Now, the online joke goes, it would cost two kidneys. On the last day of 2018, William Tan, a 30-year-old university teacher in the southern city of Nanning, replaced his iPhone 7 with a phone made by Huawei, the Chinese telecommunications giant. Although the Huawei phone cost more than $700, about a month’s salary for him, it was still more than $200 cheaper than the base iPhone XR. He had used an iPhone 5, 6 and 7. But when his iPhone 7 broke down, he found he could no longer afford the latest iPhone. The Huawei phone, he said, works fairly smoothly and takes better photos than the iPhone. “I won’t choose Apple again at this price range,” he said. Chinese consumers are by no means done with certain discretionary purchases. Spending on movie tickets and services remains strong, economists said. But the consumer slowdown could worsen if Beijing does not address its economic problems. “The question is whether China can stabilize economic growth when it is facing economic headwinds,” said Wei Li, senior China economist at Standard Chartered. “If the labor market does worsen in 2019 or if financial conditions don’t improve, if the stock market remains low, all this could weigh on consumer confidence,” Mr. Li said. Given the uncertainty, many Chinese spenders will most likely continue to scrimp. Wu Yan, a tech company worker who was looking at Xiaomi phones on Thursday afternoon, said he had also tried Apple and Huawei phones and had decided they were not much different from one another. What matters, he said, was the apps, and they work the same from phone to phone. But Mr. Wu, 40, also said many middle-class Chinese people like him had reached a stage where their work was stable, their income was secure and they no longer needed to show off their spending power. His computer at home? It’s four or five years old now, but it still works fine. “Now we spend just to fulfill our needs,” he said. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Alexandra Stevenson and Li Yuan reported from Hong Kong, and Raymond Zhong from Beijing. "
nyt://interactive/e967ea37-f854-54a7-b5ff-1b06d2731fbc,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/12/31/business/A-Big-Year-for-the-Stock-Market.html,2018-01-01T00:42:15+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"

      By KARL RUSSELL and 
    
LANDON THOMAS JR.

DEC. 31, 2017
 
The major stock market indexes broke countless records in 2017, rising consistently throughout the year. Investors were heartened by President Trump’s promise to cut taxes and regulations. Strong economic growth around the world and nary a sign of inflation also contributed to investors’ cheery mood.
 After falling sharply in the hours after President Trump was elected in November, the stock market quickly reversed course. In January it rose sharply on hopes that Mr. Trump’s promised tax cuts would boost corporate profits. Stocks also were immune to a series of geopolitical disturbances, from tensions with North Korea to investigations into Mr. Trump’s ties with Russia. The markets ended the year on a tear once it became clear that tax cuts would become law. S.& P. 500-stock index 2,700 Daily closes 2,650 MAR. 20 2,600 F.B.I. Director James B. Comey announces investigation into collusion with the Russian government by the Trump campaign. 2,550 2,500 +19% IN 2017 2,450 2,400 AUG. 8 Trump threatens North Korea with “fire and fury” 2,350 MAY 17 2,300 News breaks that Trump had asked Mr. Comey to drop the investigation of Michael Flynn JAN. 20 Inauguration 2,200 J F M A M J J A S O N D 2,700 S.& P. 500-stock index Daily closes 2,650 JAN. 20 MAR. 20 AUG. 8 +19% IN 2017 2,600 Trump inaugurated F.B.I. Director James B. Comey announces investigation into collusion with the Russian government by the Trump campaign. Trump threatens North Korea with “fire and fury” 2,550 2,500 2,450 2,400 2,350 MAY 17 DEC. 1 2,300 News breaks that Trump had asked Mr. Comey to drop the investigation of Michael Flynn Mr. Flynn pleads guilty to lying to the F.B.I. 2,250 2,200 J F M A M J J A S O N D 2,700 S.& P. 500-stock index Daily closes 2,650 JAN. 20 MAR. 20 AUG. 8 +19% IN 2017 2,600 Trump inaugurated F.B.I. Director James B. Comey announces investigation into collusion with the Russian government by the Trump campaign. Trump threatens North Korea with “fire and fury” 2,550 2,500 2,450 2,400 2,350 MAY 17 DEC. 1 2,300 News breaks that Trump had asked Mr. Comey to drop the investigation of Michael Flynn Mr. Flynn pleads guilty to lying to the F.B.I. 2,250 2,200 J F M A M J J A S O N D At over 3,000 days and counting, this bull market has been one of the longest on record. It started in March 2009, fueled by the belief that aggressive policies by the Federal Reserve would halt the stock market’s fall. It’s been rising ever since, propelled by gushers of money looking for rich returns. According to data from Edward Yardeni, the current eight-year run trails only the boom from 1987 to 2000. 3,000 S.& P. 500-stock index Scale is logarithmic to show comparable percentage changes 1,000 2 3,219 days 1 +295% 4,494 days 100 +582% 5 1,839 days Longest bull markets +229% 10 4 3 2,248 days 2,954 days +126% +263% 1 1930 1940 1950 1960 1970 1980 1990 2000 2010 3,000 1,000 2 S.& P. 500-stock index 6 3,219 days 1,826 days Scale is logarithmic to show comparable percentage changes +295% 1 +102% 4,494 days 100 +582% 5 1,839 days 4 2,248 days +229% Longest bull markets +126% 3 10 2,954 days +263% 1 1930 1940 1950 1960 1970 1980 1990 2000 2010 3,000 1,000 2 S.& P. 500-stock index 6 3,219 days 1,826 days Scale is logarithmic to show comparable percentage changes +295% 1 +102% 4,494 days 100 +582% 5 1,839 days 4 2,248 days +229% Longest bull markets +126% 3 10 2,954 days +263% 1 1930 1940 1950 1960 1970 1980 1990 2000 2010 Technology was the top performing part of the stock market in 2017, up 34 percent. But it wasn’t the giant, household-name companies like Google and Facebook at the top of the list, even though those companies had banner years. Instead, it was slightly smaller — but even faster growing — companies, including the electronic-payments company PayPal and the interactive gaming company Activision Blizzard. S.& P. 500 sectors 2017 percentage change Top performers within the top three sectors Information technology +34.3 % Micron Technology +90.7 PayPal Holdings +87.9 Nvidia +84.9 Activision Blizzard +75.6 Lam Research +75.5 Health care +26.4 Align Technology +135.6 Vertex Pharma. +105.2 Centene +82.1 Intuitive Surgical +74.5 Illumina +69.9 Materials +24.5 FMC +68.0 Avery Dennison +64.6 Sherwin-Williams +53.7 Albemarle +49.2 Freeport-McMoRan +46.1 Industrials +23.8 Financials +20.9 Consumer discretionary +15.0 Utilities +11.0 Consumer staples +10.4 Real estate +6.8 Energy –5.7 % Telecommunication services –11.9 S.& P. 500 sectors 2017 percentage change Top performers within the top three sectors Information technology +34.3 % Micron Technology +90.7 PayPal Holdings +87.9 Nvidia +84.9 Activision Blizzard +75.6 Lam Research +75.5 Health care +26.4 Align Technology +135.6 Vertex Pharmaceuticals +105.2 Centene +82.1 Intuitive Surgical +74.5 Illumina +69.9 Materials +24.5 FMC +68.0 Avery Dennison +64.6 Sherwin-Williams +53.7 Albemarle +49.2 Freeport-McMoRan +46.1 Industrials +23.8 Financials +20.9 Consumer discretionary +15.0 Utilities +11.0 Consumer staples +10.4 Real estate +6.8 Energy –5.7 % Telecommunication services –11.9 The strong markets have pushed stock valuations to dizzying heights. Some investors worry that a correction is coming. Others fret that the low readings on the VIX index, which measures expectations about upcoming market volatility, mean that investors are complacent about possible risks in the market. 25 S.& P. 500 price-to-earnings ratio 20 15 10 5 Plotted weekly 0 ’07 ’09 ’11 ’13 ’15 ’17 80 70 60 CBOE index of volatility (VIX) 50 40 30 20 10 0 ’07 ’09 ’11 ’13 ’15 ’17 25 80 CBOE Volatility Index (VIX) 70 20 60 50 15 40 10 30 S.& P. 500 price-to-earnings ratio 20 5 10 Plotted weekly 0 0 ’07 ’09 ’11 ’13 ’15 ’17 ’07 ’09 ’11 ’13 ’15 ’17 "
nyt://article/8ea648cf-1acd-5747-aec4-2ed811fafd1e,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/08/12/business/wall-street-stocks-bonds.html,2019-08-12T19:56:58+0000,article,News,590,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Nasdaq Composite Index', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Dow Jones Stock Average', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Stocks fell sharply on Wall Street on Monday, knocking nearly 400 points off the Dow Jones industrial average. The benchmark S&P 500 had its worst day in a week as the sell-off put the market deeper into the red for August. The selling was widespread, with technology companies and banks accounting for a big share of the decline. Investors sought safety in government bonds, sending their yields tumbling. The price for gold, another traditional safe-haven asset, ended higher. The costly trade war between the United States and China has rattled markets this month. An escalation in tensions between the world’s largest economies has stoked worries that the long-running trade conflict will undercut an already slowing global economy. “Trade and the concern that as this escalates it continues to wear on confidence to a point that this actually causes a recession, that’s what people are wrestling with,” said Ben Phillips, chief investment officer at EventShares. The latest wave of anxious selling left the S&P 500 index down 1.2 percent. The Dow fell 1.5 percent, and the Nasdaq composite dropped 1.2 percent. The Russell 2000 index of smaller company stocks lost 1.2 percent. The major indexes are down more than 3 percent for August. Even after this month’s stumble, they are up solidly this year, led by the Nasdaq with a gain of 18.5 percent. Anxiety and fear over the trade war continues to hover over the market and has taken stocks on a wild ride in August. The S&P 500 ended last week with its second straight weekly loss following President Trump’s threat to impose more tariffs on Chinese goods and China’s move to allow its currency to weaken. Trump has promised 10 percent tariffs on some $300 billion in Chinese imports that have not already been hit with tariffs of 25 percent. The new tariff would go into effect Sept. 1 and more directly affect American consumers. Last week, Mr. Trump said he would be “fine” if the United States and China did not go ahead with a meeting next month, damping investors’ hopes for a path to resolving the economically damaging trade war. The longer the trade conflict drags on, the more it has the potential to threaten the weakening global economy by discouraging trade and causing businesses to postpone capital spending plans. The International Monetary Fund expects world trade to slow in 2019 for a second straight year. Traders continued to shift money into bonds Monday, sending bond prices sharply higher. That pulled down the yield on the 10-year Treasury note to 1.64 percent from 1.73 percent late Friday. The yield is used as a benchmark for interest rates on mortgages and other consumer loans. The drop in bond yields weighed on financial sector stocks. Technology, health care and consumer discretionary stocks accounted for much of the market’s decline. Major stock markets outside the United States were mixed Monday, with indexes in Europe closed broadly lower while those in Asia ended broadly higher. Investors are facing a relatively slow week for economic reports and corporate earnings. The Labor Department will release its consumer price index for July on Tuesday and the Commerce Department will release last month’s retail sales results on Thursday. Macy’s will report quarterly results on Wednesday and Walmart will post results on Thursday. They are among the last major companies to report their earnings for the latest quarter. Benchmark crude oil rose 43 cents to settle at $54.93 a barrel. Brent crude oil, the international standard, added 4 cents to finish at $58.57 a barrel. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine "
nyt://article/a47e27d4-a5e7-5539-972f-02343b66ca71,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/02/06/business/dealbook/stock-market.html,2018-02-06T05:55:25+0000,article,News,617,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"After days of sometimes wild moves in stock markets, Wall Street had a good day on Tuesday. Investors refocused on the continuing strength of the American economy as shares of consumer companies helped lead broad indexes higher. A panicky global market sell-off — begun Monday when the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index lost more than 4 percent, its worst decline since August 2011 — dissipated on Tuesday, and the S.&P. 500 ended the session up by about 1.7 percent. The Dow Jones industrial average gained about 2.3 percent. The consumer discretionary sector of the S.&P. 500 jumped by more than 2 percent, pulled higher by strength in well-known consumer-facing companies like Amazon, Netflix and Home Depot. General Motors also rose after reporting strong earnings and strong demand for its pickup trucks and sport-utility vehicles. The decline in stock markets on Monday was steep, but not the worst one-day percentage drop in the S.&P. 500. In the history of the index, 38 one-day drops were worse. For months, markets seemed to sleepwalk ever higher, as measures of volatility — the ups and downs of stock prices — hit remarkably calm levels. Investors appeared to grow accustomed to an economic backdrop of lackluster growth and inflation, a state of affairs that ensured powerful global central banks would continue to support markets with a range of policies. But that peaceful climb ended in recent days. Investors have become worried that the solid economy in the United States could be showing early signals of inflationary pressure and that the Federal Reserve could raise interest rates more quickly than previously expected. Those concerns drove yields on long-term Treasury bonds sharply higher in recent weeks, as economic data — such as the Labor Department’s jobs report on Friday — showed wages growing at their fastest clip in years. Before long, there was concern that stock values had peaked, that a long-awaited correction was underway and that investors would suffer even bigger losses if they waited too long to dump their holdings. The result was Monday’s sell-off. (See how Monday’s plunge compares with previous bad days on Wall Street.) But Tuesday’s results put a brake to the slide, at least for now. While President Trump has regularly pointed to increasing share prices as a sign of a strengthening economy, Vice President Mike Pence on Tuesday largely dismissed the latest falls as simply “the ebb and flow” of stock markets. Mr. Pence, who was speaking to reporters as he headed to Asia, said the United States economy remained strong, pointing in particular to record-low unemployment and signs of accelerating wage growth. (Here’s a look at how Mr. Trump has tied his political fortunes to the stock market.) The Treasury secretary, Steven Mnuchin, said it was possible that algorithmic trading programs were partly responsible for recent volatility in the stock market. “I have heard from others that it has played a role — as there’s more programmed trading, this tends to have volatility in both directions,” he said Tuesday, adding that market participants are acting in an orderly fashion and that there are no liquidity problems. In a sign of investor confidence, yields on the 10-year Treasury note rose on Tuesday. Spooked investors had bought supersafe government bonds in recent days after being startled by the market sell-off, bringing yields lower. So, the rise in yields suggests investors are regaining their nerve. (The Upshot looks at economic data that paint a more optimistic picture than the stock market.) But pockets of volatility remain. A measure of expected market turbulence, the CBOE Volatility Index, known as the VIX, has risen sharply. It has hit its highest level since 2011, rising more than 160 percent in February alone. Follow Matt Phillips on Twitter: @MatthewPhillips. Jack Ewing, Alexandra Stevenson and Alan Rappeport contributed reporting. "
nyt://article/d373f486-b11a-52d2-bb31-a8cbdcc868f3,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/11/07/business/election-markets.html,2018-11-07T09:00:30+0000,article,News,533,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Stocks jumped on Wednesday, extending a recovery from the sharp sell-off in October with broad-based gains, after midterm elections that will split control of the United States government between both major parties. The S&P 500 rose 2.1 percent, led by giant technology companies including Amazon, Apple and Google. The tech-heavy Nasdaq composite index rose 2.6 percent, its strongest gain this month. Stock in consumer discretionary companies climbed 3.1 percent, in a sign of growing optimism that President Trump, stung by his party’s loss of the House of Representatives, could seek a win by striking a trade bargain with China at the Group of 20 summit meeting this month. Shares of Wynn Resorts, the casino company with significant business in China, jumped 3.9 percent. After weeks of uncertainty heading into the election, investors seemed to focus again on the strong fundamentals for American businesses, helping fuel the gains on Wednesday. In the voting on Tuesday, Democrats secured control of the House in the next Congress, while the Republicans padded their majority in the Senate. A divided government is conventionally thought of as good for stock investors, because it means lawmakers are unlikely to produce sweeping policy changes. “Investors can basically refocus their mental energy away from the macro and back to the micro, where earnings are really good and valuations are really reasonable,” said Julian Emanuel, chief equity strategist at the institutional brokerage BTIG. Industrial shares rose, bolstered by renewed hope for a bipartisan infrastructure-spending bill. The construction machinery maker Caterpillar, which also has large exposure to China, rose 4.5 percent. Health care shares rallied on the prospect that major health legislation is much less likely. Managed care companies that sell contract Medicaid services to state governments and insurance products on health exchanges established under the Affordable Care Act rose sharply. “You worry less about large sweeping regulatory change,” said Zack Sopcak, an equity analyst covering managed care companies for Morgan Stanley. “It means a repeat of ‘repeal and replace’ is off the table,” he added, referring to the potential for a wholesale replacement of the law, commonly known as Obamacare. After an ugly sell-off in October, investors appear to have regained their appetite for stocks. The S&P 500 has risen in four of the first five trading days of November. The 2.1 percent gain on Wednesday for the broad index of large companies was its third-best showing this year. That turn of events reflects a dizzying swing in market sentiment. As recently as Oct. 29, the market was down more than 1 percent for the year after a rout that started in September had vaporized nearly 10 percent in gains. At that time, investors saw ubiquitous threats to the nearly decade-long rally for stocks. The potential pitfalls included rising interest rates, climbing commodity and wage costs, signs of slowing growth in China and Europe and the tariff war between the United States and China, the world’s two largest economies. Most of the issues remain unresolved, but the markets have found their footing and trading seemed to suggest investors see reasons for optimism now that the elections have concluded. Equity investors are now sitting on gains of more than 5 percent for the year. "
nyt://article/6de9e2e7-1e8a-5934-922e-807ef73b7d7c,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/06/20/business/stock-market-record.html,2019-06-20T20:02:57+0000,article,News,616,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Interest Rates', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"It’s the Fed to the rescue. Again.  Stocks hit a record high on Thursday, a day after the Federal Reserve opened the door to interest rate cuts in the coming months. The signals sent by the central bank seemed to confirm growing certainty among investors that the Fed would lower rates this summer, in the face of a slowing global economy, downbeat signals from financial markets and uncertainty related to the United States-China trade war.  The S&P 500 closed up 1 percent, at 2,954.18, eclipsing the previous high-water mark for the benchmark index of American shares that was reached on April 30.  The market is now up more than 7 percent this month, a rally led by shares of materials, technology and consumer discretionary companies.  June’s bounce has repaired all the damage done during an ugly May, a slump set off in part when talks between China and the United States publicly fell apart in a storm of tweets, recriminations and the imposition of new tariffs. And the sell-off was accompanied by other indications that investors were betting on a darkening outlook for the global economy: tumbling oil prices and falling bond yields.  But stocks stopped falling in early June, after a number of officials from the Federal Reserve reassured investors that the central bank could lower interest rates if the trade war began to show signs of hurting the economy.  The message got through. In the market for futures where investors bet on the movement of the Fed Funds rate — the rate the Fed targets to set monetary policy — investors began to increase wagers that the Fed would lower rates at its next monetary policy meeting in July. In May, the market was putting roughly 20 percent odds on such a move.  The rebound in June is a repeat of a situation in January, when the central bank backed away from its plans to keep raising interest rates. At the time, the concern was that higher rates — on top of the trade war, slowing growth and the fact that the economic expansion is a decade old — would tip the United States economy into recession. So the retreat, a “pivot” in market terms, was welcome relief and led to the strongest start for stocks to a year since 1987. “It was more than a pivot, it was a pivot plus a full capitulation,” said Bill Zox, chief investment officer for fixed income at Diamond Hill Capital Management, a money management firm in Columbus, Ohio. “That’s firmly the view of all markets: ‘The Fed will do what we want.’” After the Fed’s monetary policy announcement on Wednesday, investors are putting the probability of a rate cut at the Fed’s next meeting in July at 100 percent. Those expectations have helped drive long-term bond yields lower. On Thursday afternoon, the yield on the 10-year Treasury note — an important benchmark — fell below 2 percent for a time. The 10-year note has not closed below that since November 2016.  Falling government bond yields — which occur as bond prices rise — are typically viewed as an indication that investors foresee weaker growth and lower inflation ahead. Such an outlook would seem inconsistent with a stock market that is up nearly 18 percent this year.  But as central banks have repeatedly taken actions aimed at helping the economy recover from the Great Recession, bond and stock markets have often risen at the same time, as investors in both asset classes anticipated benefits from easier monetary policy. "
nyt://article/f2082f80-5ea6-58c3-9f1b-523bd2c44351,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/04/16/business/profit-stock-market-downturn.html,2020-04-16T11:00:07+0000,article,News,910,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Mutual Funds', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Matthews International Capital Management', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Leuthold Group', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'T Rowe Price Group Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Government Bonds', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Funds managed to flourish with diverse bets on Treasury bonds and small Chinese companies — and against select American stocks. With the coronavirus spreading around the world, the vast majority of mutual funds found few refuges, with some falling 20 percent or more. But a select few funds managed to find profits. Here are three, which shorted American stocks and placed bets on small Chinese companies and long-term Treasury bonds. China, where the virus appears to have originated, might seem an unlikely spot for investments these days. And small-capitalization companies there, which are usually more exposed to financial hardships than large-capitalization ones, might seem especially risky. But to think that is to misunderstand Chinese small-caps, said Tiffany Hsiao, lead portfolio manager of the Matthews China Small Companies Fund. Chinese small-caps are arguably financially sturdier than their large-cap counterparts, which typically rely on government loans, she said. “They were capital-starved when they were growing up, so they had to generate their own cash flows. They don’t go out and spend two years building a building before getting their first cent. The customer better pay first,” she said. The best of them, she said, thrive in industries like consumer products and health care that have grown with China’s middle class. She said several of her picks stand to benefit from the pandemic. Joyoung, a maker of small household appliances, has had a surge in sales during China’s lockdown, she said. The appliances were already popular with China’s largest consumer cohort — millennials. “They’re now moving to an age when they’re having kids, and they’re struggling to learn to make food at home,” she said. Another of her holdings is CanSino Biologics, which has developed an Ebola virus vaccine and is now working on one for Covid-19. Ms. Hsiao’s fund, which has a net expense ratio of 1.5 percent, returned 10.58 percent in the first quarter, compared with a loss of 19.6 percent for the S&P 500. How three of the better performers of the first quarter of 2020 fared against the stock market — and against their peer groups of funds. T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  +21.4% U.S. Fund Long Government +21.9% Matthews China Small Companies  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS Matthews China Small Companies  +10.6% U.S. Fund China Region –8.1% Leuthold Grizzly Short  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS Leuthold Grizzly Short  +25.8% U.S. Fund Bear Market +15% T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  Matthews China Small Companies  Leuthold Grizzly Short  + 40 % + 40 % + 40 % + 20 + 20 + 20 0 0 0 – 20 – 20 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 – 40 – 40 J F M J F M J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  Matthews China Small Companies  Leuthold Grizzly Short  +21.4% +10.6% +25.8% U.S. Fund Long Government U.S. Fund China Region U.S. Fund Bear Market +21.9% –8.1% +15% T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term  +21.4% U.S. Fund Long Government +21.9% Matthews China Small Companies  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS Matthews China Small Companies  +10.6% U.S. Fund China Region –8.1% Leuthold Grizzly Short  + 40 % + 20 0 – 20 S. & P. 500 TOTAL RET. – 40 J F M FIRST-QUARTER RETURNS Leuthold Grizzly Short  +25.8% U.S. Fund Bear Market +15% As its name hints, the Grizzly Short Fund comes into its own during bear markets. It sells short stocks its managers judge to be overvalued, and that strategy tends to work better in falling markets. In short selling, an investor bets that a stock will sink. The investor borrows the stock and agrees to sell it to someone else. If, as hoped, the stock does drop, it’s bought at the lower price and delivered to that buyer. That difference, minus transaction costs, is the short seller’s profit. If the stock rises, the short seller loses, as the promised shares still must be bought and delivered. Greg M. Swenson, a portfolio manager of the Grizzly Short Fund, said he and Kristen J. Perleberg, who runs the fund with him, rank stocks based on a variety of factors, including lack of financial discipline and potential for earnings disappointments. They short those that rank worst. “We’re looking at the weakest end of the spectrum — the most expensive, the lowest quality and the lowest growth,” he said. Mr. Swenson said they also use strict rules to decide which bets to abandon. They pull out if a stock rises too much — typically, if it outperforms the market by 20 percent or more — or grows to more than 2 percent of the portfolio. “We like using a quantitative approach, because it takes your emotions out of it,” he said. With a typical stock fund, holdings shrink as they lose value. But in a short fund, everything is upside down, Mr. Swenson said. “If a stock is going against us, it’s getting bigger every day, and our losses are compounding.” The Grizzly managers short individual stocks. They don’t, like some competing funds, short indexes representing entire sectors. Even so, their short positions have lately clustered among consumer discretionary, information technology and industrial shares. Together, those represented about half the portfolio. Mr. Swenson cautioned that the fund isn’t for everyone. It’s intended to provide diversification within a broader portfolio, especially for investors with lots of exposure to stocks. It can help hedge the stocks’ downside risk. Anyone pondering investing should understand that “if the market goes up 20 percent, this fund is going down,” he said. The Grizzly fund, with an expense ratio of 1.6 percent, returned 25.8 percent in the first quarter. Like short sales, long-term U.S. Treasury securities tend to thrive during stock market routs, when many investors trust the Treasury to protect their money. The managers of the T. Rowe Price U.S. Treasury Long-Term Fund run their offering accordingly, emphasizing safety first. “This fund was established in 1989,” said Brian J. Brennan, the portfolio manager. “At the genesis, the mission was ‘Keep it safe.’ The guidelines have changed very little.” That means Mr. Brennan and Michael K. Sewell, the associate portfolio manager, buy only AAA-rated government bonds with maturities of 10 years or more. Eighty-five percent of those are U.S. Treasuries or U.S. Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities. The latter hedge against the possibility of future inflation, which eats away the returns on bonds. The rest of the portfolio is so-called Ginnie Maes, mortgage bonds issued by the Government National Mortgage Association but backed by the U.S. Treasury. The fund is “a defensive product,” Mr. Sewell said. “But we want to make sure, when things are looking better, portions of the portfolio provide positive total returns.” In the first quarter, with a severe recession looming, interest rates dropped, stocks mostly sank and long-term government bonds soared. “Long Treasuries have historically been a great hedge for equity drawdowns, like the one we’ve recently seen,” Mr. Sewell said. That was spectacularly true in the quarter, when the T. Rowe Price fund, with a net expense ratio of 0.3 percent, returned 21.43 percent. "
nyt://article/69d2c5d0-c362-5cc9-a91d-5c23768c774e,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/11/business/economy/markets-plunge-coronavirus.html,2020-03-11T19:43:58+0000,article,News,1503,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Polls and Public Opinion', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Layoffs and Job Reductions', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'World Health Organization', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Europe', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Epidemics', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Stocks plunged anew as the outbreak was officially declared a pandemic and policies to address its impact proved lacking or ineffective. The coronavirus outbreak ended one of the longest winning streaks in market history on Wednesday as the Dow Jones industrial average plunged and global policymakers grappled with the growing economic crisis. The Dow closed with a loss of nearly 6 percent. That brought the decline from its most recent peak to more than 20 percent, the threshold that defines a bear market, after the Dow’s 11-year run in bull-market territory. The broader S&P 500 was off nearly 5 percent for the day, though down less than 20 percent from its peak less than a month ago. On Thursday, stocks in the Asia-Pacific region again fell broadly, with shares in Japan down more than 5 percent at midday. Futures markets signaled grim news for Wall Street. The full economic toll of the outbreak will not be clear for months. But there is mounting evidence that it will be severe. Airlines are warning of empty planes and huge financial losses. A sharp drop in oil prices is threatening to put energy companies out of business and thousands of American drillers out of work. Supply-chain bottlenecks are forcing factories around the world to cut output, even as a slump in consumer confidence is raising doubts that there will be demand for their goods once production resumes. Policymakers on both sides of the Atlantic appeared unwilling or unable to mount an aggressive response to the crisis. A rate cut by the Federal Reserve last week failed to calm financial markets. A similar move by the Bank of England on Wednesday was equally ineffectual. Governments in Europe were struggling to manage their budgets even before the virus struck, limiting their ability to spend heavily to keep their economies afloat. And in the United States, which faces no such constraints, President Trump has resisted aggressive stimulus measures that many economists say are necessary to contain the damage. “If the Trump administration and Congress can’t get it together quickly and put together a sizable and responsible package, then a recession seems like a real possibility here,” said Mark Zandi, chief economist for Moody’s Analytics. He said he saw a roughly 50 percent chance of a recession in the next year. As recently as a week ago, few economists thought a recession was likely. Most thought that any damage from the virus would be brief, and that the economy would experience a sharp, “V-shaped” recovery. Forecasts have become significantly gloomier, however, as the virus has spread in the United States and as the effects around the world have become more pronounced. Italy on Wednesday ordered almost all businesses nationwide to close after earlier travel restrictions failed to contain the virus. Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany said that as much as 70 percent of her country’s population was likely to become infected. The World Health Organization declared the outbreak a pandemic, acknowledging its worldwide scope. transcript From The New York Times, I’m Michael Barbaro. This is “The Daily.”  Today: Global health officials are singling out China and South Korea for the success of their efforts to contain the coronavirus. Donald G. McNeil, Jr. on what those countries are getting right and what everybody else can learn from them. It’s Thursday, March 12. OK. All right, first of all, do you have a fever or a cough? I do not have a fever or a cough. OK. I am healthy. Here, help yourself. Thank you. Do you need me to clip on a microphone or you want this? No, no, no, no. OK.  So can I just start by asking you about what I understand was a rather aggressive studio sanitation regiment that you applied? Me, just now? Yeah. [LAUGHS] Somebody ratted on me, I see. Yeah, I have a little spray bottle of hydrogen peroxide that I keep on my desk — Who doesn’t? Yeah, and I sprayed down the surface of this desk here before I put my elbows on it. I also carry Purell in my pocket. And I wear one glove now, so I look like kind of an aging, completely unfunky, white Michael Jackson imitator. And I disinfect the glove as soon as I get a chance to. Well, we appreciate the fact that you are keeping our studio so clean. So I wonder, Donald, if you could tell me about this news conference on Wednesday afternoon. What happens? Thank you, thank you, Tarik. Good afternoon, everybody. So this was the World Health Organization, the W.H.O., which is part of the United Nations. And they held their regular Monday, Wednesday, Friday meeting on the coronavirus epidemic, a press conference. In the past two weeks, the number of cases of Covid-19 outside China has increased thirteenfold. And the number of affected countries has tripled. It started off with the director general, Dr. Tedros, enunciating the new figures for the world, as he does every one of these. There are now more than 118,000 cases in 114 countries. And 4,291 people have lost their lives. And then he went into the big news — We have therefore made the assessment that Covid-19 can be characterized as a pandemic. — which is that the W.H.O. is declaring this a global pandemic. Pandemic is not a word to use lightly or carelessly. The W.H.O. has resisted using the word, even though it’s clear the disease has spread all over the world. Because they were afraid if they said it, then countries would say, OK, we’re throwing up our hands, it’s hopeless, we’re not going to be able to fight it. W.H.O. has been assessing this outbreak around the clock. And we are deeply concerned, both by the alarming levels of spread and severity, and by the alarming levels of inaction. I think they chose to use it this time because they believe that many countries are not moving rapidly enough, are not preparing, are not taking seriously enough. It doesn’t actually change anything in the world, but it raises the level of attention. And they’re ringing the alarm bell even louder and goading people to move faster. Right, because I’ve had a sense, and I think you have to, that this has been a pandemic for quite some time. And so this moment feels a little bit like the weatherman coming out and telling you it’s raining, even though you’ve been outside, soaked in the rain, for hours. Yeah, that’s right. All countries must strike a fine balance between protecting health, minimizing economic and social disruption, and respecting human rights. But they want it emphasized that although this is the first pandemic ever caused by a coronavirus, they also believe this is the first pandemic that can be brought under control. More than 90 percent of cases are in just four countries. And two of those, China and the Republic of Korea, have significantly declining epidemics. And they believe that because China and South Korea appear to be bringing the epidemic under control. We’re in this together to do the right things with calm and protect the citizens of the world. It’s doable. I thank you. Right. And I watched this news conference. And I noticed that the people overseeing this news conference singled those countries out for praise. But I wonder if that means that they were scolding other countries by omission. In effect, yes. Other countries for not taking it seriously enough and not moving aggressively enough. But they didn’t name any countries. And when they were asked to name the countries, Mike Ryan, who’s the head of the emergencies program said — The W.H.O. doesn’t interact in public debate or criticize our member states in public. The answer to that question is you know who you are. OK, so with all that in mind, let’s talk about the different approaches that governments around the world are taking, some of which were referred to during this news conference. And since the W.H.O. leadership started with China on Wednesday during this news conference, let’s start there as well. Why do you think China is being praised here? China has cut its epidemic from over 3,500 new cases a day in late January to only 24 new cases yesterday. Wow, that’s pretty extraordinary. It’s stunning. No one thought it could be done. Public health experts, to me, say if they can keep the cases down as they let millions of people in China out of their houses and back into factories and subways and restaurants, if they can keep it up, then they have, you know, captured the wind. They’ve done something that nobody else has ever done before. And so how did they do it? Really aggressive measures. Some people call them brutal and draconian. The W.H.O. calls them aggressive. So the testing regimen there is nothing like ours. You do not go to your doctor’s office and ask for a test. They have set up fever clinics all over the place, attached to hospitals. There, you are met in a separate part of the hospital, maybe even in a parking lot, by doctors completely garbed head-to-toe in personal protective gear. They take your temperature. They ask you some questions to see what your symptoms are, if you’ve gotten some reason to think you’re exposed. And then they quickly to a white blood cell count on you. And, if they have it, a flu test. And those are two ways to eliminate the possibility that you have either flu or a bacterial pneumonia. If you’re still a suspect case, then they whip you into a CT machine. A CAT scan? A CAT scan. In this country, CAT scans take half an hour to an hour. The portable CAT scanners they were using, they were doing 200 scans a day on some of them. Wow, so this is all industrially scaled? Absolutely, it is industrial diagnosis. Then, if you were still a suspect case, whether they had the answer then or whether they wouldn’t have the answer until the next day, you still stayed with them. They found some place to put you up. So this is a no chances approach, in which anyone who might have the virus is not really given a chance to go home, to go back to the office and perhaps transmit it to somebody else. They’re just eliminating all those possibilities. Correct, there is no home quarantine in China. Not for people who are known to be infected or suspected to be infected, because they realized it wasn’t working. So when you see those pictures of the giant gymnasiums in the stadiums with beds in them, those were separate isolation areas for suspect cases who were kept away from the confirmed but mild cases. And you had gymnasiums for men, gymnasiums for women — I mean, these are really not gymnasiums but hospitals — and those for kids. And they separated kids from their families. And mom and dad were not allowed to visit. Wow.  So, why is it so important and effective that home isolation has been eliminated in China? Because that feels somehow pivotal to this all. 75 percent to 80 percent of all the infections in China were within family clusters. So they knew that if you got people out of the family before they infected everybody else in the family, you could cut your caseloads. So it sounds from what you’re saying, like the most distinctive element of the Chinese approach is not that curtains are being dropped around entire regions of China — although that has gotten a lot of attention — but instead the procedures and restrictions and isolating tactics within those cordoned off districts that the Chinese government has pursued. That’s part of it. The other important part is they are looking incredibly aggressively for cases. So everywhere you go, your temperature is taken. Every building you walk into, every train station, every bus station. Even trying to get into your own apartment building, there’ll be a committee there from the apartment building committee who will take your temperature before you go home. And if you’ve got a temperature, you are immediately told to report to one of the fever clinics. So they’re catching everybody with fever. Wow. So that is China. And the portrait you have painted is of a incredibly aggressive approach. The next country that was praised by the W.H.O. on Wednesday was South Korea. What has been their approach and how does it contrast with China? South Korea started later than China. Its outbreak was mostly confined in one southern city and mostly, in the beginning, to members of a very large church there. But the infection spread throughout the church like wildfire. And so now, the government is doing contact tracing on more than 200,000 members of that church, trying to find every one of them who’d been exposed. And they’re making sure that everybody who is in contact with those people is in quarantine and calling in with their symptoms. And the minute they have symptoms that indicate they might be infected, they end up going into isolation centers with other infected people. They’re not staying home with their families to infect them. So South Korea is following the China model. And the doctor who’s in charge of it, who is also in charge during their big MERS outbreak a few years ago, told the W.H.O. that he believes they’re taking the heat out of the rising cases. The cases are actually beginning to go down. You know, they’ve been at this much less time than China has, but they’re following the model. OK, so Italy was not praised by the W.H.O. But Italy has taken some of the most dramatic actions in Europe, which was closing down much of the country’s North, they said, and restricting movements in and out. So why has that not risen to the level of praiseworthy, do we think, in the eyes the W.H.O.? Because Italy is playing catch up. They, like us right now, were refusing to take the threat seriously in the beginning. They wanted to keep, you know, the clubs open into the evenings. They didn’t want to play soccer games without fans in the stands. They didn’t want to shut down movement. And then in the North, they discovered that they had a gigantic outbreak that has now got their intensive care units absolutely full up and a lot of people dying. Italy is now number two in deaths in the world. They got 600 dead out of 10,000 confirmed cases. So they’re in real trouble. So basically, they just waited too long. They waited too long, and they were resistant to the idea of social distancing. And also, they wanted to try to manage everybody at home, all the mild at home. They didn’t want to isolate cases in centers the way the Chinese did. And now, Italy has gone to the W.H.O. and asked them, tell us how China did it because we’re out of control. Italy wants to know how to replicate the success of China now? Correct, which means really aggressive measures.  We’ll be right back. OK, Donald. Finally, of course, we have the United States. And we now know we’ve had major testing problems in the United States. We talked about those on yesterday’s “Daily.” We have outbreaks and clusters across the country. And my sense is that while a lot of industry and educational institutions and local governments are taking actions to limit exposure and contain the spread, the federal government in the U.S. is not taking the kind of sweeping actions we’re seeing in China, in South Korea, or in Italy. Does that feel right to you? It’s absolutely right. I mean, we have been in a completely headless chicken phase of the response for a few weeks now, where we weren’t able to produce tests. Now, we’re in a sort of denial phase, where parts of the government are saying shut down South by Southwest, shut down Comic-Con, cancel March Madness, and things like that. And other people are saying, this is all ridiculous and the panic is overdone. And the guidance from the top is confused. We’re not conveying the sense of the seriousness of the threat. People imagine that they’re just going to be inconvenienced, they’re going to be out of school, it’s going to be a long spring break. This could go on for months if it goes out of control. That’s very difficult for Americans to grasp. And Donald, when you think about the federal government in the U.S. and its approach, is it doing any of the things that you and other health leaders have identified as the effective elements of the Chinese approach or the South Korean approach? No. We’re not making sure that everyone is diagnosed at a fever clinic, where the doctors are protected and the results are available virtually immediately. We’re not realizing that people who are infected cannot go back to infect the rest of their families. They’re going to have to go into isolation. And we’re not recognizing the fact that you may have to keep a whole lot of people off the streets and out of the way, and find a way to feed them, in order to bring the epidemic under control. Italy is realizing that now. Unfortunately, we are basically right now following the Italian model. What do you think it would take to change the American mentality around this and also the federal government’s level of aggression? Well, this is really sad, but in every epidemic I’ve ever covered, whether that was AIDS in Africa or Zika here, people don’t believe the disease is going to get them until somebody they know gets it and suffers. What America may need is a Rock Hudson moment. Hmm, explain that. OK. Rock Hudson was incredibly important to the awareness of AIDS in this country. Here was a man who was one of the most gorgeous leading men of his day. Kissed every woman in Hollywood on the screen. And in 1985, rumors began to spread that maybe he didn’t have liver cancer. He had appeared with Doris Day, his old co-star, in a promo for her series. And he looked gaunt and was barely coherent. And not long after that, he moved to France for treatment. And President Ronald Reagan, who was an old friend of his — they were leading men in Hollywood together — called him at the hospital to check and see how he was doing. And not long after that was the first time Ronald Reagan ever uttered the word “AIDS” in private. Now, it had taken from 1981, when the disease was discovered, until September 1985 for Ronald Reagan to say the word “AIDS.” And for America to realize that there was a disease ravaging the gay community, but it might strike people that they knew and were familiar with and maybe never recognized were gay. Like Rock Hudson. Like Rock Hudson. And Rock Hudson died in October. And five days later, Congress passed a bill authorizing $220 million to find a cure for AIDS. In other words, Rock Hudson was the catalyst for the entire country to realize just how urgently this epidemic — in that case HIV, you’re suggesting now coronavirus — needed to be confronted. Yeah. People, unfortunately, do not believe a disease will strike them until it strikes somebody they know and identify with. Donald, let’s suppose that there is a Rock Hudson moment in the United States that really galvanizes how the public views the coronavirus and the way the government approaches it. I still have the sense that the reason why China could do what it did is because it’s an authoritarian government. So is what they did possible in a democracy? Can the United States, can Italy accomplish what an authoritarian country like China has done over the past few months? It is absolutely much more difficult for a democracy, where people are used to getting their way and telling their leaders what they think to do it. But we’ve done this before when the threat is big enough. When the threat is big enough, America can get organized. Right now, it’s in a lot of denial and finger-pointing.  There was something that Tedros said in the W.H.O. press conference. That you have to strike a balance between the right to life and human rights, and try to find that balance in your country. And in America, we’re used to enjoying our civil liberties. We don’t live in an authoritarian system. But if what you’re hoping for is life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness, you have to preserve life, or the other two just aren’t there.  Thank you, Donald. You’re welcome.  My fellow Americans, tonight I want to speak with you about our nation’s unprecedented response to the coronavirus outbreak that started in China and is now spreading throughout the world. Today, the World Health Organization officially announced that this is a global pandemic. In a speech to the nation on Wednesday night, President Trump sought to convey the seriousness of the epidemic, encouraging Americans to take every possible precaution and announcing that he would bar all travel from Europe to the United States, with the exception of the United Kingdom, to limit the spread of the virus. To keep new cases from entering our shores, we will be suspending all travel from Europe to the United States for the next 30 days. The new rules will go into effect Friday at midnight. These restrictions will be adjusted subject to conditions on the ground. Moments after the speech, one of America’s most famous actors, Tom Hanks, announced that he and his wife Rita have tested positive for the coronavirus. We’ll be right back.  Here’s what else you need to know today. On Wednesday, Harvey Weinstein was sentenced to 23 years in prison for sex crimes, as the six women who had testified against him during his trial watched from the front row. In a rambling speech, Weinstein expressed remorse, but said he believed that his encounters with the women were consensual. Within hours of the sentencing, prosecutors in Los Angeles said they had begun the process of extraditing Weinstein from New York to face different charges of sexual assault in California. And — Last night, obviously, was not a good night for our campaign from a delegate point of view. We lost in the largest state up for grabs yesterday, the state of Michigan. We lost in Mississippi, Missouri and Idaho. During a news conference in Vermont, Senator Bernie Sanders said he would press ahead with his presidential campaign, despite a series of back-to-back defeats to Joe Biden that have severely narrowed Sanders path to the nomination. We are winning the generational debate. Our campaign continues to win the vast majority of the votes of younger people. And I am talking about people not just in their 20s, but in their 30s and their 40sm, the younger generation — Sanders made both an ideological and generational case for his candidacy, saying that he, not Biden, represented the future of the Democratic Party. Today, I say to the Democratic establishment, in order to win in the future, you need to win the voters who represent the future of our country. And you must speak to the issues of concern to them.  That’s it for “The Daily.” I’m Michael Barbaro. See you tomorrow. The United States, unlike Europe, was on fairly firm economic footing before the virus hit. Unemployment was near a five-decade low, consumer spending and the housing market were strong, and overall growth was slowing but still solid. That should give the economy some cushion. But cracks were already showing. The trade war with China hurt manufacturers and farmers, leaving the economy even more dependent on consumer spending. The Federal Reserve last year cut interest rates three times to try to keep the expansion on track. “The economy was already on its back heels coming into this year,” Mr. Zandi said. “All it was going to take was a shove to put the economy on its back, and it just got a body blow.” Top Wall Street executives, summoned to a Wednesday meeting with Mr. Trump, said the banking system was strong enough to withstand the recent turmoil. “This is not a financial crisis,” Citigroup’s chief executive, Michael Corbat, told the president. “The banks and financial system are in sound shape, and the banks are here to help.” Mr. Trump, often with his arms crossed, appeared to lament the end of the bull market. He cited the strength of the February jobs report and said additional data suggested that the economy was still running smoothly. “Now we’re hitting a patch,” he said. “And we’re going to have to do something with response to this virus.” Investors were not convinced. Hopes for a stimulus package, which helped drive stocks sharply higher on Tuesday, faded Wednesday, and so did the rally: Oil prices tumbled again, pulling down energy stocks. Consumer discretionary stocks — a sector that includes both cruise lines and restaurants — also dived, as investors appeared to price in a downturn in spending among Americans. Analysts at Goldman Sachs said Wednesday that they expected the S&P 500 to fall another 11 percent by midyear. “Even if the virus situation improves, we’re looking at people just being very cautious about going back,” said Nariman Behravesh, chief economist for IHS Markit. “It’s going to take a while for people to feel comfortable to go back into large crowds, to get back on an airplane.” Indeed, no amount of fiscal stimulus or interest-rate cuts will restore canceled flights or postponed events — nor, at a time when health officials are recommending “social distancing,” would policymakers want to. The only thing that could truly prevent economic damage or settle financial markets lies beyond the power of economic policymakers: getting the virus itself in check. “I don’t think it’s something that conventional fiscal and monetary policy can solve,” said Lewis Alexander, chief U.S. economist at Nomura Securities in New York. “It’s not like if you just write a big enough check everything will be fine.” But economists said there was still a window of opportunity to limit the damage and avoid the cascading ripple effects that could cause a recession. Targeted aid for affected industries could help prevent layoffs. Cash payments could allow people to keep spending even if their hours are cut or they miss work because of a quarantine. That window could be closing. The employment site ZipRecruiter said Wednesday that it had seen a sharp decline in postings for jobs in hotels, restaurants and other affected industries, one of the first wobbles in the labor market. Consumer confidence in March suffered its largest single-month drop of Mr. Trump’s tenure in office, according to a nationwide poll conducted for The New York Times by the online research firm SurveyMonkey. The decline was some of the first evidence that the outbreak — and the financial market turmoil it has caused — is threatening consumer spending, the linchpin of the decade-long economic expansion. The drop in confidence is not yet dire: More people (39 percent) expected very good or somewhat good business conditions in the coming year than those who expected very bad or somewhat bad conditions (22 percent). But sentiment could be shaken further by the continuing financial turmoil. The poll was conducted last week and completed on Sunday, before stock markets dropped 8 percent on Monday in a single day of virus-driven losses. Adding to the challenge, the people most at risk of losing their jobs or hours are mostly service workers: hotel housekeepers, airport vendors, waiters and waitresses. Those workers are less likely than white-collar workers to have paid sick leave, and they are less likely to have the financial resources to weather a period of reduced income. That could worsen the impact on consumer spending, said Michelle Meyer, chief U.S. economist for Bank of America Merrill Lynch. “That’s the part of the economy that is presumably most budget constrained, so they don’t necessarily have savings to draw down or lines of credit they can use,” she said. “An income shock in that population becomes a consumption shock more quickly and potentially more deeply.” Efforts to fight the outbreak are likely to make the economic situation worse, at least in the short run. The experience in other countries offers lessons for the United States. China appears to have been able to get its outbreak under control, but only through shutting down vast regions of the country. South Korea has won plaudits for its decisive response, but that, too, required huge disruptions to daily life and commerce. “The virus is beatable, but the measures that are required to beat it are economy killers,” said Ian Shepherdson, chief economist for Pantheon Macroeconomics, a research firm. The only way to kick-start the economy after such a vast disruption, Mr. Shepherdson said, is through a “blockbuster fiscal response.” There is little evidence so far that such a response is coming. Mr. Trump is proposing a temporary elimination of the payroll tax, a measure with a big dollar figure — it could cost nearly $1 trillion — that would put only a trickle of extra cash into workers’ bank accounts. For people who lose their jobs as a result of the outbreak, a payroll tax cut wouldn’t help at all. Democrats are preparing their own plan, featuring paid sick leave for affected workers as well as breaks on federal student loans and mortgages, block grants to help communities and assistance to help public transit systems stay in operation. Negotiations between the parties have hardly begun. Reporting was contributed by Niraj Chokshi, Matt Phillips, Deborah Solomon and Jim Tankersley. world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Ben Casselman writes about economics, with a particular focus on stories involving data. He previously reported for FiveThirtyEight and The Wall Street Journal. More about Ben Casselman "
nyt://article/d8c361fc-3288-5c10-9076-ca90e1241415,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/02/08/business/dealbook/stock-markets.html,2018-02-09T04:47:48+0000,article,News,768,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Renminbi (Currency)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Stocks on Wall Street ended a volatile week on an upswing, as the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index ended Friday’s trading session about 1.4 percent higher. After Thursday’s session marked a 10 percent drop from the market’s peak in January, the S.&P. 500 and Dow Jones industrial average started higher on Friday, then plummeted, then swung back into positive territory in the afternoon. Asian and European markets tumbled on Friday. Chinese stocks were among the biggest casualties in a broad sell-off across Asia. It was a stunning reversal for Chinese shares, which investors had been snapping up only days before. The cause of one of the most turbulent weeks in recent memory, market participants in the United States said, appeared to be widespread expectations that the global economy is improving and that growth would accelerate in the near future. That has led to fears that interest rate increases could cheapen the value of certain kinds of investments. “Even if stocks continue to rise, they could rise more slowly and could be subject to large drops,” said Kate Warne, an investment strategist at Edward Jones. She said investors were moving money out of riskier stocks like Apple and Disney, which are considered “consumer discretionary” stocks because they don’t serve basic daily needs, and into safer areas like utility stocks and United States Treasury notes. “Longer-term investors should stay invested and not let this worry them. This is an opportunity to buy at lower prices,” Ms. Warne said. Many investors are now growing nervous that central banks will raise interest rates in a bid to keep inflation at bay. If policymakers move too quickly, their efforts could temper the global growth. Anthony Clemente, the chief executive of Canaras Capital, which specializes in high-yield loans and has $1.3 billion under management, said some of the market movement appeared to be an effort by portfolio managers to protect themselves from volatility in stocks rather than a broader fear of market turmoil. “It’s really out of equities and inflows into the debt markets,” he said. “There’s an expectations that yields — fixed income and debt instrument — are the place where you will want to be at some point.” Whatever the cause, there is now little doubt that markets are jittery. After being lulled into a sense of complacency by years of steadily rising stocks, even small worries can snowball into a bad day for stocks. The losses can then feed on themselves in a financial industry dominated by computerized trading systems, with the weakness in the United States spreading around the world. “Asia is going to be the tail that gets wagged by the U.S. dog,” Timothy Moe, chief Asia Pacific strategist at Goldman Sachs, said on Friday. As with stocks in the United States, Chinese shares have surged in recent months, on the back of a strong economy. An improved global outlook has led to more buying of Chinese exports. The authorities also seem to have slowed what had been an alarming borrowing binge. But the Chinese market does offer reasons for concern. Investors kept a careful eye this week on China’s currency, the renminbi, which is carefully managed by the Chinese government. It took a hit on Thursday, falling as much as 1.2 percent before strengthening a bit on Friday. Before that, the renminbi had been rising steadily against the American dollar, leading to worries that Beijing might step in further to contain it. World markets can be sensitive to sharp swings in China’s currency. The tough day of trading on Friday put Chinese shares by some measures into correction territory. “We are witnessing the longest rally in the history of Chinese stocks,” analysts at Goldman Sachs wrote to clients early this week, adding, “A tactical correction appears overdue, and markets could fall further.” Shares in Shanghai fell about 4 percent on Friday, while Hong Kong shares lost 3.1 percent. Shares in Tokyo fell 2.3 percent. In Europe, stocks wavered, off more than 1 percent in afternoon trading. In the logic of stock markets, bad news can sometimes be good news. Recent gains in the value of the euro against the dollar and other major currencies were expected to slow exports and potentially put the brakes on the eurozone economy. Slower growth would, in turn, dissuade the European Central Bank from raising interest rates too soon, prolonging the cheap money that has been partly responsible for the bull market. “The E.C.B. has, in fact, a vital interest in keeping euro area interest rates at low levels,” Ralph Solveen, an analyst at Commerzbank, said in a note to clients on Friday. Jack Ewing contributed reporting from Frankfurt. "
nyt://article/96c3799d-35b8-5b6c-bdbf-da116c20186c,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/04/10/business/fisher-price-rock-n-play-recall-infant-deaths.html,2019-04-10T22:44:24+0000,article,News,913,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Cribs (Baby Beds)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Fisher-Price Inc', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Sudden Infant Death Syndrome', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Babies and Infants', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recalls and Bans of Products', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Protection', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Consumer Product Safety Commission', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Accidents and Safety', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"After Fisher-Price’s Rock ’n Play sleeper was linked to multiple infant deaths, the company and a government regulator issued a joint warning to consumers about the product on Friday, stopping short of a recall. But on Tuesday, the American Academy of Pediatrics called on Fisher-Price to withdraw the Rock ’n Play immediately. The group’s president, Dr. Kyle Yasuda, said in a statement that the sleeper, which rocks babies to sleep in a cloth-covered cradle, was “deadly” because it could cause asphyxiation. Fisher-Price, which stood by the safety of the Rock ’n Play and said a recall was not necessary, can keep selling the product. Here’s why. In issuing the safety alert, the consumer commission said it was aware of 10 deaths since 2015 of children 3 months or older linked to the Rock ’n Play. Each of the children had rolled from their backs to their stomachs or sides while in the sleeper without being secured in the product’s harness restraint. [Update: Fisher-Price recalls Rock ‘n Play sleeper linked to infant deaths.] The warning recommended that consumers not use the Rock ’n Play with children older than 3 months or those who can roll over, according to the federal regulator, the Consumer Product Safety Commission. Chuck Scothon, Fisher-Price’s general manager, said in a statement on Wednesday that the Rock ’n Play “meets all applicable safety standards.” “It is essential that the product warnings and instructions are always followed,” he said. But the warning that was issued “did not go far enough to ensure safety and protect infants,” the pediatricians’ group said. Citing reporting by Consumer Reports, the group said the sleeper had been linked to 32 infant deaths from 2011 to 2018, including some involving children under 3 months. The commission said Wednesday that it was investigating other deaths connected the Rock ‘n Play, and that a recall was possible in the future. “C.P.S.C. has requirements it must follow for any decisions concerning recalls,” said Patty Davis, an agency spokeswoman. “If the evidence shows the need for a recall, we will take that step.” Before seeking any recall, the commission must conclude there is a “substantial product hazard.” To make such a finding, it considers factors like whether the risk of injury is obvious to consumers, the severity of that risk and how many people are exposed to the product. Most recalls are voluntary and prompted either by companies contacting the commission with concerns about a product or agreeing to stop selling a product after being approached by regulators. Issuing a recall is a collaborative process. The commission works with companies to decide a recall’s parameters, including the number of affected units and whether consumers should get refunds. In rare cases, the commission can seek a mandatory recall by suing companies that refuse to agree to a voluntary recall, threatening to lay out its case publicly in legal filings. Other federal agencies have their own recall policies. Last month, the Food and Drug Administration said it had found asbestos in cosmetics sold by Claire’s, a retailer focused on products for teenagers. The agency, which said Claire’s had refused to recall the products, urged consumers not to use them. The company later said it had stopped selling the cosmetics at issue and similar items “out of an abundance of caution.” The commission has recently been leaning more heavily on warnings than on recalls, according to Pamela Gilbert, the agency’s executive director from 1995 to 2001. In March, the commission’s website listed 20 recalls for products including an electric bicycle, a riding saddle and a sauté pan. In March 2018, there were 29 such listings. Ms. Gilbert said the shift away from recalls was a “very dangerous trend.” “Consumers react to product recalls with more urgency and more care and attention than they do for warnings,” she said. “When deaths are involved, especially for babies and children, warnings are really not the appropriate remedy.” Joseph Martyak, a spokesman for the safety commission, said that a warning or a safety alert could precede a voluntary recall. He added that the number of safety alerts issued by the agency “is much less than the number of voluntary recalls we achieve every year.” The Washington Post reported this month that a leadership change at the commission under President Trump had allowed Britax, a British manufacturer of child care products, to avoid a recall of its popular BOB stroller, which the regulator had linked to hundreds of accidents. Britax said in a statement last week that it did not agree to a recall of certain strollers because “they are not defective and are safe when used as instructed.” The Rock ’n Play has faced scrutiny outside of the United States. The Australian Competition and Consumer Commission warned parents to keep the product away from children, according to The Sydney Morning Herald. In Canada, the Rock ‘n Play is classified as a “soother” rather than as a “sleeper.” Canadian regulations do not allow the product to be used for unattended sleep, according to Fisher-Price. Ms. Gilbert, who is now a consumer safety lawyer, said that parents in the United States should be better informed about the product’s risks. “This is a discretionary product — if consumers knew that their babies could die, they wouldn’t buy it,” she said. “The penalty for a caregiver failing to use a restraint should not be the baby’s death.” nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Follow Tiffany Hsu on Twitter: @tiffkhsu. "
nyt://article/2a825289-d811-529f-a191-5f56187618a3,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/01/17/business/stock-market-index-equal-weight.html,2020-01-17T12:00:07+0000,article,News,945,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Asset Allocation (Personal Finances)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Exchange Traded Funds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Research', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Financial Planners', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Index fund investing is already immensely popular. But is it time to consider funds that construct indexes differently? Not all funds that track the same index are created equal. For some, inequality is part of the design. Take the S&P 500 and the S&P 500 SPDR E.T.F. Apple is the S&P 500’s largest constituent, 4.7 percent in early January. News Corporation, the smallest member, accounted for less than 0.01 percent of the index. That’s because the S&P 500, like many other major indexes, are “capitalization weighted,” meaning that each company’s value, or market capitalization, determines how much weight it has in the index. The idea is to get a faithful representation of the stock market by giving each individual stock its appropriate relative value. But that’s not the only way to build an index. One alternative is to maintain roughly the same allocation to every company. An equal-weighted version of the S&P 500, for example, will adjust its holdings periodically to ensure that Apple, News Corporation and everything in between makes up just 0.2 percent of the portfolio. The Invesco S&P 500 Equal Weight E.T.F. does that. Like a lot of things in investing, there are merits to both methods. Over some very long periods, equal-weighted funds have beaten equivalent capitalization-weighted funds, but over the last few years, the latter have outperformed. “The equal-weight approach” involves “making sure exposure remains diversified,” said Todd Rosenbluth, director of E.T.F. research at CFRA Research. If Apple, the biggest stock in the S&P 500, soars, it will give a big lift to the traditionally composed index. In an equal-weighted version, though, Apple will provide a more muted benefit. “The downside is that winners can continue to climb higher, and we’re certainly seeing that this time around,” Mr. Rosenbluth said. Beyond greater diversification, proponents say, equal weighting benefits from a greater emphasis on stocks of smaller companies and ones in more economically sensitive, so-called value, industries. And because equal-weighted portfolios must be rebalanced periodically, it is an inherently contrarian strategy, forcing investors to “trim what is newly beloved and buy what is hated,” said Rob Arnott, chairman of the investment advisory service Research Affiliates. Invesco S&P 500 Equal Weight is rebalanced quarterly. A competitor, Goldman Sachs Equal Weight U.S. Large-Cap Equity E.T.F., which tracks an index that is nearly — but not exactly — identical to the S&P 500, is rebalanced monthly. Despite the arguments for equal weighting, the strategy remains an acquired taste that comparatively few investors have acquired. The Invesco E.T.F. had $16.8 billion in assets at the end of 2019, according to Morningstar, and Invesco’s equal-weighted S&P 500 mutual fund had less than half that much. Those totals were dwarfed by the $307.4 billion in the S&P 500 SPDR. Proportions were similarly lopsided for other equal-weighted E.T.F.s and their capitalization-weighted equivalents. The case for equal weighting may seem harder to make these days, as the market has behaved in ways that have all but eliminated its advantages. Big stocks have handily beaten small ones for the last year or so, for instance. For longer than that, investors facing a chronically lackluster economy have relentlessly bid up sectors that maintain or expand earnings in times of sluggish growth, such as consumer staples, utilities and technology. At the same time, they have shunned those in value sectors like energy and materials. For equal weighting to excel again may require investors to become fickle again. “What happens in equal weighting is everything starts out equal, and at the next rebalancing you’re going to sell winners and buy more of the losers,” said Elisabeth Kashner, director of E.T.F. research at FactSet Research. “That’s a winning proposition where everything regresses to the mean. It’s a losing proposition in a momentum market where winners keep winning and losers keep losing.” Over longer periods, equal-weighted funds have excelled. Since its inception in 2003, the Invesco S&P 500 Equal Weight has had an annualized return of 11.2 percent, compared with 10 percent for the capitalization-weighted S&P 500 SPDR, according to Morningstar. Over one, three and five years, however, the SPDR E.T.F. has outperformed by at least two percentage points a year. The Goldman Sachs E.T.F., since its introduction late in 2017, has beaten the Invesco fund slightly, but both funds lag the SPDR. Ms. Kashner cited an added cost for equal-weighted funds: greater risk. Invesco S&P 500 Equal Weight has traded over its lifetime with 61 percent more volatility than the SPDR, she said. “You can look at past returns and make statements about performance,” Ms. Kashner said. “What’s more useful is to understand the bets you’re making when you go into something equal weighted. I don’t think there’s a better or worse option.” The added diversification of equal-weighted funds and the prospect of a reversal of the momentum-driven nature of the current market lead some investment advisers to prefer them. “An equal-weight fund avoids the risk of a company that blows up when it’s materially overweight in an index,” said Dan Weiskopf, a strategist for the E.T.F. Think Tank, a website that provides information about E.T.F.s to financial advisers. That risk is higher when a fund focuses on a sector rather than the whole market. The performance of S&P 500 Consumer Discretionary Select Sector SPDR, for example, is largely at the mercy of Amazon, which accounted for 24.2 percent of its portfolio in early January. Home Depot, a distant yet hefty second, made up about 10 percent. Mr. Rosenbluth also favors the strategy, recommending the Goldman Sachs equal-weighted E.T.F., the Invesco one covering the S&P 500 and the Direxion Nasdaq 100 Equal-Weighted E.T.F. He also likes the SPDR equal-weighted sector E.T.F.s. But he acknowledged some reservations. Equal-weighted funds tend to be “more expensive, smaller in size and trade less frequently than the cap-weighted alternatives,” he said. The diversification they provide outweighs those drawbacks, in his view, “but they are things for investors to keep in mind.” nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/caa847a3-1ef5-54b1-98dc-b903d907dded,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/08/19/business/coronavirus-walmart-target-home-depot.html,2020-08-19T22:06:04+0000,article,News,872,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Home Depot Inc', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Lowe's Companies Inc"", 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Home Repairs and Improvements', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Walmart and Target reported record sales in the second quarter, driven by the convenience of one-stop shopping and their e-commerce operations. In the early days of the pandemic, when grocery stores in the United States ran low on staples like toilet paper, people flocked to Walmart and Target to stock up. Five months later, as the number of coronavirus cases remains high, shoppers continue to buy from the big-box retailers in record amounts. On Wednesday, Target reported the greatest percentage increase in quarterly sales in the company’s history. Walmart, which reported earnings on Tuesday, doubled its e-commerce sales. Home Depot’s sales increased more than 23 percent in this year’s second quarter. Wayfair reported earlier that its revenue was up roughly 80 percent year over year. The success of those retailers can be attributed, in part, to their one-stop shopping advantage — both in person and online. It allows budget-conscious shoppers to pick up groceries, clothing, electronics, and home goods at the same time. “In a pandemic, you don’t want to make multiple stops, you want to go to one place that is safe and convenient,” said Andy Mantis, head of data insights for the research firm 1010Data. The pandemic has been devastating for the broader retail industry, with name-brand companies like Neiman Marcus, J. Crew, J.C. Penney and the owner of Men’s Wearhouse among those that have filed for bankruptcy in recent months. But monthly retail sales — after plummeting in March and April — have returned to the level they were at in February, fed in large part by behemoths like Amazon, Walmart and Target. Walmart had strong demand for groceries, as well as for home and sporting goods. With people still largely stuck at home, Target’s electronics sales surged. Home Depot and Lowe’s drew crowds of people eager to finally tackle home improvement projects, with sales of hard surface flooring and interior lighting doing especially well. “These big-box retailers are just perfectly positioned,” said Andrew Lipsman, an analyst at the data analytics firm eMarketer. “They have basically every tailwind at their back.” For shoppers who wanted to completely avoid in-store shopping, big box retailers already had robust e-commerce platforms in place that allowed them to immediately start providing customers with so-called contactless shopping options, including curbside pickup and home delivery of things as diverse as groceries and furniture. “Throughout this crisis, we have deepened our relationship with American consumers and introduced millions of them to our digital fulfillment services,” Target’s chief executive, Brian Cornell, said on an earnings call. These advantages have won the stores new customers who might have previously preferred local grocers or hardware stores. Target added 10 million new digital customers in the first half of this year. “It’s creating a massive opportunity, and if they are smart about it, this is going to help them retain those customers and continue to fuel their growth,” Mr. Mantis of 1010Data said. Whether the retailers are able to sustain this growth will depend partly on how much disposable income their customers have. The stimulus payments and $600 weekly increase to unemployment benefits meant that millions of unemployed Americans were still able to buy necessities at stores like Walmart and Target, and in some cases a few extras, like toys to keep their children entertained at home. But with the $600 payments now stopped, and Congress still deadlocked on an additional aid package, some shoppers may have to tighten their belts. In contrast, many people who have held onto their jobs and are now working from home full time have found themselves with more discretionary income than ever before. People who might have spent money on dining out, travel or event tickets are now redirecting those funds toward home improvement projects like buying a hot tub, building a home movie theater, redecorating a home office or building a guest cottage. “Sales were driven by a consumer focus on the home, core repair and maintenance activities, and wallet share shift away from other discretionary spending,” Lowe’s chief executive, Marvin Ellison, said on Wednesday in an earnings release. The recent sales growth of big box stores is good for the economy, keeping supply chains strong and helping ensure job security for the millions of people the retailers employ, said Matt Williams, managing partner at the Brand Federation, a consulting firm. “For the economy, it means consumers are still spending, maybe not at the same volumes and on the same things as in the past, but they’re still spending,” Mr. Williams said. “That’s encouraging.” But it comes with a cost, particularly for small businesses, whose survival has long been threatened by the increasing dominance of corporate retailers. While large retailers like Walmart and Target were deemed essential businesses when the pandemic hit, many small stores were not, and they were forced to close their doors, leading to lost revenue and wasted inventory. Many small businesses did not have a robust e-commerce business before the virus struck, and they have lost customers while they struggle to adapt. People are also less likely to start their own businesses during this period, unable to muster enough capital or fearful that their businesses will fail in such uncertain times, said Ryan Gellis, founding partner of RMG Media, a digital commerce agency. “It’s part of why a pandemic is a tragedy,” Mr. Gellis said. “It is not just the loss of life, but the loss of people’s ability to run their own businesses and pursue that American dream.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Gillian Friedman is a business reporter covering bankruptcy, economics and general business news. More about Gillian Friedman "
nyt://article/7052c70e-a567-5b5f-9b51-9c086d4ff1df,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/06/08/business/recession-stock-market-coronavirus.html,2020-06-08T23:23:42+0000,article,News,1163,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Nasdaq Composite Index', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The S&P 500 climbed back above where it began the year on the same day that economists said the United States fell into a recession in February. And just like that, we’re back to where we started. The S&P 500, a leading stock market index, on Monday climbed back above where it began the year — before the pandemic brought the United States economy to a juddering halt, before more than 110,000 Americans died from the coronavirus, and before the police killing of George Floyd in Minneapolis set off nationwide protests. A late-day rally pushed the index into positive territory for 2020, effectively erasing one of the most tumultuous periods in recent American history from the financial record. Stocks rose 1.2 percent — on the same day that economists said the United States fell into a recession in February. Even though the economy has begun to reopen, it is hard to overstate how disastrous the past three months have been and what the long-term consequences are for everything, from the nature of work to the future of certain industries. Tens of millions of people are unemployed, corporate earnings have plummeted, and industries such as tourism, retail and entertainment might never fully recover from the blow dealt to their businesses. But in the stock market, it’s like the pandemic never happened. “Investors seem to have decided that the past three months were just a bad dream that we’re waking up from,” said Scott Clemons, chief investment strategist for private banking at Brown Brothers Harriman, an investment bank. After an initial few weeks of volatility, when the market dropped 34 percent, it has become inured to the near-daily drumbeat of bad news. When the Commerce Department announced on April 29 that the economy shrank at a nearly 5 percent annual rate, its fastest drop since the 2008 recession, stocks rose 2.7 percent. A month ago, when the Bureau of Labor Statistics published what was essentially the worst employment report on record — showing that more than 20 million jobs disappeared in April as unemployment surged to 14.7 percent, the highest since the Great Depression — stocks rose 1.7 percent. So, why is the market behaving this way? In large part, it was the actions of the federal government. Early on, the Federal Reserve stretched its financial safety net wide, announcing it would provide a backstop by using its emergency lending powers to buy assets — from municipal to corporate debt — with newly printed money. Also, it began snapping up government-backed bonds through a newly unlimited buying campaign. That had the effect of keeping bond prices up and yields, which move in the opposite direction of prices, low. And so investors, looking for better returns, began putting their money into the stock market instead, creating upward pressure on prices. “It’s the only way that you can kind of explain what’s going on, is that people really do believe that there is no downside in equity ownership,” said James Montier, a member of the asset allocation team at Grantham, Mayo, Van Otterloo & Company, a Boston-based asset management company. Since March 23, the Dow Jones industrial average has soared 48 percent. The Nasdaq composite index, which is heavily weighted toward technology, is up 45 percent and closed at a record high on Monday, as investors bet that tech behemoths like Amazon and Microsoft were well positioned to benefit from stay-at-home orders around the country. The S&P 500 is also up nearly 45 percent. “I understand fully the recovery in the market, I just think it’s ahead of schedule,” said Leon Cooperman, the founder of the hedge fund Omega Advisors, which in 2018 announced it would convert to a family office to mainly manage the billionaire’s personal fortune. “It’s ahead of schedule because of the government’s policy of giving out free money.” Mr. Cooperman was referring to the flood of money — from both the Fed and the government itself — that has been pumped into the economy and markets. Since the Fed first took steps to stabilize the markets in March, it has created roughly $2.9 trillion, the vast majority of which has gone into financial markets. Separately, the federal government has said it would borrow a record-breaking $3 trillion from April to June, much of which will be channeled to businesses and consumers to keep them afloat during the shutdown. The biggest winners in the stock market rally have been companies whose very existence earlier appeared imperiled by the crisis, with investors now swooping in to buy the most battered shares in hopes of generating the biggest gains. As oil prices stabilized since the worst of the sell-off this year, the stock price of the Apache Corporation, an oil driller, quadrupled. Stock in the oil field services giant Halliburton has tripled. (Both still remain down for the year.) The cruise operators Norwegian and Royal Caribbean are both up more than 150 percent. The S&P’s energy sector stocks have risen more than 90 percent, while consumer discretionary stocks and financials are both up roughly 50 percent. Although it’s well known that market activity is a leading indicator of economic recovery — and investors right now are excited about the reopening of states and the recent May jobs report — skeptics caution that investors may have become overly bullish. “Right now the market thinks we’ll have a V-shaped recovery and a vaccine by the end of the year and I think both of those views are too optimistic,” said Byron Wien, a longtime market observer and the vice chairman of the private wealth group at Blackstone. While Mr. Wien believes the economy is recovering, he thinks it will be a slow return to normal. Wall Street analysts don’t expect that corporate profits for S&P 500 companies will return to 2019 levels until 2021. But the market rally has effectively already priced in all those gains, in part, some say, because of the government actions. Even after accounting for the government’s support, there are significant risks facing investors that could stop S&P 500 companies from generating the profits they did before the virus reached American shores. In recent years, large companies have bought back hundreds of billions of dollars’ worth of stock through share repurchase programs. Such programs helped prop up stock prices. But as companies become more cautious, analysts expect them to instead conserve their cash, removing a key support for share prices. Economic and political tensions between the United States and China — the world’s two largest economies — also remain high, after the two superpowers engaged in a disruptive on-again-off-again trade war over the last two years. A renewed flurry of tariffs could further complicate the recovery for large American corporations as well as the global economy. Such tensions may also be more likely to re-emerge ahead of what could be a contentious presidential election in November. Then, there is the prospect of a second wave of the pandemic, which could set back the economy once more. But despite these potential challenges, market investors appear almost wholly unconcerned. “I think the market is best described as the way people think about second marriages,” said Mr. Wien, 87 years old, who has been watching stocks on Wall Street since 1965. “It’s a triumph of hope over experience.” An earlier version of this article misidentified the position of James Montier at Grantham, Mayo, Van Otterloo & Company. He is a member of the firm's asset allocation team, not its asset management team. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://article/122f9424-e70b-5b4d-9ee4-b1744648489d,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/05/29/business/economy/coronavirus-consumer-spending.html,2020-05-29T21:09:27+0000,article,News,871,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment Insurance', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (2020)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Savings', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shutdowns (Institutional)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Commerce Department', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'University of Michigan', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Government assistance, mainly stimulus checks, provided an overall boost in April. With little immediate outlet, savings soared. Even as emergency government aid gave incomes a boost in April, coronavirus lockdowns caused Americans to shut their wallets, prompting the biggest monthly drop in consumer spending on record. Personal income rose 10.5 percent, lifted by nearly $3 trillion in government transfer payments, mostly in the form of $1,200 checks that millions of households received from the federal government. But with stores closed and most Americans under stay-at-home orders, there wasn’t much opportunity to put that money to work, causing consumption to fall by 13.6 percent. That combination of a cash infusion and nowhere to spend it caused the savings rate to soar to 33 percent, up 12.7 percent from March and the highest level since the government began tracking the information in 1959. The data, reported Friday by the Commerce Department, is further evidence of an economy at a virtual standstill last month. There are preliminary signs that conditions have moderated since then, but the pain continues for many Americans. On Thursday, the Labor Department reported that 2.1 million more workers filed for unemployment insurance last week, bringing the total since mid-March to more than 40 million. Given the plunge in consumer spending, which accounts for more than two-thirds of economic activity, many economists expect a drop of 40 percent or more in gross domestic product in the second quarter. Unemployment is already in double-digits, and each report seems to bring data unimaginable a few months ago. “The numbers were wild,” Gregory Daco, chief U.S. economist at Oxford Economics, said of Friday’s report. “It’s not every year you get these kinds of crazy swings. It requires a bit of coolheadedness to understand what is transitory and what is permanent.” Government payments, which pumped up personal income, he said, “are a one-time shot. If you take these benefits out, then you are left with a massive loss of income.” The $1,200 federal checks made the biggest difference last month, but the government’s $600 in additional weekly unemployment benefits has been significant, too. That supplement to state payments is set to expire in late July. Lingering fear is likely to restrain spending on social activities and discretionary items for a while. There are signs that spending has rebounded slightly in May, Mr. Daco said, but there is a long way to go before activity returns to precrisis levels. “You might see strong growth numbers on spending, but we’re coming out of a deep hole,” he said. The rise in personal income shows how critical the huge stimulus package passed in March was as the pandemic devastated private-sector jobs. Without it, the economic damage would have been even worse, experts say. “This is an unambiguous triumph of countercyclical government spending, which will save the U.S. economy a heap of trouble in the medium to long term,” said Troy Ludtka of Natixis CIB Americas, a corporate and investment banking firm. “If the private sector retrenches, government needs to pick up the slack. This is exactly what data for the month of April depicts.” April represents the deepest point of the current economic downturn, said Michael Gapen, chief U.S. economist at Barclays. “The personal spending data was much weaker than we anticipated, and it spread across virtually all major categories,” he said. But there were reasons for optimism in the report, namely in the income and savings data, he said. “The potential good news is that there’s a large pool of savings that consumers can draw on to support spending as states reopen,” he said. “April should be the trough, and we expect May and June to look better, setting the economy up for a decent rebound in the second half of the year.” In a separate report Friday, the University of Michigan reported that its gauge of consumer sentiment ticked up to 72.3 in May from 71.8 in April. The measure remains 20 points below its 12-month average. “The fact that sentiment stabilized is encouraging,” Mr. Daco said. “But once the stimulus from the federal government fades out, we will be left with depressed incomes. This is a large amount of money for many people.” Allie Radice is one of the unlikely savers who has benefited from federal payments but worries about how long they will last. She successfully applied for unemployment insurance after her work as a dancer as well as a server in the catering industry in Manhattan dried up in March. With the $600 extra weekly benefit from the federal government factored in, her unemployment payments exceed what she earned in shows and catering. She received the $1,200 federal stimulus payment as well. But she has been holding off on big purchases. She spent some of the $1,200 on rent and banked the rest. Now Ms. Radice is saving in case the government doesn’t extend the $600 weekly payments beyond late July, when they are set to expire. She has limited her acquisitions to dance supplies: pointe shoes, a ballet barre and vinyl flooring. “I don’t feel the need to spend,” she said. “There’s nowhere to go out or any reason to get dressed up.” In the meantime, Ms. Radice, 32, is taking online dance classes and voice lessons. “I intend to keep working on my craft,” she said. “I’m still paying rent, but there is unemployment for that. If I didn’t have that unemployment insurance, I’d be in a sticky situation.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Nelson D. Schwartz has covered economics since 2012. Previously, he wrote about Wall Street and banking, and also served as European economic correspondent in Paris. He joined The Times in 2007 as a feature writer for the Sunday Business section. More about Nelson D. Schwartz "
nyt://article/c2929008-2209-5c96-bfae-2b48f6483575,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/01/12/your-money/credit-cards-debt.html,2018-01-12T15:33:47+0000,article,Question,849,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Cards', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Your Money Adviser Now that the holiday spending party is over and credit card statements are landing in mailboxes, consumers would be wise to start whittling their balances, financial advisers and analysts say. Consumers have been spending freely on plastic as the economy motors along. Revolving credit — mostly credit card debt — reached a record $1.023 trillion in November, the Federal Reserve reported this week. (Data for December will be reported in early February.) Serious card account delinquencies remain relatively low, but have been ticking upward. Bruce McClary, spokesman for the National Foundation for Credit Counseling, a nonprofit that oversees a network of agencies offering low-cost or free advice for consumers struggling with debt, said its member offices were seeing more people carrying larger balances from month to month. “It certainly has our attention,” he said. Interest rates are expected to keep rising in 2018, meaning that borrowers who carry balances should reduce their card debt to avoid higher costs, said Matt Schulz, senior industry analyst with CreditCards.com, a card comparison website. How to avoid trouble? For starters, stop adding to your card balance except for emergencies, and seek better terms. “There’s nothing wrong with calling your card issuer to see if you can get a lower rate,” said Bill Hardekopf, chief executive of the card website LowCards.com. He suggests borrowers check their credit report before calling, so they know what kind of a rate they might reasonably expect. And, he advises, “be polite.” Cutting back on card charges isn’t always easy to do. Julie Ford, a fee-only financial planner in New York City who works with clients in their 20s and 30s, said young adults in big cities could get carried away with lifestyle spending and lose track of their budgets amid social pressure to keep up. “That super-expensive gym membership becomes normalized,” she said. January is a good time for consumers to peruse credit card statements and consider what’s really necessary, Ms. Ford said. She urges clients to consider why they got into debt in the first place — was it a one-time medical expense or emergency, or is it a more persistent problem of living beyond their means? If it’s continuous overspending, Ms. Ford suggests clients put off wardrobe updates and suspend those gym memberships, perhaps switching temporarily to jogging. The extra cash can go toward their card balances. Most of her clients are able to pay off the debt within a year. “I tell them, ‘This isn’t forever,’” she said. Lauren Zangardi Haynes, a fee-only planner with Evolution Advisers in Midlothian, Va., suggests setting spending limits for any discretionary items to manage card spending. For instance, she said, she cooks at home frequently and enjoys serving wine with meals. So she established a monthly budget for wine, and makes a trip each month to buy it all at once; when the wine is gone, that’s it until the next month. Buying wine in bulk means “you get a lot of strange looks,” she said, but helps keep a lid on “budget bleed.” Here are some questions and answers about paying off credit card debt: Should I pay down the cards with the highest interest rate, or the highest balance, first? “I always tell people to tackle the highest interest cards first,” Ms. Ford said. Other cards should be put on automatic payment schedules, so at least the minimum monthly payment is made on time. Once the high-rate card is paid down, the borrower shifts extra payments to the card with the next highest rate. Some research suggests, however, that paying down a small balance — regardless of the rate — can fuel a sense of accomplishment and encourage borrowers to keep going. Either method can work — just choose one that motivates you and forge ahead, Mr. McClary said. Should I consolidate my credit card debt at a lower rate? Maybe, if you have a plan to pay off the balance. One option for disciplined borrowers with good credit is to transfer balances to a credit card with a zero-percent promotional rate. Some cards are offering initial no-interest periods of as long 15 or 21 months, Mr. Schulz said, offering a substantial window to pay down a balance. Many cards charge balance transfer fees, however, often 3 percent or more of the amount transferred. And if you are 60 days or more days late in paying, you will lose the special rate. Financial planners advise that the approach can backfire if borrowers don’t change their spending habits. Can debt settlement firms help me shed my card balances? Borrowers should be wary of firms that market the ability to negotiate settlements with card companies on behalf of consumers, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau says. Such firms may charge hefty fees, whether they are successful in reaching a settlement or not. Often, firms tell borrowers not to make payments on their cards while they negotiate, causing late payments and interest to pile up. The consumer bureau, which has taken legal action against some debt settlement firms for making misleading claims, offers more tips about the firms on its website. nyregion opinion your-money your-money nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Email: yourmoneyadviser@nytimes.com "
nyt://article/b431ed1b-a890-51a1-a625-6bd592995049,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/12/16/business/us-retail-sales-november.html,2020-12-16T13:49:31+0000,article,News,980,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stimulus (Economic)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Commerce Department', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Drops in November and October raise questions about how retailers are faring in the all-important holiday shopping season. Consumer spending has been one of the few bright spots in the pandemic-battered economy. Since the spring, Americans have spent more each month even in the face of mounting job losses, political turmoil and recurring virus outbreaks. But that streak is over now. U.S. retail sales declined last month and in October, raising questions about how retailers are faring in the all-important holiday shopping season and about the stability of the broader economy. Sales fell 1.1 percent in November — more than economists had predicted — as spending on categories like automobiles, electronic stores, clothing and restaurants and bars softened, according to a report from the Commerce Department on Wednesday. The Commerce Department also revised its tally for October to a 0.1 percent decline, from an increase of 0.3 percent that had been reported last month. Economists said the declines were “warning signs” that the economy was entering a rough patch and in need of a jolt from another round of government stimulus. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “When the U.S. consumer fails to spend, the world’s economy feels it,” said Beth Ann Bovino, chief U.S. economist at S&P Global. The November slide, in particular, adds new urgency to this week’s discussion on Capitol Hill over a stimulus package. On Wednesday, top Democrats and Republicans were said to be nearing a $900 billion deal that would expand unemployment benefits and provide new stimulus checks to consumers. Consumer spending accounts for roughly 70 percent of total economic growth, so propping up retail sales is central to any plans to stoke a recovery. And economists have been warning that failure to enact more financial support for the unemployed would eventually jeopardize the progress made in reviving the economy. “Weak retail sales in the fall, along with a recent increase in unemployment insurance claims, are warning signs for the economy at the end of 2020,” Gus Faucher, chief economist at PNC Financial Services Group, said in a research note. The uncertainty around holiday spending has been exacerbated as retailers pushed annual sales events into October, in a bid to jump-start the season and prevent crowded stores and shipping delays in November. Many major chains reported sales gains in October, but they were not certain about how that would affect spending in November and December. Mr. Faucher also noted that the boom in shopping this spring after virus restrictions were lifted reduced “the need for purchases at the end of the year.” Amazon’s “Prime Day,” an annual event for online deals, was held in October, and spurred most major chains to introduce bargains around the same time, which may have also encouraged earlier holiday spending. The report on Wednesday showed the steepest declines at electronics and appliance stores, gas stations, clothing stores, department stores and bars and restaurants. The decline in apparel spending has been part of a broader shift this year, as many Americans remain isolated at home, aren’t going to the office for work, have postponed events and are avoiding shopping at malls. Spending at bars and restaurants tumbled 4 percent from October and was down about 17 percent compared with a year earlier, reflecting the strain on these establishments. With restrictions on indoor dining taking effect again in cities like New York and public officials warning of a difficult winter ahead, spending at restaurants is likely to remain lower for several months. Spending on gasoline also declined in November, as more families opted not to travel for Thanksgiving; many people are planning to stay home for Christmas also. Auto sales fell 1.7 percent in November, after months of gains. Consumers have not been following normal shopping patterns this year, making month-to-month sales difficult to predict. Some analysts had not expected the rebound in sales to have lasted so long, given the grim economic realities for millions of Americans. By the summer, retail sales had returned to pre-pandemic levels, helped by previous rounds of stimulus, job growth and low interest rates. But the holiday season, which can make or break a retailer’s business for the year, has been difficult to gauge. Black Friday, which has traditionally signaled the start of the holiday shopping season, was also largely a bust for many retailers as cases were flaring. Some companies reported that in-person traffic that day declined by as much as 50 percent from last year, as shoppers concerned about the virus stayed away from the stores. Still, online sales have been strong through the holidays and November sales were up 4 percent over last year’s figures. The National Retail Federation, an industry trade group, pointed to the online increase from last year as a sign that the holiday season was off to a strong start for retailers. But the organization also said in a Wednesday release that additional fiscal stimulus from Congress was needed, particularly as the remainder of the season remains so unsure because of the spread of the virus. With the new concerns around shopping in person, retailers have been racing to accommodate a surge in shipping demand, grappling with new surcharges and delays with major carriers including UPS and FedEx. But there are limits on how much the boom in online shopping can prop up the overall economy. “There are only so many televisions you can buy,” said Ms. Bovino, the economist at S&P Global. “At some point, you reach saturation.” She said the decline in November sales was “much worse than expected” and reflected several troublesome realities. Unemployed Americans are not able to spend as freely on discretionary items or gifts. And for the workers who still have jobs and remain financially secure, Ms. Bovino said many of them stayed out of stores because of the rising cases. Consumers also spent more on groceries and building supplies in November — reflecting a new focus on necessities. “The economy is hitting a very rough patch,” Mr. Faucher said. “Although widespread vaccine distribution will support stronger economic growth by mid-2021, conditions will remain soft until then, especially if Congress is unable to pass another stimulus bill.” Michael Corkery is a business reporter who covers the retail industry and its impact on consumers, workers and the economy. He joined The Times in 2014 and was previously a reporter at the Wall Street Journal and the Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari "
nyt://article/16c9d5f5-f055-57ef-b39a-52f6291049b7,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/07/10/opinion/affordable-housing.html,2019-07-10T23:13:25+0000,article,Op-Ed,1129,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Public and Subsidized Housing', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Real Estate and Housing (Residential)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Affordable Housing', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Rent Control and Stabilization', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The federal government once promised to provide homes for every American. What happened? Dr. Cohen is the author of the forthcoming “Saving America’s Cities: Ed Logue and the Struggle to Renew Urban America in the Suburban Age.” In recent months America’s affordable housing crisis, a long-simmering issue for people of low and moderate incomes, has burst onto the front page. Rents are rising much faster than income, while the median home price in some 200 cities is $1 million. After a decade of decline, the number of homeless Americans is ticking back up. The private market is clearly failing. Although many city and state governments are motivated to take action, they have limited tools at their disposal, and few of them equal to the task. The Department of Housing and Urban Development, at least under its current leadership, is hardly stepping up. Indeed the very idea of a federal commitment to affordable housing seems unrealistic today. And yet not long ago, America made just such a promise: the Housing Act of 1949, which, in the optimism of the immediate postwar moment, vowed to provide “a decent home and a suitable living condition for every American family.” We need that same bold national vision today. At its root, the crisis is a supply problem. Between 2011 and 2017, the country lost four million low-rent apartments. This has driven up demand for what remains, with the predictable result that a third of all households spend more than 30 percent of income for shelter. In many prospering cities, large numbers pay more than 50 percent.  Evictions are epidemic. Waiting lists for subsidized apartments and housing vouchers intended to help low-income Americans “move to opportunity” grow ever longer, so long that some cities have stopped taking new names. A recent study by the Joint Center for Housing Studies at Harvard anticipates that rent restrictions could expire on about 1.2 million units by 2029. Most Americans would agree that a stable residence is a prerequisite for steady employment, their children’s education and a thriving democratic society. A permanent address is required to vote, and consumers’ discretionary income — what they don’t spend on things like housing — fuels a healthy national economy.  And yet aside from a few Democratic presidential hopefuls, the political conversation around housing has been muted, and the political will to act at the federal level has been almost nonexistent.  That’s in sharp contrast to the mid 20th century. From the 1930s into the 1970s, the federal government intervened in private real estate markets on behalf of the general good, without fear of undermining the capitalist economy.  Under President Franklin Roosevelt’s New Deal, the federal government built the first urban public housing. Although never aimed at the very poor, these projects provided much needed affordable homes for working people. During World War II, rent control was an accepted part of the price regulations needed on a home front vulnerable to inflation and shortages.  After the war, when the nation faced an enormous shortage of homes, Congress approved programs aimed at subsidizing the cost of housing for low- and moderate-income Americans. These programs never went as far as many “housers” — those committed to a European-style social housing agenda — would have liked, and were always constrained in scale by a vigilant real estate industry. But they still expanded the housing options available to those with limited incomes. Labeled “urban redevelopment” in the Housing Act of 1949 and “urban renewal” in its successor, the Housing Act of 1954, these programs have been derided by many historians. Too much demolition took place, particularly in the early years, and city planners too often sought to replicate their suburban counterparts’ car-oriented schemes.  But there were also mortgage subsidies for nonprofit organizations and private developers constructing subsidized housing, rent subsidies to tenants, and funding to create housing for the elderly. Much attention has been paid to how the federal government created the postwar suburbanized metropolis, with its expansive highways and mortgage supports that favored suburban communities while redlining urban ones. But federal programs also helped cities stay viable from 1950 to 1975. Mistakes were made, but lessons were learned. And over time, redevelopers increasingly engaged local communities in planning. What has particularly been forgotten are the progressive steps that federal subsidies made possible. For example, in 1968 New York State created the Urban Development Corporation, with a mandate to build thousands of units of subsidized housing and reinvigorate declining industrial cities. Under the direction of the veteran urban redeveloper Edward J. Logue, this authority relied on funding from state appropriations and private bond sales, but the real engine was robust federal backing, both in funds and political support.  During its seven-year run, it built 33,000 units of housing, developed three new towns — including the intentionally mixed-income, mixed-race and mixed-age Roosevelt Island in New York City — and fostered a spirit of architectural and technological innovation to find ways of delivering housing more efficiently, more aesthetically, and more affordably. Marcus Garvey Park Village in Brooklyn’s Brownsville neighborhood was a successful prototype of low-rise, high-density subsidized housing. The Urban Development Corporation ran into trouble when it took a progressive step too far, using its statewide authority to tackle inequities between city and suburbs. In 1972, it began a project to build 100 affordable housing units in nine towns in wealthy Westchester County, provoking a fierce suburban backlash. That, combined with a 1973 moratorium by President Richard Nixon on all congressionally approved spending on housing and cities, spelled doom for the corporation — and a steady decline in federal responsibility for housing and cities. Since the 1980s, the United States has primarily depended on private, market-oriented solutions to its housing and urban problems — strategies like using corporate tax credits to construct low-income housing, Section 8 vouchers and fees squeezed out of developers of luxury projects. But they aren’t enough to meet today’s crisis. Moreover, too often cities find themselves racing each other to the bottom to woo corporate investors like Amazon, with giveaways that sacrifice future tax revenues and add burdens to city services.  The housing crisis and climate change raise different challenges, but solving both of them requires greater commitment to re-empowering the federal government to act in the public interest. Only Washington has the resources and the scope to tackle these dire threats to the nation’s and the planet’s future.  In 1975, Ed Logue, the visionary head of the Urban Development Corporation, said, “We cannot allow basic public policy” to be made “in corporate board rooms.” And yet, for half a century, that’s exactly what we have done, to our great misfortune. Lizabeth Cohen is a professor of American history at Harvard and the author of the forthcoming “Saving America’s Cities: Ed Logue and the Struggle to Renew Urban America in the Suburban Age.” The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. nyregion business opinion opinion nyregion business arts nyregion magazine "
nyt://article/df6149fb-68b7-5ef9-b1be-b8f11bb7fed0,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/10/02/business/china-consumers.html,2019-10-02T14:47:45+0000,article,News,1178,"[{'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Chinese consumers, a $4.9 trillion force, transformed the global economy. With their own economy slowing, they are pulling back. ZHENGZHOU, China — Forty years after China began its near-miraculous run as the world’s most powerful economic growth engine, its people are experiencing something new and unsettling: a feeling that the best times may be behind them.  The Chinese economy is slowing, and the cost of living is rising. The trade war with the United States shows no sign of ending. Wage growth is sluggish. More young people are chasing fewer job prospects. Chinese consumers, who have become more cautious over the past year, are now staging a broad retreat. They are buying fewer cars, smartphones and appliances. They are going to the movies less and taking fewer trips abroad. They would rather stick their money in the bank.  For China’s young people, who have never experienced a prolonged slump in their lives, the shift is especially stark. China has seen slowdowns before, but its consumers kept spending through most of those downturns.  Now young people have more reasons to be worried. Job prospects for recent college graduates have worsened over the past year, according to data from the job search website Zhaopin.com, and graduates seeking jobs outnumber openings. Many of those openings are low-paying service-sector jobs.  “For young people in their 20s, it’s the first real economic downturn that they’ve been through and they are experiencing as young adults,” said Andrew Polk, founder of Trivium, a consulting firm in Beijing.  “They are now starting to think maybe this inexorable increase in economic growth is not so inexorable,” Mr. Polk said. Wang Junda works on a short-term contract at a complex in Zhengzhou where Apple phones are made. A fresh-faced 27-year-old, he has been a driver for Didi, China’s version of the ride-hailing company Uber, and is working toward getting a truck driver’s license in hopes of being able to make more money. Still, he worries that he will never make enough.  “Whatever you earn is never enough to match your spending,” Mr. Wang said.  The retreat of Chinese consumers — a powerful force generating $4.9 trillion in economic activity a year — will have global repercussions. Their appetite for homes, cars and iPhones transformed the world, powering global growth and making fortunes for companies like Apple and General Electric. It also poses an immediate challenge to China’s leadership, which draws its legitimacy from the wealth and confidence of the Chinese people.  The new unease can be found across China, from the glittering business capitals of Shanghai and Shenzhen to more working-class places like Zhengzhou, an industrial metropolis of 10 million in the country’s interior.  At a downtown Zhengzhou mall, Wang Li watched as a few desultory shoppers wandered by. She was among a dozen bored shopkeepers sitting on lawn chairs and stools, watching shows on their smartphones while waiting for customers. “Nothing is good. It’s not just this one type of business,” said Ms. Wang, whose shop sells towels, water bottles and keepsake mugs. “Every kind of business is not doing so great.” There are still indications of strength. Headline retail sales figures have slowed significantly but are still growing at a pace that other countries would envy. Some sales drops, like those of smartphones, are due in part to the natural maturing of the Chinese market.  Still, signs of a slowdown abound. The 100 biggest retailers in China have seen their sales decline sharply in recent months, according to Capital Economics. Sales of instant noodles, seen as an indicator because newly affluent Chinese would rather eat out or order in, are rising after declining for several years.  “The bad news is that all indicators of consumer spending are still softening, and the underlying trend is probably somewhat worse than the headline data indicate,” said Ernan Cui, a consumer analyst at the research firm Gavekal Dragonomics. The slowdown is coming just as the cost of living is rising. Young people have been priced out of the housing market in affluent places like Beijing and Shanghai. More people have mortgages and credit cards, however, expanding their spending prowess while adding to their debts.  Mengjie Wu, a Shanghai resident and technology company employee, worries about the price of basic food staples, like meat, and medicine for her mother, which must be imported from the United States. She has a mortgage and loans to pay off. Now she and her fiancé are considering putting off the ultimate act of consumption: a wedding.  “We haven’t decided if we will do it yet, because it is not a small cost,” said Ms. Wu, 30, whose dreams included a Tiffany ring and a ceremony in Bali, the Indonesian resort spot. “We won’t do it soon.”  China’s leaders are moving to get them spending again. The central government pushed out new measures in August, including discounts on big-ticket appliances. In past years, those shoppers were part of a seemingly unstoppable growth engine. China’s opening to the outside world in the late 1970s connected global companies with one billion people eager to leave grinding poverty behind. As China’s economy developed, a new consumer culture emerged, powered by hundreds of millions of spenders. Spending by households now accounts for nearly 40 percent of China’s roughly $13 trillion in annual economic activity.  They have become an essential part of the global economy as well. Chinese consumers alone accounted for one-seventh of the world’s growth over the past decade, according to the Boston Consulting Group. General Motors and its Chinese partners sell more cars in China than they do in the United States.  Now growing numbers of people in China are reluctant to spend. A survey by China’s central bank showed rising numbers of urban residents would rather deposit their money in a bank than spend or invest it.  As income growth slows, households are making fewer discretionary purchases and choosing to save more. Sectors like automobiles and smartphones are shrinking as fewer people buy these items for the first time. E-commerce is still booming, but growth in online spending has more than halved over the past four years, the Boston Consulting Group found. The trade war has raised costs for American-grown food, part of an overall surge in food prices. A devastating pig disease has led to soaring pork prices. In online forums, Chinese shoppers are calling for “fruit freedom” and “pork freedom.” A desire for deals drove Chinese shoppers to the country’s first Costco, the American discount warehouse retailer, when it opened near Shanghai in August.  Ms. Wu, the technology company employee, recently looked for a better deal on some of the food she buys each month.  She and her fiancé spend nearly all of their monthly paychecks — about $5,600 before taxes — to pay off loans and their mortgage, she said. But the small amount of money they spend on groceries, roughly $300, has risen by a tenth since the start of the year. As hundreds of shoppers around them pushed large shopping carts that were mostly empty except for basics like eggs, milk and meat, Ms. Wu thought about the Tiffany ring she had been dreaming of. Now, that purchase is up to her fiancé, she said.  “The cost for the Tiffany’s ring is much more expensive,” she said, “so I will give him the choice to buy any brand.” Cao Li contributed reporting. Alexandra Stevenson is a business correspondent based in Hong Kong, covering Chinese corporate giants, the changing landscape for multinational companies and China’s growing economic and financial influence in Asia. More about Alexandra Stevenson "
nyt://article/323b9e60-0ed7-5871-91da-0a7994d65047,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/16/business/economy/coronavirus-business-credit-access.html,2020-03-16T22:26:29+0000,article,News,1215,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Commercial Paper (Finance)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Ratings and Credit Rating Agencies', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Small Business', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Epidemics', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Oil (Petroleum) and Gasoline', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AIR FRANCE-KLM', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Large and small businesses, which borrow heavily to run their operations, will find it harder to tap credit as the outbreak curtails economic activity. Jeffrey Albrecht, who owns three Holiday Inn hotels in southern Ohio, watched as $200,000 disappeared from his books in just three days as people began canceling bookings. The banker handling his mortgages on the properties called. He wanted to know: How much more money could Mr. Albrecht lose before he would miss a loan payment? Mr. Albrecht assured him he could last at least four months. Others might be less fortunate. “If this goes on for very long, there will be much bloodletting in America’s small business community,” Mr. Albrecht said. Companies of all sizes, from local businesses to blue-chip giants, have taken a big hit from the coronavirus pandemic which will gut companies’ profits and affect not only their ability to keep operations afloat, but also their ability to borrow money. If companies are unable to tap credit to pay their rent, make payroll or finance other activities, it could force them to slash costs, lay off workers, pause investments and even declare bankruptcy. That, in turn, could worsen the recession that’s now widely expected and affect the financial markets — already stressed from stock-market plunges — where investors buy and sell the debt issued by companies, making it even harder for companies to borrow. “The economy is coming to a half of a dead stop,” said Michael Greenberger, a professor at the University of Maryland Francis King Carey School of Law. Businesses are having trouble opening or getting customers to engage normally, said Mr. Greenberger, whose research focuses on financial stability. “All of these businesses are going to at some time have to re-up their loans, renew their loans, roll them over. With the decline in revenues the ability to borrow money is going to be very problematic.” What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. On Sunday, the Federal Reserve took the drastic step of slashing interest rates to nearly zero and enacted measures to keep credit pumping through the economy and prevent a wave of business defaults and closings. And in a letter to President Trump and congressional leaders on Monday, the United States Chamber of Commerce asked for sweeping changes to laws governing the Fed so that businesses with more than 500 employees could borrow directly from the Fed’s discount window, a lending facility that is open only to banks. Such measures could ease a potential credit crunch for companies, which rely heavily on borrowing to function. Larger companies often issue bonds to investors or tap credit from banks to fund operations, refinance existing debt, build plants and even buy other companies. When the bonds are sold into the financial markets, credit rating agencies give them a letter grade, which signals their quality. Grades with As are the best. Bonds with B or C grades indicate a higher probability that investors will not recover their value, because the companies that issued them might stop making payments — but they provide better returns. Interest rates have been so low in the past decade that even the shakiest companies have found buyers for their debt because investors were looking for higher returns. From 2009 until last year, corporate borrowing surged 60 percent, to $9.3 trillion, for companies in the United States, according to the credit rating agency S&P Global Ratings. As of May, nearly $3.8 trillion was in corporate bonds rated BBB, at the low end of what qualifies as “investment grade.” BBB-caliber bonds made up 17 percent of the global corporate debt market in 2001, but now constitute more than half, according to BlackRock. But the easy money for companies came with a downside. The dependence on debt created what has been described as an “unexploded bomb” — a precariously balanced powder keg that could be set off by the coronavirus outbreak. Nervous companies have begun drawing on lines of credit from banks, trying to create a buffer against the oncoming dry spell. Industries that rely on so-called consumer discretionary spending, such as travel, airlines and retail, as well as companies with international supply chains such as autos and electronic goods makers, are more likely to be squeezed by the slowdown in activity. Hilton said earlier this month that it was drawing down a $1.75 billion revolving credit facility as a precautionary measure. Air France-KLM said on Friday that it tapped a similar $1.2 billion loan, giving it more than $6.1 billion of total buffer. Other companies vulnerable to plummeting tourism, such as the Walt Disney Co. and SeaWorld Parks & Entertainment, took similar steps. Oil and gas companies, already smarting from Saudi Arabia’s oil price cut earlier this month, are now grappling with lower demand as people and businesses scale back. Having borrowed heavily from regional banks to finance fracking and drilling, dozens of these companies now face possible bankruptcy. The intensifying demand for cash from companies — what Morgan Stanley analysts said last week had become “a full-blown liquidity scramble” — could strain the entire global financial system and also make it difficult for banks to manage their reserves. Companies are also putting their merger-and-acquisition plans on hold — in the first quarter, the number of deals announced in the United States fell by 10 percent, to 2,103, according to Refinitiv data. Deals often require billions of dollars in financing, and companies that can postpone such plans are doing so, including Xerox, which said it put its efforts to acquire HP on hold to focus on the pandemic. “Everyone is just trying to get by day to day at the moment,” said Krista Schwarz, an assistant professor of finance at the University of Pennsylvania’s Wharton business school. “Right now is not the time to grow the company — it’s the time to stay solvent.” Investors who buy company bonds are asking for higher interest rates as compensation for the additional risk, which could put more stress on companies with already strained finances. For instance, companies are struggling to issue commercial paper — a popular form of short-term promissory note typically used to cover payroll, rent and other immediate payments — because the few skittish investors who aren’t steering entirely clear are demanding the highest premium in more than a decade. What’s more, the debt that is already circulating in the financial markets, including corporate bonds and packages of corporate loans, is looking less safe for investors to hold. Some big money managers like pension funds are obligated to keep risky products off their books but many are big buyers of company bonds, which in better times were considered safe and prudent investments. But with the changing environment, the credit ratings on such bonds are going down. On Monday, S&P Global Ratings downgraded Exxon Mobil, the biggest American oil company, to ‘AA’ from ‘AA+’ citing lower oil and natural gas prices, weak demand for chemicals and low refining margins. A downgrade could make it harder for Exxon to borrow. But it’s the smaller companies — which underpin the American economy and tend to lean more heavily on debt — that could be especially hurt by a run on credit. On Monday morning, after Ohio’s governor had shuttered schools, restaurants and bars across the state, Mr. Albrecht, the hotel owner, met with his 125 employees and vowed to keep them as busy as possible, even if traffic dwindles. “Everything’s going to be O.K.,” he said. “We’re just going to have to ride it out.” Jeanna Smialek contributed reporting from Washington, Michael de la Merced from London and Clifford Krauss from Houston. world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Tiffany Hsu is a media reporter for the business desk, focusing on advertising and marketing. Previously, she covered breaking business news. Before joining The Times, she wrote about the California economy for The Los Angeles Times. More about Tiffany Hsu Emily Flitter covers banking and Wall Street. Before joining The Times in 2017, she spent eight years at Reuters, writing about politics, financial crimes and the environment. More about Emily Flitter "
nyt://article/6635c73a-560c-5e0f-9b18-f675e90217e3,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/31/business/coronavirus-companies-banks-loans-credit.html,2020-03-31T21:57:09+0000,article,News,1681,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Ratings and Credit Rating Agencies', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Layoffs and Job Reductions', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporations', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bank of America Corporation', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'JPMorgan Chase & Company', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Yum Brands Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The clamor for corporate funding is raising concerns about a financial reckoning reminiscent of 2008. In a single week in March, as financial markets convulsed and major parts of the economy began shutting down, banks made over $240 billion in new loans to companies — twice as much in new lending as they would ordinarily extend in a full year. Brian Foran, an analyst at Autonomous, a research firm that did the calculations, initially thought it was a typo. “That’s really an unprecedented figure,” he said. “I’ve never seen anything like it.” American companies are reeling from the body blow dealt by the pandemic. As revenues dwindle, travel slows and production lines halt, companies have begun to furlough or lay off employees, slash investment in operations and buy less from their suppliers. With no way to tell when the economy will restart, they are racing to conserve money and tap as much credit as possible. The new reality, say bankers and analysts, will be tough for companies that had grown accustomed to the easy money of the past decade. Enticed by ultralow interest rates, they borrowed trillions of dollars in new debt in the belief that banks would keep lending and the debt markets would always be open. Now many indebted companies, even those whose business has not taken a direct hit from the outbreak, are finding that they have to adapt to an era in which cash is suddenly much harder to raise. Carlos Hernandez, the chairman of JPMorgan Chase’s investment banking business, recently told clients and colleagues that the economic shutdown caused by the pandemic could prompt the sort of brutal reckoning for corporate America that banks went through after the 2008 financial crisis. Mr. Hernandez, from his perch at the nation’s biggest lender, is seeing the potential crisis unfold firsthand, as his bank and others get bombarded with loan requests from companies stocking up on cash. Banks are still lending, but these are bloodcurdling times for corporations. Consumers “are not spending money on a long list of things,” said Susie Scher, co-head of the financing group at Goldman Sachs. “If you sell or service that long list of things, if you had a weaker balance sheet to begin with, you’re going to find yourself in a deteriorating liquidity position as the economic crisis goes on,” she said, referring to a position from which obtaining cash is difficult. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Already, a divide among haves and have-nots is emerging in corporate America, tied to how cheaply and easily companies can get credit. Seeing this, Congress moved quickly in recent legislation to funnel emergency loans into the United States economy. Still, some types of companies could be shut out entirely from a multitrillion-dollar loan program lawmakers just set up, unless the Federal Reserve relaxes its own rules. Companies that are rated investment grade — meaning that they are the least likely to default on their debts — are having an easier time borrowing from banks or by selling bonds directly to investors via the public markets. Among those, Exxon, Disney and McDonald’s have all ventured into the turbulent markets to sell bonds to public investors recently. But companies with lower credit ratings, which make up a significant share of all big companies and include household names like Ford and Macy’s, could find the public markets more expensive. Yum Brands, which has a relatively low, or “junk,” credit rating, set its interest rate at 7.75 percent on the corporate bonds it sold Monday, nearly twice what it was paying a month ago. Yum, which owns KFC and Taco Bell, expanded its offering to $600 million from the originally planned $500 million based on strong investor demand, but it may be among the lucky ones. Lower-rated companies play a huge role in the economy. Half of the 1,148 companies in the Russell 3000 stock index that have ratings are below investment grade, according to calculations based on data from CapitalIQ. Last year, these companies employed more than six million people and had revenue of $2.7 trillion. To shore up their cash flow, hundreds of companies have chosen to draw from credit lines that banks agreed years ago to make available. Ford, which is still paying back a loan from the federal government made over a decade ago, last week tapped a $15 billion credit line; General Motors has said it would draw down $16 billion. Both have halted North American car production but are repurposing plants and workers to manufacture emergency batches of ventilators to undersupplied hospitals. Macy’s, which said it would furlough most employees, drew down a $1.5 billion credit line in March. Even as Mr. Hernandez and other longtime Wall Street executives predict a seismic shift in the way corporations handle financing, their banks — which reduced their own dependency on borrowed money and bolstered their access to cash as a result of new regulations enacted after the financial crisis — continue to lend. Between March 11 and March 18, bank lending surged by $243 billion to a total of $4.1 trillion, according to Mr. Foran, the analyst, who added that the increase occurred as companies tapped the credit they were already entitled to receive from banks as part of prior agreements. Consumer discretionary companies — coffee shop chains, shoemakers, car companies and other nonessential service providers — constituted by far the single-largest proportion of businesses borrowing money from banks, Autonomous noted in a recent report, a direct consequence of the sudden slide in their revenue from virus containment efforts. Industrial companies and real-estate firms, the firm reported, were the second- and third-largest users. During the week ending March 18, the most recent week for which data is available, JPMorgan was the most active provider of financing, playing a leading role in an estimated $78 billion worth of credit facilities that were drawn down, according to figures tracked by Standard & Poor’s and Autonomous. Bank of America lent from an estimated $31 billion pool of credit. The companies appear to be putting the cash they draw down back in the banks. Still, some banks have balked at the raft of requests, say market participants — especially those coming from apparently healthy companies with high credit ratings that appear to be drawing down lines of credit largely to burnish their balance sheets in case of future problems. The revolving lines of credit that many companies have “are there as a theoretical safety net,” said David Topper, a senior adviser at the private equity firm General Atlantic and former capital-markets executive at JPMorgan. “You’re not supposed to draw them.” Banks are encouraging corporate clients to avoid drawing on bank credit and instead look to public-market financing, Mr. Topper added. “They’ve said, ‘Look, we know you need money, and we’re willing to lend to you, but let’s do it on market terms,’” he said. In other words, banks are pushing companies to consider bond offerings — which cost companies more, both in interest payments to investors and banking fees — instead of drawing their credit lines, for which they pay the banks far less. Companies are willing to take that advice, Mr. Topper said, because they want to preserve relationships with lenders. Nonetheless, some companies are both drawing on credit lines and raising cash through the public markets in preparation for the uncertainty that lies ahead. McDonald’s, for one, has drawn down $1 billion in credit from JPMorgan and other banks and also sold $3.5 billion in public bonds to counter the fact that “the negative financial impact to our results cannot be reasonably estimated” but may be “material,” according to a regulatory filing. On Tuesday the embattled cruise operator Carnival Corporation began a $6 billion effort to raise cash from sales of stock, bonds and other securities. In a reflection of its current straits, Carnival, which has already drawn on bank credit lines, was selling some of those bonds with a suggested 12.5 percent interest payment to investors. Congress’s recent rescue package may fail to close the gap opening up between top-rated companies and those further down the credit scale, making it harder for the economy to recover and for hiring to bounce back. Also, the fraying economy could wallop companies before government agencies can get vast new loan programs set up — a process widely expected to take until mid- or late April, if not longer, for some programs. The legislation gives the Fed backing from the Treasury Department to provide an estimated $4 trillion of financing to corporations and other borrowers. It does not explicitly rule out lending to companies with ratings below investment grade, but restrictions on the Fed could lead to that outcome. Companies receiving an emergency loan from the Fed can’t be insolvent, and the central bank has to make sure that it has sufficient collateral to back its loans. The Fed can create some leeway by tweaking rules written after Congress overhauled the emergency lending laws in 2010, some Fed scholars say. One rule — which requires a company to be current on “undisputed debts” in the 90 days before an emergency loan program — would disqualify many companies right now because they’ve stopped paying some bills to stay afloat, said Peter Conti-Brown, assistant professor at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. “The Fed has to violate its own regulations or turn down the very businesses that are most in need of its interventions,” he said. “The good news is the Fed can abandon that rule.” The Fed tries to avoid taking any losses on its loans, a real risk when lending to lower-rated companies — although sufficient protection from the Treasury against any losses might make it easier for the central bank to lend to such companies. When deciding whether to lend to more fragile industries, the Fed must also contend with criticism from Congress that it is bailing out groups of companies with self-inflicted wounds and opening taxpayers up to the risk of big losses. The central bank could shield against losses and criticism by taking significant equity stakes in risky companies, said Skanda Amarnath at Employ America, a left-leaning group that seeks to influence the Fed. “The question is whether the Fed is feeling aggressive enough to exercise its authority or afraid of the politics and the blowback,” Mr. Amarnath said. Jeanna Smialek contributed reporting. world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Kate Kelly is a reporter in the Business section, where she covers big banks, trading and lending, and the crucial players setting financial policy in both politics and business. She is also the author with Robin Pogrebin of ""The Education of Brett Kavanaugh: An Investigation."" More about Kate Kelly Peter Eavis is a New York based reporter covering companies and markets. Before coming to the Times in 2012, he worked at The Wall Street Journal.  More about Peter Eavis "
nyt://article/3eaab43b-fdab-59bf-bc3c-336e07768ecc,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/08/16/business/dealbook/constellation-canopy-cannabis.html,2018-08-16T13:09:34+0000,article,News,524,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Cannabis Foods and Products', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Marijuana', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Beer', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Constellation Brands Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Heineken NV', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Molson Coors Brewing Company', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Canada', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Get the DealBook newsletter to make sense of major business and policy headlines — and the power-brokers who shape them.__________ What does a beer company do to hedge against slowing growth in its main business? In the case of the parent company of Corona, the answer is to invest heavily in the marijuana industry. Constellation Brands, which also makes Robert Mondavi wine and Svedka vodka, announced on Wednesday that it had invested $4 billion in Canopy Growth, a publicly traded Canadian cannabis producer. The deal comes nearly 10 months after Constellation first took a 10 percent stake in Canopy to help create nonalcoholic cannabis-infused drinks and other products. Constellation’s investment in Canopy, the biggest known deal in the marijuana industry, shows just how far traditional alcoholic beverage companies are willing to go to find growth. As sales of beer fall in the United States, brewers have begun to bet that legalization of marijuana around the globe, especially the United States, will continue to build momentum and sales of cannabis products will take off. The research firm Euromonitor estimates that the American market for legal marijuana products will reach $20 billion by 2020, up from $5.4 billion in 2015. While a number of states have legalized the recreational use of marijuana in recent years, purchasing or possessing it remains a federal crime. Constellation said in November that it does not plan to sell cannabis products in the United States while it remains illegal on the federal level. But as cannabis becomes legal in more countries — in Canada, for example, recreational use will become legal on Oct. 17 — alcoholic beverage companies are trying to buy into the cannabis industry before they become disrupted by it. How concerned are beer companies? Molson Coors listed legal cannabis among the biggest possible risks to its business in its annual shareholder report earlier this year: “The emergence of legal cannabis in certain U.S. states and Canada may result in a shift of discretionary income away from our products or a change in consumer preferences away from beer.” So far Heineken and Molson Coors have moved to sell cannabis-infused drinks. Heineken’s Lagunitas brand has started selling nonalcoholic sparkling water featuring THC, the active component of marijuana. And Molson Coors has formed a joint venture with Hydropothecary, a weed producer, to make cannabis-infused beverages. Under the terms of Wednesday’s deal, Constellation’s stake in Canopy will increase to 38 percent and Constellation has the right to raise that to 50 percent. “As the leader in the total beverage alcohol space, we look forward to reaping the benefits of our cannabis investment, which we see as incremental to our core beer, wine and spirits portfolio,” Robert Sands, Constellation’s chief executive, told analysts on a call on Wednesday. But such bold moves still face a number of hurdles. The Justice Department under Attorney General Jeff Sessions has toughened its stance on marijuana-related crimes, making the future of cannabis regulation uncertain. Then there is potential resistance from shareholders. While shares in Canopy were up nearly 30 percent as of Wednesday afternoon, at 41.68 Canadian dollars, those in Constellation were down 6 percent, at $208.15. "
nyt://article/b13b080c-b4e0-5649-91fb-24151327a622,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/08/14/business/retail-sales-coronavirus.html,2020-08-14T20:47:25+0000,article,News,1307,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The increase was a sign that consumerism remained resilient, but the recovery has been buoyed by government assistance that expired at the end of July. Even as coronavirus infections continued to spread, in-person school reopening plans were scrapped and unemployment stayed near record highs, Americans kept shopping in July with retail sales rising 1.2 percent from June, reflecting a rare bright spot in the battered economy. The jump in sales reported on Friday by the Commerce Department, though far smaller than the increases in the previous two months, showed that the bounce back in spending to pre-pandemic levels was not a fluke. It was instead a sign that consumerism, buoyed by government support, remained resilient even as many other facets of American life were increasingly bleak. “It shows there is a willingness and a desire to spend,” said Michelle Meyer, chief U.S. economist at Bank of America. “There is no doubt the recovery in consumer spending has been robust.” Much of that recovery has been helped by the $600 a week in unemployment assistance, which expired at the end of July. The three consecutive months of sustained retail recovery, which has brought sales above where they were in February, is exactly what policymakers were hoping the stimulus money would accomplish. By spending their benefits on food, clothing and appliances, rather than saving the money, Americans have helped keep many retailers and their employees and suppliers afloat. The retail rebound is likely to bolster arguments in Congress that a robust form of supplemental unemployment assistance should be extended. Without a large subsidy, economists predict, consumption will stall in August and into the fall, damaging the broader economy. “It’s very important to the economy that these talks in Washington come to fruition,” said Mickey Chadha, senior credit officer at Moody’s Investors Service. Sales at electronics and appliance stores jumped 23 percent in July while spending at clothing and clothing accessories stores rose almost 6 percent. Still, the electronics and appliance sales were down 3 percent from a year earlier, while clothing was down 21 percent. Some areas that saw strong sales in the previous month, like furniture and home furnishings stores and the category of sporting goods, hobby, musical instruments and bookstores, were flat or declined in July. Still, there are certain sectors of the industry that may never truly return until a vaccine is approved and widely distributed, allowing people to shop and dine indoors again without fear. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Foot traffic to brick-and-mortar stores selling primarily discretionary goods, including apparel retailers, remains down by as much as 43 percent from last year, according to research from Morgan Stanley. That persistently low traffic — following weeks and even months of temporary store closures — helps to explain why a record number of retailers have declared bankruptcy or closed down during the pandemic, even as sales of products like groceries, at-home entertainment and appliances have been booming. Shoppers have seemed more willing to venture out to open-air shopping centers, like Tanger Factory Outlet Centers, which said on Aug. 5 that even with reduced hours, foot traffic to its centers in the preceding six weeks had rebounded to about 85 percent of previous-year levels. Many analysts had predicted that retail sales would be dented in July by surging infections in states like Arizona, California and Texas, which forced restaurants and stores to close again. It didn’t happen, despite some regional dips. Some economists pointed to the substantial shift the country had made to online shopping during the pandemic. “This year is a complete game changer in terms of e-commerce,” Mr. Chadha said. But selling goods online is by no means a panacea. For one thing, it can be far more expensive to retailers because of shipping costs. Even as online buying increases during the pandemic, many retailers are seeing profits drop. “Profitability is not coming back to last year’s levels until 2022,” Mr. Chadha said. Still, the increased emphasis on e-commerce has pushed retailers to embrace change. Companies like Levi Strauss & Company, the denim retailer, have accelerated the introduction of features like curbside pickup and appointment shopping and are testing same-day delivery. The pandemic has supercharged “what may have taken five or 10 years and compressed it into this very short period of time,” said Chip Bergh, Levi’s chief executive. With malls and department stores struggling, brands like Levi’s have been forced to think about the best way to reach customers. “With hundreds of doors closed by more traditional department stores, we’re remapping the market,” Mr. Bergh said. The brand has expanded to about 140 to 150 Target locations in the past 18 months “and as other department stores are going to be closing, we’re working with Target to see if there’s an opportunity for us to do more.” He also said that the brand had a successful value line at Walmart and a longtime partnership with Amazon. Many retailers with a strong online presence or a product that serves the altered lifestyle and needs of people during the pandemic are flourishing. Heather Wong, who owns a spice store in Sacramento, said she felt “survivors’ guilt” seeing so many other local businesses close, even as her sales increased in July. She said sales at her store, Allspicery, had dropped in early June because much of the area near her store was closed by the protests over the killing of George Floyd by the Minneapolis police. But she’s not sure what caused people to stock up on her high-end spices last month. She thinks some customers may have started to run out of the oregano and herbes de Provence that they bought at the start of the lockdowns in March, when many more people started eating at home. “I don’t have an exact answer for why this is happening,” said Ms. Wong, who is selling all of her store’s items online or through curbside pickup. “So many of my peers are struggling.” Many retailers are also grappling with an unusual back-to-school shopping season, which typically drives sales in July and August. This year is different, with many schools and colleges planning to start remotely. Bed Bath & Beyond recently introduced a “College at Home” section on its website, encouraging parents and students to buy new wares to transform their childhood bedrooms into what it called “dreamy dorm spaces” for remote learning, with youthful themes such as “chill camp vibes,” “low-key bohemian” and “modern glam.” The pitch is to make the rooms “more effective and more exciting to them even if they can’t be on campus,” said Joe Hartsig, chief merchandising officer at Bed Bath & Beyond. “It’s a real window of change for students to reflect that they’ve moved on from high school and are in college, and want their room to reflect a different room.” Kohl’s back-to-school offerings are listed online with the tagline, “Heading back or logging in, the new year starts here.” The typical clothing and backpacks are followed by a link to face masks and hand sanitizer. Another section tailored to remote learners offers “everything kids need to redefine the routine.” It includes links to educational toys and virtual learning tools, as well as others titled “Your Kitchen Cafeteria” and “Backyard Recess.” Troy Carlson has seen online sales pick up significantly at his Disney memorabilia store not far from Ms. Wong’s spice shop in Sacramento. He has also managed to draw in a fair amount of foot traffic since reopening in June. Even as infections in California increased last month, he estimates that sales were about 75 percent of their normal levels. Mr. Carlson, who has owned his business, Stage Nine Entertainment, since 1991, has also been surprised by what some of his customers have chosen to buy, including Disney-themed art for as much as $8,000. “Nothing we sell is essential,” he said. But Mr. Carlson worries that his success is not sustainable if other businesses around him in the city’s waterfront district are failing and the foot traffic in the area declines. “Our business motto is to get to 2021,” he said. “We want to get to the other end but we are concerned about what the other end will look like.” Michael Corkery is a business reporter who covers the retail industry and its impact on consumers, workers and the economy. He joined The Times in 2014 and was previously a reporter at the Wall Street Journal and the Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari "
nyt://article/b8bbb6d7-56ab-579f-8642-213b5e970556,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/09/17/business/small-tech-stocks-coronavirus.html,2020-09-17T09:00:20+0000,article,News,1037,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Chegg Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'CrowdStrike Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'DocuSign Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Shopify Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Zscaler Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Zoom Video Communications', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Wayfair Inc', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Twilio Inc', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The giants aren’t the only ones. A subset of software, streaming, security and e-commerce firms are also posting eye-popping gains. Fastly is up more than 310 percent this year. Zscaler is up over 180 percent. Chegg and Veeva are up 75 percent and 90 percent. In a tech universe dominated by Apple, Amazon, Microsoft and Google, the share prices of little companies you’ve probably never heard of are soaring. The coronavirus pandemic has accelerated trends that were building for years by forcing large swaths of the population to work from home and shop online. And many obscure companies are taking off, driven by investors who expect them to flourish in an economy whose future arrived ahead of schedule. “When it comes to remote work in particular, the past 10 weeks have seen more changes than we’ve seen in the previous 20 years,” said Erik Brynjolfsson, an economist and the director of the Digital Economy Lab at Stanford University. Surveys conducted by Mr. Brynjolfsson and economists at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology found that the share of Americans working from home jumped to about 50 percent this year, from around 15 percent before the pandemic. “We haven’t seen anything like it since World War II,” Mr. Brynjolfsson said of the broad work-force upheaval. The tech-heavy Nasdaq composite index is up roughly 60 percent since it bottomed out in late March, and much of those gains can be attributed to the shares of the tech behemoths. Investors have bet heavily that those companies’ dominant market positions will only improve in the pandemic and its aftermath. But the trajectory of smaller technology stocks has been even more remarkable. Zoom — the suddenly ubiquitous video conferencing service — has been an investor darling, up close to 500 percent this year as workplaces shut down. Peloton, the home video cycling company, is up almost 200 percent amid widespread gym closures — and just added to its product line. Lesser-known companies are also posting eye-popping gains: Fastly, which sells services that enable faster delivery of increasingly complex video and gaming technology; Chegg, which offers digital textbook rentals among its education technology services; and Veeva, which provides cloud services to life sciences companies, including for management of clinical trials. Information security companies have been of particular interest to investors, who see them as crucial to the future of remote working. Zscaler, for example, is a cloud-based information security company. Its fellow security service CrowdStrike is up more than 150 percent. “What we’ve seen is an acceleration in the digital transformation,” said Jeff James, who manages small and midsize stock funds at Driehaus Capital Management. Last year, Mr. James bought shares of DocuSign, which provides digital signature software to companies ranging from BMW to Visa, betting on a company whose revenues had grown more than 30 percent annually. But with in-person meetings wiped out, DocuSign is in demand: Its revenues, in its most recent quarter, grew at a 45 percent annual pace. The company’s shares are up 166 percent this year. “Households and consumers are consuming more technology to work at home,” Mr. James said. Shares of the online retailers Carvana and Etsy are up more than 90 percent and 140 percent, as in-person shopping has collapsed. At the end of June, more than 16 percent of all retail sales were online, up more than five percentage points from last year. The last time e-commerce gained five percentage points of market share, it took roughly seven years. Traditional retailers are scrambling to compete, and tech is there to capitalize, too: The number of stores served by Shopify, which helps them develop e-commerce operations, jumped 71 percent in the second quarter from the first three months of the year. Its shares are up more than 120 percent. “We’ve seen the Covid-19 pandemic fundamentally shift the way businesses and consumers interact,” Harley Finkelstein, Shopify’s chief operating officer, told analysts after the company’s most recent earnings report. “It has catalyzed e-commerce, introducing major changes in buyer behavior and pulling forward what retail would look like in 2030 to 2020.” The tech sector has a rich history of sizzling stock surges built on little more than optimistic outlooks; the bubble of the 1990s was replete with high-profile stock flops with little or no revenue, such as Webvan and Pets.com. But while those businesses rose on near euphoria about a digital economy that was still decades away, the success of similar businesses today — consider Instacart and Chewy.com — is grounded on the solid performance even in a deep economic downturn. “The market, I think, is seeing them now going through the worst recession in history, and the worst pandemic in 100 years, and for those business models to come out stronger was something that a lot of market participants really took note of,” said Kyle Weaver, who manages growth-stock portfolios at Fidelity. Part of that reflects the fact that these firms are simply taking market share in the downturn. Normally, during a deep economic downturn, discretionary spending on home furnishings would collapse, Mr. Weaver said. But the online retailer Wayfair’s sales surged more than 80 percent in the second quarter as locked-down shoppers spruced up their surroundings. It posted its first profit as a public company. Wayfair’s shares, which Mr. Weaver’s mutual fund owns, according to its most recent public filings, have risen nearly 200 percent this year. Alan Tu, who runs T. Rowe Price’s Global Technology Fund, owns a number of the smaller tech stocks that have surged this year, including Shopify and the cloud software and security companies Twilio and Datadog. (Both of those have doubled this year.) Mr. Tu said he expected smaller tech companies not to lose the ground they had gained, even if their sales and shares didn’t surge the same way next year, because consumers and companies had gained new habits. And now that they are using the products — whether DocuSign on an application to refinance a mortgage or Carvana to buy a car — they may find that they prefer them, he said. At the same time, the tech companies benefit from the increased business: Operational efficiencies take hold, and they can refine their products. “Their services are getting better because of the increased demand, and so there’s sort of this flywheel effect where you have both demand and supply moving in the same direction,” Mr. Tu said. “It’s unlikely that we’re going to go back to the world that we lived in.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/c18eec40-4db4-5f32-9660-4c97994bd942,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/07/21/business/storage-coronavirus.html,2020-07-21T18:37:19+0000,article,News,1175,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Storage', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Real Estate (Commercial)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Square Feet What once seemed like one of the few recession-proof parts of commercial real estate looks as vulnerable as many other businesses. For years, the self-storage industry in the United States has relied on what insiders call the Four D’s: death, divorce, displacement and disaster. But the coronavirus pandemic, combined with aggressive competition and brash overexpansion, has made what once seemed like one of the few recession-proof parts of the commercial real estate industry look as vulnerable as many other businesses. The industry had been expanding since the last downturn as companies increased their footprint, eager to meet an appetite for storage space. Rising rents attracted rivals that courted consumers with new technology and improved customer service. Rents have begun to recede in the pandemic, however. In June, monthly rent for new customers before one-time discounts for a 10-by-10 unit without air-conditioning and heat, for example, declined 4.3 percent nationwide on an annualized basis, according to the research site Yardi Matrix. For the same unit with climate control, rent fell 6.7 percent. And as coronavirus cases surge around the country and leaders call for more restrictions on schools and businesses seeking to reopen, the growth of the self-storage industry could be hampered further. “Growth and new supply was starting to weigh pretty heavily on fundamentals,” said Ryan N. Clark, director of investment sales at Skyview Advisors, a brokerage firm based in Tampa specializing in self-storage sales. “The Covid pandemic obviously accelerated and exacerbated some of those challenges.” In a sense, the longtime success of the self-storage industry helped sow the seeds of its current problems. The industry got its start in the 1960s, when swelling consumerism led Americans to buy more stuff than they had room for. Ever since, self-storage businesses have steadily grown. Rates for storage units, with climate control and without, climbed nationwide in the years after the last recession as demand ballooned. Americans, flush with discretionary income from the economic boom, bought more stuff and needed more places to store it. The number of self-storage facilities nationwide grew to more than 60,000 in 2020 from around 47,000 in 2008, according to the research firm IBISWorld. Revenue increased 2.6 percent annually to $38.6 billion in 2019 from 2014. Development of self-storage facilities surged, and a wave of consolidation swept the industry as larger operators sought to capitalize on the growth. This has all contributed to a professionalization in the industry. Not only did the management and the investment in self-storage firms become more sophisticated, the facilities grew sleeker. “They were single-story, cinder block, surrounded by barbed wire, gravel driveway, maybe a guard dog, behind the industrial park or the dump,” Joseph D. Margolis, chief executive of Extra Space Storage, said of his industry’s facilities not too long ago. “Now if you look at them, they look like beautiful retail stores.” The new look made consumers more apt to rent, which drew more competition. Thousands more operators, most tiny independents, poured into the business, and institutional investors followed as self-storage shifted from being “more of a cottage industry” in commercial real estate, according to Joseph Iacono, chief executive of Crescit Capital Strategies, a lender. Publicly traded real estate investment trusts such as Public Storage and Extra Storage, the country’s two biggest operators by number of facilities, bought up competitors. The sector’s success — and the fact that its customer service and marketing had been slow to change for decades before the last recession — also gave birth to a new class of rivals focused on full-service options. Start-ups backed by venture capital, such as Clutter and MakeSpace, leaned more on technology to interact with customers and offered perks like pickup and delivery. “Storage for the past few decades has really not innovated on the customer experience itself,” said Rahul Gandhi, a co-founder and the chief executive of MakeSpace, which was started in Manhattan in 2013. “Much of the stress of this service has been put on the customer.” But the number of storage facilities soon climbed past demand in many places. Average rents for storage started to decline slightly in 2018 and 2019 in some markets. Analysts began talking about a peak in the industry, which relies on the churn of Americans moving their stuff around. The pandemic hastened the decline. “You had less move-ins and less move-outs,” said Mr. Clark of Skyview Advisors. “When mobility is hurt, self-storage is hurt.” The industry also faced eviction moratoriums in the pandemic similar to the ones meant to protect residential tenants. The most prominent was in Los Angeles, which in June passed an ordinance deferring rent and late fees for self-storage tenants delinquent because of the pandemic. Self-storage suppliers struggled with the same challenges that other industries were confronting, including keeping surfaces cleaner and reducing the potential for crowding at facilities. States’ lockdown orders regarding essential businesses also varied. Adding to the confusion, a federal directive, revised in late March, placed self-storage businesses among those deemed “so vital to the United States that their incapacitation or destruction would have a debilitating effect” on the country. Revenue buckled as rents stagnated. By the end of May, the average rents for the largest publicly traded self-storage companies, including Public Storage, Life Storage and Extra Space, were about the same as the year before, according to research firm Green Street Advisors. But self-storage companies keep building, compounding the oversupply challenge that the industry faced before the pandemic. Properties under construction or planned nationwide accounted for 8.9 percent of overall inventory in June, an uptick from the month before, Yardi Matrix said. The pace of new development is expected to slow, however, in part as a response to oversupply and because of obstacles thrown up by the pandemic, including the shutdown of construction and permitting in some areas. New supply in terms of properties and rentable square feet is expected to drop through 2024, according to several industry forecasts, similar to a decline coming out of the last recession. This should help rents rebound. In the meantime, some operators will be able to repurpose unrented units for experiential retailing, conventional retailing or last-mile delivery warehousing, according to Adam Petrillo, head of the industrial services group at the brokerage firm Savills. This will be particularly true in mixed-use developments in urban areas that include self-storage businesses. And if that doesn’t work, there are still the Four D’s. The coronavirus might have worsened industry trends, but Americans still need places to park their stuff — maybe more so because of the pandemic’s ripple effects, including residential evictions and hasty relocations. After several weeks of unevenness, operators reported a turn toward typical rates of move-ins and move-outs beginning in May. The occupancy rates for the largest publicly traded providers were north of 90 percent that month. Even with the pandemic, the self-storage industry remains a better financial investment than other real estate sectors, like offices, hotels or even life sciences projects buoyed by the hunt for Covid-19 therapeutics and vaccines, although it lags malls, health care and apartments, according to Green Street Advisors. In all of this, the industry might prove to be recession-proof after all, or at least immune to a pandemic. “As the economy reopens in various communities and people get back to more normal,” Mr. Margolis of Extra Space said, “we’ll snap back to normal very, very quickly.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/44df6c77-dcb0-5093-b370-bf666ae8f0d1,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/16/business/stock-market-coronavirus-federal-reserve.html,2020-03-16T22:24:06+0000,article,News,1198,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The Federal Reserve committed hundreds of billions of dollars to steadying the financial markets. The S&P 500 plummeted nearly 12 percent anyway. Financial markets imploded again on Monday, as increasingly alarmed investors feared that the global economy could experience a downturn rivaling the cataclysmic recession after the financial crisis a decade ago. Even President Trump’s boundless enthusiasm for the American economy has wilted in the face of what promises to be a widespread economic slowdown, as he acknowledged on Monday that the country might be heading toward a recession. The air of inevitable decline was palpable. A day after the Federal Reserve unleashed a major effort to shore up market confidence, the S&P 500 plunged nearly 12 percent on Monday — the latest in a series of big drops since the pandemic knocked it from a record high and the worst one-day decline since 1987. There are few historical parallels for the shock waves created by the coronavirus pandemic. From still-closed factories in China — where the outbreak first emerged — to Western nations where millions of people are living in a state of semi-house arrest, most of the engines that keep the global economy aloft have simultaneously sputtered to a halt. Some of the first snapshots to capture the gravity of the outbreak’s effect on economic activity appeared on Monday, suggesting that industrial activity has fallen off both in parts of the United States and in China. Factory activity in China, the world’s second-largest economy, dropped 13.5 percent last month from February 2019. Fixed-asset investment, which touches on construction of buildings, roads and railways and was long the driver of Chinese growth, fell roughly 25 percent. And one of the first bits of data for American economic activity in March, a gauge of manufacturing activity in New York State, showed the worst one-month plunge in the index’s history, falling to its lowest level since 2009. “Unfortunately this is the new reality,” economic analysts with the investment bank Jefferies wrote. “This report is a harbinger of what is to come.” The forecasts for growth that economists were making just a few weeks ago have been erased, replaced by penciled-in predictions of a sharp contraction. Goldman Sachs analysts now expect gross domestic product in the United States to contract at a 5 percent annual rate in the second quarter of 2020, in what would be the steepest drop since late 2008. JPMorgan Chase economists recently wrote that “the coming collapse in consumer spending will pull first-half growth into negative territory.” But the continuing collapse in financial markets suggests that investors think the reality could be beyond the powers of central banks such as the Fed to stop. On Sunday, the Fed cut interest rates to near zero and pledged to buy hundreds of billions of dollars’ worth of government bonds and mortgage-backed securities with freshly created money. For the last decade, variations of such programs, known as quantitative easing, have set off huge rallies in stock markets and other risky assets, as investors saw those efforts as a green light to take bigger risks. Not any more. On Wall Street, stocks plummeted 7 percent after the start of trading, triggering a 15-minute trading halt. It was the third such halt over the last week. The sell-off continued after trading recommenced, undoing the 9.3 percent surge in the S&P 500 on Friday, when a White House news conference promised greater efforts to increase testing for the virus. “The Fed has a lot of tools in its tool kit. A vaccine isn’t one of them,” said Rick Rieder, chief investment officer of global fixed income at BlackRock. “And I think the markets are realizing that it’s going to be uncertain for a period of time.” The disorder in financial markets has spread well beyond the market for stocks. Prices for corporate bonds, both from stable borrowers and riskier companies that issue junk-rated debt, fell. In the options market, the Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility index, widely considered the stock market’s “fear gauge,” climbed more than 40 percent to its highest level since the worst of the financial crisis. Prices of commodities have collapsed as the slump in global demand from China has resulted in an oil price war between Saudi Arabia and Russia, two giant global producers of crude. Benchmark prices for American crude oil fell more than 9 percent, to less than $30 a barrel, and gas prices nose-dived. Some analysts predict that oil prices could drop below $20 a barrel in the coming weeks. In the past, collapsing oil, natural gas and gasoline prices were a boon to the economy, helping consumers and lowering the trade deficit. But things have changed over the last decade. A fracking and drilling boom has converted the United States from big importer to a large exporter of petroleum and petroleum byproducts. That means several economically important states, including Texas, are poised to be hurt. Tens of thousands of jobs are at stake, and many regional banks have lent heavily to small oil companies that could face bankruptcy if prices stay low. Regional banks were some of the hardest-hit shares on Monday. The S&P 500 financial sector fell nearly 14 percent, with regional lenders such as Fifth Third, Citizens Financial and KeyCorp all dropping nearly 22 percent. Share prices fell sharply for businesses that rely on discretionary spending by consumers. The chain restaurant company Darden fell nearly 25 percent, the retailer L Brands nearly 28 percent and Gap nearly 23 percent. Perhaps more worrying were the signs of continuing problems in the less visible markets that act as the plumbing of the financial system. Borrowing costs shot higher Monday in the short-term lending markets, where companies and financial entities borrow billions every day to fund their daily operations. The Fed’s giant effort to pump money into the markets on Sunday over the past week was expected to keep such borrowing costs down, but it didn’t go as planned. “Things are not only quite bad, I would say, they’re likely worse than anything we’ve ever seen,” Alex Blanchard, global head of repo trading at Goldman Sachs, said on a client call on Sunday night. “While it’s always difficult to compare times through history, I would say this is as bad as we’ve ever experienced.” On Monday afternoon, the central bank gave an extra $500 billion injection of short-term loans into the so-called repo market, where banks and other financial institutions get temporary funding. That second round helped to calm the market. But conditions elsewhere remain tight, especially in the market for commercial paper — a form of short-term borrowing that companies use to manage their cash flows and finance their operations. Investors and bank analysts have started calling for the Fed to buy the short-term corporate debt in order to get the commercial paper market working — something it did during the 2008 financial crisis. To do so, the Fed would need to declare that the economy faced “unusual and exigent” circumstances, allowing it to use its special lending abilities. It would also require the approval of the Treasury Department. “It is just really complicated to set these things up,” said Karen Dynan, a former Treasury Department chief economist who worked at the Fed during the 2008 crisis. And the Fed, she noted, encountered major political backlash for its emergency lending and bailouts during that era. “They probably feel like they need to be super careful to get things right,” she said. Clifford Krauss contributed reporting. world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Jeanna Smialek writes about the Federal Reserve and the economy for The New York Times. She previously covered economics at Bloomberg News, where she also wrote feature stories for Businessweek magazine.  More about Jeanna Smialek "
nyt://article/3cedfa4a-4fd7-5540-9558-2a62f550f0ba,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/08/05/business/economy/us-china-yuan-renminbi-trump.html,2019-08-05T11:07:24+0000,article,News,2127,"[{'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Renminbi (Currency)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'US Dollar (Currency)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Protectionism (Trade)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""People's Bank of China"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States International Relations', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Customs (Tariff)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Mnuchin, Steven T', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Treasury Department', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"WASHINGTON — The trade war between the United States and China entered a more dangerous phase on Monday, as Beijing allowed its currency to weaken, Chinese enterprises stopped making new purchases of American farm goods and President Trump’s Treasury Department formally labeled China a currency manipulator. The escalation shook world markets as nervous investors looked for safe places to park their money. Wall Street suffered its worst day of the year on Monday, with the S&P 500 closing down nearly 3 percent. Selling was especially heavy in the trade-sensitive technology, consumer discretionary and industrial sectors. Yields on United States Treasuries, which fall as prices rise, dropped as investors sought safety in government-backed bonds. Benchmark indexes in Asia and Europe also fell. On Tuesday global markets recovered a bit. Asian stocks opened sharply lower but gained back ground through the day, and European equity indexes were mainly higher. Wall Street futures were predicting a positive opening. The People’s Bank of China, that country’s central bank, took steps on Sunday to limit the impact of Mr. Trump’s next round of tariffs by letting its currency weaken past the psychologically important point of 7 renminbi to the American dollar for the first time in more than a decade. A weaker currency can make goods cheaper to sell abroad, allowing businesses and consumers to help offset the additional tariffs Mr. Trump plans to impose on Sept. 1. It also harms American exporters that are trying to compete with China. Chinese officials said the move came in response to market forces, which have reacted to Mr. Trump’s tariff threats by pushing the value of the currency down. In an unusually blunt statement, the central bank put the blame for the currency fall on Mr. Trump’s “unilateralism and trade protectionism measures and the imposition of increased tariffs on China.” Chinese enterprises also halted new purchases of American agricultural goods in response to Mr. Trump’s decision to impose more tariffs. China’s state-run Xinhua News Agency called the president’s move a “serious violation” of an agreement reached in June with President Xi Jinping of China. Late Monday, the Treasury took the unusual step of labeling China a currency manipulator — the first time it has done so since 1994. In a statement, the Treasury said that Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, “will engage with the International Monetary Fund to eliminate the unfair competitive advantage created by China’s latest actions.” The action is mostly symbolic, requiring the administration to consult with the International Monetary Fund to try to eliminate the unfair advantage the currency measures have given a country. But China is likely to view the label as a rebuke, further escalating pressures between the countries. The move will finally fulfill Mr. Trump’s campaign pledge to designate China a currency manipulator. As a presidential candidate, Mr. Trump was sharply critical of China’s currency practices and promised to label China a manipulator if elected. Until Monday, Mr. Trump’s Treasury had declined to apply the label to China in the five currency reports it issued since the president took office. Instead, it has said the United States has deep concerns about China’s intervention in its currency. Economists say that China held down the value of its currency for many years, but it had already ceased that practice by the time Mr. Trump came into office. Ultimately, Mr. Trump was persuaded by his advisers to hold off on the label. In its most recent currency report, in May, the Treasury Department criticized China’s trade and currency practices but still did not conclude that Beijing was improperly devaluing its currency. The hardened positions underscore the increasingly tough path to resolving the trade dispute, which has begun to inflict damage across the global economy. American and Chinese negotiators met in Shanghai last week, the first face-to-face discussions since trade talks collapsed in May, but made little progress in resolving their differences. The question now is whether Beijing will allow its currency to weaken further and what Mr. Trump may do in response. The two sides have been locked in an intractable tit-for-tat economic war, with China meeting Mr. Trump’s tariffs with punishment of its own. The United States has already imposed tariffs on $250 billion worth of Chinese goods, placed tougher restrictions on Chinese investment, banned some Chinese companies from doing business with American companies and begun restricting visas for Chinese graduate students in sensitive research fields like robotics and aviation. Those moves were aimed at getting China to open its markets to American companies, protect American intellectual property and buy more agricultural products, none of which have happened yet. On Monday, Mr. Trump accused China of manipulating its currency and suggested he would look for ways to retaliate. “China has always used currency manipulation to steal our businesses and factories, hurt our jobs, depress our workers’ wages and harm our farmers’ prices. Not anymore!” the president wrote. “It should have been stopped many years ago!” If China allows its currency to fall even more, countries in East and Southeast Asia that compete in similar industries could face market pressure to devalue their own currencies. Such devaluation spirals can lead to higher inflation, pinched household spending and disruptive shifts of money across borders. They can also lead to more tariffs or other restrictive trade measures. “It’s hugely significant as they are making a clear choice to do this,” said Michael Every, head of financial markets research in Asia for Rabobank, referring to China’s central bank. “This is going to escalate rapidly and badly.” China on Tuesday signaled it would not let the currency depreciate right away. C. Fred Bergsten, director emeritus at the Peterson Institute for International Economics, said he thought the label was unjustified. China’s currency has weakened in large part because of larger economic forces, as investors sold the currency in response to Mr. Trump’s tariff threat, he said. “Unless they have some evidence they have not unveiled, it’s pretty clear the renminbi weakened because of market forces, and that does not justify the label of currency manipulation,” Mr. Bergsten said. “You can be unhappy that their currency went down, but it did so in large part because of what you just did to them.” A significant devaluation could also hurt China itself. Many of its biggest and most indebted companies in sectors like property and heavy industry have borrowed huge amounts overseas in American dollars. A weaker renminbi makes paying that debt back more expensive. It could also hurt companies that depend on commodities, such as oil, that are priced in dollars, and it could spur wealthy Chinese to take their money out of the country. For those reasons, devaluations make investors nervous. Four years ago, when China devalued its currency more drastically, a global market rout followed. Financial markets suffered another slump on Monday, with companies exposed to the next round of Mr. Trump’s tariffs hit particularly hard, including retail and technology stocks. The tech giants Microsoft and Apple dropped more than 3.4 percent and 5.2 percent respectively. Selling was heavy in shares of computer chip-makers, which generate significant revenue from sales to technology manufacturers based in mainland China. Retailers like Nike and Best Buy also declined. The two sides in the trade war seemed close to a deal in May. But after Beijing rejected some of America’s demands, talks collapsed and Mr. Trump put in place plans to tax another $300 billion worth of imports. In June, Mr. Trump agreed to hold off on additional tariffs after meeting with Mr. Xi in Japan. But last week, Mr. Trump said he would impose 10 percent tariffs on another $300 billion worth of Chinese goods as punishment for Beijing’s failure to make large-scale purchases of American farm products, like soybeans. On Monday, Beijing indicated that those purchases would not be forthcoming anytime soon. Xinhua News Agency cited the country’s economic planner, the National Development and Reform Commission, and the commerce ministry as saying that Chinese companies were suspending purchases of American agricultural products in response to the Trump administration’s plans to impose new tariffs on $300 billion in Chinese exports to the United States. The report said that China had not ruled out imposing its own tariffs on newly purchased American agricultural imports and that the Chinese companies suspended their purchases. Zippy Duvall, the president of the American Farm Bureau Federation, called the announcement “a body blow to thousands of farmers and ranchers who are already struggling to get by.” American exports to China fell $1.3 billion during the first half of the year, and American farmers now stand to lose all of what was a $9.1 billion market in 2018, Mr. Duvall said. That had fallen from a $19.5 billion market in 2017, before the trade war began. The escalating trade war already threatens to end what had looked to be a modest global expansion. The American economy still looks relatively strong, but growth in the service and manufacturing industries is slowing. The European economy has also been weak, as the trade war weighs on export-dependent economies like Germany and Italy. China’s growth has been hurt by the trade war, which has compounded some of its homegrown problems. Other countries that depend on China’s voracious economic machine, such as Japan, have been harmed as well. Yi Gang, the central bank’s governor, attributed the move in the renminbi, or RMB, to market forces, adding that many currencies had depreciated against the dollar recently. “I am confident that the RMB will continue to be a strong currency,” Mr. Yi said in an article published to the social media account of the central bank. The renminbi weakened about 1 percent against the dollar overall, a move that is not necessarily significant on its own. But that Beijing allowed it to breach a level that was long considered symbolic raised questions about whether the move was a deliberate threat from China’s top leaders, who would most likely have to give permission to the central bank to let its currency fall to such a level. “The currency is largely controlled by the P.B.O.C., but the P.B.O.C. does not have the independence to decide on its own the level of the renminbi,” said Michael Pettis, a professor of finance at the Guanghua School of Management at Peking University, referring to the central bank. “This was clearly a decision made higher up,” Mr. Pettis said. Mr. Trump has increasingly looked for ways to counteract China, including considering whether the United States should weaken its own currency. Mr. Trump and his advisers discussed intervening in currency markets to artificially weaken the United States dollar in late July, but the president decided against the idea. The president has also been jawboning the Federal Reserve to cut interest rates, including on Monday. “China dropped the price of their currency to an almost a historic low,” Mr. Trump wrote on Twitter. “It’s called ‘currency manipulation.’ Are you listening Federal Reserve? This is a major violation which will greatly weaken China over time!” The Fed did cut rates last week for the first time in a decade, a move taken in part to help the American economy weather the impact of Mr. Trump’s trade war. But Mr. Trump’s trade policies are counteracting some of the Fed’s efforts to stimulate the economy. The American tariffs on China slow China’s growth, weakening its currency and making the American dollar relatively strong. A stronger dollar cuts into inflation in the United States, and it might force the Fed to cut interest rates by more than it would otherwise to sustain its desired pace of growth and price gains. “The dollar has a very mechanical impact in the way the Fed thinks about its main policy lever,” said Neil Dutta, head of United States economics at Renaissance Macro Research. “By doing nothing, the Fed is de facto sanctioning a tightening in policy. They would need to lower rates just to keep pace.” Mr. Dutta thinks the weakening of the Chinese renminbi and the escalation of the trade war increase the likelihood that the Fed will cut rates half a percentage point at its next meeting, in September. Lower rates should weaken the dollar, all else equal, though that is never the central bank’s explicit goal. But policy doesn’t occur in a vacuum, and the Fed’s recent move to drop its benchmark rate comes as economies from Japan and Australia to Europe shift toward easing monetary policy, potentially by cutting their own interest rates. Market gyrations spurred by trade concerns have caught Fed policymakers’ attention. “I am certainly monitoring developments very closely,” Fed Gov. Lael Brainard said in Kansas City on Monday when asked about the lurch in markets. “I have said, and I think others have as well, that we’re committed to sustaining the expansion.” Ana Swanson and Jeanna Smialek reported from Washington, and Alexandra Stevenson from Beijing. Albee Zhang and Claire Fu contributed research. "
nyt://article/737e926b-afde-5472-bb3e-69952900b767,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/04/15/business/att-time-warner-china-tariffs.html,2018-04-15T18:22:27+0000,article,News,748,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Protectionism (Trade)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Telephones and Telecommunications', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'ABE, SHINZO', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AT&T Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Time Warner Inc', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'International Monetary Fund', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'World Bank', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The Week Ahead Here’s what to expect in the week ahead: CABLE TELEVISION As the Justice Department’s suit to block AT&T’s merger with Time Warner enters its fifth week, the top executives of both companies will take the stand in federal court. Jeff Bewkes, the chief executive of Time Warner, will go first, followed by Randall Stephenson, the chief executive of AT&T. They are both expected to testify early in the week. The executives will vigorously defend the $85 billion merger, which they say will create a stronger competitor to ascendant streaming video services. The Justice Department is expected to pose tough questions to the executives on how the combined companies could try to raise prices on rival cable and satellite firms — increases that would trickle down to consumers. Cecilia Kang FINANCE World leaders will travel to Washington, D.C., for the spring meetings of the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank, which run from Monday through Sunday. The organizations are likely to repeat their message of recent months, cautioning governments to make tough reforms to increase their economic productivity now, while global growth remains strong. They have also urged countries to avoid trade protectionism. Ana Swanson ECONOMY The Census Bureau is scheduled to release data on Monday on retail sales in March, providing another marker of the economy’s health and stability. Cold weather across much of the country may have led to a decline in discretionary shopping in March. Sales fell slightly in February, a typically quiet time for shoppers after the holiday rush. Michael Corkery What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. BANKING Bank earnings reports continue next week, with Bank of America reporting first quarter results on Monday, followed by Goldman Sachs on Tuesday and Morgan Stanley on Wednesday. Each could see a boost from recent stock market volatility, but a breakout performance on loan or deposit growth would be a surprise. Emily Flitter RETAIL Internet retailers will face a reckoning at the Supreme Court on Tuesday, when the justices hear arguments about whether to reconsider a 1992 ruling that helped spur the rise of online shopping. That decision barred states from forcing companies to collect sales taxes if they do not have a local physical presence. Some justices have signaled that they are ready to overrule the decision, which costs states billions in tax revenues and puts brick-and-mortar stores at a competitive disadvantage. Adam Liptak TRADE President Trump will host Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan for two days at Mr. Trump’s Florida estate starting Tuesday. While Mr. Abe has spoken with Mr. Trump more than any other foreign leader, the president’s decision not to exclude Japan from tariffs on steel and aluminum has strained their relationship. Both American and Japanese officials expect Mr. Abe to confront the president on trade, which may include a conversation about Mr. Trump's recent announcement that he would consider rejoining the Trans-Pacific Partnership. Also on the table are Mr. Trump’s plans to meet with North Korea’s leader, Kim Jong-un, a decision that stunned Mr. Abe.  Will Dudding PERSONAL FINANCE Tuesday is the deadline to file your 2017 income tax returns, so there isn’t much time left. The good news: Because of a local holiday in Washington, taxpayers have had an extra 48 hours to file this year — traditionally, Tax Day is on April 15. Tuesday is also the deadline to contribute to your Individual Retirement Account or your Health Savings Account. Although you technically have until 11:59 p.m. on Tuesday to file electronically, it’s probably best to finish your returns before the absolute last minute. And if you still file by mail, your post office is less likely to stay open late than it once was. Zach Wichter TRADE Sometime this week, the White House may release a list of roughly $100 billion in Chinese products that could be hit with additional tariffs in the coming months. That measure is the latest threat in an escalating series of trade measures between the United States and China, as the Trump administration tries to push Chinese leaders into abandoning what he has described as unfair trade practices. Ana Swanson "
nyt://article/b1a15205-b2ff-5fbf-a2ee-c3895153b984,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/01/20/us/politics/economy-government-shutdown.html,2018-01-20T20:50:31+0000,article,News,766,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shutdowns (Institutional)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Government Contracts and Procurement', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bureau of Economic Analysis', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Congressional Research Service', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'White House Council of Economic Advisers', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The early days of the federal government shutdown won’t slow the American economy much. No workers are missing paychecks yet, and because it is a weekend, few businesses expect to feel the effects of lost customers or suppliers. That could change, quickly, if the impasse drags out. The longer the government is shut down, the bigger the economic impact — and this time, the bigger the chances that the economy’s recent growth spurt could stall, at least temporarily. Shutdowns bring the government to a partial stop, though so-called essential personnel keep working, and many services continue to be provided. That partial stop costs the economy productive work time, historical evidence suggests, along with revenue that the federal government collects from daily fees at parks and museums. Private-sector companies that contract with the government have their work temporarily disrupted, and travel spending is reduced, affecting local economies. When the government is late in paying contractors, it incurs additional interest costs. Delays in issuing federal checks, permits and licenses slow the rest of the economy’s workings, affecting export and import permits, mortgages and small-business loans. A government funding crisis also casts a pall on the economy, damaging consumer sentiment and business optimism. transcript “The motion is adopted. Without objection, the motion to reconsider is laid on the table.” Here we are again. Partisan political bickering has led to another government shutdown. But what does that mean? The federal fiscal year starts on Oct. 1, often without new spending laws in place. Instead, the president and Congress strike a short-term deal to buy more time. If they can’t reach a new agreement before the next deadline, much of the federal government shuts down. Since October, there have already been three short-term agreements. When the government shuts down, federal workers are either forced off the job or told to work without pay. Essential services, such as airport security and food inspections, stay in place. The military remains active but may not be paid on time, depending on how long the shutdown drags on. And national parks and monuments will remain open, at least this time. In the event of a shutdown, the I.R.S. will likely be forced to slow implementation of the new tax bill. Funding for Puerto Rico, still rebuilding from Hurricane Maria, also hangs in the balance. The future will remain unclear for DACA recipients. And without an extension, the Children’s Health Insurance Program will run out of money.   What Happens When the Government Shuts Down?   A shutdown could also prevent federal agencies from releasing economic data that businesses and traders rely on to make market decisions every day. Economic activity typically snaps back soon after a shutdown ends, but not before the partial stoppage damages growth. A 16-day shutdown in October 2013, for example, may have cost $20 billion in output, cutting 0.5 percentage point off the annualized economic growth rate in the fourth quarter, according to the securities rating firm Moody’s. At that shutdown’s peak, 850,000 federal employees were furloughed for a total of 6.6 million workdays. Paying them for days not worked cost $2 billion. Private-sector employment is also affected. The 2013 shutdown cut job creation in the sector by about 120,000 over two weeks, the Council of Economic Advisers estimated in an analysis conducted immediately afterward. “A range of indicators show that sentiment, job creation, consumption, and some elements of production grew more slowly in the first half of October than in previous months,” the report concluded. As a whole, shutdowns cost the economy at least 0.1 percentage point of growth per week, and probably much more, the Congressional Research Service surmised in a report in 2014. A separate report from the Bureau of Economic Analysis, part of a larger analysis by the Congressional Research Service, found that lost hours worked by federal employees over the two weeks of the shutdown in 2013 accounted for a 0.3 percentage point drop in quarterly growth — by themselves. President Trump’s Council of Economic Advisers estimates that every week of furloughing federal workers would reduce annual economic growth by 0.2 percentage point. Hundreds of thousands of federal workers would be furloughed, affecting a wide range of government programs. Another shutdown would trim at least $6.5 billion a week from the nation’s economic output, economists at Standard & Poor’s suggested. “A shutdown affects not only Washington and its employees, but also has ripple effects across sectors throughout the country — from shopping malls to national parks, from contractors to hotels,” said Beth Ann Bovino, chief United States economist at S.&P. Job recruiters worried that a shutdown could also slow hiring. “We face a very real risk of a national hiring hesitation, with recruiters putting plans on hold, and job movers opting to sit tight for the foreseeable future,” said Doug Monro, a founder of the global job search engine Adzuna. And then there are the consequences for Wall Street. The nearly monthlong shutdown in 1995-96 coincided with a 5 percent drop in stock prices. “Certainly the stock market has been on a tear and proved quite resilient,” said Nancy Vanden Houten, a senior economist at Oxford Economics. “I don’t think a brief shutdown would bother the markets all that much,” she said. “But the longer it lasts, the more likely it is to affect financial markets.” After recent gains, stocks “might be a little more vulnerable to a sell-off,” she added. So far, markets have not reacted adversely. United States stock futures were trading upward on Saturday afternoon, well after the shutdown began. But analysts warned last week that traders could be spooked if they grow to believe a shutdown bodes poorly for raising the federal debt limit this spring, in time to prevent a government default on debt. “While a government shutdown only risks delayed payments for discretionary spending categories,” analysts at Morgan Stanley wrote, “a Treasury default driven by the debt ceiling could be catastrophic for the U.S. Treasury market and other macro markets in general.” world nyregion us us world nyregion business opinion magazine "
nyt://article/a861b366-e753-5853-b0eb-7729eae8b21d,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/07/01/world/europe/coronavirus-europe-usa.html,2020-07-01T14:46:47+0000,article,News,1388,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labor and Jobs', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (2020)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Layoffs and Job Reductions', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment Insurance', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Wages and Salaries', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Europe', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The United States, with its readiness to fire and hire, normally bounces back faster after a recession. This time, though, Europe’s model may be better. BRUSSELS — After the devastating financial crisis of 2008 and 2009, the United States recovered much more quickly than Europe, which suffered a double-dip recession. This time, many economists say that Europe may have the edge. The main reason America did well was the rapid response of the government and the flexible nature of the American economy, quick both to fire workers but also to hire them again. Europe, with built-in social insurance, tries to keep workers from layoffs through subsidies to employers, making it harder to fire and more expensive to rehire. But this is a different kind of collapse, a mandated shutdown in response to a pandemic, driving down both supply and demand simultaneously. And that difference creates the possibility that the European response, freezing the economy in place, might work better this time. “It’s an important debate,’’ said Jean Pisani-Ferry, a senior economist with Bruegel in Brussels and the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington. “This isn’t a normal recession, and there’s a lot you don’t know, especially if the virus comes back.’’ Much of Europe resorted to strict lockdowns that mostly beat back the virus but capsized economies. In the United States, President Trump has prioritized getting the economy moving even as infections multiply. Nearly everywhere governments had to step in with support as the emphasis shifted to relief and recovery. The common denominator is debt. The International Monetary Fund is forecasting that global debt will increase this year by 19 percent relative to gross domestic product. But the contrast is not only about different systems. It is also about different wagers on how the pandemic will proceed — which will make all the difference to how long government relief can be sustained. Already the different approaches are yielding different outcomes, not only in terms of infections and deaths — where the United States leads the world — but also jobs, with unemployment soaring in U.S. while it remains largely stable in Europe. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. The United States has provided an early burst of funds for taxpayers and company support, but is effectively leaving it up to the market to reallocate jobs. European governments, faced with an artificial shutdown, rather than a traditional fiscal crisis, have chosen to try to “freeze” their economies, in the hope of resuming them quickly. They have bet on a fairly rapid recovery, opting to try to preserve jobs as much as possible through wage subsidies, often up to 80 percent of salary, and for part-time work. But if the pandemic goes on too long, or returns in an extended second wave, European governments are unlikely to extend such support for much longer. Already, said Mr. Pisani-Ferry, “everyone is pulling back a bit.” Some plans were very generous and “there is a question of balance — you want to avoid fraud and avoid companies keeping people on furlough if there’s no chance of rehiring them.’’ Many European countries have adopted what is known in Germany as ‘‘kurzarbeit,’’ in which firms promise not to lay anyone off but to share the work, while the government makes up much of the lost income. “So far Europe is doing quite well, with a huge increase in unemployment in the U.S. and not so much here,’’ said Guntram Wolff, director of Bruegel, an economic think tank. “If what we see is temporary, if we return to an economic system much like before, then kurzarbeit is the right response,’’ he said. ‘‘But if you think there will be longer-lasting shifts, if you need to reallocate, then the U.S., which is more agile, may be better off.’’ Initial American spending was massive — up to $2.7 trillion in March and April (about 13 percent of gross domestic product) to provide economic relief to individuals, firms and states. It was the largest economic stimulus in American history. It was also several times bigger than Europe’s package, which in France, for example, was only 2 percent, Mr. Pisani-Ferry said. Still, “the European response was better — simpler and more effective in terms of the use of public funds,’’ he said. The reason is Europe’s existing social welfare system. Its “automatic stabilizers’’ kick in to support the poor and unemployed, without the need, as in the United States, to pass ad hoc legislation. The American response was a broad rather than targeted attack, with large amounts of money handed out quickly but indiscriminately and thus inefficiently by the Treasury, which had no system in place to do otherwise. The main point was to get money into the system so it did not shut down entirely, so consumer demand would continue. But the Treasury ended up giving a lot to those who did not need it — including to many dead people — and on a first-come, first-serve basis to employers, some of whom did not need the help. But even that huge spending, largely targeted at individuals rather than employers, did not prevent massive layoffs. Washington is relying on unemployment insurance and increased those payments by $600 a week, but that runs out at the end of July. Without any certainty about what comes next, consumers will hesitate to spend, slowing any recovery. The rise in unemployment in America has been roughly five times that in France, Mr. Pisani-Ferry wrote in a paper with Jérémie Cohen-Setton. “As an immediate crisis response, the French (and European) approach undoubtedly offered a bigger bang for the buck.’’ But such European generosity to prop up the existing system may slow job growth compared to the more flexible, insecure American system, where it’s easier to hire and fire, argues Megan Greene, an economist at Harvard’s Kennedy School. “Labor market flexibility creates more opportunities for U.S. workers, usually leading to a faster recovery after a downturn,’’ she wrote. That has helped America bounce back faster in traditional recessions, but this is a different kind of recession, a sudden freeze with no obvious exit. “The United States had a much larger fiscal stimulus, but as usual, fewer automatic stabilizers, so the discretionary part was bigger,’’ said Lucrezia Reichlin, professor of economics at London Business School. “So in America there is a bigger debate about who is winning and who is losing.’’ Jacob Funk Kirkegaard of the Peterson Institute for International Economics pointed out that because most Europeans don’t have to worry about getting their salaries, the “lockdown was also easier to sustain.’’ That was especially true, he said, for “the critical eight weeks, mid-March to mid-May,’’ when Europe largely succeeded in snuffing out the rapid advance of the virus, which is continuing to spread in the United States at a record pace. In the United States, “there are a lot of voices clamoring to open up or it will cost us the economy, since there are millions of Americans that need to work to put food on the table,’’ he said. “So Americans were willing to take chances that Europeans did not have to.’’ A lot will depend now on the course of the pandemic. No doubt, Europeans continue to argue fiercely over the size and shape of their coronavirus recovery fund and how it will be distributed, but by now there is no doubt that the money will be in the pipeline. If Europe is lucky and can engineer a broad, comprehensive lockdown but a short one, then whenever that money arrives next year will help the economy grow, especially if recovery is slow, weak and prolonged.  Last week, Christine Lagarde, the head of the European Central Bank, which stepped in with a massive program to guarantee new government debt, said: “We probably have passed the lowest point,’’ but given all the unknowns, “I say that with some trepidation.” In the United States, on the other hand, the uncertainty of the government response is itself a factor. “Despite being one country,” Ms. Reichlin said, “the U.S. is coming out much more fragmented than Europe.’’ If American consumers remain apprehensive, or their unemployment benefits run out, or if there is a continued rise in illnesses or a second coronavirus wave, the American recovery could be short-circuited. “We live with the idea that the U.S. has an ability to rebound that is almost unlimited,” Michel Duclos, a former French ambassador, told The Atlantic. “For the first time, I’m starting to have some doubts.” Steven Erlanger is the chief diplomatic correspondent in Europe, based in Brussels. He previously reported from London, Paris, Jerusalem, Berlin, Prague, Moscow and Bangkok. More about Steven Erlanger "
nyt://article/d8f43783-ed75-5f9c-8c33-004b7f882981,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/27/us/politics/coronavirus-stimulus-bill-farmers.html,2020-03-27T22:12:00+0000,article,News,1377,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (2020)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Agriculture and Farming', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Presidential Election of 2020', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stimulus (Economic)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AGRICULTURE DEPARTMENT', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'American Farm Bureau Federation', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Perdue Farms Inc', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Tyson Foods Inc', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Perdue, Sonny', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Grassley, Charles E', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Hoeven, John', 'rank': 16, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McConnell, Mitch', 'rank': 17, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Thune, John R', 'rank': 18, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Midwestern States (US)', 'rank': 19, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The bill allots as much as $23.5 billion in assistance to farmers, a key constituency of President Trump’s, in the middle of an election year. WASHINGTON — After providing nearly $26 billion in aid to farmers over the past few years to offset losses from President Trump’s trade war with China, the administration now has another giant new pot of money to pass out to them with little or no oversight, courtesy of the $2 trillion coronavirus stimulus package. The legislation, given final passage by the House on Friday and quickly signed into law by Mr. Trump, allocates as much as $23.5 billion in assistance for farmers and gives broad leeway to Agriculture Secretary Sonny Perdue to direct it where he sees fit. The money was inserted into the bill by senators from farm states after an intense lobbying push by major corporate farming groups. Parts of the industry are suffering immediate hits from the coronavirus outbreak, such as corn growers who have seen prices for ethanol plummet and mom-and-pop suppliers of farm markets that have closed in many cities. But unlike industries such as airlines, hotels and automakers, which have largely or completely shut down, most farms are still operating. And sales of some products in the industry have surged as worried consumers stock up, generating shortages of meat, chicken, eggs and flour. The law provides Mr. Perdue with $9.5 billion to support farmers, including livestock producers, suppliers of farm markets and producers of specialty crops, and $14 billion in borrowing authority to replenish the fund he used to make trade-related payments to farmers in the past two years. The department’s entire discretionary budget request for next year is about $23 billion. The Agriculture Department will also receive an additional $25.1 billion for food aid programs for poor families from the stimulus bill. “We are effectively subsiding every other sector of the economy” in the $2 trillion stimulus package, said Joshua Sewell, a farming industry analyst at Taxpayers for Common Sense, which advocates less government spending. “So I guess the argument goes that agriculture wants its piece of the pie, too.” The administration’s use of the money will become a major political factor in rural America in the middle of an election year in which Midwestern states could be pivotal, said Lawrence R. Jacobs, the director of the Center for the Study of Politics and Governance at University of Minnesota. He predicted that Mr. Trump would soon be trumpeting it as part of his re-election campaign. “This is just an extraordinary and unprecedented opportunity in the modern era for a president to dole out cash,” he said. “In urban areas, they call this walking around money, which a politician hands out to secure support.” A small army of groups mounted the fast-moving campaign for aid, including the politically powerful American Farm Bureau Federation and the National Cattlemen’s Beef Association. Joining them were other smaller players representing producers of goods like turkey, pork and potatoes or sunflowers, sorghum, peanuts and eggs. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Among their targets were farm-state lawmakers like Senators John Hoeven of North Dakota, who pressed for $50 billion in aid for agriculture. Others included Senators Pat Roberts of Kansas, John Thune of South Dakota and Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the majority leader. All are Republicans who serve on the Senate agriculture committee or the appropriations subcommittee that oversees farm aid. Senator Debbie Stabenow of Michigan, the ranking Democrat on the agriculture committee, was also lobbied. “We want to make sure that farmers, ranchers and rural Americans are also recognized as needing assistance,” said Dale Moore, the executive vice president of the American Farm Bureau and a former chief of staff at the Agriculture Department. Farmers in Midwestern states like Iowa, Illinois and Minnesota — as well as in Texas and Kansas — reaped much of the $26 billion spent in the past two years to blunt the economic effect of the administration’s trade policies, according to Joseph W. Glauber of the International Food Policy Research Institute. Without those payments, net farm income last year would have dropped about 5 percent, he estimated. Instead, it rose nearly 12 percent. Seth Meyer, an agricultural economist with the University of Missouri, said the economic blow to agriculture from the virus could be harder to offset than the lost sales from trade policy. “If you are producing flowers and there is no wedding this summer, if you were a fruit and vegetable grower selling through a restaurant wholesaler, what do you do now?” he asked. “What if you are a milk producer selling your product to a processor who has trouble organizing transportation and labor?” The bottom line, he said, could be a bigger effect on farmers than that created by the trade friction with China — “much bigger, potentially.” Still, some parts of the industry are seeing benefits from the pandemic. Some big meat producers, including Tyson Foods, announced special bonuses this week for farmers to reward them for the increase in work to keep supermarket shelves stocked. In general, farmers have weathered recessions better than other economic groups, because while consumers cut purchases of goods like clothing and change their eating habits to save money, they always need food. This downturn is fundamentally different from others in many ways, but Wall Street analysts are issuing bullish predictions for parts of the agriculture industry based on the surge in demand for products like beef and chicken. “Meat is flying off the shelves” wrote Ken Goldman, an analyst at JPMorgan, who upgraded the stocks of Tyson and Sanderson Farms, two major chicken and meat producers. “We now believe that outstanding retail demand for meat is more than offsetting soft demand at food service.” Prices being paid to farmers raising cattle and other animals have dropped in recent weeks, reflecting declines in financial markets worldwide and disruptions in supply chains, although these prices recovered somewhat this week. Major meatpackers are drawing scrutiny as demand rises, amid some suspicion that they are gaming the system to push up their own profits at the expense of farmers and consumers. “If packers are illegally manipulating markets during crisis we need USDA & DOJ & CFTC to investigate + help farmers,” Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, wrote on Twitter on Friday, referring to the Department of Justice and the Commodities Futures Trading Commission, the federal agency that regulates markets where these goods are bought and sold. Congress imposed almost no limit on how Mr. Perdue spends the money, suggesting only that the $9.5 billion chunk be used to support a wide range of agricultural producers. The legislation set aside $750,000 for the agency’s inspector general for “conducting audits and investigations of projects and activities carried out with funds.” Similarly, with the $14 billion for the Commodity Credit Corporation, there is very little guidance on how that money can be spent other than it be used for an “emergency requirement.” With the streets empty, cars parked and demand for fuel depressed, corn growers are among the most likely recipients. Mr. Meyer of the University of Missouri said about 40 percent of corn production goes into the ethanol industry, where “you are starting to hear of people shutting down.” Historically, the Commodity Credit Corporation only made payments to wheat, corn, soybean and livestock farmers during unexpected drops in crop prices because of surpluses or declines in output related to weather or disease. But the administration has used this program to reimburse farmers for billions in dollars in losses after China stopped buying soybeans and other crops to punish the United States for tariffs Mr. Trump imposed on Chinese products. Mr. Perdue has repeatedly warned farmers not to count on continuing to receive payments from that federal program. But every time funding has been about to run out, Mr. Trump has clamored to spend more. In late February, after the administration reached a new trade agreement with China, for instance, Mr. Perdue said, “I am not advising any farmer to expect any market program at this point, as the market should adjust for the current trade expectations.” The very next day, Mr. Trump tweeted that if farmers needed more aid while waiting for the terms of new trade deals to kick in, “that aid will be provided by the federal government.” Although the Agriculture Department is not obligated to use its new spending authority, industry analysts fully expect it will, especially with Election Day a little over seven months away. Brent Gloy, a corn, wheat and soybean farmer and agricultural economist from Nebraska, said, “Those checks are going to go out.” Kitty Bennett contributed research. An earlier version of this article referred incorrectly to Ken Goldman. He is an analyst at JPMorgan, not Goldman Sachs.  When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more Eric Lipton is a Washington-based investigative reporter. A three-time winner of the Pulitzer Prize, he previously worked at The Washington Post and The Hartford Courant. More about Eric Lipton Sharon LaFraniere is an investigative reporter. She was part of a team that won a Pulitzer Prize in 2018 for national reporting on Donald Trump’s connections with Russia. More about Sharon LaFraniere "
nyt://article/0d6a88b1-286e-574c-93a2-f6f4d82fa5f1,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/07/24/upshot/student-debt-forgiveness-already-happening.html,2019-07-24T09:00:26+0000,article,News,2612,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Education', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Education Department (US)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bush, George W', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House of Representatives', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Senate', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Democrats are campaigning to fix an issue that is already starting to resolve itself for many teachers and other public servants. When Bernie Sanders recently announced a $1.6 trillion plan to forgive all student loans, he had a particular kind of borrower in mind. “You are not truly free when you cannot pursue your dream of becoming a teacher, environmentalist, journalist or nurse,” he said, “because you cannot make enough money to cover your monthly student loan payments.” Elizabeth Warren used similar language in announcing her more modest $640 billion loan forgiveness plan, noting that “student loan debt hits America’s teachers particularly hard.” Beto O’Rourke called for canceling all schoolteacher loans. What’s strange about the new crop of proposals is that the Department of Education already has a public service loan forgiveness program, called P.S.L.F., which President George W. Bush signed into law in 2007. The program, though, appears to be a spectacular failure. In the 18 months after borrowers with a decade of service in government or nonprofit jobs first became eligible in 2017, 73,554 people applied to have their student loans wiped out. And 73,036 were turned down — a rejection rate of 99.3 percent. This has prompted widespread condemnation, with pundits on the left describing the forgiveness program as “the defrauding of tens of thousands of borrowers” and an “incredible, rage-inducing story.” Last week, the American Federation of Teachers filed a lawsuit accusing the secretary of education, Betsy DeVos, of “gross mismanagement” of the program. Yet the forgiveness program has also been criticized by analysts and politicians on the right as a drain on the public treasury. The conservative American Enterprise Institute called the forgiveness program “the latest runaway entitlement program.” Citing costs, the Trump administration has twice proposed eliminating the program altogether. What’s going on here? How can a program that Democrats hate because it rejects nearly everyone also be a program that Republicans hate because it’s too generous? The answer lies in the convoluted story of the federal government’s efforts to help people who are struggling to repay their student loans, even as it continues to make nearly all of the loans in the first place. The end of that story suggests that Democrats competing to help teachers and other public servants with loans may be about to spend hundreds of billions of dollars to fix a problem that is already on the way to being solved. The first thing to know about the forgiveness program is that Congress did not, initially, want all public servants to receive it. Instead, lawmakers limited eligibility to people with a particular kind of loan, called a Direct Loan. Direct Loans were created in the 1990s as an alternative to the Federal Family Education Loan program (F.F.E.L.), under which the federal government paid private banks to lend students money and then reimbursed banks for 98 percent of any loans that went bad. Direct Loans are made directly by the Department of Education. Technically, students could choose either one. In practice, they almost always chose from a college-provided “preferred lender list.” How did a lender get on the list? The all-expenses-paid Caribbean vacations might have had something to do with it. Which is why, when the forgiveness program was created, only 24 percent of federal student loans were Direct Loans. And only Direct Loans could be forgiven. Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. There was, in theory, a workaround. Someone who had, say, graduated in 2006 with a Federal Family Education Loan and become a low-paid schoolteacher could “consolidate” by taking out a new Direct Loan and using it to pay off an F.F.E.L. loan. In practice, President Bush signed the forgiveness program into law on Thursday, Sept. 27, 2007, as part of a larger package of overhauls that received relatively little news media attention. The measure, which became effective the following Monday, Oct. 1, forgives loans for anyone with 10 years of public service — but only service conducted after the law went into effect. That meant that people with Federal Family Education Loans who wanted to maximize their loan forgiveness benefits 10 years later had five days, including a weekend, to consolidate their loans, based on an obscure sub-provision of a little-known law. Even if they did, or filed the paperwork relatively quickly, there was another problem. Congress didn’t just limit forgiveness to a certain kind of loan. It also decided that loans had to be repaid in a certain way. When students leave college with a garden-variety loan, they’re put into the “standard repayment plan” — principal and interest divided into equal monthly payments over 10 years. Those payments can be hard for people who struggle financially, particularly if they graduate during an economic downturn. So starting in the 1970s and 1980s, Congress created a series of alternatives. Loans can be put into “deferment,” which means temporary permission to skip payments without accruing penalties or damaging your credit rating. Or “forbearance,” which is the same as deferment, except your loans accrue interest in the meantime. Although this helped with immediate crises, some students had longer-term needs. So Congress created the “graduated” plan, in which, instead of equal-size installments, payments start small and grow over time. There’s also the “extended” plan; the payment period lasts longer than 10 years. An extended plan can also be graduated. That still left people who were flat broke or unemployed or who needed to spend their money on other things, like children or food or rent. So Congress created the “income-contingent repayment” plan. Monthly payments were set at 20 percent of borrowers’ “discretionary income,” which means their income minus basic living expenses, which are defined as the federal poverty line. The good thing about income-contingent plans is that your payments can’t overwhelm you. If you earn nothing, you owe nothing. The bad thing is that interest continues to accumulate. Recognizing this, and that some people would probably never catch up, Congress decided that anyone in this kind of plan for 25 years could have the remainder of his or her loan forgiven. Income-contingent repayment loans weren’t very popular. If you don’t have much money, 20 percent of discretionary income is still a lot, and 25 years is a long time. So when Congress passed the forgiveness program in 2007, it also created income-based repayment. It worked the same way as income-contingent repayment, except now people had to pay only 15 percent of discretionary income, and leftover debt was forgiven after 20 years. Public servants got a much better deal: forgiveness after 10 years. But the definition of service was stringent: 120 monthly payments (10 years’ worth) made while employed full time in a public service job. That meant that if you put your loan into deferment or forbearance for a few months, those months wouldn’t count toward the 120. Nor would payments made under graduated or extended plans, because they were available to anyone regardless of income, and Congress didn’t want doctors or lawyers artificially knocking down their payments and then having most of their loans canceled. To be eligible for the forgiveness program, people had to make payments based on their income. But the income-contingent repayment plan was little used, and, practically speaking, people couldn’t use income-based repayment until early 2009. Imagine the circumstances those applying for loan forgiveness in 2018 and 2019 might have been in a decade earlier. They probably had a Federal Family Education Loan. With the global economy crashing, there’s a good chance they were about to experience some kind of financial difficulty that would prevent them from making payments on the standard 10-year repayment plan. Otherwise they wouldn’t have a balance left to forgive 10 years later. That difficulty would trigger a series of choices among myriad options, most of which — forbearance, deferment, graduated plan, extended plan, graduated extended plan, or just missing some payments — would not qualify as one of the necessary 120 payments. In short, there’s a very good chance that they would at some point in the next decade make ineligible payments, or no payments, or that the eligible payments they did make would be on an ineligible loan. Those people needed some good advice. Whom would they call? Not the Department of Education, which subcontracts the work of helping borrowers to “loan servicing companies.” Unfortunately, the servicers didn’t prove up to the task. Loan servicers are paid a flat rate per borrower for processing loan payments and helping people navigate the repayment process. That means that the more time and effort a borrower requires, the less money the servicer makes. Someone who sets up an automatic debit from a checking account and never picks up the phone is a source of profits. Borrowers who need a lot of time-consuming assistance to ensure that their job, their loan and their repayment plan are all eligible for the forgiveness program are a financial liability. The results were predictable. In June 2017, a few months before the first public servants were (theoretically) eligible for loan forgiveness, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau issued a report describing the many ways loan servicers were messing things up. The complaints (echoed in the recent American Federation of Teachers lawsuit) included, but were not limited to: telling people that ineligible plans were eligible; telling people that payments that were ineligible were eligible; taking too long to consolidate loans into Direct Loans; failing to tell people who were interested in the forgiveness program how to enroll; and failing to tell people that if they consolidated several existing Direct Loans into a single new one, the 120-payment clock would reset to zero. There were other problems. You can get the forgiveness program only if you make income-based payments. For those payments to be accurate, you must file a new set of forms every year detailing your income and family size. Servicers would botch this, sometimes, and while they were working it out, the payments wouldn’t count toward 120. When the time comes for forgiveness, you have to submit another set of forms proving that you were employed full time in a public service job during each of the 120 months. Servicers botched this sometimes, too. Which meant that when the loan forgiveness window finally opened in October 2017, the only people who were legally eligible were a kind of rare, immaculate borrower: someone who had not only made all of the loan payments, in full and on time, for 120 consecutive months, but had also (unusually) taken out exactly the right kind of loan, and (improbably) gotten immediately into exactly the right kind of repayment plan, and (very luckily) never once experienced a debilitating servicer error of any kind.  And this perfect borrower had to have been employed in a public service job the entire time. This also turned out to be a source of confusion. While plenty of blame can be directed at Congress for designing a confusing program and at loan servicers for carrying out the program poorly, the truth is that many of the applicants hadn’t been public servants for all of the previous decade. Why, then, does the Congressional Budget Office keep raising its estimated cost of the forgiveness program? The numbers are startling. In 2016, the C.B.O. estimated the annual cost of providing graduate school loans to be $4 billion. The next year it revised it to $6 billion. Last year the number jumped to $8 billion. This year, it’s up to $12 billion — all because the C.B.O. keeps increasing its estimate of how many public service loans the government will eventually write off. In part, it’s simply a matter of time. If you thought you made 120 qualifying payments, but really made only 110, you can make 10 more and apply again. Some of the people initially rejected will have their loans forgiven this year or next. Future applicants will need to be less immaculate as time goes on. Servicers may get better at their job. But the other big reason for the rising price is that lawmakers weren’t done tinkering with student loans back in 2007. Far from it. They continued to add and adjust, each time making the program more complicated and expensive. The first big change came in 2010, when Congress got rid of the subsidized private bank loan program. All new loans would be Direct Loans — and thus eligible for the forgiveness program. At the same time, Congress made the forgiveness program much more generous, by reducing monthly loan payments under income-based repayment to 10 percent of discretionary income, from 15 percent. Congress never gets rid of old ways to repay student loans. It just creates new ones. The 2007 law created what we’ll call Old I.B.R (Income-Based Repayment), in which you pay 15 percent of income. The 2010 law created New I.B.R., in which you pay 10 percent. New I.B.R. wasn’t supposed to be available until 2014. But some clever Obama administration lawyers figured out how to create another repayment option out of whole regulatory cloth that mirrored New I.B.R but was available sooner. They called it Pay as You Earn, or PAYE. It became available in 2013, for any loans made since 2007. That still left out people who had borrowed before 2007. In 2015, the administration created Revised Pay as You Earn, or Repaye, to include those borrowers, too. The loan servicers proceeded to add these three options to the long and growing list of complicated repayment systems that they frequently did a bad job of explaining to their customers. With so many plans and options, you need a college degree to make sense of it all. But you know who has college degrees? Graduate students. And even as federal loan policy evolved into ever-more exotic permutations, a weak economy and creeping credentialism were pushing more students back into the welcoming arms of higher education, which had all manner of expensive master’s programs for sale. Universities also benefited greatly from a 2005 law that allows graduate and professional school students to borrow whatever tuition universities decide to charge, plus living expenses. This can easily add up to six figures. The Department of Education recently published a list of 1,126 graduate programs in which the average borrower leaves college owing $100,000 or more. With that much money at stake, graduate students started to get wise about the loan forgiveness program. So did graduate school financial advisers making the case for why it’s O.K. to borrow luxury-automobile quantities of money for another college degree. There’s no way to know how many people will apply for the forgiveness program. But in 2012, the Department of Education began allowing people to submit a form that, once approved, pre-certifies the public service that people have earned as they work toward 10 years.  At the same time, nearly half of the $870 billion in outstanding Direct Loans — the kind that are eligible for loan forgiveness — is being repaid through income-driven plans, the kind that are eligible for loan forgiveness. And one in four American workers is in a job eligible for the forgiveness program. The amount of money the federal government will wave off under the forgiveness program is like a rising ocean building up behind a wall of initial program complexity, borrower confusion and loan servicer incompetence. Eventually, it will spill over. The 99 percent rejection rate can’t last. Many of the teachers and other public servants who Democratic presidential candidates say deserve to have their loans forgiven are already well on their way to exactly that. Kevin Carey directs the education policy program at New America. You can follow him on Twitter at @kevincarey1. world nyregion upshot upshot world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/b13d2f02-cfd6-5dea-abd3-ec227f084b01,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/12/06/opinion/columnists/trade-tariffs-trump.html,2018-12-07T00:06:34+0000,article,Op-Ed,847,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Protectionism (Trade)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Great Britain Withdrawal from EU (Brexit)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House of Representatives', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Great Britain', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"On trade, Trump is a rebel without a clue Opinion Columnist Are we going to have a full-blown trade war with China, and maybe the rest of the world? Nobody knows — because it all depends on the whims of one man. And Tariff Man is ignorant, volatile and delusional. Why do I say that it’s all about one man? After all, after the 2016 U.S. election and the Brexit vote in Britain, there was a lot of talk about a broad popular backlash against globalization. Over the past two years, however, it has become clear that this backlash was both smaller and shallower than advertised. Where, after all, is the major constituency supporting Donald Trump’s tariffs and threats to exit international agreements? Big business hates the prospect of a trade war, and stocks plunge whenever that prospect becomes more likely. Labor hasn’t rallied behind Trumpist protectionism either. Meanwhile, the percentage of Americans believing that foreign trade is good for the economy is near a record high. Even those who criticize trade seem to be motivated by loyalty to Trump, not by deep policy convictions: During the 2016 campaign self-identified Republicans swung wildly from the view that trade agreements are good to the view that they’re bad, then swung back again once Trump seemed to be negotiating agreements of his own. (We have always been in a trade war with Eastasia.) But if there’s no strong constituency for protectionism, why are we teetering on the brink of a trade war? Blame U.S. trade law. Once upon a time, Congress used to write detailed tariff bills that were stuffed full of giveaways to special interests, with destructive effects on both the economy and American diplomacy. So in the 1930s F.D.R. established a new system in which the executive branch negotiates trade deals with other countries, and Congress simply votes these deals up or down. The U.S. system then became the template for global negotiations that culminated in the creation of the World Trade Organization. The creators of the U.S. trade policy system realized, however, that it couldn’t be too rigid or it would shatter in times of stress; there had to be ways to relieve pressure when necessary. So trade law gives the executive the right to impose tariffs without new legislation under certain circumstances, mainly to protect national security, to retaliate against unfair foreign practices, or to give industries facing sudden surges in foreign competition time to adjust. In other words, U.S. trade law gives the president a lot of discretionary power over trade, as part of a system that curbs the destructive influence of corrupt, irresponsible members of Congress. And that setup worked very well for more than 80 years. Unfortunately, it wasn’t intended to handle the problem of a corrupt, irresponsible president. Trump is pretty much all alone in lusting for a trade war, but he has virtually dictatorial authority over trade. What’s he doing with that power? He’s trying to negotiate deals. Unfortunately, he really, really doesn’t know what he’s doing. On trade, he’s a rebel without a clue. Even as he declared himself Tariff Man, Trump revealed that he doesn’t understand how tariffs work. No, they aren’t taxes on foreigners, they’re taxes on our own consumers. When trying to make deals, he seems to care only about whether he can claim a “win,” not about substance. He has been touting the “U.S. Mexico Canada Trade Agreement” as a repudiation of NAFTA, when it’s actually just a fairly minor modification. (Nancy Pelosi calls it “the trade agreement formerly known as Prince.”) Most important, his inability to do international diplomacy, which we’ve seen on many fronts, carries over to trade talks. Remember, he claimed to have “solved” the North Korean nuclear crisis, but Kim Jong-un is still expanding his ballistic missile capacity. Well, last weekend he claimed to have reached a major trade understanding with China; but as J.P. Morgan soon reported in a note to its clients, his claims “seem if not completely fabricated then grossly exaggerated.” Markets plunged earlier this week as investors realized that they’d been had. As I said, business really doesn’t want a trade war. Let’s be clear: China is not a good actor in the world economy. It engages in real misbehavior, especially with regard to intellectual property: The Chinese essentially rip off technology. So there is a case for toughening our stance on trade. But that toughening should be undertaken in concert with other nations that also suffer from Chinese misbehavior, and it should have clear objectives. The last person you want to play hardball here is someone who doesn’t grasp the basics of trade policy, who directs his aggressiveness at everyone — tariffs on Canadian aluminum to protect our national security? Really? — and who can’t even give an honest account of what went down in a meeting. Unfortunately, that’s the person who’s now in charge, and it’s hard to see how he can be restrained. So the future of world trade, with all it implies for the world economy, now hinges largely on Donald Trump’s mental processes. That is not a comforting thought. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram, and sign up for the Opinion Today newsletter.  Paul Krugman has been an Opinion columnist since 2000 and is also a Distinguished Professor at the City University of New York Graduate Center. He won the 2008 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences for his work on international trade and economic geography.  @PaulKrugman  "
nyt://article/9390d7f2-2c95-5c91-ad7a-75d53d24d0f4,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/23/opinion/republicans-coronavirus.html,2020-03-23T22:24:32+0000,article,Op-Ed,868,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Layoffs and Job Reductions', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stimulus (Economic)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McConnell, Mitch', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Greed, germs and the art of no deal. Opinion Columnist If you want a quick summary of the state of play over fiscal stimulus legislation, here it is: Republicans insist that we should fight a plague with trickle-down economics and crony capitalism. Democrats, for some reason, don’t agree, and think we should focus on directly helping Americans in need. And if legislation is stalled, as it appears to be as I write this (although things change fast when we’re on Covid time), it’s because Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, is holding needy Americans hostage in an attempt to blackmail Democrats into giving Donald Trump a $500 billion slush fund. First, let’s talk about the nature of the economic crisis we face. At the worst point in the 2007-2009 recession, America was losing around 800,000 jobs per month. Right now, we’re probably losing several million jobs every week. What’s causing these job losses? So far it’s not what usually happens in a recession, when businesses lay off workers because consumers aren’t spending enough. What we’re seeing instead are the effects of social distancing: restaurants, entertainment venues and many other establishments have been closed to limit the spread of the coronavirus. And we neither can nor should bring those jobs back until the pandemic has faded. What this tells us is that right now our highest priority isn’t job creation, it’s disaster relief: giving families and small businesses that have lost their incomes enough money to afford necessities while the shutdown lasts. Oh, and providing generous aid to hospitals, clinics and other health care providers in this time of incredible stress. Now, while social distancing is currently driving employment destruction, there will eventually be a second, more conventional round of job losses as distressed families and businesses cut back on spending. So there is also a case for stimulus to sustain overall spending — although helping Americans in need will provide much of that stimulus, by also helping them continue to spend. So what’s in the stimulus bill that McConnell is trying to ram through the Senate? It grudgingly provides some, but only some, of the aid Americans in distress will need. Funny, isn’t it, how helping ordinary Americans is always framed as a “Democratic demand”? And even there the legislation includes poison pills, like a provision that would deny aid to many nonprofit institutions like nursing homes and group homes for the disabled. But it also includes a $500 billion slush fund for corporations that the Trump administration could allocate at its discretion, with essentially no oversight. This isn’t just terrible policy; it’s an insult to our intelligence. After all, it would be hard to justify giving any administration that kind of power to reward its friends and punish those it considers enemies. It’s almost inconceivable that anyone would propose giving such authority to the Trump administration. Remember, we’ve had more than three years to watch this administration in action. We’ve seen Trump refuse to disclose anything about his financial interests, amid abundant evidence that he is profiting at the public’s expense. Trump’s trade war has been notable for the way in which favored companies somehow manage to get tariff exemptions while others are denied. And as you read this, Trump is refusing to use his authority to require production of essential medical gear. So it would be totally out of character for this administration to allocate huge sums fairly and in the public interest. Cronyism aside, there’s also the issue of competence. Why would you give vast discretionary power to a team that utterly botched the response to the coronavirus because Trump didn’t want to hear bad news? Why would you place economic recovery efforts in the hands of people who were assuring us just weeks ago that the virus was contained and the economy was “holding up nicely”? Finally, we’ve just had a definitive test of the underlying premise of the McConnell slush fund — that if you give corporations money without strings attached they will use it for the benefit of workers and the economy as a whole. In 2017 Republicans rammed through a huge corporate tax cut, which they assured us would lead to higher wages and surging business investment. Neither of these things happened; instead, corporations basically used the money to buy back their own stock. Why would this time be any different? As I write this, Republicans are ranting that Democrats are sabotaging the economy by refusing to pass McConnell’s bill — which is a bit rich for those who remember the G.O.P.’s scorched-earth opposition to everything Barack Obama proposed. But in any case, if McConnell really wants action, he could get it easily either by dropping his demand for a Trump-controlled slush fund or by passing the stimulus bill House Democrats are likely to offer very soon. And maybe that will happen within a few days. As I said, we’re now living on Covid time. But right now Republicans seem dead set on exploiting a crisis their own president helped create by his refusal to take the pandemic seriously. Many people have lost their jobs over the past week as a result of the coronavirus. If you’re one of them, we may want to include your story in an upcoming video essay.  The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. Paul Krugman has been an Opinion columnist since 2000 and is also a Distinguished Professor at the City University of New York Graduate Center. He won the 2008 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences for his work on international trade and economic geography.  @PaulKrugman  "
nyt://article/6d661254-5d3e-5d87-aecb-cce5a99c1c9b,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/02/06/business/dealbook/stock-market-drops.html,2018-02-06T12:31:10+0000,article,News,3937,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Dow Jones Stock Average', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Wall Street (Manhattan, NY)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Good Tuesday. Here’s what we’re watching: • Tronc nears a deal to sell L.A. Times. • Dow surges 500 points. • Reasons not to worry about the recent sell-off. • Disney easily exceeds Wall Street’s expectations. • Snap jumps 20 percent after earnings. • Clayton: “There’s nothing that came out of this that concerns me.” • Is algorithmic trading to blame for Monday’s plunge? Want this in your own email inbox? Here’s the sign-up. The owner of The Los Angeles Times is close to a deal to sell the newspaper to Patrick Soon-Shiong, a billionaire Los Angeles doctor, two people familiar with the negotiations said Tuesday. The $500 million deal comes amid months of turmoil at The Times, including upheaval in the editorial and management ranks. The transaction would include The Times and The San Diego Union-Tribune, these people said. Dr. Soon-Shiong is a major shareholder in Tronc, the parent company of The Times. A deal could be announced as soon as Wednesday but could still fall apart, the people said. Tronc is likely to use the sale proceeds to pay down its debt. Dr. Soon-Shiong, the founder, chief executive and chairman of NantHealth, a health care company, was in a public feud last year with Michael W. Ferro Jr., Tronc’s nonexecutive chairman, as they vied to increase their stakes in the company in apparent attempts to outmaneuver each other for control. — Sydney Ember After days of sometimes wild moves in stock markets, investors on Wall Street refocused on the ongoing strength in the American economy as shares of consumer companies helped lead broad indexes higher. A sometimes-panicky global market sell-off — begun Monday when the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index lost more than 4 percent, its worst decline since August 2011 — dissipated through the day, and the S.&P. 500 ended Tuesday’s session up by about 1.7 percent. The Dow Jones industrial average gained about 2.3 percent. The consumer discretionary sector of the S.&P. 500 jumped by more than 2 percent, pulled higher by strength in well-known consumer-facing companies like Amazon, Netflix and Home Depot. General Motors also rose after reporting strong earnings and strong demand for its pickup trucks and SUVs. Investors appeared to reassess whether the previous day’s violent decline—the S.&P. suffered its worst decline since August 2011—reflected actual fundamentals or was merely a long-overdue outbreak of investor jitters. For months, markets seemed to sleepwalk higher, as measures of volatility—the ups and downs of stock prices—hit historically low levels. Investors appeared to grow accustomed to an economic backdrop in which growth and inflation remained lackluster, a state of affairs that ensured powerful global central banks would continue to support markets with a range of policies. But the peaceful climb ended over the past week amid worries that solid economic growth in the United States and abroad could be showing early signals of growing inflation pressure. Those concerns drove yields on long-term Treasury bonds sharply higher in recent weeks, as economic data—such as the U.S. jobs report on Friday—showed wages growing at their fastest clip in years. — Matt Phillips The Walt Disney Company on Tuesday became the latest prominent company to report solid earnings amidst the market turmoil. The strong numbers support the belief that plunging stock markets do not reflect weakness in the real economy. Disney made $1.89 per share in the last three months of 2017, after excluding a tax benefit. That number is 22 percent higher than the $1.55 per share earnings in the same period of 2016. It is also well in excess of the $1.61 per share that Wall Street analysts had forecast for the latest quarter. Disney did best in its parks and resorts business, which reported $1.35 billion of operating income, which was 21 percent higher than the year-earlier period. The earlier period’s results were somewhat depressed by the impact of Hurricane Matthew, Disney said. In its press release, the company noted that higher profits at its domestic parks and resorts were driven by an increase in guest spending and an increase in attendance, which underscores consumers’ willingness to spend more. On the other hand, the company said parks and resorts are dealing with higher labor costs and other expenses. That may not be lost on investors who are starting to see inflation as a threat to stock prices. — Peter Eavis The company reported earnings after the close that easily beat analysts’ expectations. The Numbers • Snap reported revenue rose 72 percent to $285.7 million, easily exceeding the $252.9 million expected by analysts. • The company lost 13 cents per share, below estimates of 16 cents a share. • Snap added 8.9 million daily active users for a total of 187 million, compared to the 184.2 million estimated. The Context Snap’s shares have struggled since its initial public offering in March 2017. The stock fell below its I.P.O price of $17 a share last summer and has remained below that level since. If Snap’s after-hours gains hold up on Wednesday, the stock will be on the cusp of crossing back over its I.P.O. level. The stock market’s slide over the past week has given investors plenty of anxiety. Stocks have lost roughly $4 trillion in value. The Dow Jones industrial average and the S.&P. 500 endured their worst point declines in their histories Monday and their largest percentage drops since 2011. C.B.O.E. Volatility Index surged more than 100 percent Monday, the biggest increase in its history. But there are reasons investors shouldn’t get too concerned. 1) Heading into the final hour of trading, the markets have rebounded strongly. The Dow has jumped 2 percent, while the S&P 500 and the Nasdaq Composite are up 1.6 percent and 1.9 percent. That suggests that worst of the sell-off may be passed. 2) The outlook for economic growth is strong in the United States. The American economy grew 2.6 percent in the fourth quarter and the Atlanta Fed’s GDPNow tracker forecasts a 4 percent rise in the first quarter. 3) Corporate America’s bottom line is growing. With 50 percent of the companies in the S.&P. 500 having reported results, profits are on pace to grow 13.4 percent, according to FactSet. If that growth rate holds through the end of earnings, it would mark the third quarter in the past four that S.&P. 500 companies have reported a double-digit profits increase. 4) The sell-off comes after a big run-up in stocks. Until Monday, the Dow and the S.&P. 500 hadn’t endured a pullback of 5 percent in more than 400 sessions. Since 1929, a 5 percent decline happens every 92 days on average, according to Goldman Sachs. So stocks were arguably due for a selloff. But it should be noted that after Monday’s declines the Dow was at levels last seen in, well, mid-December and was up more than 30 percent since the 2016 election. Strategists over at Goldman Sachs wrote: “The stock market correction appears to be more technical and positioning-driven rather than fundamentally-based.We believe the fundamental drivers of the equity market remain intact and reiterate our S&P 500 year-end 2018 forecast of 2850.” The company, founded by Elon Musk, achieved a new milestone with a successful test launch of its Falcon Heavy rocket, the most powerful rocket in operation in the world today. Here’s a video of the launch:  When stock markets are plunging, sober-minded investors try to gauge the underlying strength of bellwether companies, to see whether all the selling is justified. That is why many eyes will be on the earnings of the Walt Disney Company, which reports after the close of regular trading Tuesday. If the company releases stronger-than-expected results for the three months through the end of December, it will reinforce a general sense of optimism about corporate America . Stellar results from Disney would add to a strong earnings report on Tuesday from General Motors, which helped push the company’s shares 3 percent higher. Micron Technology, a large maker of computer chips, on Monday upped its outlook for the current quarter. Its shares soared 7.7 percent on Tuesday. Though Disney is not a high growth company, its results offer insight into the strength of consumer spending. As a result, if the company reports earnings that are below the forecasts of Wall Street analysts, it may add to the unease among investors.. The numbers to watch: Analysts expect Disney to earn $1.61 per share, and take in $15.44 billion in revenue in the quarter, according to data from Bloomberg. Of course, a lot more companies are going to have to report strong earnings to convince investors to jump back into the stock market. One of the reasons that stocks rallied in recent months is that analysts are expecting a 20-percent plus jump in profits in 2018, an eye-popping rise. The more large companies that hit their numbers in this earnings season, the more likely the stock market will find a floor. — Peter Eavis At a hearing of the Senate banking committee on Tuesday, Senator Richard Shelby of Alabama asked the heads of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission about the market turmoil. “Is this perhaps more than an ordinary correction?” Mr. Shelby asked. Jay Clayton, the chairman of the S.E.C. said that he could not tell what had caused the big declines, but he said that the market infrastructure had held up well under the strain of heavy trading. “As I sit here today, there’s nothing that came out of this that concerns me,” Mr. Clayton said. Christopher Giancarlo, the chairman of the C.F.T.C. said that his staff had a late night on Monday checking in with all the exchanges, and had not heard anything that concerned them. “The system worked as it was designed to do,” he said. — Nathaniel Popper Following a House Financial Services Committee hearing, Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, said that he has been in touch with market participants this week and that they are reacting in an orderly fashion and that there are no liquidity problems. He said it was possible that algorithmic trading was partially responsible for the recent volatility in the stock market. “I have heard from others that it has played a role, as there’s more programmed trading, this tends to have volatility in both directions,” he said. Despite that volatility, it does not appear that the Trump administration is ready to give up on the stock market as a measure of its success. “We’ve always been looking at the long-term impact of the stock market, it’s still up over 30 percent since the election and we continue to think American is a great place to do business,” Mr. Mnuchin said. “We couldn’t be happier with companies’ response with more and more investments in the U.S.” — Alan Rappeport Asked about the roiled stock market at a House Financial Services Committee hearing on Tuesday, Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, said that the Trump administration was not concerned and that it remains focused on the long-term trajectory of the economy. “We are very focused on long-term economic growth, and we believe that the policies that we have enacted, including tax reform are very positive for long-term economic growth,” Mr. Mnuchin said. He said that he was closely monitoring for orderly market functioning and that there were “no systemic issues” that were reported to him. “I’m happy to report I got the green lights,” Mr. Mnuchin said. The Treasury secretary said that given how much the market has rallied in the last year, he does not think the recent drop in prices raises financial stability concerns. Asked if the Trump administration will take the blame for the recent drop in stocks after taking credit for the rally, Mr. Mnuchin demurred. “I think we’ll still claim credit for the fact that it’s up over 30 percent since the election,” he said of the stock market. — Alan Rappeport  When stock markets sell off as they have the past two trading sessions, there is often more than one cause. But one popular trade is taking a lot of blame for Monday’s plunge: short volatility. Investors had piled money into exchange-traded products designed to rise when the C.B.O.E. Volatility Index, or VIX, falls. The VIX, known as the market’s fear gauge, measures how volatile investors expect stock markets to be in the month ahead. Those wagers paid off handsomely, rising 180 percent last year as the VIX plumbed historic lows. That quickly reversed Monday. The VIX surged 117 percent in its biggest one-day jump on record and two short volatility exchange-traded product — VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Short-Term Exchange Traded Note, XIV, and Next Notes S&P 500 VIX Inverse ETN — endured heavy selling. The selling led Credit Suisse to say it is going to buy back XIV and after the bank has done that it will no longer exist. Nomura also said its Next Notes “would be redeemed at a steep discount to their closing price on Monday in Asia, crystallizing large losses for investors,” the WSJ reported. From Barclays: “In our opinion, the significant spike in the VIX index and futures yesterday was technical in nature and does not necessarily indicate a true increase in risk perception.” From Morgan Stanley: “The near bankruptcy of the inverse VIX ETPs will be a very negative headline, and the several billion dollar loss for holders, largely retail, will scare some out of the market or force liquidations of other products to raise cash.” From Nicholas Colas, co-founder of DataTrek Research: “ Assuming volatility-related ETFs really are a market structure “Achilles heel”, this will take days if not weeks to play out, and there could be other problems waiting in the wings.” — Stephen Grocer Stock markets around the world appear headed down for a third straight trading day, after yesterday’s 4 percent drop in the S.&P. 500. Here are the latest numbers: • Hong Kong’s Hang Seng fell 5 percent. • Japan’s Nikkei was down 4.7 percent. • The U.K.’s FTSE 100 was down 2 percent. • Wall Street’s “fear gauge,” the VIX, is at its highest level in two and a half years. And here’s some more context from our colleague Peter Eavis. The technical question: Has computer-driven unwinding of “Goldilocks” trades tied to peaceful market rises played a role here? The economic question: Economies are growing around the world, which is likely to mean rising wages and then, perhaps, inflation. So will central bankers have to raise rates more than previously expected? The political question: What does this mean for President Trump, who has touted stock market gains as a measure of his success? More from Ben White of Politico: “This is a risk that the president clearly set himself up for,” said Charles Gabriel of Capital Alpha Partners, a Washington research firm. “Until now, Trump’s had kind of a free ride in this market and taken so much credit for it, even though so much of it was due to easy-money policies from Janet Yellen and the Fed. Now she’s out the door and volatility is back.” There’s another way of thinking about Mr. Trump’s role, Andrew writes in his latest column: Investors believe his policies to stoke growth are going to work so well that they will overheat the economy, and force the Federal Reserve to try to slow things down. But don’t expect action from the newly sworn-in Fed chairman, Jay Powell — at least, not yet. A bit of humor, courtesy of our colleague Binyamin Appelbaum: Where Bitcoin was this morning: $6,628, down almost 16 percent over the past 24 hours, according to CoinMarketCap. Ethereum’s Ether and Ripple’s XRP fell by double digits, too. What’s happening: Regulators are clamping down on digital money, and scams and hacks are eroding trust in it. More from Nathaniel Popper of the NYT: “Cryptocurrencies are almost a perfect vehicle for scams,” said Kevin Werbach, a professor at University of Pennsylvania’s Wharton School. “The combination of credulous buyers and low barriers for scammers were bound to lead to a high level of fraud, if and when the money involved got large.” Next: The heads of the S.E.C. and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission are to talk Bitcoin with the Senate Banking Committee today. The House appears ready to vote on a stopgap bill; funding would otherwise expire at 12:01 a.m. on Friday. What it does: Pairs short-term funding for the government with long-term funding for the military. What it doesn’t do: Include the increase in domestic spending demanded by Democrats, particularly Senate Democrats. Nor does it address immigration, which caused last month’s shutdown (though Senators John McCain and Chris Coons have a bipartisan proposal on that). Expect more give-and-take between the two sides of Congress: “I think everyone understands that this will probably end up being a Ping-Pong situation, and we’ll see where the ball lands,” said Representative Carlos Curbelo, Republican of Florida. Elsewhere in policy • Most of President Trump’s legal team wants to avoid letting Robert Mueller question him. (NYT) • Mr. Trump flippantly suggested that Democrats who sat through his State of the Union address stone-faced were guilty of treason. (NYT) • The House Intelligence Committee voted unanimously to release a Democratic memo tied to the investigation of a Trump campaign aide. Now it’s up to the White House. (Politico) • China is investigating U.S. sorghum exports, a move that threatens a widening trade standoff. (NYT) It depends whether AT&T’s bid for Time Warner goes through. Comcast dropped out of the running for Fox once it became clear that Rupert Murdoch would prefer a tie-up with Disney, but it is studying whether to rejoin the fray, CNBC reported. More from Alex Sherman of CNBC: An unsolicited offer at a premium to Disney’s bid could persuade enough Fox shareholders to vote against Murdoch. His family controls 39 percent of Fox’s Class B voting shares but owns only 17 percent of all outstanding shares. Comcast executives suggested to Murdoch last year they would be willing to pay significantly more for Fox’s assets than what Disney was offering, said the people. Murdoch still went with the Disney offer, in large part due to regulatory concerns with Comcast. Elsewhere in the deal world • Archer-Daniels Midland is in advanced talks to buy Bunge, unnamed sources say. (Bloomberg) • Kroger agreed to sell its convenience store business to the British investment firm EG Group for $2.15 billion. (FT) • Alibaba and an arm of the Chinese government have bought roughly 13 percent of Dalian Wanda’s movie business for $1.2 billion. (Bloomberg) • Midstates Petroleum offered to merge with SandRidge Energy in an all-stock deal that would create a nearly $1 billion oil company. (Reuters) • Viacom is near a deal to buy the online video conference VidCon, unnamed sources say. (Variety) • Elliott Advisors continued to push BHP Billiton to simplify its dual-listed corporate structure. (FT) • Walmart has bought a virtual reality start-up, Spatialand, for its Store No. 8 incubator unit. (Recode) “I talked to women engineers at Uber who were getting invited to strip clubs and bondage clubs in the middle of the day. The middle of the day! And often they would go because that’s just what everyone was doing.” That’s what Emily Chang of Bloomberg said about her reporting for “Brotopia,” her forthcoming book about the lopsided power dynamics in Silicon Valley. (NYT) The misconduct flyaround • Steve Wynn and his legal representatives set up a limited liability company solely to handle settlement funds, including $7.5 million for a manicurist who accused him of sexual assault. (WSJ) • Laurent Potdevin resigned as C.E.O. of Lululemon because, the company said, he had failed to “exemplify the highest levels of integrity and respect for one another.” (NYT) • A partner at the international law firm Baker McKenzie lost his job after allegations surfaced that he had sexually assaulted a female colleague. (FT) • Even with generous social policies, women in Scandinavia are still paid less than men, because they spend more time on child-rearing. (NYT) The venture firm, which has invested in the likes of Groupon, Dollar Shave Club and Nutanix, has closed both its 12th venture fund, at $800 million, and its latest side fund for later-stage deals, at $450 million. (It also promoted Morad Elhafed to general partner.) Battery’s latest investment focuses include big data, cloud and A.I. software, and consumer internet apps. From Michael Brown, a Battery general partner: “The successful closing of Battery Ventures XII and Battery Ventures XII Side Fund illustrates our firm’s continuing, consistent growth through up-and-down market cycles, technology trends and new geographies over decades.” The tech flyaround • The Uber-Waymo trial began with dueling sports metaphors. (NYT) • Meanwhile, Uber is working on its relationship with drivers. (Recode) • Isaac Choi, who was C.E.O. of the failed start-up WrkRiot, has pleaded guilty to defrauding employees. (Axios) • American and British lawmakers will convene to discuss their respective inquiries into social media’s impact on elections. (Axios) • Facebook is hiring an “extraterrestrial product manager” to oversee an aerospace initiative. (CNBC) • Hudson’s Bay, the parent of Saks and Lord & Taylor, has hired a new C.E.O.: Helena Foulkes, the president of CVS’s pharmacy division. (NYT) • So has Avon: Jan Zijderveld, most recently the head of Unilever’s European business. (FT) • President Trump plans to nominate Charles Rettig, a tax lawyer, to lead the I.R.S. (WSJ) • Stephen Friend, a co-founder of Sage Bionetworks who joined Apple’s health care team, has left the tech giant. (CNBC) • Marco Santori, a partner at the law firm Cooley and an expert in initial coin offerings, has joined the virtual currency start-up Blockchain as its chief legal officer. (Axios) • Saudi Arabia is trying to untie itself from oil and tie itself to one of its other natural resources: sunlight. (NYT) • Renée James, a former No. 2 at Intel, is taking aim at the company’s most lucrative business, which she helped to build. (NYT) • Two top editors and a reporter at Newsweek were fired on Monday in a purge that targeted employees involved in covering the company’s financial and legal troubles. (NYT) • Melvyn I. Weiss, whose class-action lawsuits made him a pariah to corporate America, a hero to plaintiffs, a catalyst for legal protections of investors and consumers and finally a felon, died on Friday at 82. (NYT) • Romana Acosta Bañuelos, the U.S. treasurer under President Nixon, has died at 92. (NYT) • A lunch for Oscar nominees attracted protests over the lack of Hispanic characters in movies. (NYT) • James Gorman, asked to rate his time leading Morgan Stanley, gave himself an A-minus. (Bloomberg) Want this in your own email inbox? Here’s the sign-up. You can find live updates throughout the day at nytimes.com/dealbook. We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. "
nyt://article/7e0dfc4c-bbb8-540b-87e7-c217377b5f9a,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/01/12/us/politics/black-colleges-borrower-defense-devos.html,2018-01-12T10:00:26+0000,article,News,1173,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'For-Profit Schools', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Regulation and Deregulation of Industry', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United Negro College Fund', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'DeVos, Elizabeth (1958- )', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"WASHINGTON — When Education Secretary Betsy DeVos began rolling back regulations to curb the predatory practices of for-profit colleges, critics seethed that the Trump administration was throwing yet another lifeline to a rapacious industry — in this case, one that sees vulnerable undergraduates as nothing more than moneymaking targets. Henry N. Tisdale, the president of the small campus of Claflin University in Orangeburg, S.C., disagrees. Since the Obama administration announced that it would establish a smoother pathway for students to claim that they had been misled by their colleges, Mr. Tisdale said he has feared an expensive legal battle over the smallest leaflet advertising a service on campus. “A small mistake or error at a college like Claflin could put us out of business,” Mr. Tisdale said. “We don’t have the resources ready to respond to frivolous claims. Mr. Tisdale and his counterparts at other small, historically black colleges and universities are among an unlikely cohort of supporters for Ms. DeVos’s effort to tighten a wide-ranging regulation that offers federal debt relief to students who were defrauded or deceived by their higher-education institutions. While the rules targeted for-profit colleges with billion-dollar budgets, they apply to all institutions — including small, nonprofit colleges like Claflin that have been educating low-income, minority and first-generation students for more than a century without scandal. “It’s a regulation that should be focused on the bad actors, and we have been lumped in when we’re serving the students the bad actors are preying on,” Mr. Tisdale said. “We believe it should be improved to prevent unintended consequences.” Ms. DeVos’s plans to overhaul the Obama-era rules for student borrowers reached a crucial stage this week, as a committee convened to renegotiate the regulations began debating the burden of proof students would have to meet to win claims against institutions. The Education Department has proposed that students establish “clear and convincing evidence” that institutions misled them, compared with a “preponderance of evidence” standard applied under the Obama administration. Students would also have to prove that institutions had an “intent to deceive,” “knowledge of falsity” and “reckless disregard” that resulted in financial harm to borrowers. Officials in the department said during negotiations this week that they believed the current preponderance-of-evidence standard did not sufficiently protect taxpayers and institutions. But Joseline Garcia, a negotiator on the panel and the president of the United States Student Association, said she believed the new standard swung too far in the opposite direction. “I think that switching to ‘clear and convincing’ does the opposite for students,” Ms. Garcia said. “It doesn’t protect them at all.” She added: “Although the institution may have made an honest mistake, the harm is still the same for the student. And people’s lives are greatly impacted by that harm.” Ms. DeVos has cast the Obama-era regulations as taxpayer-funded money grabs. In announcing the repeal of the rules, she said that institutions of all types raised concerns about “excessively broad definitions of substantial misrepresentation and breach of contract, the lack of meaningful due process protections for institutions and ‘financial triggers’ under the new rules.” The United Negro College Fund, which has joined the chorus of criticism over the Trump administration’s lack of tangible commitment to historically black colleges and universities, has long been among the most vocal opponents of the Obama-era rules. Since the rules were announced in 2015, the college fund has expressed concern that they could threaten the viability of its 37 member institutions, which include Claflin, Spelman College, Morehouse College and Shaw University. The member institutions collectively educate 60,000 students on campuses of about 2,000 or fewer, and 75 percent of their students receive federal Pell grants. The fund has said that the rules have a disproportionately negative effect on their member institutions because they have historically been underfinanced and serve vulnerable populations. They fear having to spend thousands of dollars fighting claims instead of backing academic programming at institutions that have been graduating students who consistently post high success and satisfaction rates.  Representatives at the United Negro College Fund are among the panelists hashing out the new standards and are in a unique position of having to represent both students and institutions. “We want to make sure this is a balanced process,” said Lodriguez V. Murray, one of the college fund’s members on the federal negotiating team. “We’re protecting students and the institutions that are giving them a chance to fall into the middle class.” Consumer rights and student advocates say the new standards essentially ask students who probably cannot afford to hire lawyers to become them. “The administration is effectively asking borrowers to have conducted a full investigation, with the power of discovery, that turns up some very severe findings from their institution before filing a borrower-defense claim,” said Clare McCann, the deputy director for federal higher education policy at the New America Foundation. Education Department officials on the rule-making committee said they could not outline how a student would meet the new burden of proof. But they said they believed, based on the claims that they have reviewed, that students could meet the standards if they were informed about them. But others on the committee expressed concerns that the department had another goal. “This would effectively do away with borrowers’ ability to get relief in almost all circumstances,” said Abby Shafroth, a lawyer at the National Consumer Law Center. The department has struggled to complete a backlog of borrower-defense claims, the bulk of which were overwhelmingly against for-profit colleges, that began pouring in under the Obama administration and swelled to more than 100,000 in the last year. The department attributed the backlog, in part, to an insufficient system established under the Obama administration, which relieved students of $450 million in loan debt after the collapse of Corinthian Colleges and ITT Technical Institute. Ms. DeVos announced last month that her department would begin notifying more than 20,000 students whether their claims had been approved. Some would see only partial relief under the new system. Lawyers who represent institutions on the negotiating team said that due process standards were crucial to their constituents because colleges could be held liable for some of the student debt “We all have bad actors. But in trying to get to the bad guys, are you allocating too much risk on the good guys?” asked Aaron Lacey, a lawyer at Thompson Coburn L.L.P., which represents schools in regulatory litigation. In addition to establishing a new burden of proof for student borrowers who feel defrauded, the department is relaxing financial accountability rules for institutions. Those so-called triggers would have required colleges to take a series of steps to demonstrate their financial health. One such trigger that the United Negro College Fund opposed would have penalized schools if they had a high number of students defaulting on their loans. (Statistics show that the populations that black colleges serve tend to have higher default rates.) That trigger was stricken from the new proposed standards, while others that applied solely to for-profits remained but were made discretionary rather than required. "
nyt://article/3069045a-ccaa-5f45-99cb-63fdb917aff4,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/10/12/style/spirit-halloween-costume-store-undead-forever.html,2020-10-12T14:57:01+0000,article,News,1211,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Halloween', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Pop-Up Stores and Restaurants', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Costumes', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Spirit Halloween Superstores', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The retailer inspires songs and memes with its near-guaranteed seasonal reappearance each fall. But can it survive this year? Spirit Halloween is once again open for business. The store known for selling costumes and spooky fall décor at temporary pop-up locations across the United States is making bullish moves in a brutal year for retail. According to the company, it has opened more than 1,400 storefronts nationwide, more than last year — even as competitors scaled back significantly because of the pandemic. Party City, for example, slashed the number of Halloween City pop-up stores it is opening this fall by 91 percent. It is almost comforting to see this chain, which is masterful at popping up in recently shuttered storefronts, reappear like clockwork this year, a reminder of seasonal change and the grim reaper of American opportunism, when so many other routines have been disrupted. At one Spirit location, in the husk of a defunct supermarket at an outdoor mall in Richmond, Va., nothing appeared different from previous years, aside from a small sanitizer dispenser near the entrance, decorated with skeletal hands. Customers were greeted by a leering, red-eyed animatronic clown, emitting groans from behind sharp teeth. Beyond, the cavernous space offered a vast array of costume options including vampires, cheerleaders, wizards, presidential candidates, non-copyright-violating riffs on “Tiger King” characters, and a surprisingly large selection of costumes in the style of the masked musician Marshmello. There were few visible nods to the many crises that have gripped the country this year, aside from a row of obligatory hazmat suits and a “Karen” costume — complete with a blond wig, binoculars, fake hundred dollar bills, and a T-shirt that read “CAN I SPEAK TO THE MANAGER?” The reason for Spirit Halloween’s durability is closely linked with its business strategy of taking over temporary leases. The store “is out of step with most normal retail concepts,” Andy Mantis, a retail analyst for the firm 1010Data, wrote in an email. “In 2019, typical party stores generated 29 percent of their annual sales from Labor Day through Halloween.” Spirit, however, “generated 90 percent over that window,” he wrote, noting that in 2020, “Covid-19 driven temporary retail closures earlier in the year did nothing to hurt their sales outlook.” And this year, the temporary lease approach may be an even bigger advantage, Mr. Mantis wrote, citing lower real estate costs as a result of “the tidal wave of 2020 retail bankruptcies and store consolidations.” In other words, Spirit is merrily feasting on the corpses of its fallen foes. It’s not all buckets of candy for the company, of course. The National Retail Foundation predicts that there will be some $8 billion in Halloween spending this year — a reduction of approximately 8 percent from last year, which the foundation says will likely result from decreased participation in haunted houses, trick-or-treating and parties. Mr. Mantis said that Spirit saw a decrease in sales “in the high single digits” this September compared to last year, though the peak of the season has not yet arrived. (And that decrease is just a blip, he said, “compared to the 50-90 percent declines in total discretionary spending during the height of the pandemic” in the country at large.) Katie Thomas, a retail analyst with the Kearney Consumer Institute, thinks Spirit may struggle with certain headwinds. She noted that customers are looking to streamline their shopping trips to a single destination in order to reduce their exposure to crowds, which could provide “an overall challenge with specialty stores” like Spirit, as opposed to big box competitors like Walmart and Target. Ms. Thomas also believes customers will spend less than usual on costumes and more on home décor, citing the “go big or go home mentality” exemplified by Home Depot’s massive skeleton. “Right now on their website, it looks like it’s still mostly costume first,” she said of Spirit. “I really think that décor is kind of the way to go.” “It’s something that people know they can do, they can really lean in to the decorating. Costume parties and trick or treating, it still feels up in the air, if not unsafe,” she said. In a news release provided by a spokesman, Spirit urged consumers to follow C.D.C. guidelines with socially distanced celebrations, including “contactless trick or treating,” “virtual ghostly storytelling sessions,” and “devilish midnight treats left for your neighbors.” (The company also said, in a statement to The Times, that it was offering several items to support “contactless trick or treating” including “treat bags on a pole.”) “At Spirit Halloween we believe Halloween restores hopefulness and provides an outlet for escape, something we all need now more than ever,” said Steven Silverstein, Spirit’s chief executive, in a Sept. 17 interview with the National Retail Foundation. “With many of our stores now open, we’re seeing encouraging initial results and are anticipating a Halloween on par with last year.” Spirit was founded in 1983 by a San Francisco dress retailer named Joseph Marver, whose store was struggling to attract customers one October. Inspired by the lines outside of a nearby costume shop, he put all of his dresses in storage and filled his store with Halloween-centric items, which sold quickly. The next year he did the same thing at an empty mall storefront and moved $100,000 of merchandise in a month. He kept at it, adding more storefronts each year, until he eventually sold the business to Spencer’s Gifts in 1999. “I didn’t invent temporary sales,” Mr. Marver told the Seattle Times in 2000. “But I feel like I invented temporary Halloween.” Two decades later, Spirit has become a Halloween mainstay, its storefronts as emblematic of the holiday’s approach as pumpkins on porches. It’s also a reliable social media punchline; after the president’s Covid-19 diagnosis, someone tweeted an image of the White House adorned with the store’s iconic grim reaper logo, captioned: “Spirit Halloween is ready to make its move.” “It’s a little bit funny to me that the world is falling apart, but Spirit Halloween persists,” said Nick Lutsko, 29, a songwriter from Chattanooga, Tenn. In September, Mr. Lutsko went viral with a mock theme song for Spirit that he posted on Twitter. “This is theme for Spirit Halloween / They got ghouls, and new locations on every other street / saving the global economy,” he sang. In one verse, Mr. Lutsko claimed jokingly that the store promised him “$1,000 for 100 retweets.” The song ended up receiving nearly 9,000 retweets, and he was excited when a Spirit representative did indeed compensate him by sending several thousand of dollars to Mr. Lutsko’s Venmo account. (“His song gave us serious goosebumps so let’s just say his Venmo account is significantly happier these days,” the company said in a statement; it would not reveal the exact dollar amount, however, adding “some things are just between us and the fog machines.”) Mr. Lutsko said he was inspired to write the song after visiting a Spirit location with his wife, a prolific Halloween decorator, in early September; the approach of the holiday offered a spark of excitement amid a year marked by sadness and dreary Covid-19 angst. “Every year whenever you see that they start doing, like, the Pumpkin Spice Lattes at Starbucks at the beginning of September, it’s like ‘Oh, they gotta wait till October,’” Mr. Lutsko said. But this year the sight of “Spirit Halloween stores opening up at the beginning of September was just like, ‘All right, bring it on, baby. Let’s get to spooky town.’” Ezra Marcus is a reporting fellow for the Styles desk. More about Ezra Marcus "
nyt://article/2de6fbc0-6fb5-5002-98cd-461e095fb6fa,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/01/27/business/coronavirus-china-economic-impact.html,2020-01-27T23:18:56+0000,article,News,1272,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Factories and Manufacturing', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantines', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The spread of the dangerous virus has spooked global markets and threatened prospects for economic growth. Before a mysterious respiratory illness emerged in the center of China, spreading with lethal effect through the world’s most populous nation, concerns about the health of the global economy had been easing, replaced by a measure of optimism. The United States and China had achieved a tenuous pause in a trade war that had damaged both sides. The specter of open hostilities between the United States and Iran had reverted to stalemate. Though Europe remained stagnant, Germany — the Continent’s largest economy — had escaped the threat of recession. Now, the world is worrying anew. An outbreak originating in China and reaching beyond its borders has summoned fresh fears, sending markets into a wealth-destroying tailspin. It has provoked alarm that the world economy may be in for another shock, offsetting the benefits of the trade truce and the geopolitical easing, and providing new reason for businesses and households to hunker down.  On Monday, investors dumped stocks on exchanges from Asia to Europe to North America. They entrusted their money to traditional safe havens, pushing up the value of the yen, the dollar and gold. They pushed down the price of oil over fears that weaker economies would spell less demand for fuel. In short, those in control of money took note of a growing crisis in a country of 1.4 billion people, whose consumers and businesses are a primary engine of economic growth around the world, and they chose to reduce their exposure to risk. The emergence of the virus in China, whose government jails journalists and tightly controls information, left the world uncomfortably short of facts needed to assess the dangers. “It’s the uncertainty of how the global economy is going to respond to the outbreak,” said Philip Shaw, chief economist at Investec, a specialist bank in London. That will depend on the severity, the spread and the duration of the outbreak, he said, and “we don’t really know the answers to any of these questions.” What was left to the imagination resonated as a reason for investors to unload anything less than a sure thing. Stocks in Japan and Europe fell more than 2 percent. In New York, the S&P 500 was down 1.6 percent, with stocks of companies whose sales are dependent on China especially susceptible. Wynn Resorts, which operates casinos in the gambling haven of Macau, a special administrative region of China, dropped more than 8 percent. The virus and its attendant unknowns conjured memories of another deadly illness that began in China, the 2002-3 outbreak of severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, which killed nearly 800 people. “In many ways, it looks similar,” said Nicholas R. Lardy, a China expert and senior fellow at the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington. “We are seeing fast increases in the number of cases. The hospitals are overwhelmed and are not even able to test people with symptoms. I’m expecting the cases to go way, way up.” In the end, SARS significantly slowed the Chinese economy, dropping the annual growth rate to 9.1 percent in the second quarter of 2003 from 11.1 percent in the previous quarter, according to Oxford Economics, an independent research institute in London. The episode is coinciding with the Lunar New Year, a major holiday in which hundreds of millions of Chinese journey to their hometowns to visit relatives. With air, rail and road links in central China restricted as the government seeks to block the spread of the virus, hotels, restaurants and other tourism-related businesses are likely to suffer. Some economists assume that those effects will quickly dissipate, leading to a revival in the consumer economy within months. That is how events played out in 2003. “Our baseline is that it will be a fairly big impact but relatively short-lived,” said Louis Kuijs, the Hong Kong-based head of Asia economics at Oxford Economics. In the hopeful view, economic damage will be contained by the Chinese government’s aggressive response in effectively quarantining the outbreak’s center — Wuhan, a city of 11 million people, and much of the surrounding area in Hubei Province. But Wuhan is a hub of industry, sometimes called the Chicago of China, intensifying the quarantine’s implications for the national economy. “This is really unprecedented,” Mr. Lardy said. “The economic effects may be much larger than SARS. Wuhan is a major industrial city, and if you’re basically shutting it down, it’s going to have a major effect.” Already, China’s government has extended the Lunar New Year holiday by three days, through Feb. 2, ensuring that migrant workers will not return to their factory jobs as soon as anticipated, almost certainly disrupting production. Suzhou, a major industrial city near Shanghai, has extended the holiday until at least Feb. 8. Given that China’s economy is the source of roughly one-third of world economic growth, the slowdown could be felt widely. Most directly, China’s neighbors would absorb the effects, especially those dependent on tourists from China — among them Hong Kong, the Philippines, Singapore, Thailand and Vietnam. Over the weekend, China announced that it was barring overseas group tours by its citizens. If China’s factories are hobbled by additional restrictions on transportation that limit factory production, that could become a global event. It could hit iron ore mines in Australia and India that feed raw materials into China’s smelters. It could limit sales of computer chips and glass panel displays made at plants in Malaysia and South Korea. It could trim sales of factory machinery produced in Germany and auto parts made in the Czech Republic, Hungary and Poland. It could even affect the purchases of additional American farm goods that China agreed to under the trade deal signed this month. The shock is hitting just as China contends with its slowest pace of economic growth in decades, reviving fears that its reduced appetite for the goods and services of the world could jeopardize jobs on multiple shores. “China is obviously slowing down in a structural way,” said Silvia Dall’Angelo, senior economist at Hermes Investment Management in London. “The global economy is clearly more shaky, with sluggish growth. It is clearly more vulnerable to shocks.” The SARS outbreak prompted the government to stimulate the Chinese economy by directing surges of credit that financed huge infrastructure projects. But whatever damage China confronts this time, its willingness to respond will be limited by the government’s concerns about mounting public debt. “They are much more constrained now,” said Mr. Lardy, the China expert. “I think people underestimate the conviction that the top leadership has, that they really want to reduce financial risk.” But as global investors try to gauge the outlook, one element is the same as ever in China: Information is scarce. Trust in the authorities is minimal. During the SARS outbreak, the government was slow to acknowledge the existence of the virus as local officials actively covered up cases, allowing the threat to multiply. This time, the government has sought to project the sense that it is forthrightly reckoning with the crisis. President Xi Jinping has publicly acknowledged the threat, while warning local officials not to hide reports of trouble. But in the current moment of agitation, any perceived lack of information tends to weigh in as bad news. “This is, of course, still a government system where transparency is not really held up as an important criterion,” Mr. Kuijs of Oxford Economics said. “This is still an overall system in which discretionary decisions by bureaucrats are driving everything instead of very clear rules.” Clifford Krauss and Matt Phillips contributed reporting. Peter S. Goodman is a London-based European economics correspondent. He was previously a national economic correspondent in New York. He has also worked at The Washington Post as a China correspondent, and was global editor in chief of the International Business Times. More about Peter S. Goodman "
nyt://article/84222464-8863-53be-9c1d-7ad5ef4a4888,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/11/13/business/biden-student-loans.html,2020-11-13T10:00:20+0000,article,News,1470,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Presidential Election of 2020', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'For-Profit Schools', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Bankruptcies', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Education (K-12)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Corinthian Colleges Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'DeVos, Elizabeth (1958- )', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Obama, Barack', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Warren, Elizabeth', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The incoming administration has proposed a series of changes that could affect more than 42 million student loan borrowers. Here’s what to expect. The federal government is the primary lender for students who borrow money for college and graduate school, and the Education Department directly holds more than $1.4 trillion in student debt. President-elect Joseph R. Biden Jr.’s administration will have the ability to make changes that can directly affect millions of borrowers’ monthly bills. Here’s what you need to know. Some 22 million borrowers of federal student loans have had their monthly payments temporarily paused and interest waived through the end of the year because of the pandemic — a suspension of payments on debt totaling more than $900 billion — and they’re anxious to learn if the relief will continue into 2021. President Trump, through an executive action, already extended the so-called administrative forbearance through Dec. 31. (It had been scheduled to expire on Sept. 30 under an emergency legislative package.) But it’s unclear whether he plans to provide another extension before Mr. Biden takes office in late January. A spokeswoman for the Education Department declined to comment. Mr. Biden’s transition team also declined to comment on its plans. Congress may feel pressure to act before the year ends, policy experts said, and it could include an extension in a new stimulus package or other legislation. “For millions of borrowers, the fallout from the pandemic is still raging,” said Seth Frotman, executive director of the Student Borrower Protection Center, an advocacy group. “The thought that their student loan payments will be turned back on and they will get money taken out of their account via auto debit, or they will see their wages garnished once again — the results will be cataclysmic for their finances.” The higher-education platform Mr. Biden campaigned on was noticeably silent about a proposal that progressives say is ripe for executive action: outright cancellation of some student debt. The Higher Education Act of 1965, which created the federal student loan program, authorizes the education secretary to “compromise, waive or release” federal student loan debts. Some legal scholars and key lawmakers believe that language gives the president the power to use an executive order to direct the Education Department to broadly discharge debts for any or all student borrowers. Others disagree and believe such an action would face legal challenges. Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. Senators Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts and Chuck Schumer of New York, both Democrats, have called for the next president to cancel up to $50,000 in debt per borrower. But Mr. Biden has never publicly endorsed the idea, and two people involved in his transition-planning discussions said his views had not changed. Without legislative action by Congress — which is unlikely if Republicans retain control of the Senate — broad student debt cancellation seems improbable. Mr. Biden stirred excitement among student borrowers with a tweet in March that endorsed a pandemic-relief proposal from Ms. Warren and other lawmakers seeking cancellation of at least $10,000 in federal student loan debt per person. However, that proposal called for Congress to authorize such relief — and so far, it has not. Without legislative action, Mr. Biden may be reluctant to jam through a measure with a price tag of around $420 billion. Roughly 8.5 million federal loan borrowers are enrolled in income-driven repayment plans, which try to help struggling debtors by linking their monthly loan payment to how much they earn. There are four plans to choose from, but advocates say they’re not always affordable for the most vulnerable borrowers. Mr. Biden proposed a more generous option: Individuals earning $25,000 or less annually will not owe any payments on their undergraduate federal loans, nor will they accrue interest. All other borrowers will pay 5 percent of their discretionary income — what remains of their paychecks after accounting for basics like food and housing — over $25,000. That’s compared with the 10 to 15 percent of discretionary income required by plans now. (One plan demands 20 percent.) Under Mr. Biden’s plan, any remaining balance would be forgiven. Mr. Biden also promised to go further: Erased debts are generally taxed as income, but he said he planned to change that. Making a permanent change to the tax code would require legislation, but tax experts say there are other ways to eliminate the tax penalty. The enormous problems associated with the federal Public Service Loan Forgiveness program are well documented. The program was created in 2007 to attract workers to low-paying government and nonprofit jobs in exchange for debt forgiveness; after a decade of on-time monthly payments, any remaining debt is wiped away. But borrowers have to be in the right type of repayment plan and have the right kind of federal loan, all while working in a qualifying position — and only 2.2 percent of applications have been deemed eligible since the program began. Mr. Biden said he would fix the problems plaguing the program “by securing passage” of a bill that would simplify the application and certification processes, including making all loans and repayment plans eligible, while also providing partial forgiveness after five years. The legislation has been introduced in both the House and Senate, but with only Democratic support. Beyond strengthening the existing program, Mr. Biden said he would create yet another forgiveness plan for workers in schools, government and other nonprofit organizations. For each year of service, workers would be eligible to have $10,000 of their undergraduate or graduate debt erased for up to five years (for a total of $50,000). A rule known as “borrower defense to repayment” allows students who were seriously misled by the schools they attended to seek relief on their federal student loans. After several notorious for-profit chains collapsed, including Corinthian Colleges and ITT Technical Institute, hundreds of thousands of people flooded the Education Department with claims. Education Secretary Betsy DeVos has fought them at every turn and let many applications languish for years, until federal judges in multiple cases ordered her to speed things up. Ms. DeVos’s department responded with mass denials of the claims, sending out more than 83,000 in the last year. However, a federal judge in California questioned those denials in a ruling last month, calling them “perfunctory” and “potentially unlawful.” The former students represented in the class-action case have asked the court to cancel Ms. DeVos’s denials. Eileen Connor, the legal director of the Project on Predatory Student Lending, which is representing borrowers in the California case, said she hoped the Biden administration would revive the spirit of the borrower-defense program and grant relief to hundreds of thousands of students who were defrauded. A new education secretary has the authority to overturn past denials, Ms. Connor said, and create new standards for adjudicating the 80,000 applications that are still pending. Mr. Biden pledged during his campaign to forgive the debt of borrowers who “were deceived by the worst for-profit college or career profiteers.” He also said he would reinstate more permissive rules for the program that were enacted during the Obama administration and eliminated by Ms. DeVos. Both federal loans and private student loans can be discharged in bankruptcy, but they aren’t wiped away as easily as credit card and other consumer debt. Borrowers have to file a separate legal proceeding, and lawmakers have toughened the rules over the past several decades. In fact, Mr. Biden supported a 2005 law that made private student loans more difficult to discharge, but he has pledged to reverse that rule as president. That may prove challenging because few Republicans have supported any changes to the bankruptcy laws. A House bill has one Republican co-sponsor, but the Senate’s version, led by Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, has only Democratic support. The Education Department outsources the task of servicing its 42 million federal student loans, and government auditors and watchdogs have repeatedly criticized the contractors for doing a poor job. Building a better system is a bipartisan agency goal that stretches back to the Obama administration, but actually doing that is complicated. Ms. DeVos’s department repeatedly changed its plans and canceled bid solicitations, which has led it to the brink of a crisis: Most of the agency’s servicing contracts run out in December 2021 and cannot be extended. The agency’s last-ditch effort to avert disaster was a new solicitation it posted last month seeking two contractors to run an interim system. But that time frame is extremely tight, and if this latest solicitation fails, it faces two bad choices: Pay its existing vendors significantly higher rates to keep working, or shift millions of borrowers to new servicers, a process that has been chaotic in the past. “We’re at the point in the whole student-loan-servicing saga where the urgency is greater than it’s ever been,” said Clare McCann, the deputy director for federal higher education policy at New America, a left-leaning think thank. “This affects tens of millions of borrowers, and it’s an issue that needs to be close to the top of the list.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine Stacy Cowley is a finance reporter with a focus on consumer issues and data security. She previously reported on a variety of business topics, including technology and economics, at CNN Money, Fortune Small Business and other magazines and websites. More about Stacy Cowley Tara Siegel Bernard covers personal finance. Before joining The Times in 2008, she was deputy managing editor at FiLife, a personal finance website, and an editor at CNBC. She also worked at Dow Jones and contributed regularly to The Wall Street Journal. More about Tara Siegel Bernard "
nyt://article/d2bfba78-f756-5aef-a756-27f3c02880fc,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/11/business/stock-market-today.html,2020-03-11T04:25:56+0000,article,News,1520,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"This briefing is no longer updating. Read the latest developments here.  Stocks plunged on Wednesday, with the Dow Jones industrial average falling into a bear market, in a drop that reflected investors’ fear that Washington won’t be able to muster a response to the economic crisis triggered by the spreading coronavirus. A bear market begins when stocks have fallen 20 percent from their high. Though it’s a somewhat arbitrary threshold, in financial markets the designation acknowledges what many investors are surely feeling — that fear-based trading in the stock market may not end soon. The last time stocks in the United States were in a bear market was during the height of the financial crisis, more than a decade ago. The S&P 500 fell nearly 5 percent on Wednesday, while the Dow dropped nearly 6 percent. From its February high, the S&P 500 is down 19 percent, while the Dow is down 20 percent. Asian markets followed Wall Street lower on Thursday, with losses steepening after President Trump suspended travel from Europe to the United States for 30 days. Shares in Tokyo fell nearly 4 percent, and Hong Kong opened 3.3 percent lower. Losses in Australia also accelerated, and its main stock index was down nearly 5 percent by midday there. Drooping crude oil prices also worsened. Futures tracking West Texas Intermediate, the American crude benchmark, were down 5 percent to about $31.30 a barrel. Treasury bond prices rose, sending yields lower. Futures markets were predicting a sharp drop on Wall Street on Thursday morning. Stocks have whipsawed this week as investors vacillated between the threat that the coronavirus poses to the global economy and the hopes that governments around the world will unveil a series of measures to help businesses. On Wednesday, World Health Organization officials officially designated the spread of the coronavirus as a global pandemic. President Trump has signaled he would consider ways to stimulate the economy, and lawmakers and administration officials spent the day Wednesday outlining their possible steps. Options include cutting payroll taxes and extending the American tax filing deadline past April 15. But so far, the White House has not announced any specific measures, and most experts say a payroll tax cut is not an effective way to combat the problems facing the economy. “What we’ve seen over the past 36 hours is hope for something from a fiscal policy perspective and then this sense that it’s not going to come, or it’s not thought out, so I think that’s the disappointment right now,” said William Delwiche, an investment strategist at Baird, an investment banking and money-management firm based in Milwaukee. That the virus is unlikely to prove fatal to the vast majority of people who get it offers little comfort to financial markets. Rather, the worry is that efforts to contain the spread of the illness caused by the virus are certain to slow the global economy and corporate profits. The worst-performing stocks on Wednesday cut across industries, reflecting how broad the concern among investors was. With oil falling again, energy stocks like Apache Corporation and Occidental Petroleum led the slide in the S&P 500. Apache fell about 24 percent, while Occidental fell 18 percent. Boeing tumbled 18 percent, the biggest drop among components of the Dow Jones industrial average. A person with knowledge of the matter said the carrier planned to drawdown a $13.8 billion credit line to shore up its cash position in the face of uncertainty over the coronavirus outbreak. Boeing also reported that it had lost more orders for its grounded 737 Max. Boeing’s top executives said in a letter to employees that the company was facing a “global economic disruption” caused by the outbreak. As a result, the company is limiting travel and discretionary spending, restricting overtime and freezing hiring until further notice, they said. And companies dependent on travel and tourism continued to fall. Norwegian Cruise Line fell 27 percent, and MGM Resorts fell 13 percent. Earlier Wednesday, the Global Business Travel Association said the coronavirus epidemic stood to wipe out more than $820 billion in spending on global business travel. Top Wall Street executives, summoned to a Wednesday meeting with President Trump, said that the banking system was strong and that the current market turmoil was not akin to the 2008 financial crisis. “This is not a financial crisis,” Citigroup’s chief executive, Michael L. Corbat, told the president. “The banks and financial system are in sound shape and the banks are here to help.” The Bank of America chief executive, Brian Moynihan, agreed, saying: “We’re very strongly capitalized. We are in a great position.” Mr. Trump appeared to lament the end of the bull market. He referred to last week’s jobs numbers as strong and said additional numbers coming in suggested the economy was still running smoothly. “Now we’re hitting a patch,” he said. “And we’re going to have to do something with response to this virus.” Coronavirus concerns have had a drastic effect on Amtrak, causing the railroad to reduce service and ask employees to take unpaid leaves, according to an internal memo from the railroad’s chief operating officer, Stephen J. Gardner. “Ridership and revenue have declined sharply over the past few weeks,” Mr. Gardner wrote, adding that the reductions had “accelerated in recent days and will likely continue for some time.” Bookings were down 50 percent from last year and cancellations were up 300 percent, he wrote. “At this rate,” Mr. Gardner wrote, “we believe we will likely suffer the loss of several hundred millions dollars in revenue during this fiscal year, and we might lose more.” The blow to Amtrak’s business came as its financial performance had been improving and its executives had expected to report its first operating profit this year. Amtrak, which owns and operates Pennsylvania Station in Manhattan, had already suspended three daily nonstop trains between New York and Washington. The Federal Reserve Bank of New York on Wednesday expanded the size of its so-called repurchase operations, which are essentially short-term loans to eligible banks. The New York Fed has been carrying out market interventions since October to keep money flowing smoothly between banks and other financial institutions. Starting Thursday and continuing through April 13, the Fed will offer at least $175 billion in daily overnight repo operations — up from $150 billion — and at least $45 billion in two-week repo operations twice a week, according to the statement. The Fed will also offer three one-month repo operations of at least $50 billion. “These operations are intended to ensure that the supply of reserves remains ample and to mitigate the risk of money market pressures,” the New York Fed said in a statement. It was the second time this week that the Fed ramped up its offering of repurchase agreements and came as investors are increasingly concerned about proper functioning of the financial system. Some economists are expecting the Fed to do more in the coming week, like mobilizing swap agreements that help foreign central banks keep dollar funding flowing in their economies or announcing an extension to the Fed’s Treasury bill purchase program. The spread of the coronavirus, along with the tumult it is stirring in financial markets, has begun to drag on consumer confidence, according to a nationwide poll conducted by the online research firm SurveyMonkey for The New York Times. The poll found the largest single-month drop in confidence since President Trump took office, driven by rising concern about the nation’s economic outlook. The decline was evident among Republicans, Democrats and independent voters alike. Still, more people (39 percent) expected very good or somewhat good business conditions in the coming year than those who expected very bad or somewhat bad conditions (22 percent). The polling was begun last week and completed on Sunday, so it does not reflect any further impact from this week’s market upheaval. High consumer confidence has buoyed Mr. Trump’s presidency. But Mr. Trump’s performance rating in the survey slipped this month, with 51 percent of respondents registering disapproval — including 40 percent who disapproved strongly of how he was handling the job. The actor Tom Hanks said on Wednesday that he and his wife, Rita Wilson, learned they had the coronavirus. The 63-year-old Academy Award-winning actor is in Australia, where he was set to film a movie about the life of Elvis Presley. Trump administration officials met on Wednesday with Facebook, Google, Amazon, Twitter and others about how they could help the efforts to stem the spread of the coronavirus. Officials told the companies that the government would soon launch a research database and asked them to develop tools that could help researchers delve into the data. The Federal Aviation Administration said on Wednesday that it would allow airlines to run fewer flights without running the risk of losing their coveted slots at some busy airports. Reporting was contributed by Peter Goodman, Alan Rappeport, Ben Casselman, Alexandra Stevenson, Ben Dooley, Niraj Chokshi, Patrick McGeehan, Kevin Granville, Jeanna Smialek, Carlos Tejada, Jim Tankersley, Matthew Goldstein, Jack Ewing, John Koblin and Marc Tracy. An earlier version of this article misstated the number of respondents in a nationwide poll that expected very good or somewhat good business conditions in the coming year. It is 39 percent, not 44 percent. And it misstated the number of respondents who expected very bad or somewhat bad conditions. It is 22 percent, not 23 percent. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://article/5dd67059-f543-52f8-93f2-404d2e349645,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/03/13/health/e-cigarettes-teenage-vaping.html,2019-03-13T13:05:19+0000,article,News,980,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Cigarettes', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Smoking and Tobacco', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Menthol', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Teenagers and Adolescence', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Convenience Stores', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Food and Drug Administration', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gottlieb, Scott (1972- )', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'your-feed-science', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"WASHINGTON — With a few weeks left in his tenure as commissioner of the Food and Drug Administration, Dr. Scott Gottlieb on Wednesday moved to restrict sales of flavored e-cigarettes to try to reduce the soaring rate of teenage vaping. The agency issued a proposal requiring that stores sequester flavored e-cigarettes to areas off limits to anyone under age 18. Retailers, including convenience stores and gas stations, will be expected to verify the age of their customers. “Evidence shows that youth are especially attracted to flavored e-cigarette products,” Dr. Gottlieb said in a statement, “and that minors are able to access these products from both brick-and-mortar retailers as well as online, despite federal restrictions on sales to anyone under 18.” The rate of teenage vaping has risen sharply in the last few years, with 3.6 million middle and high school students reporting that they vaped last year, according to a study by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. But teenage smoking continues to be at record lows, alongside the general decline in smoking rates, a pattern that public health experts warn could be reversed if nicotine addiction spurred by vaping leads young people to traditional tobacco products. Last fall, the F.D.A. began a crackdown on teenage vaping, threatening to ban most flavored e-cigarettes and warning retailers to stop selling the products to minors. It stopped short of prohibiting the flavors. But the proposal issued on Wednesday outlines details for how retailers must wall off the areas where the products can be sold. For stores that are open to consumers of all ages, the guidelines call for a physically separated room, a spokesman said, adding that stores cannot simply hang a curtain to create a space where flavored e-cigarettes could be sold. Retailers, including convenience store and gas station owners, are on Capitol Hill this week, lobbying against the F.D.A.’s proposals. Some have threatened to fight the restrictions in court. Lyle Beckwith, a senior vice president for the National Association of Convenience Stores representing thousands of retailers, said the group did not believe the F.D.A. had the authority to impose the new requirements. “The Tobacco Control Act clearly indicates they cannot discriminate against a specific channel of distribution, which is exactly what they are doing.” Conservative groups and vaping trade associations also have come out in opposition, saying that the agency’s efforts to regulate the e-cigarette industry amount to government overreach. The new restrictions do not apply to menthol, mint or tobacco flavors, which the F.D.A. wants to keep available for adults who are using e-cigarettes to quit smoking combustible cigarettes. The F.D.A. will also track youth use of menthol and mint e-cigarettes, Dr. Gottlieb said. If they become too popular, he added, the F.D.A. will reconsider the exemption. Such a move would be especially harmful to Juul Labs. The vaping giant, under F.D.A. pressure, has already moved sales of its flavored e-cigarettes online, except for menthol, mint and tobacco, which it sells in stores. But some public health advocates say the moves are too late. “While this announcement sounds big and bold, it isn’t really,” said Micah Berman, an associate professor at The Ohio State University College of Public Health and Moritz College of Law. “The F.D.A.’s announcement exempts mint/menthol, which is the most popular flavor with kids and one that makes it easier to initiate use. And in any event, most kids are getting these products online or through older friends, not buying them in convenience stores.” The proposal also calls for banning the sale of many flavored cigars. “The data also indicate that eliminating flavors from cigars would likely help prevent cigar initiation by young people,” Dr. Gottlieb said. Under the new plan, cigar companies would have 30 days to remove the products from the market, and would have to apply for F.D.A. approval to go back on the shelves. In addition, all e-cigarettes, cigars and related products not on the market by Feb. 15, 2007, must seek F.D.A. approval to sell them by August 2021. As part of their application, manufacturers must prove that their products are beneficial to public health. The agency’s original deadline for these products to comply with new, tougher regulations was extended by Dr. Gottlieb from August 2018 to 2022. Wednesday’s action chops one year off that extension. The plan issued on Wednesday is still a draft, and must undergo a 30-day comment period before it can be finalized. It’s an unusual regulatory approach, neither a new rule, nor a voluntary guideline. Instead, the F.D.A. is telling e-cigarette makers that if their products are sold in violation of this request, they can be taken off the market, and forced to apply for agency approval. The F.D.A. can do this under its discretionary enforcement authority. Dr. Gottlieb is scheduled to have stepped down by that time, and Dr. Norman E. (Ned) Sharpless, director of the National Cancer Institute, was named this week to replace him as acting commissioner. Dr. Sharpless has expressed support for the e-cigarette crackdown to reduce teenage use. In his comments, Dr. Gottlieb stressed that the Trump administration has backed the plan. Also drawing opposition is the agency’s request in the president’s budget released on Monday to collect an estimated $100 million in user fees from e-cigarette makers, similar to the fees imposed on tobacco companies and other manufacturers, to help enforce regulations aimed at teenage vaping. Liz Mair, a Republican political consultant who founded Vapers United, a group that supports tools to stop smoking, said the user fee was equivalent to a tax on the industry and would raise prices on alternatives to traditional smoking. “If your concern is improving public health, either as a matter of altruism and ethics or pure concern for taxpayers’ pocketbooks,” she said, “your policy should generally be to keep vapor taxes lower than cigarette taxes to incentivize people to try to quit smoking using them.” Follow @NYTHealth on Twitter. | Sign up for the  Science Times newsletter. "
nyt://article/1b4278f7-e7a9-5a74-956f-a0771d315dfc,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/05/27/business/stock-market-coronavirus.html,2020-05-27T07:00:06+0000,article,News,920,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporations', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"First-quarter profits shrank at the fastest rate in over a decade. Analysts don’t like what they see coming down the pike. Investors keep pushing stocks higher. Wall Street analysts have grown increasingly pessimistic in recent weeks about the outlook for corporate profits, even as investors have pushed markets steadily higher, breaking the link between analyst forecasts and the direction of stock prices. Most companies in the S&P 500 stock index have reported their first-quarter earnings, and the impact of the coronavirus pandemic on profits is becoming clear, at least for January through March. On a per-share basis, profits of S&P 500 companies fell by 13 percent, making it the worst slump since 2009. Analysts think things will get worse before they get better. At the end of March, the consensus among analysts was that profits at companies that make up the index would sink a modest 1.8 percent in 2020. But after digesting the financial reports of companies from Agilent Technologies to Zions Bancorp, they now think 2020 profits will tumble more than 20 percent. Any finance textbook’s section on equity prices holds that the direction of the stock market is determined, to a large extent, by the profits and dividends that shareholders expect companies to produce in the future. And academic research has repeatedly shown that when Wall Street analysts revise their forecasts for a company’s profits, it can move share prices.  Traders and investors routinely take note of when analysts erase earlier expectations, using those revisions as a real-time gauge of how the fundamental business prospects of corporate America are looking. Going by the conventional wisdom, the current collapse in profit expectations — and analysts’ woeful prognoses for future earnings — should be clobbering share prices. But investors don’t appear to be taking their cues from analysts. The S&P 500 has soared more than 30 percent over the last two months. To be sure, investors priced in some downturn in profits when stocks suffered a 34 percent collapse in February and March. They were right, and the pain, reflected in earnings reports, was widespread. Bank earnings were fairly awful. Quarterly profits at JPMorgan Chase, Wells Fargo and Bank of America all undershot Wall Street expectations, thanks to the costs of setting aside large amounts of cash to cover an expected surge in borrowers who can’t make loan payments because they’re suddenly unemployed. Numbers from credit card issuers like Capital One and Discover were also ugly. Firms that rely on discretionary consumer spending were, unsurprisingly, hammered. The casino operator Las Vegas Sands posted a first-quarter loss of $51 million, compared with a profit of $744 million during the same period last year. Profits fell 92 percent for the hotel company Marriott International. The cruise line Carnival lost $781 million during the first quarter. Even Amazon.com, ideally positioned for a world reliant on home deliveries, saw profits fall 29 percent as the costs of keeping open during the crisis increased. Over the last few weeks, disappointing earnings announcements sent share prices down 1 percent on average. (That’s far less than the nearly 3 percent drop stocks suffered on average after falling short of expectations in recent years, according to research from the data provider FactSet.) Close observers of stocks won’t be surprised. After all, market sentiment has grown increasingly detached from the abysmal outlook for economic growth, another supposedly fundamental building block of market prices. Instead, stocks have climbed even as the consensus expectation among Wall Street economists forecasts a 30 percent annualized rate of decline for gross domestic product this quarter, according to FactSet. Plenty of explanations have been offered to help explain the market’s blasé approach to a bleak reality facing corporate America. Some say the bad economic news was already priced in during the March collapse. Others argue that markets are simply “discounting” — that is basically betting — that the U.S. will enjoy a V-shaped, or robust, economic recovery. Another argument is that investors, who tend to be forward-looking, are simply setting their sights on a future where the pandemic is a distant memory. The most powerful reason is simpler: It’s the actions of the Federal Reserve. Since March 23 — the day the stock market rally began — the Fed has done its best to ensure that the returns on bonds are quite low by signaling its willingness to buy unlimited quantities of Treasury and government-backed mortgage bonds. It has also ventured into buying corporate bonds, which helped push yields on such bonds lower too. The goal, in part, is to push investors away from the safety of the bond markets and into riskier assets, like stocks. In a recent note, analysts at JPMorgan argued that these programs by the Fed “likely has a bigger positive impact on equity valuation, compared with the negative impact of the temporary earnings loss.” Translation: The Fed’s efforts to keep interest rates and bond yields low has more than offset the collapse in profits for S&P 500 companies, helping to keep the market aloft even though corporate profitability and the economy look like they will be gloomy for a while. A similar thing happened during the last financial crisis. Interest rates and bond yields fell to low levels that would have been unthinkable previously, which many partly attributed to central bank actions. And for the years that followed prices of assets such as stocks, bonds and real estate all rallied to levels that looked high relative to the sluggish level of economic activity after the crisis. So while corporate profits are supposed to be the fuel that revs the stock market’s engine, in the short term, Federal Reserve policy remains in the driver’s seat. That explains why investors are willing to ignore what analysts have to say, at least for the moment. "
nyt://article/aa28948a-985f-5f69-b2b1-0f49280fd4fd,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/05/23/business/fed-minutes-may-meeting.html,2018-05-23T18:13:40+0000,article,News,1028,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Interest Rates', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Open Market Committee', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"WASHINGTON — Federal Reserve officials gave no indication that they are likely to speed up their pace of interest rate increases during their most recent two-day meeting, suggesting instead that they would be willing to allow the inflation rate to rise slightly above 2 percent for a “temporary period,” while the economy continues to expand. Minutes from the meeting, which ended May 2 and are released after a typical three-week delay, reveal Fed officials are on track to raise rates again in June. The minutes also indicate officials are less worried about inflation rising above 2 percent, its current level and the Fed’s target rate, than they are about the rate of inflation dipping again. Officials continue to see the economy as strong, but they remain worried about global trade tensions, including potential damage from American and Chinese tariffs and the possibility that uncertainty over trade policy could already be crimping business investment in the United States. Officials at the Federal Open Market Committee concluded the May 2 meeting with a unanimous decision to leave the Fed’s benchmark interest rate unchanged, at a range from 1.5 to 1.75 percent. The Fed last raised interest rates in March, by a quarter of a percentage point. It is widely expected to raise them by the same amount at its next meeting in June. The minutes from the May meeting reported that officials said recent economic indicators “had increased their confidence that inflation on a 12-month basis would continue to run near the committee’s longer-run 2 percent symmetric objective.” But the minutes noted that some officials believed “it was premature to conclude that inflation would remain at levels around 2 percent, especially after several years in which inflation had persistently run below the committee’s 2 percent objective.” What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Some officials noted, the minutes added, that “a temporary period of inflation modestly above 2 percent would be consistent with the committee’s symmetric inflation objective and could be helpful in anchoring longer-run inflation expectations at a level consistent with that objective.” As if to drive home the point, the minutes use the word “symmetric” nine times in reference to inflation. Two additional references are found in the statement the Fed released after the May meeting, which noted that annual inflation “is expected to run near the committee’s symmetric 2 percent objective over the medium term.” Analysts have largely seen the inclusion of “symmetric” as an indication that Fed officials would be willing to tolerate inflation running slightly above target for a period of time. Researchers at Morgan Stanley said this week that in reading the minutes, they would “pay careful attention to the discussion behind the upgraded language” on inflation. The emphasis on “symmetric” — and the policy stance it signals — is likely to cheer economic advisers in the White House, who have long insisted that the $1.5 trillion tax cut package that President Trump signed into law late last year will increase economic growth without stoking higher inflation. Many analysts expect that an acceleration in the pace of rate increases would dampen growth and potentially offset some of the stimulus from the cuts and from the federal discretionary spending increases that Mr. Trump and congressional leaders agreed to this year. The policy decision at the May meeting was widely seen as an affirmation by Fed officials that they will stay the course on their plans to increase rates to historically normal levels, after leaving them near zero for years following the Great Recession. The minutes seem to affirm that Fed officials are not wavering in that approach — though they report officials expressing “a range of views” on the amount of rate increases that will be needed to maintain the Fed’s policy objectives in the medium term. Economic projections released after the Fed’s March meeting suggest officials expected to raise rates two more times in the months to come, for a total of three increases this year. Nearly half of the officials indicated they expected one additional increase on top of that, for a total of four in 2018. Many economists continue to forecast a total of four hikes this year, as well. Recent economic data points have seemed to validate the Fed’s approach. The unemployment rate has dropped to 3.9 percent — though at the time of the May meeting, the most recent data showed 4.1 percent. While wage growth remains sluggish, particularly for a time of such low unemployment, the inflation rate has risen to about 2 percent. A few developments in the data appear to have surprised officials in recent months, the minutes indicated. One was a slowdown in growth in advanced countries around the world, particularly Britain. Consumer spending in the United States has lagged the expectations of Fed staff in recent months, the minutes showed, which in turn has lowered the staff’s growth projections slightly. While some Fed officials have warned in recent months that they are concerned about the economy “overheating” — a condition when very low unemployment sets off a rapid increase in wages and prices, which then forces the Fed to raise rates abruptly — there were few signs of such concerns in the May meeting statement. There were continued signs — as Fed officials expressed in their March meeting — of concern for the potential harm from an escalating trade war with China. The Trump administration remains locked in negotiations with Chinese leaders that have included threats of tariffs on both sides. The Fed’s chairman, Jerome H. Powell, has taken a wait-and-see approach to such risks in public comments this spring. In the May minutes, other officials reported unease among business leaders they had spoken to about trade. In several Fed districts, the minutes said, “contacts expressed concern about the possible adverse effects of tariffs and trade restrictions, including the potential for postponing or pulling back on capital spending.” In other cases, “it was noted that the potential for higher Chinese tariffs on key agricultural products could, in the longer run, hurt U.S. competitiveness.” Business contacts also reported that they were seeing “shortages of workers in specific industries or occupations,” the minutes show. “In some cases, labor shortages were contributing to upward pressure on wages.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://interactive/69cd69a9-a9e1-5c87-bd9e-e51aaae3ba49,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2020/04/23/opinion/emergency-savings-coronavirus.html,2020-04-23T09:00:02+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Savings', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Poverty', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"How long would it take you to save for an emergency like the coronavirus? If you’re rich, it would take about two months to save enough to cover four weeks of expenses. If your household makes somewhere between $70,000 and $99,999, you can save that much in seven to eight months. An average household of more than two people making a total of $50,000 to $69,999 would need more than two years to save one month's worth of expenses. 
	Do you have enough money saved to weather this pandemic? If you are an American, your answer may well be no.
 
	Even before Covid-19, many Americans were living check to check, because of the costs of housing and child care, student debt payments, medical bills and the rest. Despite the cheery insistence of people like President Trump and personal finance gurus, the economic growth of the last decade had not brought wealth or security to most Americans. Fewer than half of American adults — just 47 percent — say that they have enough emergency funds to cover three months of expenses, according to a survey conducted this month by the Pew Research Center.
 
	In the coronavirus’s wake, those without savings may also be losing their jobs, leaving them with little to support their families other than the CARES Act relief from the government, help from charitable groups or GoFundMe or Venmo tip jar campaigns. This won’t be enough to save many families from ruin. There’s so much more this country must do to protect its people from financial hardship wrought by the pandemic.
 Had to take a pay cut or lost job or both because  of coronavirus outbreak  Don’t have three months of emergency funds Low income 77% 52% 48 23 Middle income 52 58 48 42 Upper income 25 68 75 32 Don’t have three months of emergency funds Low income 77% 23 Middle income 52 48 Upper income 25 75 Had to take a pay cut or lost job or both  because of coronavirus outbreak  Low income 48 52% Middle income 58 42 Upper income 68 32 
	Americans all along the income scale are feeling the pinch. Brenda Madison in Laguna Beach, Calif., says that several of her jobs, including doing graphic design and working at Athleta, have dried up. She estimates that she has made between roughly $35,000 and $100,000 per year doing various jobs over the past decade. But she and her husband, an I.T. administrator, don’t have savings accounts, she says, only retirement accounts. They are depending on her husband’s salary for now. “At least my husband still has a job,” she says. “But his company has been losing a lot of business, so I don't know what our future looks like.”
 
	Jason Savoy, 36, in Austin, Texas, says he still has his job, at the supermarket chain Trader Joe’s, but it doesn’t pay enough for him to save. Mr. Savoy makes $14.90 an hour, and while he is relieved to still be employed, he has reason to worry: His savings account has just 14 cents in it. If he becomes ill — a real possibility given the grocery workers now falling sick  — it could quickly send him hurtling over a financial ledge, as medical bills could be prohibitively high. As Mr. Savoy observes darkly, “Credit cards are the new savings account.”
 
	Americans have trouble saving for a range of reasons, according to research by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. For lower-income people in particular, spending can exceed their incomes if household members draw on their savings when they are unemployed, or if they borrow or rely on savings when they experience business losses. Paying off student loans and being retired can make it difficult for people to save or lead people to draw on their savings.
 Income after taxes Expenses Expenses are about three times higher  Less than $15,000 $15,000-$29,999 $30,000-$39,999 $40,000-$49,999 $50,000-$69,999 $70,000-$99,999 $100,000-$149,999 Income left for  investing or saving  $150,000-$199,999 $200,000 and more $0 $50K $100K $150K $200K Income after taxes Expenses Expenses are about three times higher  Less than $15,000 $15,000-$29,999 $30,000-$39,999 $40,000-$49,999 $50,000-$69,999 $70,000-$99,999 Income left for investing or saving  $100,000-$149,999 $150,000-$199,999 $200,000 and more $0 $100K $200K Income after taxes Expenses Expenses are about three times higher  Less than $15,000 $15,000-$29,999 $30,000-$39,999 $40,000-$49,999 $50,000-$69,999 $70,000-$99,999 $100,000-$149,999 Income left for  investing or saving  $150,000-$199,999 $200,000 and more $50,000 $100,000 $150,000 $200,000 $0 
	But being middle class — or even upper-middle class — doesn’t ensure someone has adequately quilted their nest for calamity. As you go up the class ladder, there is still limited security. Based on the Consumer Expenditure Survey 2018, we found that even families earning between $100,000 and $150,000 would need to save their discretionary income for almost five months to be able to pay for one month’s expenses.
 
	Michelle Belmont, 40, a Web developer in Minneapolis, struggles to save despite a good salary. The mother of a young son, Ms. Belmont still has her job, where she earns $107,000 per year, but she has no savings and is bankrupt, partly as a result of college, medical debt and divorce. The coronavirus hasn’t changed her life much economically, but it has affected her outlook, including her habits as a consumer. “I have been doing more bartering with friends for necessities,” says Ms. Belmont. Her new activities include trading “books for aloe and toilet paper for active yeast.”
 
	For Nicole Braun, 53, an adjunct professor of sociology who lives in Chicago with a grown son, her tenuous economic situation has become even more precarious in the pandemic. She not only has no savings but also has already “lost a couple of jobs that I was supposed to do in the future.” They include a research job that has been put on hold and potential teaching jobs.
 
	“I am worried I will not be able to pay for my rent and then I will be homeless,” she says. She sees her current experience as a consequence of the existing political order, part of a broader sweep of suffering that many others share.
 
	Situations like Ms. Braun’s indicate that state governments and even the federal government should be subsidizing rent for households experiencing financial hardship for as long as the coronavirus wave lasts.
 
	We also need the equivalent of a universal basic income for people who take care of a family member, be that a child or an elder, as well as for lower-income Americans. While there is some provision for paid leave in the stimulus bill, an actual U.B.I. could go a lot further. Take Laura Pozos, 57, a cook at a McDonald’s in Los Angeles. She was able to go on strike against the restaurant chain starting on April 5 because she and her husband, a mechanic, had $1,000 in savings. She did so when a co-worker tested positive for the virus and she and other workers felt the company didn't do enough to protect their health.
 
	Ms. Pozos, who earns $14.77 an hour, is able to protect her and her family’s health by not going to work, but she is spending down her small savings as a result. “It’s going for food, rent and utilities that are required for a household,” she says.
 
	She supports two of her three children, including one who has special needs.
 
	Something like U.B.I. — a direct deposit of at least $1,000 per month into her bank account — would help Ms. Pozos, serving the role of emergency savings where none may otherwise exist. Even a small amount of savings makes a huge difference for Americans like her: A 2016 Urban Institute study found that lower-income families with savings of $2,000 to $4,999 are more financially resilient than middle-income families without savings.  If she can’t return to work, Ms. Pozos and her family will need more than the one-time payment of up to $1,200 per person that the CARES Act promises.
 
	“The $1,200 amount is ridiculous,” says Ms. Braun.  “The pandemic has exposed the deeper issues, with people falling through the cracks. It shows structural failures.”
 No income disruption Income disruption LOW-INCOME MIDDLE-INCOME HIGH-INCOME Evicted Missed housing payment Missed utility payment Received public benefits 0% 20 40 0% 20 40 0% 20 40 No income disruption Income disruption LOW-INCOME Evicted Missed housing payment Missed utility payment Received public benefits 0% 20 40 MIDDLE-INCOME Evicted Missed housing payment Missed utility payment Received public benefits 0% 20 40 HIGH-INCOME Evicted Missed housing payment Missed utility payment Received public benefits 0% 20 40 No income disruption Income disruption LOW-INCOME MIDDLE-INCOME HIGH-INCOME Evicted Missed housing payment Missed utility payment Received public benefits 0% 20 40 0% 20 40 0% 20 40 
	Given the level of hardship, we should be sure to help workers first, rather than companies: while the CARES Act helps individuals, it also greatly aids particular companies like Boeing, which are expected to get up to $17 billion in assistance.
 
	Other ways to help people with low or no savings include broadening unemployment insurance or relieving student debt. On a smaller scale, financial institutions should drop expensive overdraft and A.T.M. fees, and high interest rates for loans and credit card payments. In addition, “employers could provide matching funds for emergency savings accounts and short-term loans guaranteed against stimulus checks,” recommends Chuck Collins, the director of the Program on Inequality at the Institute for Policy Studies (the fiscal sponsor of the organization I run, the Economic Hardship Reporting Project). As little as $250 in savings might be the difference between that family’s missing a utility payment or getting evicted.
 
	Ms. Braun, for one, is having trouble concentrating and sleeping now. “This lack of savings feels like a form of psychological violence,” she says.
 
	If we don’t start helping people create the financial security they need, we will prove ourselves a society that is practicing moral distancing as well.
 
	Alissa Quart (@lisquart) is the executive director of the Economic Hardship Reporting Project and the author of “Squeezed: Why Our Families Can’t Afford America.”
 
	Yaryna Serkez (@iarynam) is a graphics editor for Opinion.
 
	Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram.
 "
nyt://article/e14d9561-02be-54c3-920f-69603665857e,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/13/business/live-stock-market.html,2020-03-13T04:46:47+0000,article,News,1598,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Dow Jones Stock Average', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Stocks rallied Friday, rebounding from their worst day in more than 30 years, after President Trump said leaders of private companies in the United States had agreed to help with efforts to test for the coronavirus, and declared a national emergency that would free billions in funding to fight the epidemic. The S&P 500 rose more than 9 percent, making Friday its best day since 2008, with most of the gains coming late in the day as government officials and business executives spoke at a news conference at the White House. Though he was short on details, Mr. Trump said the administration was working with Google to develop a website to determine whether an individual needs a test — a move aimed at avoiding overwhelming the health system with people who are ill but do not necessarily need to be tested for coronavirus. Google later said the site would initially only be used around San Francisco, “with the hope of expanding it more broadly over time.” The chief executives of Walmart, Target and Walgreens all said they had agreed to make facilities available for testing. Executives from CVS Health, Roche Diagnostics and Signify Health were also in attendance at the news conference. Mr. Trump also said he would waive interest on all student loans held by all government agencies, and that the energy secretary would be buying “large quantities of oil” to fill up the country’s strategic reserve — an effort to bolster flagging oil prices. Later Friday evening, Speaker Nancy Pelosi told Democratic lawmakers she had reached an agreement with the Trump administration on a coronavirus relief package. She had already said the House of Representatives would vote on it Friday. Not long after, even as congressional and administration aides negotiated the final legislative language of the compromise, Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, confirmed it would move forward. Financial markets have been nothing if not inconsistent for the past three weeks, plunging and then rising, and then plunging again, as each day brought new measures to contain the outbreak and new worries that the economy, workers and businesses would take a hit as a result of them. On Thursday, stocks had their biggest daily drop since the stock market crashed in 1987, as Mr. Trump’s ban on the entry to the United States from most European countries disappointed investors, who had been waiting for Washington to take stronger steps to bolster the economy. For the S&P 500, Friday’s gains recouped most of those losses. Google is working with Verily, a life sciences unit of its parent company Alphabet, to direct individuals with a high risk of coronavirus infection to testing sites. But the program will not be as sweeping as President Trump suggested. (Google’s shares surged, to a gain of more than 9 percent, as Mr. Trump spoke on Friday.) Late Friday, Carolyn Wang, a spokeswoman for Verily, said it was hoping to create a website to help “triage” people for virus screening. She said the aim was for the website to be available Monday “at the latest,” but that it would be limited to screening individuals for appointments at testing sites in the Bay Area only. If the pilot goes well, Verily aims to deploy the project nationwide, but there is no timetable for a national rollout. When asked to confirm Mr. Trump’s statement of 1,700 Google engineers assigned to the project, Ms. Wang declined to comment. She said, however, that the president might have been talking about the number of Google employees who had expressed an interest in volunteering for the project of creating a triage site that would feature a series of questions for people with symptoms of the virus. Alphabet’s chief executive, Sundar Pichai, had sent employees an internal memo on Thursday seeking volunteers to build the website. “A planning effort is underway to use the expertise in life sciences and clinical research of Verily in partnership with Google to aid in the COVID-19 testing effort,” Mr. Pichai wrote in the memo, which was obtained by The New York Times. He explained that once more tests become available, the plan was to have public health officials direct people to a Verily website that can steer people at higher risk to testing sites. Mr. Pichai did not lay out how many engineers would be assigned to the project, but he asked for volunteers interested in working on the project. As part of his emergency declaration on Friday, President Trump said he was waiving interest on tens of millions of student loans held by the federal government until further notice. But here’s the catch: Monthly payments are not actually going to decrease. Instead, people will pay the same amount they are currently paying. The difference is that the full sum will go toward the principal on their loans, according to a Department of Education spokeswoman. That means they could pay their loans down faster, but they won’t have more money in their pockets now. Mr. Trump said waiving the interest on their loans would help borrowers and their families. “That’s a big thing for a lot of students that are left in the middle right now,” he said. How much the waiver saves a borrower over time will vary depending on the interest rate on their loan. Interest rates on fixed-rate loans to undergraduate and graduate students range from 4.53 percent to 7.08 percent. The biggest benefit may be to borrowers who have paused their monthly payments because of hardship, or may in the future. In student loan terms, this is known as forbearance. Normally, the interest on their loans would continue to pile up, but that won’t happen during the waiver period. The department said it expected the waiver program to go into effect in the next week, and said it would be retroactive to Friday. One of the main selling points for Bitcoin has been that it would serve as a safe place to keep money during times of turmoil, like a digital version of gold. This promise has not held up well during the recent market gyrations. Gold has held its value better than most other investments over the last month, but the price of a Bitcoin has fallen around 50 percent, to under $5,000 — a much sharper drop than American stocks. Thursday was the cryptocurrency’s worst day in seven years. Critics of Bitcoin have been gleefully posting on social media the many times that prominent advocates of the cryptocurrency had said that it would be a good refuge in times of economic uncertainty. Advocates of the cryptocurrency have said that Bitcoin is not mature enough to be a safe haven yet, but that it will be in the future. Some retailers of apparel and other discretionary items are temporarily closing their doors to help prevent the further spread of the coronavirus. The outdoor-gear brand Patagonia posted a letter from its chief executive on its website on Friday, saying that the brand would temporarily close its stores and offices until at least March 27. At that point it will “reassess and post an update.” That includes 39 stores in North America, including two in Canada, the company said. Patagonia also said on Friday that it was temporarily unable to accept orders on its website and asked customers to check back for an update on Monday at 4 p.m. Glossier, the beauty start-up, also said on Friday that it planned to close its stores for at least two weeks beginning on Friday and delay a planned store opening in Arizona. Buck Mason, a men’s wear brand with 10 stores, will also temporarily close its locations. Is isolating yourself because you might have been exposed to the coronavirus the same as calling in sick? That’s the question that United Automobile Workers union officials are negotiating with Fiat Chrysler, and expect to take up with General Motors and Ford Motor. The union wants to make sure that members who stay away from work to avoid potentially spreading infection are eligible to collect sick pay, even if they have not developed symptoms of illness. The union and Fiat Chrysler “are working together during this unprecedented and challenging situation,” said Cindy Estrada, a union vice president. “The U.A.W. feels strongly that no member should be disadvantaged in response to the COVID-19 process.” For now, the question is mostly hypothetical. Fiat Chrysler and Ford said Friday that they knew of no American workers who were infected. That was also true of G.M., though it said “a small number” had quarantined themselves at home because they had traveled to South Korea or other affected areas in the last few weeks. Delta will cut 40 percent of its flights over the next few months — more than it did after the 9/11 terrorist attacks — and is also parking up to to 300 planes, offering unpaid leaves, freezing hiring, scaling back its use of consultants and contractors and slashing capital spending by at least $2 billion for the year. American consumers were slightly less confident in early March compared with a month ago, according to the latest University of Michigan consumer confidence index, reflecting early fears about the spread of coronavirus and its impact on the stock market.  Reporting was contributed by Nathaniel Popper, Sapna Maheshwari, Deborah Solomon, Neal Boudette, Ron Lieber, Tara Siegel Bernard, Alexandra Stevenson, Jeanna Smialek, Niraj Chokshi, Jim Tankersley, Cao Li, Matt Phillips, Amie Tsang, Carlos Tejada, Brooks Barnes, Tiffany Hsu, Mohammed Hadi and Katie Robertson. "
nyt://article/a3d6bba2-8500-5a54-873e-e330e32ece59,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/05/21/business/dealbook/us-china-trade.html,2018-05-21T10:55:35+0000,article,News,3260,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States International Relations', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Mnuchin, Steven T', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Good Monday. Here’s what we’re watching: • Can investors now strike a trade war from their list of worries? • G.E. announced a big deal for a transportation unit. • Our take on the new Theranos book. • Banks are using military tricks to fight cybercrime. Get this in your inbox each morning. Sign up here. The conglomerate has agreed to combine its transportation business to Wabtec in a tax-free transaction, valued at about $11.1 billion. The deal is the first move to shed an entire business since John Flannery became C.E.O. in August, and it likely presages more. Mr. Flannery said last fall that he wanted to sell off $20 billion in assets. Since the end of the financial crisis, G.E. has sold roughly $200 billion of assets. The company has moved to exit its finance arm, sold NBCUniversal and divested its appliance business that most people associated with G.E. Here’s a timeline of some of G.E.’s biggest transactions since the financial crisis. 2016: Cerberus Capital purchases G.E.’s French consumer-credit unit, GE Money Bank for $4.4 billion. 2016: Qingdao Haier of China buys G.E.’s appliance business for $5.4 billion. 2015: G.E. sells its equipment and receivable finance businesses in France and Germany to Banque Fédérative du Crédit Mutuel for $6.5 billion. 2015: G.E. completes the spinoff of Synchrony. 2015: G.E. sells a division that finances leveraged buyouts in Europe to a unit of Sumitomo Mitsui for about $2.2 billion. 2015: G.E. sells the bulk of a division that finances leveraged buyouts to the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board in a $12 billion deal. 2015: Bank of Montreal buys G.E.’s transportation finance business for $8.9 billion. 2015: Capital One purchases G.E.’s health care financing business for $9 billion 2015: G.E. sells the majority of its commercial lending business to Wells Fargo for roughly $30 billion. 2015: Canada’s Element Financial buys the bulk of G.E.’s vehicle fleet-management business for $6.5 billion. 2014: G.E. sells 15 percent of Synchrony Financial in an I.P.O. 2013: Comcast pays $16.7 billion to buy G.E.’s 49 percent stake in NBCUniversal. 2009: G.E. sells 51 percent of NBCUniversal to Comcast for $22.85 billion. Paul Singer’s hedge fund lost when it took on Samsung three years ago. But the activist investor has claimed victory in its latest battle with a South Korean conglomerate, or chaebol. “Hyundai Mobis will withdraw the proposal in its current form in order to have an opportunity to supplement and improve the restructuring plan, including the proposed spinoff merger,” Lim Young-deuk, the C.E.O. of a Hyundai affiliate at the center of the fight, wrote in a letter to shareholders. Here’s how the hedge fund prevailed. The context Elliott took aim at Hyundai Motor because it was one of the last chaebols that needed to revamp its corporate structure and remove the so-called “circular shareholdings” that linked various company affiliates. But Hyundai’s proposed method — where an affiliated parts maker would spin out a part of its business and merge it with yet another affiliate for $8.8 billion — drew criticism as a way to help keep control of the company within its ruling Chung family. Elliott said that the restructuring plan showed management “has failed to act in the best interest of the companies and their respective shareholders.” It instead proposed turning Hyundai Motor into a holding company that it said was more tax efficient and sustainable. The hedge fund had the backing of shareholder advisory firms like Institutional Shareholder Services and Glass Lewis, both of whom urged investors to vote against Hyundai Motor’s plan. “Despite the board’s claims that the proposed restructuring plan aims to address the circular ownership issues, the transaction itself will have no impact on cross-ownership,” I.S.S. wrote in its report last week. Why Elliott could win this time In a presentation earlier this year, the hedge fund noted that Hyundai’s proposed transaction was similar to what Samsung wanted to do in 2015, where the company sold an affiliate to the chaebol’s holding company. There, Samsung was able to rally individual investors, who accounted for nearly a third of its shareholder base, to its cause. The bottom line: It’s hard to say whether Elliott’s victory at Hyundai was a one-off. But the hedge fund does have some reason for hope: The chairman of the Fair Trade Commission, one of Korea’s top business regulators, is a former activist investor himself. — Michael de la Merced Stock markets are up so far this month, suggesting in part that investors were betting that tensions between the United States and its largest trading partners would ease. That seemed to occur this weekend. The United States and China issued a joint statement on trade and Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury Secretary, said planned tariffs on $150 billion of Chinese goods were on hold. China did not seem to commit to much that is concrete to gain a reprieve from the tariffs, a notable achievement for the country’s negotiators. The joint statement said China would significantly increase its imports from the United States, but it did not say how much more it would buy and over what time period. The parts of the statement about investing in each other’s country and protecting intellectual property were even vaguer. President Trump on Monday nevertheless promoted the statement as a win. But influential members of his administration who are still spoiling for a big trade fight will no doubt want to keep up the pressure on China — and Mr. Trump may at times share their desire in the coming months. Still, the events of recent weeks show that the United States was largely isolated in its trade fights and the Trump administration may have lacked the resolve or unity to keep up its hard-edged approach. The Trump administration can, of course,reintroduce the threat of tariffs if it believes China is failing to make concessions in the proceeding trade talks. But after stepping back this weekend, it will be harder for the Trump administration to make an aggressive stance appear credible. Indeed, the big question hanging over the Trump administration: Why did it withdraw its tariff threat now, before exacting hard, quantifiable concessions from China? One reason may be that the United States needs China’s help in dealing with North Korea ahead of Mr. Trump’s summit with Kim Jong Un planned for June. Another reason may be that China was up for a long fight with the United States and signaled so. Whatever the cause, the takeaway for investors is that the Trump administration passed up an opportunity to show China that it meant what it said. Still, investors may not want to relax too much. Mr. Trump’s popularity has been rising even as he made combative moves on the trade front that at times roiled the market. In other words, there does not appear to be much political risk domestically, if any, to taking on China, and so Mr. Trump may use belligerent trade talk to stir up his base ahead of the midterm elections in November. But as long as he steps back from taking tough actions, investors will most likely take his rhetoric in stride. That stance has served them well. The Standard & Poor’s 500 index is now up from where it was in mid-February when the Trump administration outlined its case for steel and aluminum tariffs. - Peter Eavis Analysts over at Goldman Sachs are out with a report on Monday looking at the holdings of 848 hedge funds with a combined $2.3 trillion in stock market bets. Here are some takeaways: Individual stocks • Hedge funds added bets on Facebook more than any other stock during the first quarter, followed by Microsoft, Aetna and Monsanto. • Amazon had the biggest reduction in wagers on it, followed by Apple, McDonald’s and Citigroup. Context: The data suggests that overall investors were buying the dip with Facebook. Shares of the social media giant dipped nearly 20 percent as the Cambridge Analytica scandal broke in mid-March. Apple’s shares were under pressure toward the end of the quarter as investors crew concerned about iPhone sales. After hitting an all-time high, during the first quarter, Amazon slipped at the end of the quarter as President Trump targeted Amazon’s business in a series of tweets. Sectors •Tech remained the biggest holding among hedge funds but their holdings overall decreased during the first quarter. • Hedge funds boosted their bets on the energy sector. • They remain the most bullish on shares of consumer discretionary companies. • The hedge funds cut their exposure to financial stocks. The U.S. Supreme Court has ruled that employers will be able to include rules in contracts that force employees into individual arbitration, even if they wanted to band together to take legal action as a group, over issues about wages and hours. More details from Adam Liptak in the NYT: The vote was 5 to 4, with the court’s more conservative justices in the majority. The court’s decision on the matter could affect some 25 million employment contracts. The magazine’s annual list of largest U.S. corporations by revenue sees some firms making big leaps. Here’s how to interpret some of biggest changes. • Tesla made the biggest move up the table this year, jumping 123 places to No. 260. But for some perspective, its revenue of $11.8 billion is still dwarfed by that of fellow automaker G.M., which takes tenth place with $157.3 billion. And profitability—or the lack thereof—remains a huge concern for Elon Musk’s firm. • Nvidia, the chip maker, has jumped 81 places, from No. 387 to No. 306, with revenue of $9.7 billion. That’s still a shadow of its rival Intel, at No. 46 with $62.8 billion. But while Intel’s profits have fallen 6.9 percent, Nvidia’s have jumped by 82.9 percent—a result of its enormous successes in providing many of the chips that are used to run AI software. • Charter jumped 22 places from No. 96 to No. 74, with $41.6 billion in revenue. That’s largely thanks to its acquisition of Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks in 2016. • DowDuPont rose to No. 47 from No. 62, with revenue of $62.7 billion. • Coca-Cola fell 23 places, from No. 64 to No 87, reporting lower revenue and profits than in 2016. That’s partly a result of investment in new products as consumers and—governments—shift away from excess sugar consumption. Becky Quick of CNBC’s “Squawk Box,” reports that Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin is adjusting his comments, made over the weekend, about a pause in the U.S.-China trade war. She tweeted: Steven Mnuchin said this weekend, “We’re putting the trade war on hold.” S.&P. 500 futures were up on the news. But the pressure is on the Trump administration to back up its tough talk on China — a task that may be more difficult without the leverage of potential tariffs. The fight inside the White House is still real. Free-trade supporters like Mr. Mnuchin and President Trump’s top economic adviser, Larry Kudlow, are still slinging arrows at hard-liners like the U.S. trade representative, Robert Lighthizer, and the trade adviser Peter Navarro. (While Mr. Mnuchin said the tariffs were “on hold,” Mr. Lighthizer said they were still possible.) The state of play, from Ana Swanson and Alan Rappeport of the NYT: The two sides have agreed on a “framework” under which China would increase its purchases of American goods, while putting in place “structural” changes to protect American technology and to make it easier for American companies to compete in China. But China didn’t guarantee increasing purchases of American products by a specific amount, let alone the $200 billion reported last week. And there has been little detail about fixing the tech issues underlying the trade fight: no firm plans to solve IP theft, and little hope of curbing China’s ambitious plans to become a technology powerhouse. Critics’ corner: Even a $200 billion Chinese buying spree wouldn’t help U.S. trade, Michael Pettis writes in Bloomberg View. Elsewhere in trade: Mr. Trump is reportedly happy to wait for as long as it takes to get a good Nafta deal. The British foreign secretary, Boris Johnson, is touring Latin America this week to gin up interest in trade after Brexit. Improving trade relations with Russia is reportedly a top priority for Germany. Update: G.E. has agreed to sell its transportation business to Wabtec in a tax-free transaction, valued at about $11.1 billion. Under the terms of the deal, G.E. will own 50.1 percent of the combined company, while Wabtec will own the remainder. G.E. will also get a $2.9 billion cash payment up front. G.E. was advised by Morgan Stanley and Dyal Company, the boutique investment bank founded by the former Goldman Sachs deal maker Gordon Dyal, as well as the law firm Davis Polk & Wardwell. Wabtec was advised by Goldman Sachs and the law firm Jones Day. From earlier: The next deal to shrink the embattled industrial conglomerate, according to Reuters: a sale of its transportation business for more than $20 billion to Wabtec, a rail equipment maker. (The transaction would reportedly be performed using one of Michael’s favorite deal structures, a reverse Morris Trust — a similar tactic to that used by G.E. to merge its oil and gas business with Baker Hughes.) The chief executive of G.E., John Flannery, has pledged to reduce the company’s byzantine structure and focus on its fastest-growing core businesses. Making train engines isn’t part of that equation. Elsewhere in deals: Comcast is apparently considering very seriously a bid for parts of 21st Century Fox. Dell is reportedly continuing talks with investors about a deal for VMware. Ant Financial is said to be worth $150 billion (but investors must pledge not to back any Alibaba rivals). A breakup of Britain’s big accounting firms might be a good thing. Blackstone sold its Hilton holdings. “Bad Blood,” John Carreyrou’s heavily anticipated tome about the blood-testing start-up and its founder, Elizabeth Holmes, is out today. (How anticipated? Jennifer Lawrence is signed to a movie based on the book, and “60 Minutes” did a segment on the failed start-up last night.) From Roger Lowenstein’s review in the NYT: Even for a private company like Theranos, disclosure is the bedrock of American capitalism — the “disinfectant” that allows investors to gauge a company’s prospects. Based on Carreyrou’s dogged reporting, not even Enron lied so freely. Andrew’s bottom line: I read the book in just two sittings — it’s a page-turner. If you love narratives like “Barbarians at the Gate,” Mr. Carreyrou’s tale gets awfully close to that feeling of being inside the room, and watching a spectacular fraud unfold. • Rudy Giuliani said that Robert Mueller planned to finish his obstruction investigation by September — but only if President Trump sits down for an interview. The Justice Department’s inspector general has been instructed to look into the president’s allegations of an improper government inquiry into Mr. Trump’s 2016 campaign. • Donald Trump Jr.’s meeting with an emissary of two Persian Gulf states in 2016 suggests that countries other than Russia wanted to get involved in the election. (NYT) • The British law firm Linklaters is under scrutiny for its work on behalf of Russian oligarchs. And here’s a closer look at one of them, the billionaire Viktor Vekselberg, who has been linked to Michael Cohen. • Scott Pruitt has run into some problems in his deregulation campaign at the E.P.A. (WaPo) • The new U.S. secretary of health and human services, Alex Azar, is the rare Trump regulator who isn’t focused on deregulating. (NYT) • Don Blankenship may have lost the Republican Senate primary in West Virginia, but the former Massey Energy C.E.O. is still causing headaches for the party. (Politico) Cybercrime is one of the greatest risks to the American financial sector, according to the Treasury Department. How banks are taking that threat seriously, according to Stacy Cowley in the NYT: Former government cyberspies, soldiers and counterintelligence officials now dominate the top ranks of banks’ security teams. They’ve brought to their new jobs the tools and techniques used for national defense: combat exercises, intelligence hubs modeled on those used in counterterrorism work and threat analysts who monitor the internet’s shadowy corners. Elsewhere in finance: David Solomon’s era atop Goldman Sachs may start at year end — and here’s an argument why Lloyd Blankfein shouldn’t stay on as chairman. Deutsche Bank’s troubles have cast a spotlight on the firm’s chairman, Paul Achleitner. A top Citigroup banker sees investment banking revenues recovering this year. • Antonio Tajani, the president of the European Parliament, says that Mark Zuckerberg’s hearing with the legislature will be live-streamed. Separately, Germany’s online hate speech law makes the country a lab for testing how to regulate the social network. • A close look at why Google is under the regulatory microscope. (60 Minutes) • Europe’s new data privacy laws are proving lucrative for technology consultants. And a new study discovered more than 200 apps and services that can aid would-be stalkers. • Why America needs an A.I. policy. Microsoft bought an A.I. start-up to make its voice control software sound more natural. • Tesla’s entry-level car, the Model 3, could cost much more than $35,000, making it look distinctly less mass-market. The company has made public some of the software underpinning its Autopilot system. • Why investors in tech start-ups in the Midwest shouldn’t look for companies to emulate Silicon Valley. (The Information) • Sony’s new C.E.O., Kenichiro Yoshida, plans to move the company away from making gadgets. (Bloomberg) • Baidu’s chief operating officer, Qi Lu, is stepping down, raising questions about the Chinese tech company’s A.I. ambitions. (Bloomberg) “Should we own 50 percent of every company in America? That’s ridiculous, and we are a long way from that.” — Jack Bogle, on the need for limiting the power of the three big money managers (including his own firm, Vanguard) in Barron’s cover story • How the “Math Men” — engineers and data scientists — became the kings of advertising. (New Yorker) • Google has reportedly removed “don’t be evil” from its code of conduct. (Gizmodo) • Fewer companies are registering in Britain as Brexit nears. (Guardian) • To understand inflation, think of the U.S. as two economies: one for goods, another for services. (WSJ) • China is mining for gold in the Himalayas, which could aggravate tensions with India. (SCMP) • Roman Abramovich’s soccer team, Chelsea, may have won the F.A. Cup, but Britain hasn’t renewed the Russian oligarch’s visa yet. (FT) We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. "
nyt://article/5e81ec06-c606-50c4-9be1-6cb1b5703b90,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/17/business/dealbook/coronavirus-airline-bailouts.html,2020-03-17T10:34:39+0000,article,News,1178,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'AIRLINES AND AIRPLANES', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Want this in your inbox each morning? Sign up here. A week ago, major U.S. airlines said that they could absorb the costs of the coronavirus pandemic. Now, after travel bans around the world, they’ve approached the government for help. They’re asking for over $50 billion, the WSJ reports. And carriers like Delta and American are also asking banks for billions in loans. That’s not including the $10 billion that U.S. airports reportedly want, or the unknown amount that Boeing is said to be negotiating for itself and its suppliers. “We’re going to back the airlines 100 percent,” President Trump said at a news conference yesterday. But Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin said the assistance wouldn’t be a bailout. “If you’re providing liquidity to good businesses that just need liquidity for three to six months, where you’re taking collateral and you have security, that’s not a bailout,” he said. The thing is … The five biggest U.S. carriers spent 96 percent of their free cash flow over the past decade on stock buybacks, according to Bloomberg. • The NYT columnist Tim Wu writes that any bailout should require the airlines to cap fees for itinerary changes and baggage, halt the drive for ever-smaller seats, and generally treat customers and employees better. “We cannot permit American and other airlines to use federal assistance, whether labeled a bailout or not, to weather the coronavirus crisis and then return to business as usual,” he writes. Are bailouts for people or companies? Bloomberg’s Joe Nocera senses a change in attitude in the economic response to the virus, with companies going out of their way to pay workers during downtime. “For once, ‘shareholder value’ is a secondary concern,” he writes. • Republican Senators Mitt Romney and Tom Cotton have proposed direct cash payments for all Americans, a very different approach from the one pursued after the 2008 financial crisis, when banks and auto companies received the bulk of bailout funds. Concerns about the financial health of banks and the broader business world are being reflected in credit markets. Major banks plan to borrow from the Fed’s discount window, heeding a call from the central bank to keep credit flowing. Several big banks said in a joint statement that they “individually have substantial liquidity and multiple sources of funding,” but wanted to destigmatize using the Fed’s short-term funding facility. (This was previously done during the 2008 financial crisis.) What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. • That said, new accounting rules could force banks to book losses on loans in full earlier than in the past. Analysts say that’s unfair, but they don’t expect any easing of the guidelines in the middle of a crisis. Policymakers were urged to broaden access to the discount window to non-financial companies with more than 500 employees. Companies have already been drawing down credit lines — Anheuser-Busch InBev and Kraft Heinz among them — while demand for short-term unsecured bonds known as commercial paper dries up. And oil companies like Chesapeake have reportedly hired advisers to help them figure out what to do about their hefty debt loads. Yesterday brought one of the worst one-day declines in U.S. stock market history, rivaled only by the crashes in 1987 and (gulp) 1929. As the economic damage of the coronavirus outbreak becomes clear, data and forecasts are being produced that would have been scarcely believable just a short time ago. • Increasingly strict restrictions on activity are shutting down large parts of the economy, resulting in G.D.P. forecasts that will make your head spin. Pantheon Macroeconomics, for instance, expects U.S. growth to fall 10 percent in the second quarter, driven by a collapse in discretionary consumer spending (which accounts for more than a third of G.D.P.). • The outlook for jobs is equally grim: Kevin Hassett, a former White House economic adviser, expects March payrolls to fall by one million. “Nobody is going to get hired next week,” he told CNN. • Unprecedented volatility in the markets pushed the VIX index — Wall Street’s “fear gauge” — to a record high. Some think automated trading strategies are making market swings more violent. Belgium, France, Italy, Spain and South Korea have introduced curbs on short-selling in an effort to calm their markets. • Transportation accounts for two-thirds of global oil demand. With practically nobody traveling, trade slowing, and the Saudi-Russian price war flooding the market with unneeded crude, the Eurasia Group says global oil consumption could fall by 25 million barrels per day in the second quarter, to 75 million. • Many of these assumptions depend on how widely the virus spreads, and especially its mortality rate. The NYT Upshot team put a range of estimates and assumptions into an interactive tool, putting the numbers in context. One of the most sought-after commodities these days is the alcohol-based goo, and businesses are responding to shortages of the stuff. • Air Liquide, which was already in the process of selling a division that makes sanitizer, has reportedly upped its asking price for the business, Kaye Wiggins of the FT reports. • Distilleries are making their own hand sanitizers — they already have the necessary base alcohol, after all — and are giving them away. In addition to clean hands, these varieties feature the aromas of juniper, citrus, coconut and piña colada. More coronavirus news: • Amazon is hiring 100,000 delivery and warehouse workers to keep up with demand from people ordering things from home. (WSJ) • Silicon Valley execs held a conference call to discuss pooling their resources to fight the virus. (CNBC) • Universal Pictures will no longer give theaters an exclusive period to play new movies, releasing them for simultaneously for home streaming. (NYT) • Can the internet handle so many people working from home? (NYT) • Norway’s prime minister, Erna Solberg, held a news conference specifically to answer children’s questions about the coronavirus. “It is OK to be scared when so many things happen at the same time,” she said. (Reuters) Deals • Finablr, the owner of the Travelex chain of currency exchange outlets, warned that it may collapse after discovering questionable payments to third parties. (FT) • Renaissance Technologies recorded one of its worst months in a decade. (FT) • Oura, the start-up that makes the Ouraring sleep tracker, plans to announce that it has raised $28 million in new funding. Tech • Google disclosed that it began reporting YouTube’s financial results after a request by the S.E.C. (Reuters) • Apple was fined $1.2 billion by French antitrust regulators over sales agreements the company made with two wholesalers. (NYT) • Tech giants are buying up most of the promising A.I. start-ups. (Bloomberg) Best of the rest • A New York Stock Exchange executive took one for the team and rang the Big Board’s opening bell yesterday — alone — as markets were poised for a disastrous open. (@NYSE) We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. "
nyt://article/f84627d1-635e-5414-a2ea-23c39f7443cf,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/06/12/business/trade-war-us-china-tourism.html,2019-06-12T07:00:09+0000,article,News,1179,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Travel and Vacations', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Trade and World Market', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Hotels and Travel Lodgings', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'AMUSEMENT AND THEME PARKS', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'NYC & Co', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United States Travel Assn', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"A new battlefront has opened in the trade war between the United States and China: the $1.6 trillion American travel industry. A Los Angeles hotel long popular with Chinese travelers saw a 23 percent decline in visits last year and another 10 percent so far this year. In New York City, spending by Chinese tourists, who spend nearly twice as much as other foreign visitors, fell 12 percent in the first quarter. And in San Francisco, busloads of Chinese tourists were once a mainstay of one fine jewelry business; over the last few years, the buses stopped coming. Figures from the Commerce Department’s National Travel and Tourism Office show a sharp decline in the number of tourists from China last year. Industry professionals worry that the drop-off is picking up speed this year, affecting not just airlines, hotels and restaurants, but also retailers and attractions like amusement parks and casinos. Tori Barnes, executive vice president for public affairs and policy at the U.S. Travel Association, a trade group, said the Chinese were especially valuable because they were spending an average of $6,700 during their stays — 50 percent more than other international visitors. “International travelers actually help reduce the trade deficit,” Ms. Barnes said. “There isn’t as much thought given to the services industry being an export,” but, she added, it is a significant one. According to data from the National Travel and Tourism Office, 2.9 million Chinese travelers visited the United States in 2018, down from 3.2 million in 2017. This year’s rate is probably even lower, said Adam Sacks, president of Tourism Economics, a consulting company. “It’s not getting better in 2019,” he said. “The risk is that it gets worse. Mr. Sacks added: “If you look at the previous decade, Chinese travel increased at an annual average growth rate of 23 percent. Then it stops on a dime and begins to retrench in 2018.” He pointed to what he described as “case study of this happening in the past, where China has essentially weaponized tourism.” In 2017, Chinese travel to South Korea fell by nearly 50 percent, he said, after South Korea deployed a missile defense system that China said could be used to spy on its territory. That example was cited in a Bank of America Merrill Lynch report last week in estimating a “worst-case scenario” of as much as a 50 percent decline in Chinese travel to the United States. Its analysts said that could mean a $18 billion hit to the American travel industry. The decline in Chinese tourism may be tied, in part, to a slowdown in the Chinese economy, which has left consumers with less money for discretionary spending. But travel industry professionals, international trade experts and economists say the bigger factor is the trade war and the inflammatory rhetoric associated with it. They say Beijing may see its sizable population of global travelers as a cudgel in its battle with the United States. “That is a real threat to the U.S., if the Chinese run out of options,” said Jan Freitag, senior vice president at travel research and data firm STR. “China has only so many things they can put a tariff on. The one thing where they have leverage is tourism outbound.” Jacob Kirkegaard, a senior fellow at the Peterson Institute for International Economics, said Beijing’s tight grip on domestic media also gave it a pronounced advantage. “You have a political climate in China where the government-led press has clearly been hammering this issue,” he said. Michael O. Moore, professor of economics and international affairs at George Washington University, agreed. “That is potentially an enormous advantage in a conflict if you can control the message, without question,” he said. “There’s an increasingly patriotic spin to everything and the U.S. is portrayed in a negative light, and that can play a role in people’s decisions.” On June 4, China’s Ministry of Culture and Tourism issued an advisory about travel to the United States, saying its citizens have been interrogated, interviewed and subjected to other forms of what it called harassment by American law enforcement agencies. A day earlier, its Ministry of Education warned students bound for the United States that they risked visa delays or other potential disruptions, after the State Department began requiring most visa applicants to provide the agency with detailed information about their past five years of social media use. “Announcements such as this can have a chilling effect,” Roger Dow, the president and chief executive of the U.S. Travel Association, said after the Chinese actions. “We continue to urge both governments not to politicize travel.” Big gateway cities in the United States benefited the most from the rise in Chinese tourism and are on the front lines of the fall. “For right now we’re holding to our 2018 numbers, but we are starting to see some indicators that are starting to show some softening in the first quarter,” said Christopher Heywood, executive vice president of global communications for NYC & Company, the city’s tourism marketing organization. The trade war and visa issues “are concerning to us,” he said. “All of the hurdles could translate into unintended consequences.” Mr. Heywood said Chinese tourists in New York City spend roughly $3,000 per person in the five boroughs, nearly twice what other foreign visitors spend. Hotels are also caught in the crossfire. Mark D. Davis, president and chief executive of Sun Hill Properties, which owns the Hilton Los Angeles/Universal City, a popular destination for Chinese tourists, said that business had been improving through 2017 but fell last year and was weakening further so far this year. “The general messaging from the U.S. has been a little unfriendly at times,” Mr. Davis said. “The posturing, I think, has people worried.” Even businesses that are more peripheral to tourism have seen sales to Chinese visitors dwindle. After the recession left the American dollar battered and the country a relative bargain for overseas tourists, the United States was an attractive destination for the Chinese. “It sort of started in 2009 for us. We started to do some Chinese tourism business and it really just started to take off,” said Lane Schiffman, co-owner of Shreve & Company, a fine jewelry retailer with stores in San Francisco and Palo Alto, Calif. “They were this incredible wave.” As recently as a few years ago, charter buses booked by Chinese tour groups regularly delivered 20 to 30 passengers to his San Francisco shop, Mr. Schiffman said. But the buses have vanished. “The wave crested,” he said. “It’s just not a big part of our business now. We’re not seeing them on the street like we used to.” Mr. Schiffman said his stores were thriving thanks to the booming Bay Area and Silicon Valley economy, but he estimated that his overall international tourist business fell to 10 percent from 30 percent over the past few years. “It seemed like maybe the Chinese government put pressure on people not to buy so much outside of China,” Mr. Schiffman said. “It’s kind of like they turned the faucet off.” world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/40d39a46-a419-561d-b305-ee31c4ad1743,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/05/14/business/coronavirus-retail-bankruptcies-private-equity.html,2020-05-14T20:03:53+0000,article,News,1618,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'J Crew Group', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Neiman Marcus Group', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Private Equity', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Bankruptcies', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shutdowns (Institutional)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"At a time when J. Crew and Neiman Marcus needed to be investing money to adjust to changing shopping habits, enormous sums were going to their owners. J. Crew and Neiman Marcus were each facing a host of issues before the coronavirus pandemic forced them to close their stores and eventually file for bankruptcy, including trouble adjusting to the rise of e-commerce and a lack of connection with a new generation of shoppers. But they also shared one increasingly common problem for retailers in dire straits: an enormous debt burden — roughly $1.7 billion for J. Crew and almost $5 billion for Neiman Marcus — from leveraged buyouts led by private equity firms. Like many other retailers, J. Crew and Neiman over the past decade paid hundreds of millions of dollars in interest and fees to their new owners, when they needed to spend money to adapt to a shifting retail environment. And when the pandemic wiped out much of their sales, neither had anywhere to go for relief except court. “Much of the difficulty that the retail sector is experiencing has been aggravated by private equity involvement,” said Elisabeth de Fontenay, a professor at the Duke University School of Law who specializes in corporate finance. “To keep up with everybody’s switch to online purchasing, there really needed to be some big capital investments and changes made, and because these companies were so debt strapped when acquired by private equity firms, they didn’t have capital to make these big shifts.” The filings by J. Crew and Neiman Marcus followed a wave of retail bankruptcies in the past few years, and came as numerous chains, including J.C. Penney, teetered on the brink because of the pandemic. In July, a report from the Center for Popular Democracy, a progressive advocacy group in Brooklyn, said 10 of the 14 largest retail chain bankruptcies since 2012 involved companies that private equity firms had acquired. Barneys New York went into liquidation in November, and Zac Posen, owned by Yucaipa Companies, closed the same month. In March 2019, the North American operation of the Italian brand Roberto Cavalli declared bankruptcy when its private equity owner, Clessidra, failed to sell its stake. In early April, the British department store chain Debenham’s filed for protection for the second time in less than a year. “You need so much money to keep the stores open, so much money to keep the inventory flowing — an average department store will have 2,500 brands — you need to invest in building, you need to invest in staffing, and most P.E. firms don’t want to make investment before they start seeing the return,” said Marigay McKee, founder of MM Luxe Consulting and a former president of Saks Fifth Avenue. Private equity firms have been involved with retailers for decades. But the collapse of Toys “R” Us in 2017 put a spotlight on how major buyouts by the firms could go sideways. The chain had been burdened with $5 billion in debt from a 2005 leveraged buyout by the private equity firms Bain Capital and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and the real estate firm Vornado Realty Trust, and it did not have sufficient funds to invest in its stores and e-commerce business during a crucial period of growth for Amazon and Walmart. It was eventually liquidated, and more than 30,000 workers were laid off. The workers were not paid severance — even as creditors, bankruptcy lawyers and consultants received payments — until they lobbied pension funds, which invest heavily in funds managed by private equity firms. The situation galvanized politicians and union activists and spurred public outrage. J. Crew, which owns Madewell, and Neiman Marcus, which owns Bergdorf Goodman, have vowed to stay in business, but bankruptcies inevitably raise questions about what the future holds for employees, stores and vendors. The bankruptcies have also shown how running retail companies requires a specific skill set, particularly when it comes to fashion. Clothing is an almost entirely discretionary purchase, dependent not just on cycles within the economy but on consumer taste and the images of the brands themselves. Private equity funds often find themselves “seduced a little by the hypified names,” said Sandeep Dahiya, an associate professor of finance at Georgetown University. Private equity has been flirting with fashion retail since at least 1987, when the Bahrain-based Investcorp began buying shares in the beleaguered family-run Italian brand Gucci, turning the loss-making company around. It cashed out in an initial public offering in 1996, setting a model for the industry and paving the way for such deals as TPG’s 1999 purchase of Bally, Permira’s 2007 acquisition of Valentino Fashion Group and the triple flip of Jimmy Choo from Equinox to Lion Capital to TowerBrook. Carlyle acquired 48 percent of the Italian fashion brand Moncler in 2008, right as its puffer jackets exploded in popularity. It exited in 2014, the year after Moncler went public. Other private equity deals had mixed results, but Carlyle’s success — combined with a booming luxury sector, especially in Asia, and the lure of real estate embodied by store networks — enticed private equity investors. They saw retail as a cash-generating business, with management often composed of founders or families that could be shaken up and streamlined. “Retail used to be kind of a golden goose for private equity firms, because in order for an LBO to work, the company has to be fairly mature with fairly regular cash flows,” Ms. de Fontenay said. “Under normal conditions, that’s kind of the definition of retail.” It “works out just fine as long as the economy and sector you’re invested in continues to grow,” she added. “If the sector is shrinking, it has been bad news.” Neiman Marcus was first taken off the market for about $5.1 billion in a 2005 leveraged buyout by TPG and Warburg Pincus. The company was then sold in 2013 to a group led by the private equity firm Ares Management and the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board in a $6 billion deal. Steve Dennis, founder of SageBerry Consulting and a Neiman Marcus strategy executive from 2004 to 2008, said he knew of at least one firm that backed away from the price tag of the second sale “based on the significant amount of growth to justify it.” “Anything that would take more than a trivial amount of capital and have a longer payout time doesn’t generally fit with a private equity model,” Mr. Dennis said. Neiman Marcus filed to go public in 2015, but an I.P.O. never materialized. The company, which said in court filings that it employed about 13,200 people, including 9,500 full-time staff, has spent much of the last two years trying to restructure its roughly $5 billion in debt, on which it has paid hundreds of millions of dollars in interest. Its revenue was $4.9 billion in its last public annual report, which was for the year that ended in July 2018. Moody’s said last May that Neiman Marcus’s debt levels had reached “unsustainable levels.”  One of Neiman Marcus’s most valuable assets — the luxury e-commerce retailer MyTheresa — was not part of the bankruptcy filing. A group of bondholders have been arguing since 2018 that MyTheresa’s assets were improperly transferred to the company’s owners, leaving little to protect holders of the company’s unsecured debt. Marble Ridge Capital, a hedge fund that holds some of Neiman’s bonds, wrote in a public letter to the owners last month that “you have left a carcass of a company for the remaining stakeholders and have put both Neiman’s storied franchise and thousands of jobs at risk.” Alex Yankus, a representative for Ares, declined to comment. Darryl Konynenbelt, a representative for the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board, declined to comment. Amber Seikaly, a spokeswoman for Neiman Marcus, said that since 2014, the company had “invested over $1 billion of capital into our business,” including in new and existing stores, technology and its digital presence. J. Crew has also faced a rocky road after its $3 billion leveraged buyout by TPG and Leonard Green & Partners in 2011. It weathered fashion missteps, management changes, quality complaints and a general identity crisis. But its debt and related expenses also ate up cash that hurt the company’s ability to reinvest in its products, supply chain and e-commerce platforms. Americans for Financial Reform, a consumer advocacy group, estimated that J. Crew had paid more than $760 million in dividends and fees to its ownership group since 2011. Those distributions are shared with investors in funds managed by the private equity firms. Before it began furloughs during the pandemic, J. Crew had 13,000 employees worldwide, with 4,000 full-time workers, according to court documents. Luke Barrett, a representative for TPG, said that the bankruptcy was “a significant disappointment for everyone” and that the investment “ultimately created loss for both TPG and our investors.” “When Covid-19 forced the closure of the company’s entire store operations, we worked quickly to modify the capital structure and create a new ownership structure that will serve the long-term interests of J. Crew, its employees and its customers,” he said. A representative for Leonard Green declined to comment. “One of the defenses of private equity right now is, they’re saying these are structurally declining businesses already, and, look, that is a part of it,” said Andrew Park, a senior policy analyst at Americans for Financial Reform. “But again, having to service that debt makes these businesses hard, and when you see these companies blatantly taking money away, that’s the element that has really led to criticism.” Mr. Dahiya, the Georgetown professor, said he expected more bankruptcies from retailers backed by private equity firms given the current environment and that he thought it could potentially become a political issue. “If there is a big retail bankruptcy or liquidation with a lot of job losses and P.E. is involved,” he said, “that would be like catnip to politicians, because retail is something that touches you and me, unlike, say, chemicals.” Peter Eavis contributed reporting. Contact Sapna Maheshwari at sapna@nytimes.com or Vanessa Friedman at vanessa.friedman@nytimes.com. Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times. More about Vanessa Friedman "
nyt://article/8ff03756-6877-5a4c-b75f-4bb0efe7007f,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/05/29/business/stock-market-today-coronavirus.html,2020-05-29T09:00:54+0000,article,News,2335,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"This briefing is no longer updating. Live updates can be found here.  Stocks staged a late-day rebound on Friday, climbing after President Trump gave a long-awaited news conference on China without laying out any new tariffs or sanctions against the country.  Investors had spent most of Friday bracing for Mr. Trump to unveil new measures aimed at punishing China, after Beijing moved to strengthen its authority over Hong Kong, a semiautonomous Chinese city that enjoys special trade and financial relations with the United States.  Mr. Trump said that he would ask his administration to revoke special privileges afforded to Hong Kong, including on trade and law enforcement, and that it would impose sanctions on certain Chinese officials. Both those measures have been discussed by other administration officials and lawmakers in recent days. “My announcement today will affect the full range of agreements we have with Hong Kong,” he said, including “action to revoke Hong Kong’s preferential treatment as a separate customs and travel territory from the rest of China.” The S&P 500 posted a small gain for the day, the last trading session in May, leaving the benchmark stock index up more than 4.5 percent for the month. Technology companies, which are particularly sensitive to tension with China because the country serves as an important manufacturing hub and market, rallied.  Combined with a 12.7 percent gain in April, it was the best two-month jump for the markets in 11 years, a rise that reflects investors focus on the return of economic activity in regions were locked down in an attempt to fight the coronavirus, as well trillions of dollars’ worth of monetary and fiscal stimulus that has surged into financial markets and consumer bank accounts in recent weeks.  “The market has sort of intuitively decided that the worst of the Covid risk is behind us,” said Steve Sosnick, chief strategist at Interactive Brokers in Greenwich, Conn. That may prove incorrect. There’s no guarantee that current efforts to reopen will go smoothly. Experts say infections could begin to rise again as people begin to return to their normal activities. A second wave of infections in the fall remains a possibility.  transcript I would worry almost more that a second outbreak would undermine confidence. I mean, a full return to — a full recovery of the economy will really depend on people being confident that it’s safe to go out and save to engage in a broad range of economic activities. That’s how the economy will recover. And you see people testing the limits now, probably every day, all of us are doing things we might not have done two months ago. We know that — I guess everyone is affected by the pandemic in a negative way to one degree or another. But the burdens are falling very strongly on those who can least afford to bear them. The unemployed come very largely, so far, come very largely from parts of the service economy, which involve dealing with large groups of people in — that are tightly together. Secondly, falling on women to an extraordinary degree, this is falling on women to some extent, or in those jobs. And so this is, this — there’s tremendous inequality in the way the pandemic is affecting our population. Now you ask, does that does that affect our policy? Look, it does affect our policy. You know, although essentially part of our mandate is maximum employment. It’s maximum employment and stable prices are monetary policy mandates. So we’re very focused on the full range of employment, and doing whatever we can to really, as I mentioned earlier, to try to get those people back to work or in new jobs.   Powell Worries ‘Second Outbreak Would Undermine Confidence’   Jerome H. Powell, the chair of the Federal Reserve, said that central bankers saw the need to use their tools “to their fullest extent” as coronavirus lockdowns shuttered economies around the world and caused U.S. unemployment to soar. “We felt called to do what we could,” Mr. Powell said on Friday, during a Princeton University webinar. “We crossed a lot of red lines that had not been crossed before, and I’m very comfortable with — this is that situation in which you do that, and you figure it out afterward.” The Fed has taken a variety of actions to support the economy, including cutting interest rates to near-zero, rolling out unlimited bond purchases and introducing a variety of emergency lending measures to keep credit flowing to businesses and state governments. The central bank’s efforts have come at a time of dire economic need. Economists are bracing for a deep plunge in output in the second quarter, which runs from April through June, and most predict only a gradual recovery over the remainder of the year. It could be months or years before output climbs back to its precrisis level and the unemployment rate falls to the 50-year lows that prevailed before the coronavirus came to the United States. More than 40 million people, the equivalent of one out of every four American workers, have filed for unemployment benefits since mid-March, based on data released this week. A report next Friday is expected to show that the unemployment rate jumped to 19.5 percent in May, based on the median estimate in a Bloomberg survey of economists. Government infusions to Americans’ bank accounts led to a surge in personal income in April, the Commerce Department reported Friday, but the coronavirus-related economic shutdown still caused a steep decline in consumer spending. Personal income rose overall by $1.97 trillion, a gain of 10.5 percent in March and 11.7 percent from the previous April. The drop-off in wages was offset by nearly $3 trillion in government transfer payments. Of that, $360 billion was unemployment benefits and $2.6 trillion was “other” — reflecting the checks of up to $1,200 a person that the federal government sent to most households. That extra cash did not translate, at least immediately, into spending on consumer goods, which was down 13.6 percent from March. The decline was spread across all major categories — durable goods, nondurable goods and services. “It’s not every year you get these kinds of crazy swings,” said Greg Daco, chief U.S. economist at Oxford Economics. “It requires a bit of coolheadedness to understand what is transitory and what is permanent.” Government payments, which pumped up personal income “are a one-time shot,” he said, adding, “If you take these benefits out, then you are left with a massive loss of income.” On the other hand, lingering fear is likely to restrain spending on social activities and discretionary for a while. There are signs that spending had begun to rebound slightly in May, Mr. Daco added, but there’s a long way to go before activity returns to precrisis levels. “You might see strong growth numbers on spending but we’re coming out of a deep hole,” he said. There is widespread agreement that the United States economy will soon begin to recover from coronavirus lockdowns. The big debate is whether that rebound will resemble a V, a W, an L or a Nike Swoosh. Increasingly, economists and analysts are penciling in another glyph: a question mark, writes Jeanna Smialek. Forecasters often label their expectations for a post-recession rebound with letters — a “V” suggests a rapid recovery, a “W” a double-dip, and so on — but that’s hard to do this time around. As all 50 states begin to open up and consumers trickle out of their homes, the path ahead is wildly uncertain, making prognostication dicey. It isn’t just Wall Street forecasters eschewing the alphabet in favor of a range of what-if’s. From the Federal Reserve to the White House, analysts have suggested that posing confident prognostications is probably more misleading than helpful. John C. Williams, president of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, said during an appearance last week that it was important for policymakers to prepare for every eventuality, rather than focus on one type of recovery. Google has rescinded offers to more than 2,000 people who had agreed to work at the company as temporary and contract workers. Google employs more than 130,000 contractors and temp workers, a shadow work force that outnumbers its 123,000 full-time employees. Google’s full-time staff are rewarded with high salaries and generous perks, but temps and contractors often receive less pay, fewer benefits and do not have the same protections, even though they work alongside full-timers. Many of the contract and temp candidates who had agreed to work at Google before the pandemic took hold in the United States were let go without any severance or financial compensation. This came after weeks of uncertainty as Google repeatedly postponed their start dates during which time they were not paid by Google or the staffing agencies through which they were recruited. Some of the would-be contractors left stable, full-time jobs once they received an employment offer at Google and are now searching for work in a difficult labor market. Some, who are Americans, said the rescinded offers had complicated and, in some cases, delayed their ability to receive unemployment benefits because they left their last jobs voluntarily, according to several of the workers facing this quandary. In mid-April, a company spokeswoman said that Google intended to bring on the people who it had already hired but who had not started. But this did not seem to apply to contractors or temp workers for Google and Alphabet, which has a market capitalization of near $1 trillion. It made $6.8 billion in profit in the first three months of 2020, despite what it called “a significant and sudden slowdown” in advertising. “If these people were promised jobs at Alphabet, which is worth a trillion dollars, it seems like the company has a responsibility to take them on,” said Ben Gwin, who works as a data analyst in a Google office for HCL America, a contracting agency. “It’s not like Google can’t afford it.” The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention announced sweeping new recommendations on the safest way for American employers to reopen their offices to prevent the spread of the coronavirus. Among the guidelines: Employees should get a temperature and symptom check on arriving at work. Desks should be six feet apart. If that isn’t possible, employers should consider erecting plastic shields around desks. Seating should be barred in common areas. Face coverings should be worn at all times. If followed, the guidelines would lead to a far-reaching overhaul of the corporate work experience. They even upend years of advice on commuting, urging people to drive to work by themselves, instead of taking mass transportation or car-pooling, to avoid potential exposure to the virus. The recommendations run from technical advice on ventilation systems (more open windows are most desirable) to suggested abolition of communal perks like latte makers and snack bins. The country’s largest dollar-store chains reported their latest quarterly results on Thursday, blowing away expectations for sales and profits. These discounters generally thrive during periods of high unemployment and weak economic growth, and the coronavirus crisis is no exception. “We do very good in good times and we do fabulous in bad times,” said Todd J. Vasos, the chief executive of Dollar General. His company reported a 28 percent rise in sales in its latest quarter. Dollar Tree reported an 8 percent rise in revenue over the same period. “In 2008, folks lost jobs, too, and they needed us and they found us,” said Gary M. Philbin, the chain’s chief executive. For the year, both companies’ stock prices are up nearly 20 percent, easily outperforming the S&P 500 and nearly doubling the rises recorded by Walmart and Target. Dollar General said it had hired more than 50,000 people since mid-March, and Dollar Tree hired more than 25,000 over a similar stretch. Both are paying special bonuses for workers during the pandemic; Dollar General said these totaled $60 million in its latest quarter. Still, working conditions at these stores have faced criticism, before and since the coronavirus outbreak. The French carmaker Renault said on Friday that it would cut nearly 15,000 jobs worldwide and drastically reduce production as it tries to deal with “the major crisis facing the automotive industry.” About a third of the job cuts would be in France, Renault said. The company, which is partly owned by the French government, indicated it is likely to close several factories while it cuts the number of cars it produces annually to 3.3 million, from four million. Renault will also pull out of China, where it has failed to get much traction. Renault has been hit hard by the pandemic. Renault sales in the European Union, its most important market, fell almost 80 percent in April, when dealerships were closed and most buyers were not leaving their homes. The U.S. dollar has gained about 7 percent this year against a basket of major currencies. But with interest rates at rock-bottom levels, the Fed’s printing presses revving up and the government borrowing enormous sums for stimulus spending, today’s DealBook newsletter asks: Can it retain its haven status? A recent research note by Gregory Daco at Oxford Economics found that since 1973, the dollar has appreciated an average of 6 percent in the past six recessions, in line with its performance during the current downturn. Mr. Daco expects the dollar to remain strong this year, but not for the usual reasons. Unlike in past recessions, when investors flocked to the safety of Treasury bonds, foreign investors dumped U.S. government debt at a record rate in March, which would normally push the dollar down. But since the Fed flooded the markets with stimulus, the U.S. stock market has, unusually, become a “safe refuge,” Mr. Daco writes, propelled by tech stocks whose businesses are benefiting from stay-at-home orders. Ascena Retail Group, the owner of Ann Taylor, Loft and Lane Bryant, said on Thursday that “the uncertainty created by Covid-19 requires us to evaluate all options available to protect the business and its stakeholders,” sending its shares down on Friday. The company, which also owns Justice, said that its revenue plummeted 45 percent in the quarter that ended May 2 and it had reopened only 450 of its 2,800 stores as of May 27. Nordstrom, the top-performing department store in the United States, said on Thursday that its net sales fell 40 percent to $2 billion in the first quarter, and that it posted a net loss of $521 million. Digital sales accounted for more than half of its total net sales during the quarter. The retailer closed stores on March 17 and started reopening in early May. It said it now has about 40 percent of its locations open.  Costco Wholesale said on Thursday that its net sales rose 7.3 percent to $36.5 billion in its quarter ending May 10 and that it posted a net profit of $838 million, as the pandemic prompted customers to stock up on goods. The warehouse chain, which has more than 500 U.S. locations, said its income took a hit from a $283 million pretax charge “from incremental wage and sanitation costs related to Covid-19.” Reporting was contributed by Nelson D. Schwartz, Ben Casselman, Niraj Chokshi, Daisuke Wakabayashi, Jason Karaian, Jeanna Smialek, Matt Richtel, Kate Conger, Jack Ewing, Mike Isaac, Maggie Haberman, Kevin McKenna, Mohammed Hadi and Carlos Tejada. "
nyt://article/c409dbd7-5ff6-5141-8f59-e764b4c88ada,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/01/03/business/dealbook/ant-financial-moneygram-trump.html,2018-01-03T11:47:48+0000,article,News,3192,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Ant Financial Services Group', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'MoneyGram International Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'China', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Good Wednesday. Here’s what we’re watching: • Tesla pushes back its Model 3 production targets again. • Manafort’s lawsuit faces a tough road. • Researchers discover two major flaws in the world’s computers. • Spotify filed confidentially to go public. • The death of Ant Financial’s bid to buy MoneyGram raises questions about how useful close ties to President Trump are. • Dominion Energy and Scana are combining. • Underwriting for free. Want this in your own email inbox? Here’s the sign-up. The electric carmaker said it delivered 1,550 Model 3s in the fourth quarter and would likely build about 2,500 Model 3s per week by the end of the first quarter. Those numbers were well below analyst expectations and Tesla’s past forecasts. In September, analysts predicted that Telsa would deliver 15,900 Model 3s in the fourth quarter. That number had come down since then. Prior to Wednesday’s announcement, the consensus among analysts was 4,100, or more than double what Tesla actually delivered. Meanwhile, the forecast of 2,500 Model 3s per week by the end of the first quarter is half the number it had earlier promised. The company now says it will produce 5,000 Model 3s a week by the end of the second quarter. Critics corner: “The premise of the stock’s sky-high valuation has long been of Tesla eventually dominating the auto industry. That notion has hardly ever seemed more fanciful,” writes Heard on the Street’s Charley Grant. The news hasn’t spooked investors much. Shares are down just 2 percent after the close. Lawyers know that there are many paths to getting a good result. When one is blocked, then look for another one. The lawsuit filed by Paul J. Manafort Jr., the former campaign chairman for President Trump, against the Justice Department, deputy attorney general Rod J. Rosenstein, and special counsel Robert S. Mueller III is an effort to find a backdoor way to block the criminal charges filed against him last October. The Supreme Court has made it abundantly clear, most recently in 2014 in Kaley v. United States, that defendants cannot attack a grand jury indictment by claiming that they are innocent. That’s what a trial is for, so once indicted the only alternative is to go to trial. But that’s a risky path, especially for Mr. Manafort who will face a jury from Washington, D.C., a venue that is not very hospitable to Republicans. To avoid a trial, Mr. Manafort asked the court to stop the case because it is unrelated to any Russian interference with the 2016 election. The lawsuit claims that Mr. Mueller exceeded the limits of his appointment as special counsel, comparing the indictment to the discredited independent counsel law that led to drawn out investigations of President Bill Clinton and others in the 1990s. Can it work? Federal judges have a strong aversion to interfering with prosecutors, routinely refusing to second guess decisions about who to prosecute and what to charge. So Mr. Manafort faces a tough road if he wants to find a means to block Mr. Mueller from dragging him into court. Deciding whether one is guilty is usually left to the jury, not a judge saying who should and shouldn’t be prosecuted. — Peter J. Henning Those are the names of two major security flaws found in the microprocessors inside nearly all of the world’s computers. The Meltdown flaw affects virtually every Intel microprocessor, which are used in more than 90 percent of computer servers. Spectre affects most other processors now in use, though the researchers believe this flaw is more difficult to exploit. From Cade Metz and Nicole Perloth of the NYT: “The two problems could allow hackers to steal the entire memory contents of a computer. There is no easy fix for Spectre, which could require redesigning the processors, according to researchers. As for Meltdown, the software patch needed to fix the issue could slow down computers by as much as 30 percent — an ugly situation for people used to fast downloads from their favorite online services.” The business implications are unclear for chip makers, who may have to eventually swap out all affected hardware to eradicate the threats. The researchers notified the affected companies but had tried to keep the news from the public so hackers could not take advantage of the flaws before they were fixed. The Register, a British science and technology website, reported news of the Meltdown flaw, spurring the researchers to release papers describing the flaws much earlier than they had planned. Intel’s shares fell 3.4 percent Wednesday. Rivals Advance Micro Devices and Nvidia jumped 5.2 percent and 6.6 percent respectively. The tax overhaul signed into law last month should boost corporate bottom lines. The bad news? The gains could be shortlived. Bank of America Merrill Lynch raised its 2018 earnings forecast for the Standard & Poor’s 500 index to $153 from $139. “The biggest impact on earnings from tax reform comes from the lowering of the federal tax rate from 35% to 21%, making up roughly $10 of the $14 increase. Buybacks representanother $3 of the increase, with some modest offsets from the minimum foreign tax rate and the cap on interest deductions.” But tax reform may weigh on corporate profits in 2019.The bank forecasts earnings of $161 in 2019. “While tax reform should provide a big boost to 2018 earnings growth, there are several reasons to expect it to be a headwind to growth in subsequent years. First, economic theory suggests that higher returns should incentivize additional competition, which should have a negative impact on margins over time, especially with many traditional industries already facing increasing disruption. Second, stronger growth could result in more aggressive Fed tightening, which could eventually weigh on overall economic growth.” Which sectors stand to get biggest earnings boost this year from the cut to the corporate tax rate? consumer discretionary and telecom. Why? The two sectors generate more of their revenue domestically and have a higher average tax rate. Not Spotify it seems. The music streaming service filed confidentially to go public through a direct listing on the New York Stock Exchange, according to reports. The NYT reported in May that the company was leaning toward such a listing. A direct listing is exceedingly rare and bypasses the traditional initial public offering process that virtually every other company uses to begin trading on the markets. Direct listings essentially move trading in a company’s stock from private markets to public ones, with new investors buying shares on the open market. Instead of a prospectus many weeks before the market debut, the company files a registration statement soon before a direct listing. Wall Street and Silicon Valley will watch Spotify’s listing closely. If it goes well, it could spur other high profile start-ups to pursue a direct listing. Wall Street is unlikely to cheer such a development. Direct listings generate lower fees than the typical I.P.O. That’s essentially what is happening in Asia. The Wall Street Journal reports that three state-owned Indian companies paid a dollar in underwriting fees to seven banks, including Barclays and Standard Chartered, for their work selling a total of $1.3 billion in dollar-denominated bonds. While those fees may be unusually low, they highlight a trend in the region: “Underwriting revenue, while also up from a year ago, isn’t keeping up with the accelerating pace of Asian corporate bond issuance. That is raising concerns that underwriting “could become largely unprofitable” in Asia. In the United States, companies, on average, pay fees of 0.7 percentage point for an investment-grade corporate bond issue and 1.2 percentage points for underwriting a junk bond offering.  So much for the charm offensive last year by Jack Ma: U.S. officials have effectively killed a $1.2 billion takeover bid by one of his companies for MoneyGram. The failure of Ant Financial, an electronic payments company controlled by Mr. Ma, to win approval from an American national security watchdog raises questions of how much being friendly to President Trump ultimately helps. If it’s true that White House officials are clashing over how hard a negotiating stance to take with countries like China over trade, this development suggests that the hawks might have the upper hand right now. Who should be worried • Foreign companies, particularly Chinese ones, seeking to buy American counterparts. (Think also of Broadcom, which is legally headquartered in Singapore and which is pursuing Qualcomm — and has assiduously courted Mr. Trump.) • Domestic companies looking to merge in contested situations, despite having unofficial support from the president. (Think Disney and Fox, whose proposed transaction raised antitrust concerns but garnered praise from Mr. Trump.) • American companies looking to do business in China, who may now face retaliatory blowback. Critics’ corner • Lex writes, “With the demise of this payments merger, any Chinese company wanting to buy anything of significance in the U.S. should give up.” (Lex) • Richard Beales writes, “If it’s a rebuke, it’s one that’s conveniently unlikely to provoke great resentment.” (Breakingviews) Dominion Energy has agreed to buy Scana Corporation in an all-stock deal valued at $14.6 billion, including debt. Scana shareholders will receive 0.669 shares of Dominion Energy for each share held. That’s about $53.71 a share based on Dominion’s stock price at Tuesday’s close and a 28 percent premium. Shares of Scana jumped 22 percent on the news, while Dominion slipped 4 percent. Scana has struggled since this summer when it abandoned two unfinished nuclear reactors in South Carolina. The project was once expected to showcase advanced nuclear technology but was plagued by delays and cost overruns. Scana’s shares are down more than 40 percent since midsummer. Height Securities via Axios warns that the deal has ways to go before it closes. “In this case especially, Dominion will have to pull out all the stops to demonstrate that their offer is the best deal for customers, particularly given the uncertainty facing [SCANA’s] rates over the coming months. We’re looking for a reaction from the Governor as well as House Speaker Jay Lucas and the PSC commissioners for early signs of whether Dominion’s proposal will fall flat.” Where Bitcoin traded early yesterday: $13,833 Where Bitcoin is trading this morning: $15,202 What happened: It was probably the revelation that the venture capitalist Peter Thiel has made a big bet on the digital currency. From Rob Copeland of the WSJ: Founders Fund, the venture-capital firm co-founded by Peter Thiel, has amassed hundreds of millions of dollars of the volatile cryptocurrency, people familiar with the matter said. The bet has been spread across several of the firm’s most recent funds, the people said, including one that began investing in mid-2017 and made bitcoin one of its first investments. Has Founders Fund made money? The WSJ reports, citing unidentified sources, that the firm bought about $15 million in Bitcoin and that its stake is now worth hundreds of millions of dollars. The Bitcoin flyaround • John O’Rourke, the head of Riot Blockchain, a small biotech-turned-digital currency company, has made at least $712,000 on price increase of more than 60 percent after the company added blockchain to its name. (CNBC) • The penny-stock company TGI Solar Power Group enjoyed a surge in its stock price (though not quite what Long Blockchain, nee Long Island Iced Tea, experienced last month) after it announced a move into digital currencies. Its stock went as high as 0.2 cent. (Bloomberg) • Speaking of Long Blockchain, the company has added two new board members as part of its pivot from cold beverages to cryptocurrency. (WSJ) • Criminals are turning to a new breed of virtual currency, because Bitcoin’s underlying technology can work against them. (Bloomberg) It isn’t just the fact that Mitt Romney, a sometimes vociferous critic of the president, is expected to run for Mr. Hatch’s Senate seat. It’s that another Republican lawmaker who has been relatively friendly to Mr. Trump is stepping down before the 2018 midterm elections — which could whittle down the G.O.P.’s control of Congress. More from Jonathan Martin of the NYT: Mr. Romney’s potential ascent is particularly alarming to the White House because the former presidential candidate has an extensive political network and could use the Senate seat as a platform to again seek the nomination. Even if he were not to run again for president, a Senator Romney could prove a pivotal swing vote, impervious to the entreaties of a president he has scorned and able to rally other Trump skeptics in the chamber. He’s running, probably: While Mr. Romney didn’t issue a statement on his potential candidacy, he did change his location on Twitter from “Massachusetts” to “Holladay, Utah.” Also worth noting The Washington flyaround • Republican and Democratic lawmakers will meet today with White House officials to try and reach a spending deal before Jan. 19 — or face a government shutdown. (NYT) • The founders of the research firm Fusion GPS, which has been at the heart of the investigations into Russian interference in the 2016 elections, criticized Republican attacks on those inquiries in an NYT Op-Ed. (NYT) • American Airlines and Southwest Airlines joined the tide of companies offering employees $1,000 bonuses. (Bloomberg) • BP said it would take a roughly $1.5 billion accounting charge for its latest quarter because of the tax overhaul. (WSJ) • Jack Lew, the former Treasury secretary, described the tax overhaul as a “ticking time bomb” and asserted that it could leave the U.S. broke. (Bloomberg) • Michele Bachmann, the former Minnesota congresswoman and 2012 Republican presidential candidate, said she was considering running for Al Franken’s Senate seat. (Axios) • Vice Media placed its president, Andrew Creighton, and its chief digital officer, Mike Germano, on leave after the NYT reported on sexual harassment allegations against them. (NYT) • The Showtime political documentary series “The Circus” will return in April without its most recognizable star, Mark Halperin, whose career was felled by allegations of sexual harassment and assault. He will be replaced by the CBS News anchor Alex Wagner and the political analyst Mark McKinnon. (NYT) • Pete Wells asks who can clean up the restaurant industry and wonders when prominent restaurant figures will admit that the way the industry treats women has damaged careers and lives. (NYT) Oil is at its highest level since 2015, edging up this morning toward $67 a barrel. Geopolitical risks, like protests in Iran, have prompted buying, while production curbs by OPEC members have tightened supply. That rise is expected to continue. More from David Sheppard of the FT: While global oil demand is forecast to rise by about 1.4m barrels a day next year, growing US shale output combined with new projects in Brazil and Canada are broadly expected to see non-OPEC supply rise by a similar amount. Hedge funds are, however, betting that prices are likely to head higher, with some arguing that geopolitical unrest — including in OPEC member Venezuela, where oil output has been falling — should keep prices well supported. Blackstone’s Byron Wien reckons that “populism, tribalism and anarchy” could push oil above $80 a barrel this year. The hedge fund’s latest victory: Alexion Pharmaceuticals said that it would work with the activist investor on finding a new director for its board. From a statement by David Brennan, Alexion’s chairman: We have been actively working to expand and diversify our board, and we welcome input from Elliott to identify a strong director candidate to further strengthen Alexion’s board. The context: Michael broke the news last month that Elliott had built up a stake in the drug maker and was weighing a proxy fight if the company didn’t change elements of its business strategy. The broader landscape: For companies under pressure from activists, resistance requires deft maneuvering, according to Breakingviews. Procter & Gamble’s expensive, hard-line defense against Nelson Peltz failed, but both G.M. and Automatic Data Processing have shown that fending off hedge funds is possible. “It’s like your neighbor having a suitcase stuffed with $1 million in cash, but you’ll only pay him $500,000 for it because you think he’ll lose the rest on the way to your house.” — Bloomberg, describing how SoftBank’s relatively modest market value reflects continued skepticism of Masayoshi Son. • Amazon could buy Target this year, the tech analyst Gene Munster predicted. (Loup Ventures) • Wixen Music Publishing, which manages songs by Tom Petty and Stevie Nicks, is suing Spotify for $1.6 billion, saying the streaming service used thousands of songs without a proper license. (Variety) • A young man with life-threatening cancer was granted a wish to go anywhere or meet anyone. He chose to meet JPMorgan’s Jamie Dimon. (Business Insider) • Big deals are poised to return in 2018, but they may not fit so neatly into industry or sector categories. (Bloomberg) • In the final weeks of 2017, business loan growth fell to its lowest levels since the aftermath of the financial crisis, a change that could weigh on bank earnings this month. (WSJ) • Snapchat’s New Year’s Eve party was meant to be an “offline” experience, so the company blocked snaps coming from the venue. Employees took to Instagram instead. (The Daily Beast) • Airbnb defeated a lawsuit brought by Apartment Investment & Management, which accused the home-renting marketplace of enabling tenants to break their lease agreements through unauthorized sublets. (Bloomberg) • Lyft has teamed up with the self-driving software company Apriv and will be showing off a fully-automated ride-hailing service at the Consumer Electronics Show in Las Vegas this month. (Bloomberg) • Michael Gelband, the former head of credit at Millennium Management, plans to start his own hedge fund in the next six months, after resolving a hiring dispute with Millennium’s founder, Izzy Englander. (Bloomberg) • China is suspending the production of more than 500 car models that do not meet its fuel economy standards as part of efforts to reduce emissions in the world’s largest auto market. (NYT) • The practice of putting nursing homes and related businesses in separate limited liability corporations and partnerships has gained popularity as the industry has consolidated, making it harder to hold owners personally responsible if something goes wrong. (NYT) • The pharmaceutical industry may be under attack over drug prices, but the problem has splintered and made it difficult to identify who is responsible. Meanwhile, Scott Gottlieb, the F.D.A. commissioner, has been following through on the president’s fiery rhetoric about rising drug prices. (WaPo, Bloomberg) We’d love your feedback as we experiment with the writing, format and design of this briefing. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. "
nyt://article/bce79811-948f-5b83-985c-4f180de7f199,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/03/03/opinion/sunday/plastic-bags-pollution-oceans.html,2018-03-03T19:30:26+0000,article,Op-Ed,1201,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Plastic Bags', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Oceans and Seas', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Waste Materials and Disposal', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Supermarkets and Grocery Stores', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'European Union', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United Nations', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'World Economic Forum', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bloomberg, Michael R', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Boston (Mass)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'California', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Ireland', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Denmark', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'New York State', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'New York City', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Op-Ed Contributor All it had taken was a moment’s distraction. In a well-practiced sleight of hand, the cashier had double-bagged in plastic a dozen eggs, which were already encased in two protective layers of plastic. I briefly contemplated appealing for the liberation of my groceries but chose the path of least resistance. The deed was done, and the purveyors of plastic had been victorious on this occasion. It was not always thus. In the late 1970s, single-use plastic bags were seldom available in grocery stores. Since then they have become an omnipresent part of the exchange of merchandise for money, a “free” offering to consecrate the ritual. An estimated one trillion bags are used each year globally, but they are so seamlessly ingrained into our daily routines that we hardly notice. It is difficult to imagine life without them. The average American throws away about 10 single-use plastic bags per week, but New Yorkers use twice the national average. Some 23 billion are used across the state each year — more than enough, when tied together, to stretch to the moon and back 13 times. In the short trip from store to home the utility of these bags is spent, but the bags themselves can take millions of times longer to break down in landfill. Yes, you are correct. This is crazy and entirely unnecessary. In Ireland, my home country, plastic bags were once an essential part of daily life. They were often found polluting waterways and littering the countryside, fluttering in trees and hedges. After a 15 euro cent fee was introduced in 2002, however, annual use dropped  from an estimated 328 to 14 per person by 2014. Within a year of the fee’s imposition, a national survey found that 90 percent of shoppers were using reusable bags; litter had also been reduced significantly. Other countries have followed suit, though in a trickle, not a flood. But now political momentum is gathering across the globe to address the problems that plastics pose for the planet. Last year, Kenya banned plastic bags, becoming the latest of more than two dozen countries to either prohibit them or impose a fee for their use. In the United States, California is the only state to have imposed a comprehensive solution to the plastic bag problem, banning single-use plastic bags in stores in 2014, an action then endorsed by voters in a statewide referendum in 2016. Dozens of municipalities have banned plastic bags or imposed fees to discourage their use, including Austin, Tex.; Chicago; and Seattle. New York State and Massachusetts may well find themselves on the front lines of the plastic bag war this year. In January, the European Union responded with its first Europe-wide strategy on plastics, which aims to clamp down on single-use plastic items and ensure that they are fully recyclable by 2030. All of this is part of a growing realization that our feckless use of plastics is out of control. This has become particularly evident in what is happening to the world’s oceans. In December, an important milestone was reached when 193 countries signed a United Nations resolution to monitor plastics disposal in the oceans and 39 countries committed to reducing the quantity of plastics going into the sea. The United Nations Environment Program estimates that some eight million tons of plastic waste end up in the oceans each year, while a 2016 World Economic Forum report projects that there will be more plastic than fish by weight in the oceans by 2050 if current trends continue. Plastic production and disposal also generates around 400 million tons of carbon dioxide a year globally, more than total annual emissions from Britain. Millions of whales, birds, seals and turtles die because they mistake plastic bags for food or because they become ensnared in nets, packing bands and other items. Trillions of microplastics end up in the ocean, with seafood eaters ingesting an estimated 11,000 tiny pieces annually. Plastic fibers have also been found in tap water around the world; in one study, researchers found that 94 percent of water samples in the United States were affected. The impact on human health from direct exposure to microplastics is unknown. One of the most direct ways to begin to address this problem is by taking on the single-use plastic bag. Following in the footsteps of California, Massachusetts may attempt this year to impose a statewide solution to the plastic bag problem. In December, Boston’s mayor, Martin Walsh, signed an ordinance banning single-use plastic bags in city stores. With around 60 other municipalities in the state restricting or imposing fees on these bags, the State Legislature is considering banning them. New York is another potential battleground. Efforts by former Mayor Michael Bloomberg and by Mayor Bill de Blasio to introduce a bag fee have been stymied in part by opposition from the “big plastic” lobby. Last year Gov. Andrew Cuomo blocked a law that would have imposed a 5-cent fee on plastic bags in New York City and called instead for a statewide solution. The task force he established identified eight options in a report released in January, including voluntary initiatives, outright bans and fees. But it makes no specific recommendations. In choosing a solution, it is important to understand the real cause of the plastic bag problem: the myth of free plastic. Retailers pay up to 5 cents per plastic bag, but the cost is hidden, passed on to shoppers through higher grocery prices. This is, no doubt, a brilliant business model for plastic manufacturers, but it has had a devastating impact on the planet. Fees charged to consumers for each plastic bag undermine the foundation of this myth. They have a long track record of success, and not just across American cities. They have been effective in Denmark, Hong Kong, South Africa, Britain and Botswana. The average Dane, for example, now uses just four single-use plastic bags a year, after the introduction of a fee in 1994. Some see fees as a regressive tax on seniors, the sick or the poor, but these arguments do not hold water. It is unjust to charge more for staples like food so that discretionary plastic items can be offered free, especially when there are alternatives. In any case, reusable bags can be provided for those in need. Fees set above 15 cents that flow to an environmental fund strike a good balance between flexibility and effectiveness. They can be more politically acceptable than outright bans. For example, a survey of Irish citizens revealed that a remarkable 91 percent welcomed the fee because they witnessed the drop in litter and found reusable bags more suitable for carrying groceries. The cultural impact can be game changing. As was the case with smoking indoors, the use of plastic bags becomes less socially acceptable over time once the government moves to restrict them. Reusable bags become the norm quicker than one might imagine, and shoppers seamlessly adapt their daily routines to the new reality. Action aimed at plastic bags can pave the way for further measures to address free coffee cups, lids, stirrers, cutlery, straws and takeout packaging. When achieved, these small changes to our daily routines can be surprisingly empowering. Joseph Curtin (@jmcurtin), a research fellow at the Institute of International and European Affairs, Dublin, and University College Cork, is a member of the Irish government’s Climate Change Advisory Council. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook and Twitter (@NYTopinion), and sign up for the Opinion Today newsletter.  "
nyt://article/bbe91ab1-ebba-5cda-9078-f487491824c7,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/07/03/us/coronavirus-amtrak-cuts.html,2020-07-03T15:06:27+0000,article,News,1272,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Railroads', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AMTRAK', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'ANDERSON, RICHARD H', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Daines, Steve', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Flynn, William J Jr', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Northeastern States (US)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'California', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Transit Systems', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Members of Congress are angry that the rail agency is asking for more money while planning to lay off staff and reduce services. Smaller communities that rely on rail service could be badly hurt. WASHINGTON — Amtrak has long wanted to cut back on long-distance train routes that span America’s heartland, but political pressure from Congress made it next to impossible. Then came the coronavirus. Since March, the pandemic has killed over 128,000 Americans and exacted a higher financial toll on the transportation industry than the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001. Amtrak has not been spared, with an internal analysis showing a 95 percent drop in ridership, and revenue projected to fall by 50 percent in 2021. In an effort to stay afloat, the rail agency announced last month it would cut up to 20 percent of its work force by October. It also will suspend daily service on long-distance train routes that service over 220 communities across the country, according to industry experts who analyzed the effect of proposed cuts to national train routes when the Trump administration tried to gut the service in 2019. The moves have been met with intense skepticism, and even anger. Amtrak received letters from 16 senators last week asking why it needed to enact such steep cuts since it had already received $1 billion in emergency aid. The agency had also requested nearly $1.5 billion in additional funding on top of its standard $2 billion budget request for 2021. “We are deeply concerned by the downsizing plan,” a bipartisan coalition of seven senators, led by Steve Daines, Republican of Montana, said in its letter to Amtrak. “These cuts would not only dramatically reduce the utility of the nation’s passenger rail network, but would also ignore congressional intent to expedite economic recovery following the pandemic.” Critics argue Amtrak’s cutbacks are not a surprise, and fall in line with the agency’s recent desires to prioritize profitability and the reduction of long-distance routes. The rail agency receives federal funds but is independently run. “I fear that the Covid-19 pandemic is convenient reasoning to do that which Amtrak, over the past several years, has determined to do,” said John Robert Smith, a former chairman of Amtrak’s board, “and that is to dismantle the national system.” A spokesman for Amtrak, Jason Abrams, said in a statement that the agency was cutting back service “to better align our service with demand” during the pandemic. “We are fully committed to returning this service when demand returns and with adequate funding,” he said, adding: “Amtrak is adjusting its work force to better match this reduced demand. As a first step, we are offering employees a voluntary incentive package.” Supporters of continued rail service say Amtrak’s decision will be particularly damaging to small communities where the train provides an economic lifeline and may be the only transit option available to residents. They also point out that ridership on long-distance routes in May dropped by 78 percent compared with the same period last year, while ridership on shorter routes fell more than 90 percent. “A lot of people can’t fly, they just can’t get on the plane,” said Sean Jeans-Gail, the vice president at the Rail Passengers Association. “Amtrak is the only way they can get around. Those users of the system have a right to be very concerned.” On Monday, the rail agency will reduce service from New York to Miami to four days a week rather than each day. Up to 20 percent of the work force, or nearly 4,000 employees, could be let go by October. Most of the network’s 15 long-distance train routes will see daily service cut to three days a week starting in the fall. Even Amtrak’s busiest route in the Northeast Corridor will have fewer trains serving passengers every day. Amtrak is prepared to cut its operating costs by $500 million in its 2021 fiscal year, which starts in October, anticipating ridership will not return to prepandemic levels because of “changed behaviors, such as increased telework and reduced discretionary income,” according to a letter William J. Flynn, Amtrak’s new chief executive, wrote to Congress in May. But the agency recognizes that the future is hard to predict. “Generating estimates of future demand is incredibly challenging, given the unprecedented nature of our current circumstances and the unknowable trajectory of the pandemic,” Mr. Flynn wrote. “Most demand predictions anticipate a second wave of Covid-19 impacts in the fall, and that further complicates any forecast.” Many in Congress are skeptical, and are asking the rail agency to provide stronger proof that such drastic action is needed even with significant emergency funding from Congress. “We would like to ensure that reductions in frequencies for long-distance routes do not unnecessarily extend beyond the Covid-19 crisis,” a group of five Republican senators, led by Roger Wicker of Mississippi, wrote last week in a letter obtained by The New York Times. “What data is Amtrak using to justify reductions in service for all of fiscal year 2021?” Since Amtrak was created in 1971 by Congress to be the nation’s rail operator, it has lost money. Federal subsidies and payments from states have allowed the network to remain operational, and it has become an integral mode of transport in corridors like the Northeast and Southern California. In 2017, Amtrak’s board hired Richard Anderson, a former chief executive of Delta Air Lines, to take the reins of the rail network and make it profitable and more reliable. His three-year contract recently expired, but he will remain on staff for the remainder of 2020 as a senior adviser to Mr. Flynn. Mr. Anderson took his charge from the board seriously, and embarked on a mission to trim the work force and improve shorter-haul, more trafficked routes in corridors like the Northeast, while scaling back support for longer-haul and less popular routes that run across parts of America’s Southern, mountain and Western regions. “We should be looking at breaking up some of those long-distance trains,” Mr. Anderson said last year at a Senate hearing, “and figuring out how we serve the American consumer to provide high-quality service in short-haul markets.” In 2018, he decided to close an Amtrak reservation call center in California, and told 500 employees they could keep their jobs if they moved to Philadelphia — where the positions were being relocated — in 60 days. Around 100 took the offer, according to the Transportation Communications Union. The same year, Mr. Anderson tried to significantly cut long-distance service along a 2,200 mile route which stretches from Chicago to Los Angeles, and replace the portion from Kansas to New Mexico with bus service. Amtrak abandoned its plans after receiving fierce blowback from members of Congress. During a congressional hearing last year, Senator Jerry Moran, Republican of Kansas, said “the idea that Amtrak would think about replacing passenger service with bus service for 400 miles” was something he could not “get over because it tells me your attitude toward that line or maybe toward long-distance nonprofitable passenger service.” Mr. Flynn has yet to testify before Congress about his vision for the rail network, but he said this week in an interview with The Washington Post that service cuts to Amtrak’s long-distance routes would remain in effect for the winter and would be re-evaluated on a route-by-route basis next spring and summer. Critics also warn that cutting service on long-distance train routes makes them a less attractive option, with passengers having to wait days for trips or endure long layovers between connecting routes. Others point to Amtrak’s statements from as far back as 2000, in which its leadership said attempts to reduce long-distance service “ended up costing the company more in lost revenue than we were able to take out in the way of expenses” because some fixed costs could not be cut even after reducing service from daily to three days a week. “We’ve done it before,” Mr. Smith said. “It doesn’t pay, it doesn’t save the money and it drives off revenue.” Pranshu Verma is a reporter in the Washington bureau, and part of the 2020 New York Times Fellowship class. He reports on diplomacy and transportation policy. More about Pranshu Verma "
nyt://article/218970cc-f6be-5966-851f-b19b1e501c45,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/09/25/climate/nyt-newsletter-climate-strikes-protests.html,2019-09-25T17:58:39+0000,article,News,1359,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Global Warming', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Greenhouse Gas Emissions', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Solar Energy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United Nations Climate Action Summit (2019)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'General Assembly (UN)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United Nations', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Guterres, Antonio', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Thunberg, Greta', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Climate Fwd: Also in this edition, community solar projects and a fuzzy pledge from businesses.  Welcome to the Climate Fwd: newsletter. The New York Times climate team emails readers once a week with stories and insights about climate change. Sign up here to get it in your inbox.  I’ve covered more speeches over the course of seven United Nations General Assemblies than I can remember. Never have I heard someone speak with such force, such rage, as Greta Thunberg on Monday. She accused the presidents and prime ministers in the room of selling “fairy tales” rather than taking urgent action to avert catastrophic climate change.  Her statement, at special climate summit organized by Secretary General António Guterres, reflected the demands of youth protesters who want big, rich countries and companies to pivot the global economy away from its dependence on fossil fuels.  Just a few days before, on Friday, young people took to the streets en masse in cities big and small, rich and poor. Organizers estimated a global turnout of 4 million, and protests are expected to continue in the coming weeks.  We tracked down young organizers in seven countries to hear what drives them. They spoke not only about how they viewed the risks to their future but how they saw the effects of climate change already in their communities. As a parent, I was most struck by hearing how terrified they were.  Mr. Guterres’s climate summit was conceived with a bold call for world leaders to stop building new coal projects — particularly with taxpayer money. Yet some of the biggest champions of coal had a place on the General Assembly stage, along with other fossil fuel promoters.  The summit was intended to showcase countries and companies that are making concrete commitments. But little came from the biggest emitters. China did not say, as many had hoped, that it would reduce its emissions faster. India said nothing about its still-growing pipeline of coal projects. The United States did not speak at all, though President Trump showed up briefly, drawing an icy glare from Ms. Thunberg, who watched him walked past her in the hallway, according to a video that blew up on Twitter.  That gap between the activists and world leaders, it seems, is still wide.  A couple of weeks ago, we talked about solar panels. They’re a great way to reduce your carbon footprint, but what if you can’t afford them? Or what if your landlord likes your building’s roof just the way it is? Between half and three-quarters of Americans, according to a report from Wood Mackenzie, can’t install solar panels for various reasons: They rent, their roof is shaded, or they can’t afford it. If you can’t, or don’t want to, install solar panels, there are other options to support solar energy. One is to participate in a community solar project. Although there’s a wide range of program models, they all involve “buying into a bigger project and lowering your electric bill,” said Nathanael Greene, senior renewable energy advocate at the Natural Resources Defense Council.  In New York, many community solar projects are subscription based. You subscribe to a certain number of panels at a large array, or solar farm, near you. Those panels send power into the grid, and at the end of the month, you receive two bills: one from the solar farm, and one from your utility company. The bill from your utility includes a credit for the amount of electricity generated by your panels. Most people see savings of about 10 percent to 15 percent on their electric bills, said Jeff Cramer, executive director of the Coalition for Community Solar Access. And, unlike with rooftop solar, there’s no upfront cost. Sound too good to be true? The catch is that community solar is still in its infancy. While most states have at least one project online, only 19 states and the District of Columbia have enacted community solar legislation, and a smaller number have statewide programs up and running. In total, Mr. Cramer estimated that fewer than 10 percent of Americans have access to community solar. The easiest way to see if you’re one of the lucky few is to search online for solar farms in your region, or find out if your state has a database like New York. If you happen upon a project with space, Steph Speirs, co-founder of community solar organization Solstice, advised examining the contract duration, cancellation fees and projected savings before signing up. Or, if you’re a property owner or community organizer, you could try to start your own solar project, perhaps seeking help from nonprofit groups like Groundswell and GRID Alternatives. “Finding ways to get the cleanest electricity is critical to fighting the climate crisis,” Mr. Greene said. “The money we spend on our electricity should try to move the whole system toward a cleaner mix.” Anyone seeking signs of hope during climate week may have felt some relief on Sunday, when dozens of large companies pledged to cut their greenhouse gas emissions. But a closer look shows that promise to be looser than it might seem. The pledge gives each company two years to submit to the United Nations and its partners a target for reducing emissions. The pace of cuts is largely discretionary: The organizers want average annual reductions of 4.2 percent each year, but signatories can take as long as 15 years to reach that point. The only fixed number is net-zero emissions by 2050. At many of the companies that signed this week’s pledge, greenhouse gas emissions appear to be moving in the wrong direction. According to data from CDP, a British-based nonprofit group that collects environmental data from companies around the world and is one of the organizers of the pledge, emissions reported by some signatories have increased by 50 percent or more since the Paris Agreement was signed in 2015. When contacted by The New York Times, many of those companies noted that there are different ways to measure emissions. That’s true, and those accounting choices can often make the difference between reporting an increase and a decrease. And methodologies change over time, making it difficult for those outside companies to track their progress. Finally, there is no legal requirement that companies keep their word. Lise Kingo, head of the United Nations Global Compact, which helped coordinate the pledge, said she was confident they would nonetheless carry through. “No sensible company would make such a commitment without having an honest intention to honor it,” Ms. Kingo said. “The reputational downside of just ignoring this commitment would be so big.” Yet companies have ignored such commitments before. At the United Nations climate summit five years ago, a similar coalition of companies agreed to eliminate deforestation from their supply chains by 2020, in what became known as the New York Declaration on Forests. It’s clear now that the effort will be a failure, according to Bruno Sarda, the North America head of CDP. “There’s only a fraction of companies that have demonstrated enough progress toward these targets to have any chance of hitting them,” Mr. Sarda said. Some of the same companies that signed the deforestation pledge also signed this week’s pledge to reduce emissions. Still, he said he hoped this time would be different: As climate change gets worse, so does the risk to businesses that do nothing. “The motivation seems to be sincere,” Mr. Sarda said. “The proof will be in the pudding.” Greetings! A couple of readers wrote last week to point out a detail in our item on green energy providers that wasn’t quite right. We said that Oregon had a deregulated energy market. Well, it does. But only partly deregulated. That means that, while electricity choice is available to some commercial and industrial consumers, it’s not available to residential customers. We should’ve put more energy into checking. Have a great week.  We’d love your feedback on this newsletter. Please email thoughts and suggestions to climateteam@nytimes.com. If you like what we’re doing, please spread the word and send this to your friends. You can sign up here to get our newsletter delivered to your inbox each week. And be sure to check out our full assortment of free newsletters from The Times. world nyregion climate climate world nyregion opinion business magazine Somini Sengupta covers international climate issues and is the author of ""The End of Karma: Hope and Fury Among India's Young."" More about Somini Sengupta Christopher Flavelle covers climate adaptation, focusing on how people, governments and businesses respond to the effects of global warming. More about Christopher Flavelle "
nyt://article/9a18291a-0058-5acd-80f1-7c1061a0eccb,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/08/21/us/politics/deficit-will-reach-1-trillion-next-year-budget-office-predicts.html,2019-08-21T15:11:44+0000,article,News,1413,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Congressional Budget Office', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Taxes (US)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"WASHINGTON — The federal budget deficit is growing faster than expected as President Trump’s spending and tax cut policies force the United States to borrow increasing sums of money. The deficit — the gap between what the government takes in through taxes and other sources of revenue and what it spends — will reach $960 billion for the 2019 fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30. That gap will widen to $1 trillion for the 2020 fiscal year, the Congressional Budget Office said in updated forecasts released on Wednesday. The updated projections show deficits rising — and damage from Mr. Trump’s tariffs mounting — faster than the office had previously predicted. In May, the budget office said it expected a deficit of $896 billion for 2019 and $892 billion for 2020. That damage would be even higher if not for lower-than-expected interest rates, which are reducing the amount of money the government has to pay to its lenders. Still, the 2019 deficit is projected to be 25 percent larger than it was in 2018, and the budget office predicts it will continue to rise every year through 2023. The increasing levels of red ink stem from a steep falloff in federal revenue after Mr. Trump’s 2017 tax cuts, which lowered individual and corporate tax rates, resulting in far fewer tax dollars flowing to the Treasury Department. Tax revenues for 2018 and 2019 have fallen more than $430 billion short of what the budget office predicted they would be in June 2017, before the tax law was approved that December. The need to borrow more money has been aggravated by several bipartisan budget agreements to raise military and nondefense domestic discretionary spending. And it could increase if the trade war further chills business investment and consumer spending, resulting in slower economic growth and fewer tax dollars flowing to the Treasury Department. “One likely reason for the lower-than-expected receipts is that some parts of the economy have been weaker than C.B.O. projected in April 2018,” the budget office said. “A number of developments other than the tax act appear to have contributed to that weakness, including increases in tariffs, greater uncertainty about trade policy and slower economic growth in the rest of the world.” The ballooning deficit defies a historic trend: Typically, the budget deficit shrinks when unemployment is low. But it is increasing despite the longest economic expansion on record and the lowest jobless rate in 50 years. It also underscores the degree to which Republicans in Washington — who championed fiscal responsibility under President Barack Obama, a Democrat — have largely abandoned that goal. While lawmakers continue to talk about the need to reduce the deficit, it is no longer the kind of animating issue that ushered the Tea Party into power. Mr. Trump has shown little inclination to prioritize deficit reduction, and has instead considered policies that would add to the debt. The president has mused in recent days about reducing the taxes that investors pay on capital gains, a move that is estimated to add $100 billion to deficits over the next decade. He has also talked about cutting payroll taxes, which could reduce revenues by $75 billion a year for every percentage point cut in payroll tax rates. Mr. Trump backed away from both ideas in comments to reporters on Wednesday, though it is unclear if the new deficit figures played any role in that reversal. The president also wants to make permanent many of the temporary individual tax cuts contained in the 2017 law, which are scheduled to expire in 2025. The budget office forecast assumes those cuts expire and tax revenues rise; if they do not, future deficit projections would be even larger. Mr. Trump’s indifference to deficits has shattered his campaign promise not only to balance the budget, but also to pay off the entire national debt. And it has left his fellow Republicans, who pushed through deficit-reduction measures under Mr. Obama when the economy was still fragile, in a bind. Congressional Republicans have largely gone along with Mr. Trump’s moves to add more debt, even as they insist they will return to shrinking the deficit if Mr. Trump wins a second term in office. The deficit has now risen four consecutive years, and is on track to rise for the next four. Such a streak would break the record for longest run of deficit increases in recorded American history — five years, from 1939 to 1943 — according to the Peter G. Peterson Foundation, an organization that advocates deficit reduction. Congress could vote in the coming weeks to send Mr. Trump additional deficit-increasing legislation, like the permanent repeal of a health care tax known as the Cadillac tax, which has already cleared the Democratic-controlled House. Members of both chambers are preparing for a potentially bruising debate over how to allocate the money needed to fund the government before Oct. 1. Conservative groups — which largely supported Mr. Trump’s tax cuts — have pushed Congress to cut future deficits by reducing benefits for federal health care and retirement programs, like Medicare and Social Security. “Something must be done soon,” the conservative advocacy group FreedomWorks said in a news release on Wednesday, “and that means taking a hard look at mandatory spending, the root cause of the United States’ fiscal woes.” Republicans do not believe Mr. Trump is likely to push for cuts to a pair of popular retirement programs — and risk exposing himself to attacks in a re-election campaign — before a second term. But they acknowledged that efforts to curb the projected growth in so-called mandatory federal spending were warranted. “We’ve got to fix that,” said Senator John Thune of South Dakota, the No. 2 Republican in the Senate. “It’s going to take presidential leadership to do that, and it’s going to take courage by the Congress to make some hard votes. We can’t keep kicking the can down the road.” “I hope in a second term, he is interested,” Mr. Thune said of Mr. Trump. “With his leadership, I think we could start dealing with that crisis. And it is a crisis.” Other Republicans say pushing through any changes to safety-net programs will require a compromise that draws in both political parties. Reducing the costs of Social Security, Medicare and other contributors to the debt is “usually best done during divided government,” said Senator John Barrasso, Republican of Wyoming. “We’ve brought it up with President Trump, who has talked about it being a second-term project.” Senator David Perdue, Republican of Georgia, said that “it probably takes a second-term president” to prioritize the issue. “It’s politically difficult to say you’re going to save Social Security, because most people think, well that means cutting benefits,” he added. Other lawmakers in both chambers said that Congress had abandoned all appearance of caring about the national deficit. “I don’t know, maybe they should be honest with the American people and say that they don’t care about reducing spending,” said Representative Justin Amash of Michigan, a fiscal hawk who recently broke ties with the Republican Party. “There’s no incentive within Congress to keep the debt down. That’s just not something they’re interested in. They believe they can keep spending forever. They never feel they’re going to be held accountable for it.” Congressional Democrats have walked a line on the deficit, criticizing Republicans for the tax law but providing the bulk of the votes to pass the most recent spending increases, including one that ended the threat of sequestration, the process of sweeping cuts across all government agencies and programs. “It’s just not financially sustainable at all,” said Senator Jon Tester, Democrat of Montana. “Even though I hated sequestration with a passion, I don’t think that gives you the right to just go out and spend money and put the whole economy on a sugar high. And that’s going on right now.” Many of the party’s leading candidates for president have proposed large increases in government spending, like Medicare for All, that would need to be financed by tax increases or additional government borrowing. Candidates have proposed rolling back the Trump administration’s tax cuts and imposing new taxes on the wealthy and high earners, while some in the party have pushed their leaders to effectively mimic Mr. Trump’s approach to the deficit — spending more without simultaneously raising taxes. world nyregion us us world nyregion opinion business magazine Because of an editing error, an earlier version of this article misstated who the government must repay. It is lenders, not borrowers. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://article/36b21545-d838-5d24-a623-aa309f44c7e7,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/09/01/business/media/summer-box-office-movies.html,2019-09-01T22:04:44+0000,article,News,1466,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Movies', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Video Recordings, Downloads and Streaming', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walt Disney Company', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Twentieth Century Fox', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Sony Pictures Entertainment', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Netflix Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"LOS ANGELES — This was supposed to be the summer when Hollywood blew the doors off theaters. Stay home and stream? Not with Simba, Spider-Man, John Wick, Snowball, Buzz Lightyear, Aladdin, the X-Men and Godzilla on the way. Instead, the film business finds itself lagging last year’s surge and facing questions about why. Some box office analysts point to 20th Century Fox, which imploded in Rupert Murdoch’s handoff to Disney and delivered three bombs in a row. Others say moviegoing has become too expensive — concessions, tickets, babysitters — especially given the growing array of low-priced at-home entertainment options that are often already part of a household’s budget. Or is something bigger going on? “It is another sign that the broader economy is in a fragile place,” said Mark Zandi, chief economist at Moody’s Analytics, noting that some other leisure businesses — Disney theme parks, Major League Baseball games — also had a soft summer. From the first weekend in May to Labor Day, a period that can account for as much as 40 percent of annual movie ticket sales, box office revenue in the United States and Canada is expected to total about $4.32 billion, a 2 percent decline from the same period last year, according to Comscore. For the year, revenue from ticket sales is down 6.3 percent, which roughly translates to a 5 percent decline in attendance. That is despite the runaway success of “Avengers: Endgame,” the Disney-Marvel superhero movie that arrived in late April and collected a record-breaking $2.8 billion worldwide, nearly $860 million of that in North America. The specialty box office has been in particularly rough shape. Between January and Aug. 25, combined ticket sales for the 20 largest art film distributors (Fox Searchlight, Magnolia and the like) fell 45 percent from the same period last year, according to Box Office Mojo data. The movie business ebbs and flows depending on factors that vary from reviews to the weather. Ticket sales soared 15 percent last summer in part because of pent-up demand; the “Incredibles” series from Pixar returned after a 14-year hiatus, and “Crazy Rich Asians” was the first studio movie in 25 years to tell a contemporary Asian story. The art-house sector is extra-dependent on quality, and distributors say gems have been in short supply lately, in part because Netflix has snapped up so many of them (for premium prices). Hollywood could make up ground in the coming months with potential blockbusters like “It: Chapter 2,” “Joker,” “Frozen 2,” “Jumanji: The Next Level,” “Cats” and “Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker.” Specialty distributors have high hopes for Bong Joon-ho’s “Parasite” (Neon), which was the top prizewinner at Cannes, and “Downton Abbey” (Focus Features). But box office experts say the theatrical landscape has shifted, possibly permanently. Before it drowned in red ink, MoviePass, the cut-rate ticket subscription service, trained fans (especially younger ones) to expect deep discounts. Streaming services like Netflix, Hulu and Amazon Prime have also proliferated, offering huge catalogs of movies and shows for a comparatively low price. At this point, many living rooms are equipped with large flat-screen televisions. Netflix charges $13 a month for its standard plan. Disney Plus, a service dedicated to everything Disney, Pixar, “Star Wars,” National Geographic and Marvel, will arrive in homes on Nov. 12 and cost $7 a month. For a comparison, standard movie tickets cost $16 to $18 in New York and Los Angeles; IMAX screenings run about $22. (The average ticket price in the United States in the second quarter was $9.26, down from $9.38 a year earlier, according to the National Association of Theater Owners. The average price reflects discounts — child, senior and matinee tickets — and tickets sold outside the more expensive cities.) “Pricing was never an impediment to going to the movies, and it is now,” said Chris Aronson, a former distribution chief for 20th Century Fox who now runs his own consultancy. “Streaming services have come along with such attractively priced entertainment that theaters can’t compete, except on a handful of event movies that people absolutely must see.” Out-of-home entertainment had a down summer in general. Attendance at Major League Baseball games is expected to fall for the fourth consecutive season, according to Two Circles, a sports marketing agency. Broadway attendance has declined 2.6 percent from a year earlier, according to the Broadway League. Full data was not yet available for concerts, but early numbers suggest a decline, according to statistics from Pollstar, a trade publication. Attendance eased 3 percent at Disney theme park resorts in Florida and California in the April-June period, according to the company’s quarterly financial report. National Park Service data shows that Yellowstone National Park had fewer visitors in May, June and July. “Recreation is, of course, a discretionary purchase, and that it has gone soft reflects greater caution by consumers,” Mr. Zandi said. On a studio-by-studio basis, Hollywood’s summer was severely lopsided. The top 10 movies generated $2.57 billion in domestic ticket sales, and Disney commanded 51 percent of that total — with just three films: “The Lion King,” “Toy Story 4” and “Aladdin.” The No. 1 movie of the summer was “The Lion King,” a remake that took in $523.5 million in North America and $1 billion overseas (and is still playing). Disney was humbled, however, by the performance of its newly acquired 20th Century Fox division, which delivered a hall-of-fame bomb: “Dark Phoenix,” an X-Men movie, cost an estimated $350 million to make and market and collected $252 million worldwide, roughly half of which goes to theater owners. Two other Fox movies, “Stuber” and “The Art of Racing in the Rain,” also fizzled at the box office. All were well in the works before the Disney deal. Sony Pictures Entertainment accomplished a unique feat, releasing a juggernaut superhero sequel, “Spider-Man: Far From Home,” and a completely original blockbuster, “Once Upon a Time … in Hollywood.” No other studio showed that range. “We believe in balance, and you can see this exact strategy in the rest of our year,” said Thomas E. Rothman, Sony’s movie chief, noting the “Jumanji” sequel and an original drama, “A Beautiful Day in the Neighborhood,” which stars Tom Hanks as the television personality Fred Rogers. “As strong as the audience is for superheroes and sequels, we limit ourselves to serving that audience at our peril,” Mr. Rothman said. “It will ultimately narrow the business. We have to think about every audience.” Sony misfired with “Men in Black International” in June, but the studio limited its financial exposure on that science-fiction film by bringing in outside financiers to share the production costs. “We wish it had gotten more enthusiasm,” Mr. Rothman said. For the year, Sony is a whisper away from Warner Bros. in domestic market share, a standing that drew double takes in Hollywood. Just a few years ago, Sony was sputtering and Warner was the film industry’s superpower. But Warner, now owned by AT&T, has struggled in recent months. Warner had hoped that female moviegoers would rally around releases like “The Kitchen” and “Blinded by the Light,” which were directed by women. But they were dead on arrival. “Shaft,” starring Samuel L. Jackson, similarly failed to catch on with black ticket buyers, its target audience. Warner was pleased with the turnout for “Annabelle Comes Home,” which collected $72.7 million in North America, but the film, a sequel to a sequel, trailed its franchise predecessor by 29 percent. Lackluster marketing? Subpar movies? Fingers have been pointing inside the studio. Warner’s top films of the summer were “Pokémon Detective Pikachu,” which took in $432 million worldwide, and “Godzilla: King of the Monsters,” which collected a disappointing $386 million. (An independent company, Legendary Entertainment, led the production effort on both of them.) Warner declined to comment. In a few cases, studios suffered because hoped-for behemoths were merely big. “Rocketman,” the Elton John bio-musical from Paramount Pictures, sold $190.4 million in tickets worldwide — a very healthy number. But it was less than half the amount Paramount thought was possible. Universal Pictures and its Illumination animation division had a similar experience with the humdrum “Secret Life of Pets 2,” which generated $414 million. The first chapter sold $875.5 million in tickets. “Sequels and remakes that do not bring something different, original and outstanding are going to lose their audience fast,” said David A. Gross, who runs Franchise Entertainment Research, a movie consultancy. Otherwise, Universal mostly succeeded. A high-stakes “Fast and Furious” spinoff, “Hobbs & Shaw,” has chugged away in theaters since arriving in early August, taking in roughly $700 million worldwide. Comedies, which have struggled in theaters in the streaming age, also came through for Universal, in particular the Beatles-themed “Yesterday.” It was the sleeper hit of the summer, costing about $26 million to make and collecting $135 million. "
nyt://article/ac4fcaf7-e568-5698-a336-9778f408503a,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/09/28/dining/drinks/read-wine-label.html,2020-09-28T16:33:16+0000,article,News,3059,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Wines', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Grapes', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Typography', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labeling and Labels (Product)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The Pour The wine shop can be intimidating, with so many different styles of labeling. Here’s help in decoding a dozen basic types. Credit...Alexandra Bowman Buying wine can be a paralyzing challenge. Facing a wall of unfamiliar bottles can frustrate even the most worldly consumer. Those bottles have labels, of course, often with loads of information about the character and nature of the wine within. But the more detail they offer to knowledgeable wine consumers, the more baffling they seem to the uninitiated. To cut through the confusion, some wineries simply furnish fewer facts. These wines — often hugely popular ones like Yellow Tail, Barefoot and 19 Crimes — rely on brand names and marketing to build an audience. For dedicated wine lovers, though, the facts are crucial, even if it takes some education to decode a label. Every winery does things a little differently. Some wine cultures, particularly in the Old World, emphasize the place the grapes were grown rather than the variety of grapes in the wine. Sound historical tradition guides that position, though some regions permit or even require the grape variety on the label. And in the New World, where labels routinely identify the grapes, some of the highest-esteemed wines don’t break down their blends for consumers. Should there be a better, more consistent system for labeling wine? That might make life easier. But wine historically has been largely a local expression, with customs and traditions arising in inconsistent and sometime peculiar ways. The beauty of wine — and, arguably, of wine labels — is in the distinctions and differences. Some of what you see on labels will seem obvious: All ought to list the name of the producer, where the grapes were grown and the vintage — that is, the year the grapes were harvested. But even here you will have exceptions. Not all wines are vintage wines. Champagnes are frequently blends of multiple vintages, as are some other wines, like tawny port and even the occasional red or white. And some inexpensive wines may be what the industry calls “bulk wines,” in which the grapes were grown and vinified into wine in one country, then shipped in bulk to another to be bottled. Often the vintage is consigned to a neck label, or put around back. Why? It saves on the expense of reprinting labels each year. Doesn’t the alcohol-by-volume listing pose the same problem? Well, most legal entities allow just enough wiggle room that producers can get away with not recalculating that figure each year. What follows is a key to interpreting some common types of wine labels. I’ve chosen some of the most confusing ones, and some of the simplest. The best advice: When in doubt, ask your wine merchant, whose job it is to direct you to the best bottle for any occasion. This is a classic label for a Burgundy, one of the most esteemed French wine regions and also one of the most complicated. It comes complete with a simplified provincial coat of arms, vines laden with grapes and an old Gothic font used for the region, Chambolle-Musigny. 1. Ghislaine Barthod is the producer of the wine. A more old-fashioned label might have rendered the name in fine print. The increased emphasis here is a nod to the commercial importance of the producer today. 2. Chambolle-Musigny The region in which the grapes were grown, which in classic French style is displayed most prominently. 3. Premier Cru Les Gruenchers In the Burgundian hierarchy, vineyards are rated on their potential to make distinctive wines. At the top are the grand crus, vineyards so distinctive as to warrant their own appellation. Just underneath are the premier crus, prestigious in their own right but always listed with the region in which they reside. This indicates that the grapes came from Les Gruenchers, a premier cru vineyard within the Chambolle-Musigny region. 4. Appellation Chambolle-Musigny 1er Cru Controlée An appellation is a legally defined and protected wine-growing area. This line is the official notice that the wine meets the requirements for using the appellation, Chambolle-Musigny 1er Cru, on the label. Many French labels use either “premier cru” or “1er cru.” The French term Appellation d’Origine Contrôlée may be used interchangeably with the European Union term, Appellation d’Origine Protégée. 5. Mis en bouteilles par French for “bottled by.” 6. Propriétaire-Récoltante indicates that Ms. Barthod is both the proprietor of the estate and the grape grower, or récoltante. 7. 750 ML — 13% alc./vol Indicates that the bottle contains 750 milliliters, the standard size of a single bottle, and that the wine is 13 percent alcohol. Wines can range from around 7 percent for a sweet wine, in which all the grape sugar is not fermented into alcohol, to 20 percent for a wine fortified with spirits, like port. But most dry wines today range from roughly 11.5 percent to 15.5 percent. Here is another traditional French label, from the small appellation of Palette, in Provence. It, too, has a coat of arms and depictions of grapes. But Palette is a simpler region than Burgundy, with only a handful of producers and without the hierarchy of vineyards and other distinctions, so the label needn’t offer as much information. 1. Château Simone The name of the producer, in a kind of precursor to an Art Nouveau font, is superimposed over a rendering of the chateau and its vineyards. 2. Palette — Appellation Palette Contrôlée, the official notice of the appellation, is given pride of place at the top of the label. 3. Mis en Bouteille au Château This goes one better than a simple “mis en bouteille” by specifying where the wine was bottled, at the place the wine was made. 4. Rougier, Propriétaire, Meyreuil (B. du R.) France Propriétaire denotes the owner of the winery. Rougier is the surname of the family that owns Château Simone; Meyreuil is the commune in Provence where it is situated. Alsace does things a little differently than the rest of France. For many years France and Germany fought to rule this region and, as in German-speaking wine cultures, the label lists the grape variety, riesling. Alsace has also identified vineyards with the potential to make exceptional wines, which it designates grand crus. Beyond the legal requirements, individual estates may decorate the label and add discretionary information. 1. Domaine Zind Humbrecht Domaine designates the name of the producer, Zind Humbrecht. “Domaine” suggests that the producer grew the grapes rather than buying them. 2. Alsace Grand Cru Rangen The region, Alsace, and the vineyard, Rangen, which has been designated a grand cru. Just underneath is a year, 1296, and a crest with grapes and the initials I.H., taken from a carved stone found years ago in a vineyard by the Humbrecht family. The winemakers attribute the crest to an ancestor, Isadore Humbrecht. 3. Clos Saint Urbain A “clos” is an enclosed vineyard. This clos is named for a 16th-century chapel devoted to Saint Urbain that sits within the vineyard. 4. Rangen de Thann The Rangen vineyard, the southernmost grand cru in Alsace, stretches between two villages, Thann and Vieux Thann. The Clos Saint Urbain portion is in Thann, which the Humbrecht family believes is the most interesting part of the vineyard, hence Rangen de Thann. 5. Appellation Alsace Grand Cru Contrôlée The official designation that the wine meets the requirements of the appellation. 6. Riesling The wine is made entirely of this white grape. 7. Indice This is a proprietary code used by Zind Humbrecht to indicate the wine’s level of sweetness, with Indice 1 the driest and Indice 5 the richest and sweetest. It will be filled in depending on the vintage. 8. Olivier et Margaret Humbrecht The current proprietors. 9. Contains sulfites Sulfites are compounds that both occur naturally in fermented grape juice, and are added in the form of sulfur dioxide, an almost universally used preservative. This label is mandatory for wines in which the sulfite level is more than 10 parts per million. This includes virtually all wines, whether sulfur dioxide is added or not. 10. L 24 R A proprietary code for labeling, lot number or bottling date. This typifies an old-fashioned German wine label, full of essential information that novices will find mystifying, perhaps mitigated by the image of a kindly monk raising a glass. It is adorned by the conventional old motifs of a coat of arms, on the barrel, and grape bunches. 1. Willi Schaefer The name of the estate, in a German Gothic font. Its address is just underneath. 2. Mosel The region in which the wine is made, the Mosel Valley in western Germany. 3. Graacher Domprobst Domprobst is the name of the vineyard, situated in the village of Graach. 4. Riesling Auslese Riesling is the grape; auslese indicates that the grapes were ultraripe when harvested, and usually suggests a very sweet wine, unless you see the phrase “auslese trocken,” a rare designation for a dry wine made from ultraripe grapes. 5. 2016 The vintage. 6. Prädikatswein The Prädikat system, often used in Germany and occasionally in Austria, evaluates grapes according to six ripeness levels when harvested, including auslese. These designations are generally used for sweet wines, but, depending on the region, may also be used for dry. A dry wine may be labeled Prädikatswein without the ripeness designation. 7. Gutsabfüllung A German term noting that the wine was bottled on the grounds of the winery. 8. VDP Grosse Lage V.D.P. is a German association of leading growers. It awards the term “grosse lage” to the best vineyard sites. Not to be confused with the maddeningly similar “grosselage,” which simply indicates a collection of mediocre vineyards with supposedly similar characteristics. 9. L A.P.Nr. 2 583 154 14 16 A mandated code for tracing the bottle, should any problems arise. As with French wine, Italian labeling tends to emphasize place rather than grapes. So you will have to look somewhere other than this label to learn that this wine is 95 percent sangiovese and 5 percent canaiolo. Vineyards and crests are popular with Italian label designers, too. The clean lines make this label easy to read. 1. Monteraponi The name of the estate. 2. Chianti Classico The appellation in which the grapes were grown. Chianti Classico is the historic heart of the greater Chianti region. 3. Denominazione di Origine Controllata e Garantita The official indication that this wine meets the standards of the appellation. D.O.C.G. is the highest Italian quality category, awarded only to certain appellations. The European Union designation Denominazione di Origine Protetta may be used interchangeably. 4. Integralmente prodotte e imbottigliato da Azienda Agricola Monteraponi di Braganti & C. Wholly produced and bottled by the Monteraponi wine estate. Braganti is the surname of the proprietors. 5. Radda in Chianti — Siena — Italia The estate is situated in the town of Radda in Chianti, in the province of Siena. 6. Contiene Solfiti Contains sulfites. 7. LN.01.16 Code for the lot number or bottling date. Bartolo Mascarello is one of the most traditional estates in Italy, yet this label is clean and modern, centered on a painting by Bartolo Mascarello, who died in 2005. (You can find a crest on a bottle of Bartolo Mascarello Barolo.) In the Piedmont region of Italy, many wines, including barbera, dolcetto and others, use the name of the grape as part of the appellation, a useful feature when multiple grapes are grown in a particular place. 1. Bartolo Mascarello The name of the estate. 2. Barbera d’Alba Made from barbera grapes grown in the Alba region. 3. Denominazione di Origine Controllata The official indication that the wine meets the requirements of the appellation. D.O.C. is not as high a classification as D.O.C.G., which would be awarded to an appellation as a whole, not to an individual wine. The European Union term Denominazione di Origine Protetta may be used instead. 4. Barolo — Italia The winery is in the town of Barolo. An old-school California wine label, notably different from European labels in emphasizing grape variety over place. The name Mayacamas is said to mean “howl of the mountain lion” in the language of the Wappo, the original inhabitants of this part of Northern California, and the dancing lions within the stylized “M,” surrounded by vines, pay homage to that image. 1. Mayacamas The producer, named for the mountain range that divides Napa and Sonoma counties. 2. Cabernet Sauvignon The predominant grape. By California law, a wine with 75 percent or more of a particular grape can use the name of the grape to identify the wine. 3. Mt. Veeder — Napa Valley Mount Veeder is a sub-appellation — an American Viticultural Area, in domestic wine parlance — within the larger Napa Valley appellation. 4. Produced and bottled by Mayacamas Vineyards Indicates that the winery crushed, fermented and bottled at least 75 percent of the wine, but does not suggest that the winery grew all the grapes. The phrase “estate bottled” would indicate that a winery grew all the grapes and produced the wine. 5. Alcohol 14¼% A wonderfully old-fashioned rendering, forgoing the decimal equivalent. Like the label on the Ghislaine Barthod Chambolle-Musigny, this Burgundy label includes all the pertinent information, yet it is presented without the traditional decorative touches, and uses a cleaner, simpler typeface. 1. Domaine Boussey Laurent & Karen (proprietaries-récoltants) Laurent and Karen Boussey are the proprietors and the grape growers. 2. Volnay 1er Cru Appellation d’Origine Contrôlée The official appellation. The grapes were grown in a premier cru vineyard in the village of Volnay. 3. Les Taillepieds The name of the vineyard. 4. Grand Vin de Bourgogne A meaningless but compulsory indication that the wine is from Burgundy. It could also read simply Vin de Bourgogne. 5. Mis en Bouteille au domaine etc. Bottled at the estate, along with other information. Unlike the busy Mosel label of Willi Schaefer, this one has been streamlined, offering only some basic information: the vineyard site, Steffensberg, in the Mosel region, the vintage and the name of the producer, Weiser-Kunstler. The striking font, ITC Willow, is meant to evoke the era of 1895 to 1920, said Alexandra Kunstler, a proprietor. Rather than shields or grapes, the label uses small images of owls and a butterfly. The owl, Ms. Kunstler said, comes from the name of her partner, Konstantin Weiser, whose surname means “wise.” The butterfly suggests life and vibrancy. All of the formal, required information has been offloaded to the back label so that the front can serve as a decorative enticement. 1. Weiser-Künstler The name of the estate. Note that the ITC Willow typeface doesn’t permit an umlaut, which represents a “ue” sound, so an “e” has been inserted into the “u” of Künstler. 2. Mosel The wine comes from the Mosel region. 3. Steffensberg The name of the vineyard. Steffensberg back label 1. Weiser-Künstler The producer. 2. Mosel The region. 3. Enkircher Steffensberg The vineyard, Steffensberg, in the town of Enkirch. 4. Riesling 2018 trocken The grape and the vintage. Trocken means the wine is dry. 5. Erzeugerabfüllung Bottled by the producer. 6. D-56841 Traben-Trarbach The estate is in the town of Traben-Trarbach. 7. Vom Boden The name of the importer, in an old Gothic font. 8. Government Warning This is required on all bottles of wine sold in the United States. This is an entry-level riesling that comes from different parts of the Rheingau region and so does not have a vineyard designation. Because the pertinent information is simpler, it lends itself to the equivalent of a brand name, Eins-Zwei-Dry, rather than myriad facts. The pun, Dry for drei, emphasizes that this is not a sweet wine. It is all superimposed over a “3” in case you did not know that eins, zwei, drei is German for one, two, three. The brand is most prominent, though it is the numeral that dominates. 1. Leitz The producer. 2. Eins Zwei Dry The brand. 3. Rheingau The region in which the grapes are grown 4. Riesling The grape. 5. Dry The wine is not sweet. This is pure brand, and one of the most popular wines in its class. The label is dominated by the unsettling image of a hooded, shackled prisoner, along with the printed name. A few sparse facts have been consigned to the back label. Even there, the constituent grapes are not listed. Wines like this are aimed at an audience that may love the wine, or the brand, but is not curious about its origin and production. The Prisoner back label 1. Napa Valley The region where the grapes are grown. 2. Red Wine In case you were wondering. 3. Bottled By This simply indicates that the Prisoner Wine Company bottled the wine. Quite possibly, it did not grow the grapes or even make the wine. Some labels are highly idiosyncratic. This one comes from the Montefalco region of Umbria, and is the polar opposite of the Prisoner’s. It offers information far beyond what is required, presented in a multitude of typefaces, some of which resemble informal handwriting. Some parts are in Italian only; others are translated into English. 1. Antica Azienda Agricola Paolo Bea Vignaiolo in Montefalco Paolo Bea is the name of the estate; Antica Azienda Agricola denotes that it’s an old wine estate; Vignaiolo in’Montefalco means winemaker in Montefalco. 2. Montefalco Sagrantino The name of the appellation. This, too, like Barbera d’Alba, names the grape, sagrantino, and the place, Montefalco. 3. Secco — Denominazione di Origine Controllata e Garantita Secco means the wine is dry, while D.O.C.G. is the highest classification for an appellation in Italy. 4. Pagliaro The name of the vineyard, indicating that all the grapes come from this place. It’s given the most prominent place on the label. 5. Vendemmia 2012 The vintage or harvest. 6. Metereolgia etc. This section includes much information, about the weather (a dry, hot summer); the grapes; the fermentation (only with native yeast); the maceration (37 days with skins and seeds, and without temperature control); the processing (16 months in stainless steel vats, 44 months in large barrels); recommendations for serving and production totals. 7. Contiene 77 mg/l This indicates about 77 milligrams per liter of sulfites. The legal maximum level for sulfites in wine in the United States is 350 parts per million, or roughly 350 milligrams per liter. 8. Nel rispetto dei reciproci A warning to wine publications not to expect to receive samples. 9. Non disperdere Another warning, to consumers: Don’t litter. 10. Integralmente produtto e imbottigliato all’origine Produced and bottled at the estate by Paolo Bea. Follow NYT Food on Twitter and NYT Cooking on Instagram, Facebook, YouTube and Pinterest. Get regular updates from NYT Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice. world nyregion dining dining world nyregion opinion business magazine Eric Asimov is The Times’s wine critic. More about Eric Asimov "
nyt://article/9bac647b-097a-5c36-90fd-ed0e8aa265da,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/29/us/house-democrats-committee-leaders.html,2018-10-29T19:12:47+0000,article,News,1873,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House Committee on Ways and Means', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House Committee on Energy and Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House of Representatives', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Infrastructure (Public Works)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Elections, House of Representatives', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Cummings, Elijah E', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'DeFazio, Peter A', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Engel, Eliot L', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Nadler, Jerrold', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Pallone, Frank Jr', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Waters, Maxine', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Smith, David A', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Neal, Richard E', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"If Democrats win control of the House, they will gain control of powerful committees that could put a check on Mr. Trump’s agenda. Expect subpoenas, must-see hearings and lots of investigations.  WASHINGTON — In the House, the majority rules. Just ask Democrats, who have introduced bills destined for nowhere, watched oversight requests pile up and seen Republicans overrule most of their policy efforts.  But if the Democrats take the House on Nov. 6, they will assume control of two of the most powerful tools in Washington: gavels and subpoenas.  The committee chairmen and women in waiting are mostly over 65  and considerably more diverse than the Republicans they would replace. They could become household names. With chairmanships would come the power to compel the Trump administration to produce evidence, to call witnesses to the stand and to show voters — ahead of 2020 — how Democrats would run the government if given the chance. Judiciary Lifelong New Yorkers, Mr. Nadler and President Trump have been at each other’s throats since the 1990s, when Mr. Trump was a real estate developer and the Manhattan representative stood in the way of one of his West Side developments. Mr. Nadler’s objections earned him a Trumpian jab — “one of the most egregious hacks in contemporary politics” — but as the chairman of one of the most powerful committees in Congress, Mr. Nadler could bring the president serious pain and potentially oversee his impeachment. Mr. Nadler, 71, has pledged to start investigations into potential violations of anti-corruption clauses in the Constitution, Mr. Trump’s apparent attempts to exert undue control over the F.B.I. and Justice Department, and accusations of sexual misconduct and perjury against Justice Brett M. Kavanaugh. Mr. Nadler has said he would tread more carefully around the ongoing investigation of Mr. Trump’s campaign and Russia. In the short term, that means protecting the special counsel overseeing the inquiry, Robert S. Mueller III. But when Mr. Mueller’s work is complete, Mr. Nadler would be a key Democrat deciding whether to open an impeachment inquiry.  The committee also has jurisdiction over some of the Democrats’ highest policy priorities, including writing laws on guns, immigration policy and voting rights.  Oversight and Government Reform With his hands on the levers of the House’s marquee investigative body, Mr. Cummings would face one of the Democrats’ most perilous balancing acts: How to scrutinize the heap of Trump administration scandals left untouched by Republicans without appearing to overreach. The son of sharecroppers, Mr. Cummings, 67, thinks he can pull it off. He is a blunt and fiery liberal beloved by his caucus who prizes strong working relationships with Republicans. “This is not about trying to get any retribution. It is about trying to bring us back to a sense of integrity,” he said. Mr. Cummings has laid out two discrete lanes of inquiry: potential fraud and abuse by the White House and federal agencies; and broader issues that cut at what he refers to as “the soul of our democracy,” such as voter suppression. With the second largest staff in the House, the committee could quickly initiate inquiries into issues like the hobbling of the Environmental Protection Agency,  the White House’s revocation of security clearances to voting rights, the 2020 census and implementation of the Affordable Care Act. Financial Services Perhaps no member of the House — other than Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic leader — has been a bigger target for Mr. Trump than Ms. Waters, the 80-year old firebrand from Los Angeles whom he routinely insults as stupid. Her incendiary language — including calls for citizens to confront Trump administration officials in restaurants and other public places — has made her a darling of the liberal left. If Democrats take control, Ms. Waters can strike back. She has watched, unhappily, as Republicans have watered down the Dodd-Frank Act, the Obama-era legislation aimed at reining in risky banking practices and protecting consumers. At the helm of the Financial Services Committee, Ms. Waters would almost certainly move to undo the Republicans’ changes and put teeth back into the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, though such efforts would have trouble passing a Republican Senate. “Financial services issues are critical for all Americans and for our economy,” she said in an emailed statement, “and I am focused on making sure that our financial system is fair.” Appropriations Women have been a driving force behind the Democrats’ push to retake the House. If they are successful, Ms. Lowey would be the first chairwoman of the Appropriations Committee, the powerful panel that controls discretionary spending. Look for Ms. Lowey, 81, to use the power of the purse to advance spending legislation that reflects the Democrats’ policy goals, including expanding access to health care, lowering prescription drug prices, and increasing funding for child care and early education programs.  She led a successful push earlier this year to fund gun violence prevention studies at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; the agency had avoided such research for 20 years, fearing political repercussions. She said she intended to make certain such studies get underway. Separately, she will press for expanded funding for birth control and work to block Republican efforts to reduce spending on family planning or eliminate funding for Planned Parenthood. “In my work as a woman appropriator,” Ms. Lowey said, “I want to make sure that we’re protecting women’s health, women’s rights.” Armed Services Like other would-be chairman, Mr. Smith, a hawkish former prosecutor, wants badly to step up the committee’s oversight role. He said last month at a defense conference that he would scrutinize overseas military operations, calling out the conflict in Yemen as antithetical to American values. The committee would also look to curtail the president’s efforts to expand the nuclear arsenal, Mr. Smith said, and to protect lesbian, gay and transgender people serving in the armed forces. At 53, he is one of the younger potential chairmen, though he has served in the House for more than 20 years. Education and the Workforce A soft-spoken but forceful presence on Capitol Hill, Mr. Scott, 71, is the first African-American elected to Congress from Virginia since Reconstruction and a Harvard-educated former civil rights lawyer. He has been a sharp critic of Betsy DeVos, the education secretary. High on Mr. Scott’s list is addressing inequities in education. He has repeatedly called on the department to work harder to close the achievement gap between white students and minorities — and has accused Ms. DeVos of permitting states to flout a law that requires schools to make progress toward that goal. It will also be up to Mr. Scott to try to make good on the Democrats’ promise to make college education affordable. He and his fellow Democrats have already introduced legislation, the Aim Higher Act, to expand access to federal student loans, provide states with grants that would help students graduate from community college debt-free, and crack down on predatory for-profit colleges. Energy and Commerce With jurisdiction over health care, energy, the environment and interstate business, the Energy and Commerce Committee looks over some of the most important planks of any party’s agenda. For the Democrats and Mr. Pallone, 66, stabilizing the Affordable Care Act, lowering prescription drug costs and restoring environmental rules undone by Mr. Trump would top the list. If Republicans still control the Senate, major Democratic priorities, like legislation addressing climate change, are probably headed nowhere. But Mr. Pallone, a member of the Progressive Caucus, could certainly raise the profile of his party’s solutions and could use the committee for hearings into malfeasance in the private sector. Mr. Pallone may try to work with Republicans to craft new regulations on how social media companies collect and use user data. He would also use the committee to apply pressure on the Federal Communications Commission and its decision to eliminate net neutrality rules. Foreign Affairs The soft-spoken Mr. Engel, 71, hopes to be a counterbalance to Mr. Trump’s unconventional foreign policy, and he could get an opportunity sooner than anticipated. After the killing of Saudi journalist Jamal Khashoggi inside the Saudi consulate in Istanbul, the Trump administration is under intense pressure to punish one of the United States’ closest Arab allies, and the president has said he would rather Congress take the lead. That could give a starring role to Mr. Engel, a lifelong resident of the Bronx whose unflagging support for Israel has occasionally put him at odds with his party. Mr. Engel could also revive legislation he wrote to hold Russian actors responsible for interfering in the 2016 election and a resolution of inquiry seeking records from Mr. Trump’s summit meeting with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia earlier this year in Helsinki, Finland. And Democrats are eager to question the State Department on the potential targeting of career employees based on their politics. Intelligence The committee’s divisive investigation into Russia’s interference in the 2016 election made its Democratic members some of the best-known names in Washington — none more so than Mr. Schiff. But the meticulous former federal prosecutor from greater Los Angeles sees its work on the issue as far from done. When Republicans concluded the Russia investigation in March having found no evidence of collusion between the Trump campaign and Russia, Mr. Schiff, 58, and committee Democrats put together a 98-page document detailing outstanding lines of inquiry. With subpoena power, he could chip away at those leads, compelling new testimony from witnesses that Republicans left unexplored.  “One of the issues that is of great concern to me is: Were the Russians laundering money through the Trump Organization,” Mr. Schiff said in a recent interview. “That to me would be far more powerful kompromat than any video.” Mr. Schiff has said he will make restoring “comity” on the committee a priority after two years of intense partisan infighting. Transportation and Infrastructure Considered one of the last opportunities for bipartisanship action, infrastructure could be one of the first action items on the Democrats’ to-do list, and the president may find an unlikely ally in Mr. DeFazio. The 71-year-old chairman-in-waiting has signaled his willingness to work with Mr. Trump, and the president himself has publicly mused that there’s “a chance” House Democrats and he will “get along and get along well.” Democrats’ proposed infrastructure plan is a sprawling $1 trillion package that would rebuild roads, bridges, water pipes and rural areas’ broadband networks. Mr. DeFazio has proposed generating more revenue by raising the gas tax and indexing it to inflation. Ways and Means The powerful Ways and Means Committee writes tax law, signs off on trade deals, and oversees Social Security and Medicare. Mr. Neal, an institutionally minded western Massachusetts Democrat, wants to make serious policy pushes in almost all of those areas. First Mr. Neal, 69, would lead the committee’s consideration of the revised North American Free Trade Agreement. Mr. Neal voted against the original Nafta agreement, and his opposition to the deal could hobble efforts to sign it into law quickly. Mr. Neal was a vocal opponent of Republicans’ latest tax cuts and would convene hearings on the law’s effects. He and committee Democrats also would play a key role in the party’s attempts to stabilize the Affordable Care Act, address high prescription drug costs, negotiate a potential infrastructure investment bill with Mr. Trump and pass legislation requiring all but the smallest employers to provide 401(k) retirement plans. Mr. Neal also would have at his disposal an obscure provision in the federal tax code that allows the leaders of Congress’s tax-writing committees to request and investigate the tax returns of any American, including the president.  world nyregion us us world nyregion opinion business magazine Nicholas Fandos is a reporter in the Washington bureau covering Congress. More about Nicholas Fandos Sheryl Gay Stolberg is a congressional correspondent. In 21 years at The Times, she has been a science correspondent, national correspondent, political features reporter and White House correspondent. More about Sheryl Gay Stolberg Catie Edmondson is a reporter in the Washington bureau, covering Congress. More about Catie Edmondson "
nyt://wirecutterarticle/0129873e-56de-5c9a-8dcf-b335f65d12af,https://www.nytimes.com/wirecutter/blog/data-harvesting-by-companies/,2020-05-28T00:00:00+0000,wirecutterarticle,,0,[],consumer discretionary,"We independently review everything we recommend. When you buy through our links, we may earn a commission. Learn more› Advice, staff picks, mythbusting, and more. Let us help you. Published May 28, 2020 Thorin Klosowski Share this post It’s a surreal experience to see all the data you’ve given a company in one place.
Online and off, nearly every life choice you’ve made, every item you’ve purchased, or every website you’ve visited has been logged, categorized, and then entered in a spreadsheet to be sold off. Once it’s laid out in front of you, it may make you rethink how you share information in the future.   At the start of this year, California enacted its new privacy law, the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), which gives people the right to see what data businesses have on them, to delete that data, and to opt out of further collection. Such data requests give everyone a chance to see a sliver of that data, and although it takes some time to jump through the hoops to make the request, doing so is a useful exercise because it can help you make informed decisions about your data in the future.  I spent around 20 hours requesting and reading my data from more than 30 companies. I asked for every single bit of data from the obvious companies, such as Apple and Amazon, as well as from the less obvious data brokers like Acxiom and Clearview. After I filed these requests, the data arrived up to 45 days later, in large spreadsheets or text files, often filled with codes impossible to decipher. Going through my files, I felt like an amnesiac detective trying to piece together clues from his own past. It won’t surprise anyone that Amazon collects and stores everything you do on Amazon. The company has a list of everything I’ve purchased or returned, everything I’ve watched on Amazon Prime Video (including what device and location I watched it from), and everything I’ve searched for on Amazon (including if I clicked an internet or external link). It tracks every customer service email and chat. It tracks everything you can imagine it tracks, and some things you might not.  None of this practice is unexpected, but it’s fascinating to see it all in one place. Going through my purchase (and return) history on a giant spreadsheet has yielded little micro-stories about moments in my life: when I got divorced, when I moved to a new state, when I got real into the banjo, or when ants invaded for months on end.  Brick-and-mortar stores collect data, too. For example, Home Depot had a much larger file on me than I had expected considering I don’t have an account with that retailer. My data was complete with details like inferred income level and net worth (both very wrong), ethnicity and gender (both correct), home ownership (incorrect), and purchase history. Best Buy had a similar set of data, adding my inferred religion and political party to the mix alongside other “triggers,” such as how I have a decreased likelihood of buying a cell phone (true), a satellite dish (also true), or a luxury car (very true).  Looking at my marketing profile was as relieving as it was horrifying. For everything it got wildly wrong (a high likelihood to enjoy soccer), there was something so right, I couldn’t help but wonder how they came up with it (a high likelihood of, ahem, “Heavy fiber focused food buyers”). In either case, with all these metrics in front of me, I could easily imagine a hypothetical future where this data would be abused, either to deny me a service or to take advantage of a negative (or positive, for that matter) life event. But where do retailers get this type of data—about political parties, inferred religion, and the like—in the first place?  That brings us to data brokers. Data brokers are companies that collect and sell information about consumers to other data brokers or to individual companies. Data brokers collect information from everywhere they can, including public records, commercial sources, and Web browsing. They then collate that data into a profile. For a more detailed look, Vice breaks down how these services work, including how data brokers collect and sell this information. Vice also provides a resource for opting out of them. Even if we claim that our purchases don’t define us, data brokers use what we buy to do exactly that. I was able to get my data from a couple of data brokers, including Acxiom and Equifax. Acxiom has my addresses going all the way back to my childhood home, my email addresses from high school onward (including my first Prodigy.net address), and my age. Acxiom also includes what it infers about gender, income, and children. This is the type of third-party service companies such as Home Depot and Best Buy use to build profiles of me—if not directly, then from a similar data set. I asked Home Depot’s privacy department if my profile was from Acxiom, and although representatives told me that the retailer uses data services like Acxiom, they wouldn’t directly confirm which ones. Best Buy did not reply to my email. Acxiom tracks my buying behavior across apparel, electronics, general orders, and more. It knows how many purchases I make a month in each category and how much I tend to spend. It knows how much I travel and how much I donate. It uses this information to create a profile that includes my lifestyle interests, discretionary income, and segmentation inferences (I’m an “upscale earner,” “young digerati,” and “wealthy achiever,” which is news to me). Even if we claim our purchases don’t define us, data brokers use what we buy to do exactly that. Based on Acxiom's inferences, I’m punching well above my actual wealth class.  Clearview—the startup that helps law enforcement match photos of unknown people to their online images—isn’t exactly a data broker, but it operates in the similar gray area of providing surveillance as a service. In my case, my data was boring, including profile photos from various websites I’ve worked for over the years. But as Vice’s Anna Merlan notes, these photos don’t all come from social media, as you might expect. Some come from more obscure sources, in her case including “an enraged post someone wrote accusing me of yellow journalism, and the website of an extremely marginal conspiracy theorist who has written about me a handful of times.” Everything you do on every device you own is tracked. It’s not surprising that Netflix has a list of all 5,751 videos I’ve streamed, Spotify knows every track I’ve played (and favorited), Amazon has a log of exactly where I’ve abandoned reading an ebook, and Apple Music tracks how far into a song I’ve listened.  Perhaps more surprising is how much hardware tracks engagement. Amazon knows not only how often I change a page (likely so that the Kindle can display the time remaining in a chapter or book) but also whether I tap or swipe the screen to do so. I assume this tidbit gets used when Amazon designs the interface for the next generation of the Kindle. Netflix’s report gave me a variety of data beyond the videos I’ve watched, such as what I’ve searched for, how far I’ve gotten through movies, and more. This is the kind of data that Netflix mines to come up with show ideas.  Recommendation algorithms feel like magic when you first see their output. But when you’re given a chance to look at all the input—every bit of data you supply to companies, all in one place—the magic disappears. For example, I’ve listened to Purple Mountains a lot this year, and therefore Spotify recommends Silver Jews. I’ve searched for Zodiac on Netflix several times, and therefore Netflix assumes I’d like to watch Extremely Wicked, Shockingly Evil and Vile, or if it can’t get the rights, something similar enough. The algorithms make obvious connections, but they can’t figure out the nuance of why you liked something, which makes them no more useful than two seconds of Googling would be. What makes Zodiac one of the best movies of all time isn’t that it’s about a serial killer—it’s everything else. When you’re requesting data from Facebook (including any services it owns, such as Instagram), Google, or Twitter, each one typically redirects you to internal tools to download everything you’ve submitted to that service (such as photos on Instagram or search history in Google). Social media companies don’t offer any hidden data or insightful details about your account. If you’ve been with these services for a long time, it might be interesting to see your data all in one place, but I didn’t find it worth the effort. All these companies will show you your ad profiles, though: If you want to request your own data (or exercise any of your other rights under the CCPA), prepare to hunker down for a few hours. Some companies asked me to prove my identity with a state-issued ID, while others required photos or some sort of address validation. A few simply trusted me. Stick with what you’re comfortable with, and if a company asks for more identification than you think it needs, contact the company directly. In any case, if you don’t have a password manager, now is the time to set one up. Password managers are helpful for securely keeping track of all these requests and accounts. As a California resident, I started with this list on GitHub and Common Sense Media’s list to find companies I’d purchased from. If you’re not a California resident, some of the biggest companies allow you to request your data regardless of where you live: The CCPA does allow you to opt out of the sale of information (though to do so you need to fill out another form or click the Do Not Sell My Personal Information link on every single website you visit), but there’s no way to stop companies from using the data internally. And shopping in the real world and avoiding rewards cards doesn’t insulate you completely, either: Best Buy, for example, had a full profile of me even though I don’t have a My Best Buy account. Marketing companies find a personality metric embedded in every product you choose, and when you take a glimpse at that data, the underbelly of how these services work gets exposed.  Even though the CCPA adds some protections and transparency to personal data collection, it still needs improvements. Companies implement its requirements unevenly, and getting through requests is like wading through sludge, but the law represents a good first step toward the type of transparency that makes it easier for everyone to understand where their data is, how it’s bought and sold, and ultimately, what it’s worth. Having seen what so many companies collect about me, I recommend going through this data request process if you can, if not for every place you’ve ever shopped, then at least for some of the larger companies. The experience is similar to learning how to repair an item you own, where taking it apart gives you a new appreciation for how it works. Learning how your data gets collected and then moves between companies is the first step to understanding the process as a whole.   We give up more data than we’ll ever know. The CCPA shines a light on some of it, and looking at your results will make you rethink how much you give away freely in the future. It’s still nearly impossible to shut down this type of collection completely, but the more tools people get from laws like the CCPA, the more chances everyone will have to stop some of this. by Thorin Klosowski Privacy policies can be unreadable walls of text. Here’s what to look for and how to protect your data. by Thorin Klosowski With a few easy changes to the privacy and security settings, you can control how much information your iPhone—and your apps—collects and uses. by Thorin Klosowski With a few easy changes to the privacy and security settings, you can control how much information Android and Google—and the apps you use—collect about you. by Thorin Klosowski These free, easy-to-install browser extensions are simple add-ons that can help block ads, reduce tracking, and improve your privacy online. Get shopping advice, our favorite gifts, and the best discounts on Wirecutter-approved picks sent straight to your inbox. For information about our privacy practices, including how to opt out of marketing emails, see our Privacy Policy. For general questions, contact us anytime. Wirecutter is the product recommendation service from The New York Times. Our journalists combine independent research with (occasionally) over-the-top testing so you can make quick and confident buying decisions. Whether it’s finding great products or discovering helpful advice, we’ll help you get it right (the first time).  "
nyt://article/c3e5198c-d2af-5cc6-abfb-d7a46b012122,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/09/02/business/retailers-holiday-shopping.html,2020-09-02T16:30:36+0000,article,News,1657,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Christmas', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Holidays and Special Occasions', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Santa Claus', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'International Brotherhood of Real Bearded Santas', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'National Retail Federation', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"September may seem early to be thinking about the holiday shopping season, but retailers are already acknowledging that it will be transformed in fundamental ways. It’s only September, but Santa Claus is already nervous about coming to town. And he is not worried about whether kids are naughty or nice, as much as he is about the chance that taking photos with them on his lap at a local mall could expose him to the coronavirus. “Santas are concerned about catching it, especially considering they’re immunocompromised,” said Stephen Arnold, a Memphis resident and president of the International Brotherhood of Real Bearded Santas, a trade group with nearly 2,300 members. “Almost all of us have diabetes and heart conditions and are overweight and elderly.” Mr. Arnold’s Santas are not the only ones thinking about how different the holidays will be at malls and department stores this year. Thanksgiving, the traditional start of the holiday shopping calendar, is still more than two months away, but retailers pummeled by the coronavirus pandemic have already been making decisions about inventory, staffing and how best to connect with customers skittish about visiting crowded stores during a pandemic. The result will be a 2020 season that is transformed in fundamental ways — and unlikely to make up for the severe drops in revenue caused by the shutdowns. In August, the Commerce Department reported that retail sales in the United States rose 1.2 percent in July, the third straight month of growth. But the increase slowed noticeably from June, and the way Americans are shopping has changed significantly. Customers have moved online in greater numbers, hoping to avoid crowds at stores, and retailers are already adjusting their holiday plans accordingly. Rather than enticing shoppers into stores with holiday sales events, retailers like Walmart and Target recently said they would try to temper the crowds by closing on Thanksgiving Day and putting their best deals online earlier than usual. Instead of conversing with browsing shoppers, many store workers will be spending their time handing off purchases to people who pull up to the curb in their car. And the holiday windows and light shows common to department stores in cities across the country will probably feel muted with a diminished amount of foot traffic. “I do think it’s going to be a holiday season unlike any holiday season we’ve seen before given social distancing and masks and everything else,” Chip Bergh, chief executive of Levi Strauss & Company, said. There’s “the combination of pandemic, which won’t be gone by this Christmas, and the economic fallout from it, which, who knows how bad it’s going to be by then?” With the national unemployment rate at 10.2 percent, an estimated 30 million Americans are relying on unemployment benefits and many people’s ability to spend money on gifts for the holidays will largely depend on whether new aid is made available. “It’s a very important time of year spiritually, and people will make sacrifices so that they can go get Christmas presents,” said Kenneth Rogoff, an expert on economic calamities and a professor of economics at Harvard University. “But it’s hard to see a blowout Christmas season when you have a 15 percent unemployment rate.” As special as the holiday season feels to shoppers, it is crucial for stores. Holiday sales in November and December can bring in 20 percent of a retailer’s annual revenue, and 30 percent of sales for hobby, toy and game stores, while driving tremendous profitability, according to the National Retail Federation. The most recent annual report for Macy’s, which also owns Bloomingdale’s, showed that the fourth quarter accounted for 34 percent of its sales. A pause is expected on so-called doorbuster deals and the ensuing madness created by crowds rushing into stores for limited discounts and fighting over electronics. Companies including Hasbro, Target and Macy’s have signaled plans to offer discounts over a longer period, starting as soon as late October. Jeff Gennette, Macy’s chief executive, said in a July earnings call that he expected Black Friday deals “to start in full force after Halloween.” In preparation for customers who are nervous about crowds, Macy’s has been exploring new ways to manage store traffic and rethinking bustling sales events like Black Friday and the 10 days before Christmas, Mr. Gennette said. He added that this year’s new curbside pickup “is going to be a big secret weapon for us this holiday season,” and especially huge with shoppers who aren’t comfortable entering stores. Its performance will be crucial: Macy’s said Wednesday that sales for the first half of this year were $6.6 billion, compared with $11 billion last year. “We’re not going to see any of these crazy blowout sales; we’re not going to see a typical Black Friday — we’ve already seen the cancellation of Thanksgiving Day shopping,” said Stacey Widlitz, president of SW Retail Advisors, an independent research firm. “The stores cannot safely handle these.” Nordstrom has been preparing for more pressure on its e-commerce business this holiday season and “doing a lot of scenario planning about what it’s going to take to make sure that we can fulfill the demand if it’s going to happen disproportionately in online channels,” Peter Nordstrom, president and chief brand officer of the company, said in July. “The wild card is going to be the traffic we get through physical stores, given the sensibility of customers around Covid,” he said. “And no one’s got a crystal ball on that.” Far more shopping is expected to take place online or through pickups at stores. That is safer for consumers, but means that retailers will lose out on the extra purchases people make once they’re in stores, as well as change the nature of seasonal retail work. And it puts a serious emphasis on smooth delivery. Robert Carter, the chief information officer of FedEx, said in July that the company referred to the surge in e-commerce traffic and volume as “getting sling-shotted into 2023.” “What we’re really preparing for is probably the greatest e-commerce penetration within a holiday season that we’ve ever seen, and probably the largest year-over-year growth in online shopping,” said Michelle Cordeiro Grant, chief executive of Lively, an intimates and loungewear brand that mostly sells online. That shift, and the public anxiety around visiting stores, will probably put additional pressure on department stores — traditionally some of the most festive destinations during the holiday season — which have already seen sales drop significantly this year, leading to several bankruptcies and prompting a wave of store closings and liquidations. Even while many retailers that sell apparel and other discretionary goods have taken a blow this year, they have had time to slash their inventories to avoid steep markdowns, said Simeon Siegel, a retail analyst at BMO Capital Markets. “People hear pandemic and think mass discounts,” he said. “The reality is unlike 2008, retailers and brands clamped down, stopped ordering, and therefore the surprising truth is that inventory seems fairly under control. So come holiday, depending on what the demand looks like, I don’t know that everyone should be expecting fire-sale prices.” Levi’s was quick to adjust to that reality this year. “If you wind up with too much inventory, you have to get rid of it,” Mr. Bergh said. “The only way to get rid of it is mark it down, and that’s just not good for the health of the brand.” On the other hand, more expensive items, like jewelry or higher-end electronics, could see a boost in sales. People who haven’t lost their jobs may use the holidays as an opportunity to buy an extra-special gift for themselves or their family members. “Because some people are not spending on eating out and going to the theater and traveling, they actually have extra money to buy an aspirational product, which helps luxury and higher-end products,” said Marie Driscoll, managing director of luxury and fashion at the research firm Coresight Research. Still, the holiday season is likely to be unforgiving to retailers that lack a sophisticated e-commerce infrastructure. “Those retailers that thought they had time to build new online facilities, build new online experiences, just lost that time,” said Michael Brown, a retail management consultant at the firm Kearney. “It is going to accelerate the number of bankruptcies coming out of this holiday because they won’t be able to deliver and will miss the business opportunity.” Christmas has already forced one retailer, The Paper Store, into bankruptcy. The specialty gifts company, based in Acton, Mass., lost so much revenue from store closings that it did not have enough cash to buy inventory for the holiday season. It decided to file for Chapter 11 protection in July, hoping that the cash infusion from a sale would allow it to buy the Christmas stock it needed. As for Santa, Mr. Arnold, 69, anticipated that at least 20 percent of his group’s members intended to sit out this season — a not insignificant financial decision given that Santa performers, mostly retirees, can earn anywhere from $4,000 to $30,000 for their work. About 30 percent were exploring video conferencing options like JingleRing, which arranges virtual visits with Santa and Mrs. Claus. (There are more than 200 Mrs. Claus performers in the organization.) Santas who do venture into stores plan to wear masks — Mr. Arnold has been sporting one with a holiday theme — and may get creative about interacting with the public. He added that more than half of the group typically worked in malls and big box stores. A firm in Texas created a structure that puts Santa behind a thick acrylic wall and seats children in front of it, then uses specific angles and lighting for photos that make it look as if they are closer together. Another idea being developed, Mr. Arnold said, is telling a story about elves who accidentally trap Santa in a snow globe, allowing Santa to visit with children while being protected by the orb. “We’re all trying to figure out ways to have that spirit out there and to be working,” Mr. Arnold said. “It’s going to be something very different than we’re accustomed to, and we’re all going to be worried about our own personal health.” Contact Sapna Maheshwari at sapna@nytimes.com or Gillian Friedman at gillian.friedman@nytimes.com. Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari Gillian Friedman is a business reporter covering bankruptcy, economics and general business news. More about Gillian Friedman "
nyt://article/d79ed349-20bc-5198-8bb3-afe80f78bd25,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/05/28/business/economy/coronavirus-stimulus-unemployment.html,2020-05-28T22:43:51+0000,article,News,1599,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (2020)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shutdowns (Institutional)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment Insurance', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McConnell, Mitch', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Poverty', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Senate', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House of Representatives', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stimulus (Economic)', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Emergency programs have cushioned the shutdown’s impact on workers and businesses and lifted the economy, but may not outlast the coronavirus crisis. For millions of Americans left out of work by the coronavirus pandemic, government assistance has been a lifeline preventing a plunge into poverty, hunger and financial ruin. This summer, that lifeline could snap. The $1,200 checks sent to most households are long gone, at least for those who needed them most, with little imminent prospect for a second round. The lending program that helped millions of small businesses keep workers on the payroll will wind down if Congress does not extend it. Eviction moratoriums that are keeping people in their homes are expiring in many cities. And the $600 per week in extra unemployment benefits that have allowed tens of millions of laid-off workers to pay rent and buy groceries will expire at the end of July. The latest sign of the economic strain and the government’s role in easing it came Thursday when the Labor Department reported that millions more Americans applied for unemployment benefits last week. More than 40 million have filed for benefits since the crisis began, and some 30 million are receiving them. The multitrillion-dollar patchwork of federal and state programs hasn’t kept bills from piling up or prevented long lines at food banks. But it has mitigated the damage. Now the expiration of those programs represents a cliff they are hurtling toward, for individuals and for the economy. “The CARES Act was massive, but it was a very short-term offset to what is likely to be a long-term problem,” said Aneta Markowska, chief financial economist for the investment bank Jefferies, referring to the legislative centerpiece of the federal rescue. “This economy is clearly going to need more support.” Even the possibility that the programs will be allowed to expire could have economic consequences, Ms. Markowska said, as consumers and businesses gird for the loss of federal assistance. President Trump and other Republicans have played down the need for more spending, saying the solution is for states to reopen businesses and allow companies to bring people back to work. So despite pleas from economists across the political spectrum — including Jerome H. Powell, the Federal Reserve chair — any federal action is likely to be limited. The House voted overwhelmingly Thursday to give businesses more time to use money borrowed under the Paycheck Protection Program, which offers forgivable loans to small businesses that retain or rehire their workers. The bill’s fate in the Senate is uncertain, but a deal seems likely. A bipartisan group of lawmakers has separately proposed expanding a tax credit meant to subsidize wages, and the expanded unemployment benefits program may be extended. But Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, has said that any additional aid package must be far narrower than previous packages. The delivery of aid has been far from seamless. Many applicants waited weeks or months for payments. But the assistance has had an impact on millions of families. “I have people regularly who are calling me just crying because they’ve gotten their payments and they can actually pay rent and pay back some of the things that they were defaulting on,” said Michele Evermore, a senior policy analyst at the National Employment Law Project. When Nakitta Long was laid off on March 30, her first thought was the $900 rent payment due two days later. She was barely getting by on $507 a week as a temporary employee at a North Carolina automotive plant. Now she would be receiving just $223 per week in unemployment benefits — if she could get through to apply, which took weeks. Federal assistance provided a bridge. In April she got a $2,200 stimulus payment — $1,200 for her and $500 for each of her two minor children — which covered rent and her car payment. Then she started collecting the $600 per week in additional unemployment benefits, which means she is earning more than she was at work. “I don’t know where I would be,” Ms. Long said. “If I wasn’t getting the unemployment that I’m getting, and then the $600 boost and the stimulus, we would have been homeless.” Ms. Long, 44, is figuring out what to do when the help runs out. She is scared to return to work with the virus still spreading, and unsure how she will do so if schools and day care centers remain closed. Most available jobs pay less than $15 an hour, which won’t cover her bills. “I’ll have to take whatever’s available, to be honest with you,” she said. “I don’t think I’ll have time to weigh it. Rent’s going to have to be paid. Lights are going to have to be paid.” The Democratic-led House passed a $3 trillion package this month that would extend the extra jobless benefits, send another round of $1,200 checks to households and provide aid to state and local governments, among other provisions. The measure stands no chance of becoming law as written. “I think about a month from now, we’ll take a look at how things are going and be able to make a more intelligent decision than a grab-bag of $3 trillion,” Mr. McConnell, the Senate leader, said Thursday at an event in Kentucky. To some Republican lawmakers, extra unemployment benefits and other assistance made sense when businesses were shut down and the government was discouraging people from leaving home. But as the economy reopens, they say, the benefits could impede the recovery by providing an incentive not to return to work. Many economists feel those fears are overblown. Generous benefits might be a deterrent to work in normal times, they argue, but these are hardly normal times. Even the most optimistic forecasters expect the unemployment rate to be well above 10 percent when the extra benefits expire, meaning there will be far more jobless workers than available jobs. “The idea that — at an unemployment rate drastically higher than at the worst part of the great recession — we’re going to pull back support is just unbelievable,” said Jay Shambaugh, director of the Hamilton Project, an economic policy arm of the Brookings Institution. Research routinely finds that unemployment insurance is one of the most effective parts of the safety net, both in cushioning the effects of job loss on families and in lifting the economy. In economists’ parlance, the program is “well targeted” — it goes to people who need the money and who will spend it. Various studies have found that in the last recession, the system helped prevent 1.4 million foreclosures, saved two million jobs and kept five million people out of poverty. The impact could be greater in this crisis because the program is reaching more people and giving them more money. The government paid $48 billion in benefits in April and has reached $86 billion in May, according to the Treasury Department. Ms. Markowska, of Jefferies, expects government data on Friday to show that personal income actually increased in April thanks to the unemployment benefits, stimulus payments and other programs. That money has flowed through the economy in rent payments, grocery store trips and other spending — not only helping the recipients but also preventing a steeper downturn. “These are paycheck-to-paycheck folks, who are going to spend this money,” said Elizabeth Ananat, a Barnard College economist who has been studying the effects of the pandemic on low-wage workers. “They’re going to spend this money, keeping us from having a rent-payment crisis and from having a malnourished-children crisis. That strikes me as pretty good for the economy over all.” When Julie Glasser was summoned to an online department meeting in late March, she thought she might learn how her company, a vacation-rental start-up in Portland, Ore., was scaling back acquisitions or adapting to the growing pandemic. It took until the end of the meeting for her boss to deliver the real news: Everyone on the call was laid off, immediately. A single mother of two, Ms. Glasser applied for unemployment benefits the same day. She enrolled in health insurance through the Affordable Care Act and signed up for food stamps. Still, there was no way she could cover her costs. “I did the quick math and realized that I could pay my mortgage and maybe get a few groceries and that was it,” she said. A week later, Congress passed the CARES Act. In mid-April, Ms. Glasser received her first unemployment check with the extra money. But she is thinking about what will happen when that money runs out. “It’s a huge relief, and then it’s also this thought bubble up above my head of, ‘How long is this going to last?’” she said. “I definitely would not be able to survive right now on the payment that the state unemployment is making.” The risk for Ms. Glasser and millions of other job seekers is that the pullback in government assistance will lead to a new round of layoffs just as they must try to return to work. All that uncertainty could lead to a pullback in spending even before programs expire. Laura Mocker, an actress in New York City, has been out of work since mid-March, when theaters began canceling performances and the restaurant where she worked as a server shut down. It took her until April 12 — Easter Sunday — to get through to the state unemployment office. Now that she is getting her benefits, Ms. Mocker has been able to pay the rent and other bills accrued during weeks of joblessness. But as the July 31 cliff approaches, she has cut back what little discretionary spending remained as she tries to build up her savings. “It’s pretty simple if you think about it,” she said. “If people don’t have money, they can’t spend it. And the people that do have money won’t spend it because they’re worried.” Emily Cochrane and Jim Tankersley contributed reporting. world nyregion business business world nyregion opinion business magazine An earlier version of this article misstated where Julie Glasser is based. She is in Portland, Ore., not Seattle. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more Ben Casselman writes about economics, with a particular focus on stories involving data. He previously reported for FiveThirtyEight and The Wall Street Journal. More about Ben Casselman "
nyt://article/cd429136-2102-5e58-af41-a41d69df3978,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/09/17/business/dealbook/gop-business-donors.html,2018-09-17T10:05:34+0000,article,News,1644,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Politics and Government', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Klarman, Seth A', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Good Monday. Want this in your inbox every morning? Sign up here. Seth Klarman of the hedge fund Baupost Group was the biggest Republican donor in New England. Now, he’s donating millions to Democrats to help them take back Congress. Such is the rate of his giving that, according to the Center for Responsive Politics, he could end up giving more to Democratic candidates than George Soros does over this election cycle. Les Wexner, chief executive of L Brands and one of the biggest Republican donors in the Midwest, is also withdrawing his support of the party. “I won’t support this nonsense,” the Columbus Dispatch quoted him as saying. President Trump and his policies have alarmed many traditional conservative backers, but many others remain quiet, satisfied with tax cuts and the appointment of conservative judges. Mr. Klarman told Bari Weiss of the NYT’s editorial pages that those points don’t make up for Mr. Trump’s failings: “One of the reasons I’m willing to come out of my shell and talk to you is because I think democracy is at stake. And maybe I’ll be able to convince some other people of that. And get them to support Democrats in 2018.” The Salesforce co-founder and his wife, Lynne, will buy Time magazine from the Meredith Corporation for $190 million. Mr. Benioff follows in the footsteps of other billionaires, including Jeff Bezos, who bought the WaPo; Patrick Soon-Shiong, who acquired the L.A. Times; and Sheldon Adelson, who purchased the Las Vegas Review-Journal. The Benioffs, whose estimated net worth is $6 billion, will provide the news publication with deep pockets and, for now, a promise to maintain Time’s editorial independence. (Mr. Benioff told the NYT: “We are only stewards of a historic and iconic brand.”) Still, the deal highlights the tension of media outlets selling themselves to billionaires. Doing so may provide financial security, but there’s no way to prevent new owners from exerting more editorial control in the future. And if the outlets can’t make money, benefactors could sell them or shut them down. Bonus: Mr. Benioff spoke to the S.F. Chronicle about his philanthropy. American financial titans like the Blackstone Group’s Steve Schwarzman often lobbied presidents to go easy on China. Their hope: winning business in China, from advising on mergers to lending money and selling financial services. But Wall Street’s influence in Washington isn’t helping to ease trade tensions. More from Alexandra Stevenson, Kate Kelly and Keith Bradsher of the NYT: Even as they win tax cuts and regulatory rollbacks from the Trump administration and the Republican-controlled Congress, they appear to be able to do little to stop the trade war. “What’s really surprising is that the connections that used to work, the formula that used to work, just don’t work at this point,” said Marshall W. Meyer, an emeritus professor of management at the Wharton School of Business. Senior finance executives held talks with Chinese officials and bankers over the weekend. But with Wall Street holding less sway in Washington, the trade war (which could escalate this week; more on that below) might mean that such relationships won’t pay off. More trade news: It’s another crunch week for Nafta. European leaders will meet in Salzburg, Austria, this week, and Brexit tops the agenda. And Deutsche Bank could move as much as 450 billion euros, or $525 billion, in assets to Frankfurt from London over Brexit. New American tariffs on China could be coming. President Trump is expected to announce levies of around 10 percent on $200 billion worth of Chinese goods as soon as today. That is less than the 25 percent first suggested in August, a reduction reportedly spurred by objections from businesses and a desire to reduce the impact on American consumers. Chinese officials say they could block exports of crucial components for Western supply chains if the trade war continues. The 70th Primetime Emmy Awards will be broadcast on NBC at 8 p.m. Eastern. A big question: Will HBO, which has dominated the awards for 16 straight years, still win more Emmys than Netflix? SpaceX will announce the name of its first space tourist. The passenger will fly around the moon aboard one of the company’s BFR rockets (which haven’t been built yet). The Tesla C.E.O. famously said that the company would have to endure “production hell” to speed up manufacturing of its Model 3 sedan. Now he says there’s a new source of fire and brimstone. “We’ve gone from production hell to delivery logistics hell,” Mr. Musk wrote in a tweet apologizing to a customer whose car delivery had been indefinitely delayed — despite the fact she could see the vehicle parked at a railroad depot. The Tesla chief said that the delivery problem was “far more tractable” than the production issues, but that the company was “making rapid progress” on solving it. Mr. Musk expects to build twice as many cars in the third quarter as the second — so a delivery fix will have to come quickly. More Tesla news: The automaker plans to take its collision repairs in-house. The e-commerce giant is said to be investigating a series of data leaks and employee bribes as part of a push to stamp out seller scams from its service. More on that from Jon Emont, Laura Stevens and Robert McMillan of the WSJ, citing anonymous sources: In exchange for payments ranging from about $80 to more than $2,000, brokers for Amazon employees in Shenzhen are offering internal sales metrics and reviewers’ email addresses, as well as a service to delete negative reviews and restore banned Amazon accounts, the people said. Amazon is investigating a number of incidents involving employees, including some in the U.S., suspected of accepting these bribes, according to people familiar with the matter. Amazon told the WSJ that it had introduced systems that restrict and audit the kinds of data that employees can access. Sources told the newspaper that the company has also reorganized the roles of key executives in China to try to find the source of the problem. The famed venture capitalist, known for annual reports on internet trends, said on Friday that she and her team were leaving the investment firm. That raises big question about the uncertain prospects of Kleiner, which made its name with investments in Google and Amazon. The departure of Ms. Meeker strips Kleiner of its late-stage investing arm at a time when rivals are piling into that business. (The firm shut down its seed-stage investing arm nearly two years ago.) It has also lost a number of partners in recent years, and is still recovering from a P.R. hit after the Ellen Pao discrimination lawsuit. While Kleiner has hired new high-level partners, it still has a lot to do to convince Silicon Valley that it remains a top-flight V.C. firm. As the federal government prepares for a new fiscal year, one thing is certain: The national debt will grow. The Congressional Budget Office predicts the amount of debt held by the American public will hit $28.7 trillion — 96 percent of G.D.P. — in 10 years. Barron’s latest cover story explains how hard it would be to prevent that growth: Just holding the line at 78% of GDP over the next three decades would require finding massive, immediate savings in the budget — $400 billion over the coming year, rising gradually to $690 billion by 2048, using 2019 dollars. In comparison, America spent $590 billion in fiscal 2017 on defense, and $610 billion on all other discretionary items. (The rest of the $4 trillion in spending went for mandatory programs, such as Social Security and Medicare, and for interest on the debt.) Many Republicans favor extending Trump’s tax cuts, and the president is pushing an expensive infrastructure bill. There’s little reason to think that borrowing won’t increase. Mary Daly, the San Francisco Fed’s head of research, will become its next president. Deals • The battle for the British broadcaster Sky could be resolved behind closed doors. (WSJ) • Wow Air, the low-cost Icelandic airline, plans to raise about $300 million in an I.P.O. (FT) • Japanese companies are buying up more U.S. companies than ever. (FT) • Credit Suisse is nearing the end of its yearslong financial restructuring. (Bloomberg) Politics and policy • Some Republican senators want to postpone a vote on Brett Kavanaugh’s nomination until they review an accusation of sexual assault against him dating from decades ago. (WaPo) • The economy is doing well. But Republicans aren’t enjoying any political benefit. (NYT) • Companies have repatriated only a sliver of the estimated $2.7 trillion of cash they hold overseas. (WSJ) • No, Jamie Dimon isn’t running for president in 2020. (Bloomberg) Tech • Robots could handle 52 percent of current work tasks in seven years — but also create 60 million more jobs than they destroy by 2022. (World Economic Forum) • Silicon Valley firms are still hiring with gusto — especially outside San Francisco. (S.F. Chronicle) • Wall Street investors are using technology to become America’s biggest landlords. (WSJ) Best of the rest • The Les Moonves fiasco shows that America needs to overhaul its corporate governance system. (WSJ) • M.B.A. applications to America’s top business schools are declining. (FT) • Why activism like #NikeBoycott rarely dents sales figures. (WSJ) • Paying clients to manage their money may not be as crazy as it sounds. (FT) Thanks for reading! We’ll see you tomorrow. We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. An earlier version of this article incorrectly stated that the federal deficit could hit $28.7 trillion in ten years. It is the national debt of the United States, not the annual federal budget deficit.  When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://interactive/b049ce78-6d94-5dfc-8b43-2fb76dcdd79a,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2019/10/03/your-money/middle-class-income.html,2019-10-03T09:00:05+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Budgets and Budgeting', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Working Hours', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"
	Most Americans think of themselves asmiddle class. For many, the line betweena stable life and a fragile one is thinning.
 
	Examine the typical American family’s monthly budget, line by line, and a larger story emerges about how the middle class has evolved.
 
	What it means to be middle class hasn’t changed much — there’s a steady job, the ability to comfortably raise a family if you choose to, a home to call your own, an annual vacation. But what it takes to achieve all that has become more challenging.
 
	The costs of housing, health care and education are consuming ever larger shares of household budgets, and have risen faster than incomes. Today’s middle-class families are working longer, managing new kinds of stress and shouldering greater financial risks than previous generations did. They’re also making different kinds of tradeoffs.
 
	Most people believe that they belong somewhere in the middle class, but its boundaries and markers are subject to interpretation.
 
	Based on income alone, about half of all adults in the United States fall in this category, according to a 2018 report from the Pew Research Center, a nonpartisan research group. It defined being middle class as having an annual household income from about two-thirds to double the national median, which translates to roughly $48,000 to $145,000 for a family of three (in 2018 dollars).
 
	Four families, from Sheboygan, Wis., to San Francisco, gave us a glimpse at their monthly budgets. Their stories help illustrate how a middle-class existence has fundamentally shifted over a generation.
 Lauren and Trevor Koch Lauren is in retail sales, and Trevor is a chef. They  are 27 and 28, live in Sheboygan, Wis., are married  and have a son and a daughter, who are 4 and 2. $4,000 Monthly take-home pay (on average, it varies) Major monthly expenses $600 Rent on two-bedroom house Includes groceries, toiletries and supplies for three cats. 800 Groceries and dining out 550 Student loans 482 Transportation They have two cars, but one is paid off. 340 Credit card debt 212 Utilities Other monthly expenses $100 T-Mobile cellphone service Lauren uses an app that rounds up change to put into savings, currently at $400. 63 YMCA family membership 60 Diapers 25 Savings Children are covered by BadgerCare, a state-run program. Lauren and Trevor are uninsured. 0 Health insurance Total monthly expenses $3,232 About $768 less than income. Lauren and Trevor Koch Lauren is in retail sales, and Trevor is a chef. They  are 27 and 28, live in Sheboygan, Wis., are married  and have a son and a daughter, who are 4 and 2. $4,000 Monthly take-home pay (on average, it varies) Major monthly expenses $600 Rent on two-bedroom house Includes groceries, toiletries and supplies for three cats. 800 Groceries and dining out 550 Student loans 482 Transportation They have two cars, but one is paid off. 340 Credit card debt 212 Utilities Other monthly expenses $100 T-Mobile cellphone service Lauren uses an app that rounds up change to put into savings, currently at $400. 63 YMCA family membership 60 Diapers 25 Savings Children are covered by BadgerCare, a state-run program. Lauren and Trevor are uninsured. 0 Health insurance Total monthly expenses $3,232 About $768 less than income. Lauren and Trevor Koch Lauren is in retail sales, and Trevor is a chef. They are 27 and 28, live in Sheboygan, Wis., are married and have a son and a daughter, who are 4 and 2. Monthly take-home pay: $4,000 (on average, it varies) Major monthly expenses Other monthly expenses $600 $100 T-Mobile cellphone service Rent on a two-bedroom house Includes groceries, toiletries and supplies for three cats. 800 63 Groceries and dining out YMCA family membership Lauren uses an app that rounds  up change to put into savings,  currently at $400. 550 60 Student loans Diapers They have two cars, but one is paid off. 482 25 Transportation Savings Children are covered by  BadgerCare, a state-run program.  Lauren and Trevor are uninsured. 340 0 Credit card debt Health insurance 212 Utilities Total monthly expenses: $3,232 About $768 less than income. Lauren and Trevor Koch Lauren is in retail sales, and Trevor is a chef. They are 27 and 28, live in Sheboygan, Wis., are married and have a son and a daughter, who are 4 and 2. $4,000 Monthly take-home pay (on average, it varies) Major monthly expenses $600 Rent on two-bedroom house Includes groceries, toiletries and supplies for three cats. 800 Groceries and dining out 550 Student loans 482 Transportation They have two cars, but one is paid off. 340 Credit card debt 212 Utilities Other monthly expenses $100 T-Mobile cellphone service Lauren uses an app that rounds up change to put into savings, currently at $400. 63 YMCA family membership 60 Diapers 25 Savings 0 Health insurance Children are covered by BadgerCare, a state-run program. Lauren and Trevor are uninsured. Total monthly expenses $3,232 About $768 less than income. 
	For Lauren and Trevor Koch of Sheboygan, making their finances work on one salary was a struggle. Mr. Koch, a chef earning $51,000, often worked 50 hours or more a week. Ms. Koch decided to give up her job as a restaurant server after the couple had the first of their two children. Given the high cost of child care, she felt her time was better spent at home.
 
	Life got trickier when Mr. Koch lost his job as a chef at the end of February. Now he cares for the children in the morning, while Ms. Koch works part time at a shop that sells CBD, or cannabidiol, products. When she gets home at 1 p.m., he leaves for his job as a line cook, where he is paid hourly and works until 11 p.m. Neither of them receives paid time off or health insurance.
 
	“We have such high levels of stress from juggling our schedules,” Ms. Koch said. Collectively, they earn slightly more than before, she said, but it’s unclear if their hours will dwindle during the winter months.
 
	As family incomes have become more volatile, academic experts said, the trend has contributed to greater feelings of financial insecurity. For many people who experience a drop in income, whatever the reason, the declines tend to be greater than in the past, according to an analysis by Jacob Hacker, the director of Yale University’s Institution for Social and Policy Studies.
 Chances of a Sharp Drop in Income 8 % Trend line 6 6.1% 4 RECESSIONS 2 Share of working-age Americans experiencing 50 percent or greater drops in family income over two-year periods. 0 ’70 ’80 ’90 ’00 ’10 ’14 Chances of a Sharp Drop in Income 8 % Trend line 6 6.1% 4 RECESSIONS 2 Share of working-age Americans experiencing 50 percent or greater drops in family income over two-year periods. 0 ’70 ’80 ’90 ’00 ’10 ’14 Chances of a Sharp Drop in Income 10 % 8 6 Trend line 6.1% 4 RECESSIONS 2 Share of working-age Americans experiencing 50 percent or greater drops in family income over two-year periods. 0 ’70 ’80 ’90 ’00 ’10 ’14 
	“The gap between Richie Rich and Joe Citizen is a lot larger than it used to be,” Professor Hacker wrote in “The Great Risk Shift,” “but so too is the gap between Joe Citizen in a good year and Joe Citizen in a bad year.”
 
	That’s just one indicator of the deeper structural problems reshaping the middle class, he said. Employers and government institutions keep shifting responsibility to workers, forcing them to navigate more threats to their financial well-being. Pensions have been largely replaced by 401(k) plans. Comprehensive health coverage has given way to high-deductible plans. Paid family leave is uncommon.
 
	So families make tradeoffs. Even when Mr. Koch had a salaried job with benefits as a chef, he and his wife couldn’t afford to save for retirement. Their biggest expenses were rent, food and debt payments, and they were just scraping by. At $80 a month, their health care premiums seemed reasonable, until they needed a doctor: Both had deductibles of $3,000.
 
	Such a fragile existence is threatened even further when major investments meant to cement a middle-class life — getting a college degree, buying a home — backfire. Mr. and Ms. Koch both have more than $70,000 in loan debt for college educations they never completed, meaning a good chunk of their money is effectively gone every month before they have spent anything at all.
 
	If their finances were stronger, Ms. Koch said, they would seek help handling life’s stresses and complexities. “Therapy is probably the first thing we would add into our lives,” she said.
 Melanie Espinosa and Brett Townsend Melanie is a procurement specialist, and Brett is an internet sales manager at a car dealership. They are 30 and 33, live in Layton, Utah, are engaged and have two daughters, who are 3 and 2. $5,600 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $1,545 Rent on three-bedroom house 1,220 Montessori school tuition 1,000 Two car payments, insurance and gas Melanie worked full time during college. 843 Groceries and dining out 340 Student loans 240 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus a $2,000 family deductible. 167 Utilities Other monthly expenses $320 Miscellaneous 187 Children’s expenses “One of them is  constantly growing out of something,” Melanie said. 73 Doctor co-pays, deductible, prescriptions 65 T-Mobile cellphone service 50 Life insurance About $238 more than income. 28 Netflix and Spotify Total monthly expenses $5,838 Melanie Espinosa and Brett Townsend Melanie is a procurement specialist, and Brett is an internet sales manager at a car dealership. They are 30 and 33, live in Layton, Utah, are engaged and have two daughters, who are 3 and 2. $5,600 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $1,545 Rent on three-bedroom house 1,220 Montessori school tuition 1,000 Two car payments, insurance and gas Melanie worked full time during college. 843 Groceries and dining out 340 Student loans 240 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus a $2,000 family deductible. 167 Utilities Other monthly expenses $320 Miscellaneous 187 Children’s expenses “One of them is  constantly growing out of something,” Melanie said. 73 Doctor co-pays, deductible, prescriptions 65 T-Mobile cellphone service 50 Life insurance 28 About $238 more than income. Netflix and Spotify Total monthly expenses $5,838 Melanie Espinosa and Brett Townsend Melanie is a procurement specialist, and Brett is an internet sales manager at a car dealership. They are 30 and 33, live in Layton, Utah, are engaged and have two daughters, who are 3 and 2. Monthly take-home pay: $5,600 Major monthly expenses Other monthly expenses $1,545 $320 Rent on a three-bedroom townhouse Miscellaneous “One of them is  constantly growing out of something,” Melanie said. 1,220 187 Montessori school tuition Children’s expenses 1,000 73 Two car payments, insurance and gas Doctor co-pays, deductible, prescriptions 843 65 Groceries and dining out T-Mobile cellphone service Melanie worked full time during college. 340 50 Student loans Life insurance 240 28 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Netflix and Spotify Plus a $2,000 family deductible. 167 Utilities About $238 more than income. Total monthly expenses: $5,838 Melanie Espinosa and Brett Townsend Melanie is a procurement specialist, and Brett is an internet sales manager at a car dealership. They are 30 and 33, live in Layton, Utah, are engaged and have two daughters, who are 3 and 2. $5,600 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $1,545 Rent on three-bedroom house 1,220 Montessori school tuition 1,000 Two car payments, insurance and gas Melanie worked full time during college. 843 Groceries and dining out 340 Student loans 240 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus a $2,000 family deductible. 167 Utilities Other monthly expenses $320 Miscellaneous “One of them is constantly growing out of something,” Melanie said. 187 Children’s expenses 73 Doctor co-pays, deductible, prescriptions 65 T-Mobile cellphone service 50 Life insurance About $238 more than income. 28 Netflix and Spotify Total monthly expenses $5,838 
	Melanie Espinosa, 30, and her fiancé, Brett Townsend, 33, of Layton, Utah, have mastered a morning routine: She is up at 6:45 getting ready for work. He rouses and dresses their two toddler daughters about 15 minutes later and gets them a snack. They buckle the girls into their carseats by 8 and head to preschool. They’ll have breakfast there.
 
	Ms. Espinosa, a purchasing specialist at a transit technology company, and Mr. Townsend, an internet sales manager at a car dealership, together earn about $90,000 a year. And yet their income never seems to go as far as they need it to.
 
	Ms. Espinosa said they would like to save for a down payment on a home and for the girls’ college educations. But that isn’t possible right now.
 
	“We are in survival mode,” she said. “We can mostly break even.”
 
	Even with two paychecks, middle-class status has become more elusive. The soaring costs of those three big-ticket items — housing, health care and college — have made it more difficult for some people to achieve certain milestones.
 
	The struggle is not unique to the United States. In April, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development reported that pressures on the middle class around the world have increased since the 1980s. What sets middle-class Americans apart, the study found, is that they are struggling under several burdens — low income growth, rising costs, declining job security — while those in many other countries face just one or two.
 
	Spending patterns have also shifted drastically over the past century. American households spend significantly more of their budgets on housing and less on items like food than they did in previous decades.
 
	Housing accounted for 23 percent of the average household’s total expenditures in 1901, 27 percent in 1950, and nearly 33 percent in 2018, according to data from the United States Consumer Expenditure Survey. Those squarely in the middle of the income distribution spent slightly more, or 34.5 percent. (The data doesn’t account for homes today being larger and having more amenities.)
 Rising Costs Outpace Income Growth 180 % Education costs 160 Real U.S. prices and income, 1995 = 100%				 Housing costs 140 Health care costs 120 Median income 100 ’95 ’00 ’05 ’10 ’15 ’17 Rising Costs Outpace Income Growth 180 % Education costs 160 Real U.S. prices and income, 1995 = 100%				 Housing costs 140 Health care costs 120 Median income 100 ’95 ’00 ’05 ’10 ’15 ’17 Rising Costs Outpace Income Growth 180 % Education costs 160 Real U.S. prices and income, 1995 = 100%				 Housing costs 140 Health care costs 120 Median income 100 ’95 ’00 ’05 ’10 ’15 ’17 
	“Young families with kids are really getting slammed on all sides,” said Jenny Schuetz, a fellow at the Brookings Institution who studies housing policy. “They are more likely to have some student debt, and child care has gotten more expensive. So if you are trying to pay off student debt, pay for child care and rent, it will be tough to save for a down payment.”
 
	Child care is a substantial expense for Ms. Espinosa and Mr. Townsend — and it just swelled. They were paying about $800 a month, a relative bargain because they relied on someone who watched children in her home. But they had to find a replacement quickly when their caregiver stopped working recently. Two spots at a Montessori school were available, but they’re now paying $1,200 for that — nearly as much as their rent.
 
	The girls are thriving, Ms. Espinosa said, but the extra cost will probably push the prospect of owning a home further into the future.
 
	The couple’s only debt is from Ms. Espinosa’s student loans, now just under $16,000, and car payments on their six- and 11-year-old Hondas.
 
	Ms. Espinosa said she had always thought being middle class meant living a humble life, without having to constantly worry about which bills were coming up.
 
	“We have a good income for where we are,” she added. “But for some reason every single month it seems like, ‘Oh, something came up or we didn’t make enough.’ It’s just a constant battle.”
 Amanda Rodriguez and David Allen Amanda managed a health care intervention program at a hospital, and David is a director at a charter school. They are 35 and 34, live in San Francisco, are married and have one infant daughter. $9,675 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $3,535 Rent on a two- bedroom apartment 2,800 Expected to start early next year. Nanny share 850 Groceries and dining out 425 Was $2,900 before the nanny share. Retirement savings (plus $550 pretax) 380 Plus $5,700 in annual deductibles. Health insurance (pretax, not in total) 210 Transportation 100 Utilities Other monthly expenses $500 Clothing, haircuts, happy hour, etc. 400 Baby purchases 300 Yoga and other wellness 225 Camping, weekend trips Includes savings for future travel. 167 Dental, eye care, co-payments 75 Home goods 55 Cricket cellphone service 28 About even with income. Renters’/umbrella insurance Total monthly expenses $9,670 Amanda Rodriguez and David Allen Amanda managed a health care intervention program at a hospital, and David is a director at a charter school. They are 35 and 34, live in San Francisco, are married and have one infant daughter. $9,675 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $3,535 Rent on a two-bedroom apartment Expected to start early next year. 2,800 Nanny share 850 Groceries and dining out Was $2,900 before the nanny share. 425 Retirement savings (plus $550 pretax) 380 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus $5,700 in annual deductibles. 210 Transportation 100 Utilities Other monthly expenses $500 Clothing, haircuts, happy hour, etc. 400 Baby purchases 300 Yoga and other wellness 225 Camping, weekend trips Includes savings for future travel. 167 Dental, eye care, co-payments 75 Home goods 55 Cricket cellphone service 28 Renters’/umbrella insurance About even with income. Total monthly expenses $9,670 Amanda Rodriguez and David Allen Amanda was a program manager of a health care intervention program at a hospital, and David is a director at a charter school. They are 35 and 34, live in San Francisco, are married and have one infant daughter. Monthly take-home pay: $9,675 Major monthly expenses Other monthly expenses $3,535 $500 Clothing, haircuts, happy hour, etc. Rent on a two-bedroom apartment Expected to start early next year. 400 2,800 Baby purchases Nanny share 300 850 Yoga and other wellness Groceries and dining out Was $2,900 before the nanny share. Includes savings for future travel. 225 425 Camping, weekend trips Retirement savings (plus $550 pretax) 167 380 Dental, eye care, co-payments Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus $5,700 in annual deductibles. 75 210 Home goods Transportation 55 100 Cricket mobile phone service Utilities 28 Renters’ and umbrella insurance Total monthly expenses: $9,670 About even with income. Amanda Rodriguez and David Allen Amanda managed a health care intervention program at a hospital, and David is a director at a charter school. They are 35 and 34, live in San Francisco, are married and have one infant daughter. $9,675 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $3,535 Rent on a two- bedroom apartment 2,800 Nanny share Expected to start early next year. 850 Groceries and dining out Was $2,900 before the nanny share. 425 Retirement savings (plus $550 pretax) 380 Health insurance (pretax, not in total) Plus $5,700 in annual deductibles. 210 Transportation 100 Utilities Other monthly expenses $500 Clothing, haircuts, happy hour, etc. 400 Baby purchases 300 Yoga and other wellness 225 Camping, weekend trips Includes savings for future travel. 167 Dental, eye care, co-payments 75 Home goods 55 Cricket cellphone service 28 Renters’/umbrella insurance About even with income. Total monthly expenses $9,670 
	Until a few weeks ago, Amanda Rodriguez and David Allen together earned about $154,000 annually, which would place them on the upper-income tier in many American cities. But in San Francisco, where they live, it’s considered middle class, according to Pew’s calculations.
 
	The couple welcomed a baby girl in May, meaning their income will have to stretch even further: They will likely spend roughly two-thirds of their take-home pay on child care and rent on their two-bedroom apartment. For now, they’re managing on less money.
 
	Ms. Rodriguez, who has been on maternity leave, had planned to return to her job — managing a program that trained medical providers to help victims of violence — in mid-September. But little more than two weeks before her scheduled return, she learned she no longer had a position to return to — federal funding had been slashed, eliminating the program.
 
	So her leave from the work force has effectively been extended — she plans to look for another job in public health in the coming months.
 
	The shape of the American family is in a steady state of flux, but two-earner households are the norm now. In perhaps one of the biggest shifts of the past 50 years, married mothers entered the work force in ever-greater numbers in a wave that peaked in the 1990s before leveling off and retreating slightly. Women, in general, followed a similar pattern.
 
	But for many families, the addition of women’s earnings has simply helped maintain their position or kept household income from dropping, according to an analysis by Heather Boushey, the president and chief executive officer of the nonprofit Washington Center for Equitable Growth.
 
	From 1979 to 2018, middle-income families’ incomes rose 23.1 percent, adjusted for inflation, according to the study. Professional families’ incomes, by contrast, rose 68.3 percent. Over the same 39 years, the average American woman experienced a 21 percent increase in annual working hours, according to Ms. Boushey’s analysis.
 
	Most of the earnings gains among families in the period Ms. Boushey studied can be traced directly to working women. They accounted for three-quarters of the rise in income among middle-class families in that time. Among professional families, women’s earnings were the most important factor, but men’s incomes rose, too.
 
	“Many families would have seen their income drop precipitously over the past few decades if it had not been for women going to work,” Ms. Boushey said.
 Women are working more hours . . . 1,720 Professional 1,460 Middle class 1,330 1,180 Annual hours worked by women 760 Low income 630 1979 2018 . . . and account for most income growth. +$100,000 Other sources Change in household income, 1979 to 2018 +$80,000 Men’s earnings +60,000 +40,000 MORE PAY Women’s earnings +20,000 MORE HOURS 0 Low- income Middle- class Professional –20,000 Women are working more hours . . . 1,720 Professional 1,460 Middle class 1,330 1,180 Annual hours worked by women 760 Low income 630 1979 2018 . . . and account for most income growth. +$100,000 Other sources Change in household income, 1979 to 2018 +$80,000 Men’s earnings +60,000 +40,000 MORE PAY Women’s earnings +20,000 MORE HOURS 0 Low- income Middle- class Professional –20,000 Women are working more hours . . . . . . and account for most income growth. +$100,000 Earnings from other sources 1,720 Professional +$80,000 Change in household income, 1979 to 2018 Men’s earnings 1,460 Middle class +60,000 1,330 1,180 Annual hours worked by women +40,000 MORE PAY Women’s earnings 760 Low income +20,000 630 MORE HOURS MORE HOURS 0 Low income Middle class Professional –20,000 1979 2018 
	And though it’s more common now than it once was in households led by two adults for both to be working, it can introduce new costs and stresses. Ms. Rodriguez wasn’t comfortable with leaving her infant in a big day care, so she and Mr. Allen will most likely pay a little more to share a nanny with another family.
 
	That means they will be forced to set aside significantly less for retirement, eliminate trips to the chiropractor and cut back on weekend jaunts out of town. Saving for a down payment on a home isn’t a priority because they don’t have any aspirations of ever owning in high-cost San Francisco.
 
	“We will rearrange things,” Ms. Rodriguez said. “It’s a very expensive city, and we are actively making a choice to be here.”
 Mike and Lindsey Schluckebier Mike is a college academic adviser, and Lindsey is a K-12 public school curriculum coordinator. They are both 38, live in Iowa City, are married and have a son and a daughter who are 6 and 9. $8,500 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $800 in extra principal payment. $2,060 Mortgage on a three- bedroom house Plus $1,733 in pretax savings. 1,000 Retirement savings 700 Groceries and dining out Was $1,080, before their son entered public school. 360 Afterschool care Health insurance (pretax, not in total) 265 Lindsey’s premiums are paid by her employer. 200 College savings ($100 for each child) 178 Utilities, including internet  Mike rides a bicycle to work. 125 One car Other monthly expenses Includes home improvements and kids’ activities. $2,000 Discretionary 400 Charitable donations To the Women’s Resource and Action Center (University of Iowa) and parent-teacher organizations. Out-of-pocket health care (pretax) 125 12 Tello, pay-as-you-go, mobile phone service 0 Other debt (They paid off their student loans five years ago and use credit cards heavily for rewards, but pay them off each month.) Total monthly expenses $7,047 About $1,453 less than income. Mike and Lindsey Schluckebier Mike is a college academic adviser, and Lindsey is a K-12 public school curriculum coordinator. They are both 38, live in Iowa City, are married and have a son and a daughter who are 6 and 9. $8,500 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $800 in extra principal payment. $2,060 Mortgage on a three- bedroom house Plus $1,733 in pretax savings. 1,000 Retirement savings 700 Groceries and dining out Was $1,080, before their son entered public school. 360 Afterschool care Health insurance (pretax, not in total) 265 Lindsey’s premiums are paid by her employer. 200 College savings ($100 for each child) 178 Utilities, including internet  Mike rides a bicycle to work. 125 One car Other monthly expenses Includes vacations, kids’ activities, summer camps and home improvements. $2,000 Discretionary 400 Charitable donations To the Women’s Resource and Action Center (University of Iowa) and parent-teacher organizations. Out-of-pocket health care (pretax) 125 12 Tello, pay-as-you-go, mobile phone service 0 Other debt (They paid off their student loans five years ago and use credit cards heavily for rewards, but pay them off each month.) Total monthly expenses $7,047 About $1,453 less than income. Mike and Lindsey Schluckebier Mike is a college academic adviser, and Lindsey is a K-12 public school curriculum coordinator. They are both 38, live in Iowa City, are married and have a son and a daughter who are 6 and 9.  Monthly take-home pay: $8,500 Includes home improvements, vacations, kids’ activities and summer camps. Major monthly expenses Other monthly expenses $800 in extra principal payment. $2,000 $2,060 Discretionary Mortgage on a three-bedroom house Plus $1,733 in pretax savings. 400 1,000 To the Women’s Resource and Action Center (University of Iowa) and parent-teacher organizations. Charitable donations Retirement savings 125 700 Out-of-pocket health care (pretax) Groceries and dining out Was $1,080, before their son entered public school. 360 12 Afterschool care Tello, pay-as-you-go, mobile phone service Lindsey’s premiums are paid by her employer. 0 265 Other debt Health insurance (pretax, not in total) (They paid off their student loans five years ago and use credit cards heavily for rewards, but pay them off each month.) 200 College savings ($100 for each child) 178 Utilities, including internet  125 Mike rides a bicycle to work. One car Total monthly expenses: $7,047 About $1,453 less than income. Mike and Lindsey Schluckebier Mike is a college academic adviser, and Lindsey is a K-12 public school curriculum coordinator. They are both 38, live in Iowa City, are married and have a son and a daughter who are 6 and 9.  $8,500 Monthly take-home pay Major monthly expenses $800 in extra principal payment. $2,060 Mortgage on a three- bedroom house Plus $1,733 in pretax savings. 1,000 Retirement savings 700 Groceries and dining out Was $1,080, before their son entered public school. 360 Afterschool care Health insurance (pretax, not in total) 265 Lindsey’s premiums are paid by her employer. 200 College savings ($100 for each child) 178 Utilities, including internet  Mike rides a bicycle to work. 125 One car Other monthly expenses Includes home improvements and kids’ activities. $2,000 Discretionary 400 Charitable donations To the Women’s Resource and Action Center (University of Iowa) and parent-teacher organizations. Out-of-pocket health care (pretax) 125 12 Tello, pay-as-you-go, mobile phone service 0 Other debt (They paid off their student loans five years ago and use credit cards heavily for rewards, but pay them off each month.) Total monthly expenses $7,047 About $1,453 less than income. 
	Mike and Lindsey Schluckebier and their two children, 9 and 6, live comfortably on two salaries in Iowa City. The investments they made to secure a middle-class life — earning three graduate degrees between them, buying a home — have paid off.
 
	“Middle class to me means being able to work and afford the things we need and some of the things you want,” said Mr. Schluckebier, a 38-year-old academic adviser at a university, who recruits students and helps them navigate the curriculum. “And I’d say we are on the upper end of that.”
 
	Families like the Schluckebiers — on the cusp of what could be considered upper middle class or above — have experienced greater income gains than those squarely in the middle. That has allowed their collective net worth to grow far more, even if they feel pinched by rising costs.
 
	“A good proxy for points at which we can be pretty sure people are in a strong financial position is if their income is congealing into wealth,” said Richard Reeves, director of the Future of the Middle Class Initiative at the Brookings Institution and the author of “Dream Hoarders: How the American Upper Middle Class Is Leaving Everyone Else in the Dust.” “It is not what is coming in, but what is staying in.”
 
	There is no magic formula for creating that congealing effect, but achieving it often involves several factors, including a bit of luck and a bit of help.
 Share of all U.S. income Share of all U.S. wealth Grouped by income Upper- middle class Middle class 51% 48% 46% Upper- middle class 40% 35% 34% Top 1% 32% 29% 24% 21% Middle class Top 1% 13% 8% 8% 7% Lowest 20% Lowest 20% 4% 2% 1979 2016 1995 2016 Share of all U.S. income Share of all U.S. wealth Grouped by income Middle class Upper- middle class 51% 48% 46% Upper- middle class 40% 35% 34% Top 1 percent 32% 29% 24% 21% Middle class Top 1 percent 13% 8% Lowest 20 percent 8% 7% Lowest 20 percent 4% 2% 1979 2016 1995 2016 Share of all U.S. income Share of all U.S. wealth Grouped by income Upper- middle class Middle class 51% 48% 46% Upper- middle class 40% 35% 34% Top 1 percent 32% 29% 24% 21% Middle class Top 1 percent 13% 8% 8% Lowest 20 percent 7% Lowest 20 percent 4% 2% 1979 2016 1995 2016 
	A few factors helped shape the Schluckebiers’ circumstances. They made deliberate financial decisions that have worked out well: Both kept the cost of college down by working on campus as resident assistants. They also worked full time during graduate school — Mr. Schluckebier was a residence hall director, so they had free housing — and eventually saved $16,000 for a down payment on a house.
 
	Once they were ready to buy, they didn’t reach for a more spacious house in the parts of town where two-car garages are the norm. They chose a modest, 1,500-square-foot ranch, then dedicated an extra $800 a month to paying off the principal on their mortgage while making healthy contributions to their retirement accounts. That may be easier to do in a relatively low-cost locale with healthy job opportunities like Iowa City than in a big city on one of the coasts.
 
	Timing also helped. They were ready to buy a home in 2008, as prices were trending lower. They also have the good fortune of having what Mr. Schluckebier calls “spectacular” retirement and health benefits at work. His employer contributes 10 percent of his salary to his retirement account.
 
	The couple’s student debt, now paid off, was manageable, in part because their parents contributed to their tuition payments.
 
	But they worry about whether they will be able to contribute enough toward their own children’s college expenses, given what college might cost 10 years from now. More broadly, they are concerned about the state of the country, and how other Americans are faring.
 
	“We have been incredibly lucky,” Mr. Schluckebier said, “which is why I don’t necessarily worry about us as much as I worry about the macro picture across the country.”
 HOW WE CHOSE THE FAMILIES We found the families profiled here through a callout to readers on The Times's website and social media platforms. With more than 350 respondents, we chose households that represented different middle-class incomes, backgrounds and geographies, who were also willing to share detailed budget information. "
nyt://interactive/45439bdc-5282-5522-b67a-61f6e494fdb9,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2020/07/27/magazine/ben-jerry-interview.html,2020-07-27T09:00:02+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporate Social Responsibility', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Ice Cream and Frozen Desserts', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""BEN & JERRY'S HOMEMADE INC"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Presidential Election of 2020', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Lives Matter Movement', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Capitalism (Theory and Philosophy)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Talk “There wasn’t any other business talking about dismantling white supremacy.” 
By David MarchesePhotograph by Mamadi Doumbouya

  It has now become trendy for corporations to take a stance on social-justice issues without fear of hurting the bottom line. In fact, it’s widely seen as a way to do the opposite, and that has a lot to do with groundwork laid by Ben Cohen and Jerry Greenfield, the founders of Ben & Jerry’s Homemade ice cream. The two childhood friends started out making ice cream in 1978, opening their first shop in a remodeled gas station in Burlington, Vt., and turned their business into one known around the world — both for its distinct chunk-filled product as well as for its determination to be a force for good via community involvement, environmentally sustainable practices and the creation of a still-lucrative alternative to the simple pursuit of profit. Though Cohen and Greenfield, both 69, long ago ceded control of the company, they’re still involved in promoting its social-justice campaigns, and their spirit is still found in the company’s progressive practices. (Maybe you saw its corporate statement, released in response to George Floyd’s killing, about dismantling white supremacy.) ‘‘Using ice cream to talk about difficult issues creates an opening,’’ Cohen said. ‘‘You can talk in a way that’s tinged with lightness, which makes it much more palatable.’’ Which is something he and Greenfield know a little bit about. If you look at the history of Ben & Jerry’s, you always had noble goals: You wanted to keep control of the company. You wanted the highest-paid employee to never make more than five times that of the lowest-paid employee. You didn’t want to keep growing for the sake of growth. And yet you had to sell the company, that pay ratio wasn’t maintained and the company just kept growing.11 Ben & Jerry’s had reported sales of $681.5 million in 2019. In 2000, when the company was sold to Unilever, its sales were a reported $237 million. What does that show us about how capitalism can subsume good intentions? Cohen: The end result of capitalism is not unlike a Monopoly game. One guy gets all the bucks, and everybody else loses. What we have in America is a democracy that’s run for the benefit of corporations. That’s a disaster. We’re looking at it, we’re living it and it continues to get worse. Does that answer your question? It didn’t really, but I can’t tell if you went off on a tangent or were being evasive. Cohen: I’m not trying to evade. I was going off on a tangent. There’s no doubt that Ben & Jerry’s has influenced capitalism more than capitalism influenced Ben & Jerry’s. Ben & Jerry’s and a few others — The Body Shop, Patagonia — were pioneers in creating a model of business that saw making profits to be coequal with its purpose of improving society beyond just providing jobs. There’s a bunch of corporations genuinely starting to see the light. Granted, capitalism subsumed the concept of socially responsible business. Every major corporation now has a corporate social responsibility officer. The biggest problem in terms of Ben & Jerry’s being subsumed is that if you see the major problem in our society as being the continuing concentration of wealth into fewer hands, that we ended up getting owned by a huge multinational22 Ben & Jerry’s is a wholly owned subsidiary but maintains an independent board. works against what I believe is needed to create a more equitable society. But with that exception, the company continues to do as much as it can to heal the wounds of capitalism. Is there anything that makes you squeamish about Ben & Jerry’s making ice cream flavors called Pecan Resist, which is a reference to resisting certain Trump administration’s policies, or Justice ReMix’d, whose name   alludes to the company’s work in criminal-justice reform? Coming up with politically driven flavor names was not something you did much of when you were running things. Isn’t there something glib about it? Greenfield: It doesn’t make me squeamish if the initiative is genuine. If you talk about Justice ReMix’d, the flavor is there to call attention to the issue of criminal-justice reform, and the activities the company has done — one of them was closing down the Workhouse jail in St. Louis. Cohen: We won!33 Ben & Jerry’s teamed up with St. Louis groups in a successful lawsuit to ban the city’s jails from holding inmates solely because they were unable to post bail. On July 17, the St. Louis Board of Aldermen passed a bill to close the Workhouse jail by year’s end. Greenfield: Right, and another was changing the budget in the school system in Miami and hiring counselors instead of police officers. Cohen: We half won!44 The Miami-Dade County school board did hire more counselors but did not reduce the number of police officers in schools. Greenfield: When those flavors are part of real action that the company is undertaking in partnership with nonprofits, I think it’s great to be tying ice cream into social action. Cohen: You know, the company once came out with a flavor called American Pie.55 It was an apple-pie-flavored ice cream. The packaging showed the pie chart of the federal discretionary budget; it was advocating shifting money out of nuclear weapons into children’s services. Greenfield: A pie chart of the federal discretionary budget is a well-known marketing technique for selling ice cream. I’m salivating just thinking about it. On the subject of flavors — Greenfield: I want to interrupt you for a second. Ben and I are always talking about the mission of the company, and people always want to talk about flavors. People are fascinated by flavors. So am I. What would go in a Joe Biden flavor, and what would go in a Donald Trump flavor? Cohen: A Trump flavor, it’s not palatable. You can’t make Trump into ice cream. You could make him into coal. What about Biden? Cohen: It’s an interesting question. [Sighs.] You know, it’d be better than nothing. Ben, I know you’re a Bernie Sanders guy,66 Cohen was a co-chair of fellow Vermonter Bernie Sanders’s 2020 presidential campaign. Through his private brand Ben’s Best, Cohen has also made two Sanders-inspired ice cream flavors: Bernie’s Yearning in 2016 and Bernie’s Back this year. but what would it take to get you excited about Biden? As a presidential candidate, not as a flavor of ice cream. Cohen: If he would essentially adopt Bernie’s platform. They talk about the Hillary wing of the party and the Bernie wing of the party. Biden epitomizes the Hillary wing, the wing in which he went to a group of  big-money donors and said: “Elect me. I guarantee nothing will change for you.”77 This is a reference to a speech Biden gave at a ritzy New York City fund-raiser in 2019, in which he said: “No one’s standard of living will change. Nothing would fundamentally change.” We could go back to a pre-Trump country, and we would still need all the change represented by Bernie’s platform. Going back to a pre-Trump country will not address systemic problems that our country faces in terms of fairness, equality, and justice. Now I have an ice cream etiquette question. You know how some people dig the chunks out of Ben & Jerry’s? Cohen: Marriages have split because of that. What’s your position? I think it’s selfish. Cohen: If your partner also likes the chunks, it’s inconsiderate. But if it’s yourself who’s doing it, it’s fine. Greenfield: The term for this is “mining.” Mining for chunks. I’ve never been tempted to do it. I don’t see the point. Although recently Ben & Jerry’s started selling chocolate-chip-cookie-dough pellets separately from ice cream for those people who wanted to dig them out. Cohen: Who wanted to mainline. Greenfield: Mainline? No, Ben. And why did Ben & Jerry’s never sell gallons? Would they have been prohibitively expensive? Cohen: Yes, the expense. The other reason is that as ice cream hangs out in your modern self-defrosting freezer, it degrades. If it’s in a small package, you finish it quicker, and there’s less chance of it degrading in quality. Greenfield: There’s an opposing theory, though, Ben. It’s that the more ice cream people have in their freezer, the more they’ll actually eat. But that only matters if one were concerned about selling more ice cream, which Ben and I are not anymore. Now, there was a time when Ben and I were absolutely trying to sell ice cream. We were out there on the road hawking it. Cohen: It was like an adventure in the wilderness. Greenfield: We have incredible memories of going to restaurants that were going out of business, and some auction company was selling off their old stuff, and we were bidding on things and loading them up in a truck and driving them home. That’s what I remember more fondly than any business things. Is it right that before you guys started in ice cream, you had some goofy idea for a business involving delivering bagels and lox and The New York Times to people? Greenfield: Come on, man. What’s so goofy about that? Cohen: We were calling that business U.B.S., United Bagel Service. But we wanted to locate our business in a rural college town, because that’s the kind of place where Jerry and I wanted to live.88 Cohen and Greenfield were raised in suburban Long Island and met each other in junior high school. Eventually we realized that there weren’t that many people in rural college towns looking to have the Sunday New York Times and bagels, cream cheese and lox delivered to their door. Maybe I’m too uptight about money, but it’s surprising to me that you’ve managed to stay such good friends after being in business together all these years. Money was never an issue? Greenfield: I don’t think we ever had a disagreement about money. The most famous disagreement was about the size of the chunks in the ice cream. Ben is well known for his inability to smell and therefore his inability to taste. So he was always focused on texture in ice cream. He liked big chunks of cookies and candies. But I was the one making the ice cream, and it’s hard to put big chunks in ice cream, which is why no other ice cream companies do it. I was advocating that a larger number of smaller chunks be well distributed throughout the ice cream. Ben was insisting on bigger chunks. Ben was right. Cohen: I was eating Coffee Toffee Bar Crunch last night and was tunneling around for the big chunks. I believe the term is mining. Greenfield: Tunneling works also. Cohen: Tunneling works great. But, you know, it’s disappointing when you keep tunneling around and you never run into what you’re aiming for. I still think we ought to put a golden cone inside some pint — do the Willy Wonka golden-ticket thing. I can’t understand how we have yet to do that. Greenfield: Ben, in case you hadn’t figured this out, did all the marketing for the company.  Jerry, there has been a proliferation of other premium and ultra-premium99 Premium ice cream is defined by marketers as consisting of 12 to 14 percent butterfat. Ultra-premium consists of 17 to 20 percent. ice cream brands. There’s Ample Hills. There’s Van Leeuwen. There’s Jeni’s Splendid. And a result is that it’s not uncommon to go into a grocery store and see a $9 pint of ice cream. What’s your perspective on that change in the market? Greenfield: It’s kind of crazy for me to say this, but it seems like a lot of money to pay for a pint of ice cream. Ben and I remember when Ben & Jerry’s pints of ice cream first started going over $2 a pint. We were terrified that nobody was going to buy it. Cohen: There’s a bunch of artisanal guys now, and one of the great things about the ice cream business, which is one of the reasons we got into it, is that there’s a very low barrier to entry. The equipment to make very high quality ice cream on a small scale is not very expensive. Do either of you have non-Ben & Jerry’s ice creams in your freezers? Cohen: No. Greenfield: No. But if any of those other ice cream companies wanted to give me some ice cream, I would be all for it. To get back to a couple of bigger ideas — Greenfield: The other thing I want to mention is that Ben and I are sometimes asked, “Why has Ben & Jerry’s been successful?” We usually say it’s because of three things: really high quality ice cream, great ingredients, very unusual flavors – and also the activist social mission of the company. Some other company could start making ice cream with big chunks the same way Ben & Jerry’s does, but Ben & Jerry’s having this activist, outspoken social mission — other companies can’t copy that. It’s not something you can just say. It has to be who the people are. How close of a connection do you feel to Ben & Jerry’s today? Greenfield: You may know that Ben and I both still work at the company. But as we always tell people, we’re not involved in management or operations. I’m proud of the mission of the company and how it’s being actualized. Sometimes people ask me, “How do you feel seeing your name on ice cream containers in stores everywhere?” I don’t feel anything from that. Cohen: It’s like the company is a child who has moved out of the house and is now on their own. You hope that your child will have the values that you tried to instill. I’m amazed to see that the values are there. The regret I have is that the overwhelming problem in the world is the increasing concentration of wealth in the hands of fewer entities, and having Ben & Jerry’s owned by one of those is, to me, unfortunate. When the company was sold, something I resisted, there were people trying to comfort me by saying, “Now Ben & Jerry’s can influence Unilever.” I thought that was a bunch of [expletive]. But I think that it has had a positive influence on Unilever. I certainly wouldn’t say Unilever is values-led, but it is starting to integrate more social benefits into how it does business.1010 For example, in June, Unilever announced that it was pulling brand ads from Facebook, Twitter and Instagram, saying, ‘‘Continuing to advertise on these platforms at this time would not add value to people and society.’’ That’s good. If you two are not in operations and not in management, what exactly do you do? Are you mascots? Cohen: We have no responsibilities and no authority, but no, I don’t regard myself as a mascot. I regard myself as a person who is focused on justice.1111 Cohen is starting a cannabis brand, through which he intends to work with and invest in people and communities that have been impacted by the war on drugs and mass incarceration. Greenfield is a trustee of the Ben & Jerry’s Foundation, the company’s charitable arm When Ben & Jerry’s does something that aligns with my belief in justice, I do everything I can to support that. Greenfield: When the company introduced Justice ReMix’d, Ben and I were involved in that. Last year, the company introduced a flavor at a United Nations forum in Geneva that was called Cone Together that was related to refugee rights. Ben and I were involved in that, too. We also go to the franchise meeting1212 There are more than 600 Ben & Jerry’s scoop shops worldwide. every year and hang out with the shop owners and talk about our hopes for the company. Even though we don’t really influence things, people like to hear what we’re thinking. So, David, can I ask you a question? Of course. Greenfield: You’ve done a lot of reading about Ben & Jerry’s. Is this what you were expecting? Where have we let you down? You haven’t let me down. But I wonder if there’s more you could be saying about what Ben & Jerry’s being bought by Unilever ultimately meant for the values you originally tried to instill in the company. Greenfield: Well, so, Ben & Jerry’s has been part of Unilever for about 20 years. For the first number of years, I think Unilever did not appreciate the mission of Ben & Jerry’s, and its energy went into integrating Ben & Jerry’s into the Unilever system. During that time, the social mission of the company suffered. The company as a brand also suffered. About ten years ago, Unilever named a new chief executive for Ben & Jerry’s, Jostein Solheim,1313Solheim continued as chief executive until 2018, when he was succeeded by Matthew McCarthy. who told us that his assignment was to re-radicalize Ben & Jerry’s. And during that time, Ben & Jerry’s rediscovered its soul. Ben & Jerry’s publicly supported Occupy Wall Street. Ben & Jerry’s publicly supported Black Lives Matter before most other companies. Now within Unilever, there’s an incredible amount of respect for what Ben & Jerry’s has done. I mean, this last statement by Ben & Jerry’s after the George Floyd killing: There wasn’t any other business talking about dismantling white supremacy. How skeptical, though, should we be of the intentions behind statements like that? So many socially progressive statements that companies are making these days obviously also double as marketing. Cohen: The deal about Ben & Jerry’s is that when your company is acting on its values and those values resonate with your consumers’ values, it’s an incredibly deep connection based on justice, fairness, equality — the stuff that we thought the country is supposed to be about when they taught us in elementary school. The other thing is that businesses are the most powerful force in our society, and things have gotten to such a state with Trumpism that businesses — which had always said, “We’re not going to take political stands” — have to make their voice heard because there’s no other powerful actor doing it. Money talks. Do you ever meet people who are surprised that Ben and Jerry are real guys? And that you’re them? And that you’re still alive? Cohen: Maybe two years after we started, when the business was this little homemade ice cream parlor in an old gas station in Burlington, Jerry and I were hanging around outside the store, and a boy and his father were walking in. The little boy said, “Daddy, is there really a Ben and a Jerry?” And the father said, “Maybe many, many years ago.” Greenfield: I’ve had people ask me, “Are you the original Jerry?” I say: “There used to be another Jerry. I got hired to be the next one.” My wife gets a kick out of that. After all this time in and around the ice cream business, what have you learned about what ice cream means to Americans? Cohen: It’s about happiness. Ice cream is present at most any celebration, birthday, wedding, bar mitzvah. And Americans stock ice cream in their freezers as a staple. That is very unusual compared with other countries. Around the world, a huge amount of ice cream is sold in single-unit servings.  Do you guys ever get sick of ice cream? I worked in an ice cream shop one summer when I was a teenager, and it put me off ice cream for a solid year. Greenfield: You were in the industry! You’ve been holding back on us! But no, I never had that. I tended to eat ice cream more recreationally than Ben. Ben was in charge of quality control, which meant eating a lot of ice cream. Once we started packaging ice cream into pints, Ben felt that he had to eat all the way to the bottom. Any ice cream flavor tastes good for the first couple of spoonfuls. The real test is how it tastes when you get down to the bottom. Cohen: Yeah, I was sick of it. But now that I’m no longer eating it because my job requires me to, I don’t get sick of it. I eat a reasonable amount. Every once in a while I go overboard. Greenfield: We both still eat a lot of ice cream. This interview has been edited and condensed for clarity from three conversations.   "
nyt://article/ae8b48c0-6c1c-560b-9130-8a90bf265b7e,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/09/08/style/guitar-sales-fender-gibson.html,2020-09-08T13:09:54+0000,article,News,2247,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Music', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Fender Musical Instruments Corp', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Gibson Guitar Corp', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'your-feed-selfcare', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Painted by some as a boomer relic just years ago, the guitar is seeing a revival that may just extend past the stress-purchase quarantine bounce. The British guitar player Eric Clapton on stage in Boston, Mass. in 1974.Credit...Fin Costello/Redferns, via Getty Images Not so long ago, things didn’t look so great for the guitar, that global symbol of youthful freedom and rebellion for 70 years running. With hip-hop and Beyoncé-style spectacle pop supposedly owning the hearts and wallets of millennials and Generation Z — and so many 20th-century guitar deities either dead (Jimi Hendrix, Kurt Cobain) or soloing into their 70s (Eric Clapton, Jimmy Page) — electric guitar sales had skidded by about one-third in the decade since 2007, according to Music Trades, a research organization that tracks industry data. Gibson guitars, whose celebrated Les Paul line had helped put the Led in Zeppelin, was sliding toward bankruptcy. All of this was enough for The Washington Post to declare the “slow, secret death of the six-string electric” in 2017. That same year, even Mr. Clapton himself, known simply as “God” to devotees more than half a century ago, sounded ready to spread the ashes. “Maybe,” he mused at a 2017 news conference for the documentary “Eric Clapton: A Life in 12 Bars,” “the guitar is over.” Hold the obituaries. A half-year into a pandemic that has threatened to sink entire industries, people are turning to the guitar as a quarantine companion and psychological salve, spurring a surge in sales for some of the most storied companies (Fender, Gibson, Martin, Taylor) that has shocked even industry veterans. “I would never have predicted that we would be looking at having a record year,” said Andy Mooney, the chief executive of Fender Musical Instruments Corporation, the Los Angeles-based guitar giant that has equipped Rock & Roll Hall of Famers since Buddy Holly strapped on a 1954 sunburst Fender Stratocaster back in the tail-fin 1950s. “We’ve broken so many records,” Mr. Mooney said. “It will be the biggest year of sales volume in Fender history, record days of double-digit growth, e-commerce sales and beginner gear sales. I never would have thought we would be where we are today if you asked me back in March.” It’s not just graying baby boomer men looking to live out one last Peter Frampton fantasy. Young adults and teenagers, many of them female, are helping to power this guitar revival, manufacturers and retailers said, putting their own generational stamp on the instrument that rocked their parents’ generation while also discovering the powers of six-string therapy. It all started with a collective breaking point, according to Jensen Trani, a guitar instructor in Los Angeles whose thousands of instructional videos on YouTube, he estimated, have attracted some 75 million views over the past 14 years. “There was this point with my students where I could tell that numbing out on Netflix and Instagram and Facebook was just not working anymore,” Mr. Trani, 38, said. “People could no longer go to their usual coping mechanisms. They were saying, ‘How do I want to spend my day?’” For many, apparently, the answer was “strumming.” Shortly after stay-at-home orders were announced in the spring, Mr. Trani saw a surge of traffic for his videos, he said, and quickly tripled his number of private students taking lessons remotely. Popular instructional sites like JustinGuitar.com and GuitarTricks saw similar spikes during the spring. And most of the new students were not looking to rekindle memories of Foghat live in 1976. Most of them probably did not know who Foghat was, given that the majority of Mr. Trani’s new students were, as he put it, female-presenting people in their late 20s or early 30s. The biggest names in the business of online guitar instruction were seeing a similar pattern. Fender said that its guitar-instruction app, Fender Play, which features Mr. Trani as an instructor, saw its user base shoot to 930,000 from 150,000 between late March and late June, with a considerable assist from a three-month promotional giveaway. Nearly 20 percent of the newcomers were under 24, and 70 percent were under 45, the company reported. Female users accounted for 45 percent of the new wave, compared with 30 percent before the pandemic. In a narrow sense, the surge made sense. Prospective players who had never quite found the time to take up an instrument suddenly had little excuse not to. As James Curleigh, the chief executive of Gibson Brands, put it: “In a world of digital acceleration, time is always your enemy. All of a sudden time became your friend.” But there was more to it, Mr. Trani said. Many newcomers to the instrument seemed to be looking for an oasis of calm in a turbulent world. “There is,” he said, “this sense of learning how to sit with yourself.” That was the case for one of his new students, Kayla Lucido, 31, of San Jose, Calif., who decided to make good on her longstanding ambitions to learn guitar in March, despite a frenzied schedule juggling remote work as a project coordination manager at a technology company and parenting duties for her 17-month-old son. “It’s been quite healing for me, learning something new, and being able to drown everything else out,” said Ms. Lucido, who has been plucking out songs like “Beautiful Stranger” by Halsey or “Bluebird” by Miranda Lambert, even for 10 minutes each day. “You just really have to focus on your hand placement, the chords you’re playing, then pairing that with the strumming,” she added. “If I’m working out, my mind still wanders, but when I’m playing guitar, I just get lost in it. It’s like meditation.” No wonder. Learning guitar, or piano, or oboe or bassoon, benefits the brain on profound levels, according to Daniel Levitin, a neuroscientist, musician and the author of the 2006 New York Times best seller “This Is Your Brain on Music.” (Many psychological studies have shown the therapeutic benefits of playing an instrument, as well.) The process, Dr. Levitin wrote in an email, is “neuroprotective” in that it “requires that you grow new neural pathways — something you can do at literally any age.” He added that “using your brain for something that is challenging, but not impossible, tends to be rewarding, and hence comforting.” Learning the guitar, he wrote, is also a forward-looking process, kindling hope and optimism, which helps regulate stable mood chemicals like serotonin and dopamine. And “there is a very real sense of mastery and accomplishment,” Dr. Levitin said. “I’m working on a Chopin piece on the piano right now — the Prelude in E minor — and I keep reminding myself I’m putting my fingers in the same configurations that Chopin did. For a few minutes, I can be Chopin.” “The same,” he added, “holds true for Clapton when I play guitar.” “I’ve been in the instrument retail business for 25-plus years and I’ve never seen anything like it,” Brendan Murphy, a senior salesman at Sweetwater, an online retailer of guitars and other instruments, wrote in an email in July. “It feels like every day is black Friday.” Other online retailers were reporting the same thing in the spring and into summer. Despite having to close 293 of its 296 giant retail showrooms in March and April because of the coronavirus, Guitar Center was soon seeing triple-digit sales growth for most top guitar brands on the website, according to Michael Doyle, the company’s senior vice president of guitar merchandising. Guitars are hardly the only consumer item to experience a quarantine bounce, of course. Sales have spiked for many items since lockdowns began — bicycles, baking yeast, board games, yoga mats, beans and even Everclear, the 190-proof spirit. But a guitar is not a bag of lentils. A new guitar usually requires an investment of several hundred dollars, if not several thousand, and new players and virtuosos alike often live with their trusty ax for years, bonding with it as a statement of personal taste and style. It’s what economists would call a “discretionary” purchase, the sort of nonessential consumer item that is usually the last thing one might buy when the economy is plunging and unemployment is skyrocketing. Throw in monthslong factory closures for manufacturers and a virtual disappearance of brick-and-mortar retailers, and the situation seemed nearly apocalyptic. “I figured that this is one of those business-falls-off a-cliff situations,” said Chris Martin, the chief executive of C.F. Martin & Co., the 187-year-old manufacturer of acoustic guitars that has supplied contemporary stars like John Mayer and Ed Sheeran, as well as legends like Bob Dylan, Joni Mitchell and some guy named Elvis, over decades. “We’ll pick up the pieces and put the company back together whenever.” But after a “terrible” March, with revenues 40 percent below normal, business roared back. “It’s crazy,” said Mr. Martin, the sixth-generation Martin to run the company. “It’s unbelievable the demand there is right now for acoustic guitars. I’ve been through guitar booms before, but this one caught me completely by surprise.” Taylor Guitars, which equips Taylor Swift, Justin Bieber and Ben Harper, among others, with guitars fashioned from fine tonewoods (including, in a recent eco-minded move, shamel ash trees salvaged from Los Angeles freeways), has seen a similar famine-to-feast rebound. “We just had the biggest June, in terms of orders received, that we’ve ever had since we’ve been in business,” said Kurt Listug, who founded the company with Bob Taylor in 1974. June and July alone, he added, accounted for half the orders that the company had projected, pre-pandemic, for all of 2020. “Guitars hit the stores now, they unbox them, and they’re gone,” Mr. Listug said. Electric guitars may not have exactly the same plunk-through-a-few-Neil-Young-tunes-on-the-bed appeal, but sales have been strong on that front for the electric-guitar giants Fender and Gibson, too (both companies also make acoustic guitars). The pandemic hit at a sensitive time for Gibson. The company had declared bankruptcy in 2018, after previous management had made an aggressive push to expand into home and commercial audio electronics, and attempted to jetpack this company founded in 1894 into the future with 21st-century reinterpretations of classic Gibson stadium shakers — some featuring built-in electronic “robot” tuners. A new management team headed by Mr. Curleigh, the former president of Levi’s Brand, ditched the onboard robotics, rebooted the brand’s budget-priced Epiphone line and released new Original and Modern collections featuring fresh interpretations of classic Gibsons from the 1950s and 1960s that today fetch five- and six-figure prices on the vintage market. The company was earning rave reviews for its new product lines and improved quality control before factories closed in April. “When we had no production,” Mr. Curleigh said, “we had no sales, let’s face it.” To Mr. Curleigh, the guitar rebound was a signifier of deeper psychological currents circulating among a traumatized population. “It’s Maslow’s hierarchy of needs,” he said, citing a theory of human motivation proposed by the psychologist Abraham Maslow in the 1940s. Maslow’s five-tier pyramid of needs proposed that people first must satisfy fundamental requirements like sustenance and personal security before they can scale toward the higher goals of creative fulfillment. “That’s what the world went through,” Mr. Curleigh said. “First we were figuring out the basic essentials — where to buy toilet paper, making sure you were isolated in quarantine. Then the psychological reset hit. People said, ‘Well, I can still self-actualize, I can still self-fulfill.’” It may be easy to guess that a lot of those glossy new guitars may end up in the closet as soon as people once again whisk off their masks and pack into crowded restaurants, bars, ballparks and movie theaters. Indeed, interest in online tutorials has already cooled a bit from the peaks in the spring, according to several sites. And the overall retail picture for the industry remains rather fuzzy in the short-term: Despite the sales bounce for marquee American companies, overall sales of all fretted instruments — including banjos, ukuleles and bass guitars — dipped 2.4 percent in the second quarter compared with last year, according to Music Trades. That dip also reflects a precipitous drop in imports — nearly 23 percent for acoustics and 44 percent for electrics — over the same period, in large part because of factory closures, severed supply lines and bottlenecks in shipping ports, particularly in Asia, said Paul Majeski, the publisher of Music Trades.  Even so, electric guitar sales had rebounded to about 1.25 million instruments by the end of last year after bottoming out around one million in 2015. And in dollar terms, guitar sales have grown steadily since the Great Recession of 2009, Music Trades reports. Last year, they topped $8 billion. And that’s not accounting for the market for secondhand guitars on eBay, Craigslist and Etsy, and vintage sellers like Reverb, which dwarfs retail sales at music shops, and indicates that “the public’s interest in fretted instruments has never been greater,” Mr. Majeski said. (It’s worth pointing out that sales of new guitars are inherently dampened by the very durability of the product. A quality electric guitar can last 50 years or more with minimal care, and the classics often improve with age, many players believe. Smartphones these aren’t.) Sure, there’s still the issue of the idols. The calendar is not suddenly running in reverse for Jeff Beck or Pete Townshend. Maybe the issue isn’t too few guitar heroes, but too many of them. As any 30-minute foray through cover-song videos on YouTube will attest, there are approximately 1,000,000,007 much-better-than-average guitarists out there, many of whom are in their teens or early 20s. A great many of them are tearing through Hendrix, Eddie Van Halen or Jimmy Page licks. And a great many of them positively shred. In other words, you could argue that the guitar god is dead. You could also argue that the guitar gods did their job. "
nyt://article/3782c6bc-c892-510b-94f5-84b20138522e,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/10/08/style/superyachts-billionaires.html,2019-10-08T14:59:34+0000,article,News,1867,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Sailboats and Sailing', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Design', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Luxury Goods and Services', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bannenberg & Rowell', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'High Net Worth Individuals', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Billionaires won’t stop buying superyachts. You can even thank Donald Trump. “Joy,” at sea. Credit...Bannenberg and Rowell LONDON — The end of summer is a nervous time for superyacht designers, and not because they fear that the owners of their latest creations may be disappointed with the first outings in the Mediterranean. The worry is about the designers’ next vessels, because this is the time of year when clients whose boats are still in production come back from holidays with a wish list of new features — usually, based on what they saw on their friends’ yachts or at the Monaco Yacht Show, which ended Sept. 28. “Right now we are quite far down the line in completing a big yacht in northern Europe for one client who has just spent time on a friend’s boat, which is not necessarily helpful,” said Dickie Bannenberg, the head of one of the world’s best-known superyacht design houses, Bannenberg & Rowell. He was in his London studio, an airy two-story space lined with sleek models of its creations. “The delivery date is in the first half of next year, and that is sooner than it might seem,” Mr. Bannenberg said. “It’s fine when it’s superficial — let’s say they liked the plates or towels on their friend’s yacht — but if you’re not careful it can verge on, ‘Oh, my friend’s gym was like this, can we have something similar?’ or, ‘I would really like to add a submersible vessel.’” The complex production schedules of these vessels mean shipyards will resist significant changes. “Re-engineering or rebuilding is going to cost a lot of money,” Mr. Bannenberg, 58, said.  That end-of-summer tension illustrates some inescapable truths about life dealing in the world’s most expensive consumer products and ultimate discretionary purchases. One vessel alone can cost $5 million to $500 million, with annual operating costs of perhaps 10 percent of that. This is an industry in which problems include protecting the owner’s Picasso collection from salt air, clumsy crew members and faulty sprinklers.  Or maybe you have to decide whether to build one 330-foot vessel (100 meters) or join a trend of the last few years by opting for a “smaller” 200-foot yacht with a 165-foot support vessel to carry a submarine, helicopter, speedboats and other toys. Aviva, a 320-foot yacht launched in 2017, was the first in the world to include a full-size indoor paddle tennis court. William Mathieson, the editorial and intelligence director of the Superyacht Group, the leading analyst of the industry, said there are about 3,500 active vessels in the world that meet the loose definition of a superyacht by measuring more than 100 feet; just 55 top 330 feet.  Mr. Bannenberg’s father, Jon Bannenberg, who died in 2002, used to say that nobody in the world needs a superyacht, so it was the designer’s task to make them want one. Jon, a charismatic Australian, is widely credited with inventing the profession of superyacht designer. In the 1960s, he brought together interior and exterior design skills with an understanding of marine engineering to replace what had previously been relatively simple structures sitting on top of hulls designed by naval architects. He had waves of clients, starting with Greek shipping tycoons in the 1960s. Then came Middle Eastern royals in the 1970s, German and American industrialists in the 1980s, tech titans from the United States in the 1990s and wealthy Russians. After Jon’s death, Dickie, who had worked as his father’s project manager for 15 years, brought in Simon Rowell, a hotel designer, as the studio’s creative director. A short walk from Wandsworth Bridge on the River Thames, the studio holds 15 people, who manipulate detailed computer images of planned vessels, pore over design drawings and phone Italy to order marble fittings. There are usually six or seven projects at various stages of a construction process that takes four to five years, and that often extends to designing stationery and a logo for crew uniforms, as well as commissioning sculptures to go on board. Jon Bannenberg liked to design the cutlery and crockery, flower vases, the light fittings and door handles. He ran his practice like a Renaissance artist, training a stream of apprentices who now run some of the world’s top studios, and relying on wealthy patrons for commissions. Those patrons included J. Paul Getty, Malcolm Forbes and Larry Ellison. Projects were discussed with Fidel Castro and the Shah of Iran that never made it to the water. Almost inevitably, many people rich enough to spend tens or hundreds of millions of dollars on a yacht have proved to be controversial. The Australian billionaire Alan Bond was a Bannenberg customer before being jailed for fraud, and so was the Saudi arms dealer Adnan Khashoggi, who commissioned a 280-foot ship called Nabila. Donald Trump bought that one (and renamed it Trump Princess) in 1987 for a reported $30 million, with a running cost of $2.5 million a year, justifying the expenditure by saying it was “the ultimate toy” and that he hoped it would make other yacht owners feel inferior. A string of Bannenberg yachts were built for the British businessman Gerald Ronson, who also did jail time for fraud, and the American magnate Bennett LeBow was forced to repay millions of dollars to companies he controlled for loans that were spent on his yachts. The body of Robert Maxwell, the publisher and fraudster, was found floating off the back of his Bannenberg yacht, the Lady Ghislaine, which was named after his daughter who is now in the headlines over her involvement with Jeffrey Epstein, the financier charged with child sex trafficking. Mr. Epstein, who died in jail in August, represented the retail tycoon Leslie Wexner during the construction of his 300-foot yacht Limitless, another Jon Bannenberg project. Five imposing models of Limitless still sit on the walls of the studio. Dickie Bannenberg said he never dealt with Mr. Epstein, though Ms. Maxwell “may have come to a design meeting but I have never met her.” “It’s a tricky one,” Mr. Bannenberg said. “Legally in any industry you have a requirement to know as best you can the source of your client’s money, so in our contracts our lawyers require us to find the beneficial owner behind the project.” “The shipyard asks the same questions,” he said. “They won’t just build for Mysterious Corporation of Grand Cayman, they need to know who is behind it.” The ownership of some yachts is a tight secret, with the owner’s passion for privacy and security often extending to teams of private guards in every port. Adam Ramlugon, a lawyer who specializes in superyachts, said the legal obligations to avoid “dirty money” fall on regulated professions rather than on designers and builders themselves.  “It is the designer’s bank and lawyers who are required to know the source of funds, but any company should be very careful because their bank might decide to stop acting for them if they don’t know the source of some money sloshing around in their bank account,” Mr. Ramlugon said. Mr. Bannenberg said that “in real life, there is a limit to what we can do.” He recalled being hired by a Moscow shipyard to do design work for a client whom he and Mr. Rowell met “once or twice including one memorably uncomfortable meeting” in a Majorca villa. One sign that something was odd was that the meeting was held in what felt like a “safe room.” Mr. Bannenberg said that “a much bigger sign came three years later.” “After the yacht had been delivered, Simon was a bit terrified to notice a newspaper photo of the client being led away in handcuffs by two Spanish police officers wearing balaclavas. He was allegedly the head of an organized crime gang. How could we know that?” Mr. Rowell, 50, said that “once or twice” the firm has made its own inquiries and decided to stay away from a potential client, but a lot of these problems, especially white-collar crime, “only become obvious with hindsight.” The types of buyers and their demands keep changing. More than a decade of heavy spending by Russian and East European clients began drying up after the Russian annexation of Crimea — “we lost one job half an hour after that,” Mr. Bannenberg said — as Western sanctions on Russian oligarchs have continued to bite. The rising number of billionaires in mainland China has not yet translated into new buyers, and Mr. Bannenberg believes the Chinese face political and cultural restraints “on being so upfront with your wealth.” More promisingly, there has recently been a pickup in buying from the United States, Mr. Bannenberg said, “because America still has the most high-net-worth individuals.” The Trump tax cuts have fueled demand for superyachts, according to industry analysts, and shipyard order books are solid. Notably, this is despite recent softness in top-end sales of art, cars and real estate, amid broader fears of an economic slowdown. Research by the Superyacht Group shows that after peaking in 2008 and then slumping after the financial crisis, the production of luxury yachts has been stable in recent years, with an annual output close to 150 new vessels. While Americans remain the biggest buyers, the United States’ own yacht output has shrunk, with the global industry consolidating into fewer shipyards. The Italians now make the most vessels, and Dutch and German builders dominate the top of the market. The most striking change in the industry is a shift in what the boats are actually for, as a new generation of owners want to do more than show off while anchored off Sardinia. “The clients that approach us nowadays don’t really want a floating palace,” Mr. Rowell said. “They want a boat they are going to live on and even work on, and use for more than two weeks a year.” The Microsoft billionaire Paul Allen, who died in 2018, is often cited as an example of a more active owner, as he used his yachts for ocean research and roaming the world. A 600-foot-long monster called REV that emerged from a Romanian shipyard in August took that trend even further: Its Norwegian owner had it designed to double as a marine research vessel capable of supporting 60 scientists. The world’s largest yacht, REV (short for Research Expedition Vessel) can sail around the world without refueling. “Owners today do realize that these are extraordinary bits of equipment that can go to pretty exciting places that are really difficult to reach, and that changes the way you design the yacht,” Mr. Rowell said. Modern owners sail everywhere from the Northwest Passage to Antarctica. There is “still a minority of attention seekers, status seekers, whatever you want to call them, who really are happy sitting off St.-Tropez and Cala di Volpe and the Amalfi Coast,” Mr. Bannenberg noted. There is a movement, he said, “towards a much greater sense of connection between the yacht and the immediate sea, by which I mean swim platforms, ‘beach clubs,’ folding terraces and hull doors that open up to the sea.” A growing sense of environmental issues is also having an impact, Mr. Bannenberg said. “There are a few yacht-based movements and marine foundations, which are sometimes labeled as a yacht-owner’s guilt trip, that are part of the whole environmental conversation going on at the moment,” he added. “It all adds up to a much bigger desire to actually interact with the ocean rather than sitting in a glitzy apartment that happens to be floating.” "
nyt://article/a8c53db9-178d-55c4-ab67-51b1cb209674,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/04/11/business/dealbook/mark-zuckerberg-facebook-hearings.html,2018-04-11T11:34:39+0000,article,News,2731,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Russian Interference in 2016 US Elections and Ties to Trump Associates', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Facebook Inc', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Zuckerberg, Mark E', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Good Wednesday. Here’s what we’re watching: • Mark Zuckerberg is back on Capitol Hill. • Why would a trade war with China be good for the United States economy? • Has Facebook opened itself up to regulation? • Bank of America’s move on gun sales. • Why did the U.S. attorney for the Southern District of N.Y. recuse himself from the Michael Cohen raid? Want this in your inbox each morning? Sign up here. Mark Zuckerberg’s second day of Congressional grilling lifted its shares again. The stock rose 0.8 percent, even as the broader market dropped 0.6 percent. While it remains to be seen whether Mr. Zuckerberg’s performance will keep regulations at bay, his testimony was certainly a tonic for investors. Facebook’s two-day rise of more than 5 percent added over $24 billion to its market capitalization, according to Bloomberg data. Ali Mogharabi, a Morningstar analyst, offered this takeaway from the two-days of testimony: “Zuckerberg appears willing to work with lawmakers on possible regulations, which may create a barrier to entry in the social network space and help Facebook maintain its market leadership.” — Matt Phillips Mark Zuckerberg is back on Capitol Hill for a second day of congressional testimony. Here are some highlights : • Representative Greg Walden, Republican of Oregon and chair of the Energy and Commerce Committee, kicked off the hearing by declaring that “while Facebook has certainly grown, I worry it has not matured.” Mr. Walden floated the prospect of regulation, saying that “I think it is time to ask whether Facebook may have moved too fast and broken too many things.” • Mr. Walden also asked: “What exactly is Facebook?” The definitions matter. If Facebook is viewed as a telecommunications service that is more like a utility, it may be regulated by the Federal Communications Commission. If lawmakers define Facebook as a publisher, it could also fall under regulations at that agency. “I consider us to be a technology company,” Mr. Zuckerberg answered. “The primary thing we do is have engineers that write code and build services for other people.” • Representative Frank Pallone, a New Jersey Democrat, pressed Mr. Zuckerberg on whether Facebook would agree or refuse to change Facebook’s default settings to minimize collection and use of users’ data. “This is a complex issue that deserves more than a one-word answer,” Mr. Zuckerberg answered. “That’s disappointing to me,” Mr. Pallone responded. • California Democrat Anna Eshoo put it more bluntly, asking Mr. Zuckerberg: “Are you willing to change your business model to protect users’ privacy?” Mr. Zuckerberg was noncommittal, saying: “Congresswoman, I’m not sure what that means.” • Representative Joe Barton, Republican of Texas, pressed Mr. Zuckerberg on why Facebook has been allegedly censoring content from conservative organizations and Trump supporters such as Diamond and Silk. Mr. Barton also asked Mr. Zuckerberg if he would agree that Facebook would work to ensure it is “a neutral public platform.” “I do agree that we should give people a voice,” Mr. Zuckerberg said. • Rep. Gene Green, a Texas Democrat, and Jan Schakowsky, an Illinois Democrat, pressed Mr. Zuckerberg’s promise to give users worldwide the same privacy controls required by a tough new data protection law which will go into effect in the European Union next month. Mr. Green also asked Mr. Zuckerberg if Facebook planned to comply with the provision in the European law that allows individuals to obtain a copy of the data companies hold about them. • A number of lawmakers have tried to draw a comparison between the Obama campaign’s use of a Facebook app to scrape data from users and their friends in 2012 and Cambridge Analytica. Those lawmakers have failed to mention one very important distinction between the Obama campaign’s app and Cambridge Analytica’s app: The Obama app was actually on Facebook itself, and it was very clear about who and what the data would be used for. The app used to scrape data for Cambridge Analytica was accessed through a personality questionnaire hosted on a site outside of Facebook, and it appeared to users to be for academic research, not for a political data company owned by a wealthy Republican donor and dedicated to reshaping the American electorate. Elon Musk, the chief executive of Tesla, made an appearance on “CBS This Morning” and weighed in on the Facebook controversy. Mr. Musk told co-host Gayle King: “I think whenever something is – whenever there’s something that affects the public good then there does need to be some form of public oversight. … I do think there should be some regulations on AI. I think there should be regulations on social media to the degree that it negatively affects the public good. We can’t have like willy-nilly proliferation of fake news, that’s crazy. You can’t have more types of fake news than real news. That’s allowing public deception to go unchecked. That’s crazy.” Andrew writes: These were the most important words from Mark Zuckerberg’s five-hour testimony: “I agree we are responsible for the content.” They may come back to haunt him, given his previous rejection of calling Facebook a publisher. He later backtracked and called his business a tech company, but his acknowledgment may fundamentally shift the conversation — and how the company operates. (All in all, Mr. Zuckerberg did better than anyone had expected.) More from Peter Eavis: Lawmakers now seem much more aware of how much power large technology companies have. This was encapsulated in questions posed by Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina. He framed Facebook as a monopoly and brought up the possibility of regulating Facebook, asking Mr. Zuckerberg: “But you as a company welcome regulation?” And Facebook may now only be one big scandal away from a more stringent government response. Critics’ corner • Paul Pendergrass writes, “If Mr. Zuckerberg can convince lawmakers and users that he is the most capable and determined person to fix his company’s problems, then the company can start turning the corner on this crisis.” • Kara Swisher of Recode tweeted that Mr. Zuckerberg won yesterday’s hearing “not because he was so good (he was fine if a little flat), but because the senators really dropped every single ball possible.” • Sara Fischer and Dan Primack of Axios write, “Mark Zuckerberg on Tuesday morphed from a shy tech nerd into a confident business executive who ran circles around lawmakers.” • Shira Ovide of Gadfly writes: “Zuckerberg believes he’s giving users control, but he’s giving them the illusion of control. And that means the consent of Facebook users is not informed.” Elsewhere in Facebook: Robert and Rebekah Mercer have tried to mend fences with the tech giant on behalf of Cambridge Analytica. Some user data obtained by the quiz app behind the scandal included private messages. Facebook collects more info about you than you realized. And could Instagram help bail out its parent company? That’s the question Jack Ma, the founder of Alibaba, said he is struggling currently to understand. “Under a symbiotic U.S.-China relationship, America became a preeminent technology leader, and its brands are today the envy of the world. China improved the standard of living of its citizens with a tenfold increase in per capita gross domestic product over the past 20 years.” But that relationship will change over the next two decades, Mr. Ma said: “China is shifting its economy from the world’s largest exporter to the world’s largest consumer. Chinese citizens now have the wealth and income to pursue discretionary spending. They want to buy high-quality imported food, cosmetics, fashions and health and wellness products for themselves and their children.” Mr. Ma goes on to write: “It is therefore ironic that the U.S. administration is waging a trade war at a time when the largest potential consumer market in the world is open for business. Is America going to forfeit this opportunity? Instigating a trade war is the wrong solution because it will only provoke retaliation. The Chinese government responded to U.S. tariff threats with its own tariffs on American agricultural products, such as soybeans. China is the largest export market for American soybeans, worth $14 billion annually and accounting for 65 percent of all U.S. soybean exports. The U.S. has been a consistent defender of free and open markets, but this time it is resorting to protectionism that will not improve American competitiveness. Any country seeking to increase exports would do better to focus on developing good products and channels to access foreign markets rather than putting up trade barriers.” Shares of CBS are down 1.9 percent and Viacom’s stock is off nearly 1 percent after CNBC reported that Shari Redstone is likely to replace Les Moonves, the chief executive of CBS, if a deal isn’t reached with Viacom. Shari Redstone, whose National Amusements controls CBS and Viacom, is seeking to combine the two media companies. From Reuters: “Her longtime friend and business ally, powerful CBS Chief Executive Les Moonves, has emerged as one of the biggest obstacles to a potential CBS-Viacom tie-up, according to people familiar with the matter. Concerns are that his objections could either doom the transaction or that he might not lead the new entity, the people said. “Moonves is chafing at Redstone’s insistence on installing Viacom’s CEO as his second-in-command and likely successor of a merged company, the people say.” Add the U.S.’s second-biggest bank to the list of financial firms wading into the gun control debate. Bank of America said it would stop lending money to companies that make military-inspired firearms for civilians, such as AR-15-style rifles. Bank of America works with “just a handful” of such manufacturers, according to its vice chairwoman Anne Finucane. Their reactions? “Mixed,” she said. (Still unclear: how this affects Remington Outdoor, which owns Bushmaster and is getting through Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceeds with the aid of an asset-backed loan from Bank of America and several other institutions.) The DealBook tally of financial firms that have taken steps to limit gun sales: Citigroup, Amalgamated, BlackRock, Bank of America. (Know of another? Do tell us.) Why did Geoffrey Berman, the Trump-appointed interim U.S. attorney for the Southern District of New York, which oversaw the F.B.I. searches, recuse himself from the case? DealBook readers might recall that Mr. Berman was a longtime lawyer for Deutsche Bank, one of the few major banks that lent money to Trump in recent years. On the legal issues behind the raid: Though President Trump has complained on Twitter that “attorney-client privilege is dead” after the F.B.I.’s searches at his personal lawyer’s office and hotel room, DealBook’s Peter Henning explains why that’s not the case. (So does George Conway, the husband of Kellyanne Conway.) More on Mr. Cohen: The F.B.I. sought records related to payments to Stormy Daniels and Karen McDougal, who claim to have had affairs with Mr. Trump. And how the lawyer attracted federal attention. • Robert Mueller corner: President Trump is still seething about the special counsel, and advisers worry he will try to fire him or the deputy attorney general, Rod Rosenstein. He sought to shut down Mr. Mueller’s investigation in December, the NYT has reported, though it’s disputed whether he could fire him directly. Republican leaders in Congress still oppose legislation to protect the special counsel. • What the tariffs on imported metal have cost a Pennsylvania manufacturer. And how China may be working around them, legitimately or otherwise. (It also seems to have returned to intellectual-property hacking.) • Tom Bossert was forced out as the Trump administration’s homeland security adviser days after John Bolton became national security adviser. (NYT) • The E.P.A. is reviewing threats to Scott Pruitt on social media to see if his costly security detail is justified. (NYT) • Mr. Trump is skipping the Summit of the Americas this weekend and, critics say, missing an opportunity to mend fences with Latin America. Vice President Mike Pence will go. (Axios) Mr. Deripaska in particular is suffering from the U.S. sanctions against associates of President Vladimir Putin and their companies. According to analysts, traders and bankers , he may soon  need Russian government support to stay afloat: Shares in Rusal, the aluminum producer he controls, have fallen 55 percent since Friday, when the sanctions were unveiled. It’s a humbling blow to Mr. Deripaska, who has sought Western acceptance. A former State Department official told Bloomberg he “had it coming.” The pain isn’t likely to end. A top U.S. Treasury Department official has warned of “consequences” if British firms continued to do business with sanctioned companies. After the two companies failed to reach a deal last year (and in 2014, and 2011), they’re back in talks, Michael hears. Shares in both companies jumped — Sprint 17 percent, T-Mobile 5.7 percent — after the WSJ reported on the restart. It’s not exactly a surprise. SoftBank’s Masa Son bought control of Sprint planning to merge it with T-Mobile, the better to fight Verizon and AT&T. And most analysts agree that both companies need to become bigger to survive. • The F.C.C. is reportedly pushing back on part of Sinclair’s plan to win approval of the $3.9 billion acquisition of Tribune — selling Tribune TV stations in New York City and Chicago to companies affiliated with the broadcaster’s founding family. (WSJ) • Saudi Arabia agreed to a flurry of investments in France after Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman’s three days there. The kingdom also sold $11 billion worth of bonds — just as Qatar was lining up its own debt sale. • Carl Icahn agreed to sell Federal-Mogul to Tenneco for $5.4 billion, in an apparent blow to his dreams of an auto-parts empire. (Bloomberg) • Aviation corner: Global Infrastructure Partners is reportedly considering selling its 42 percent stake in London Gatwick Airport. easyJet, Air France-KLM and Cerberus Capital Management have reportedly approached Alitalia about buying it together. Qatar and JetBlue have invested in JetSuite, a private jet company. And Google is reportedly in talks to buy Nokia’s in-flight broadband business. • A group led by Patrick Soon-Shiong, owner of The L.A. Times, is reportedly close to buying the D.C. United soccer team. (FT) • The investment firm Altaris agreed to buy Analogic, which makes M.R.I. and luggage-screening equipment, for $1.1 billion. (WSJ) • Vitol and the Carlyle Group have scuttled an I.P.O. of Varo Energy, a fuel refiner and distributor. (FT) • Volkswagen plans to oust its C.E.O., Matthias Müller, as it works to move past the diesel emissions scandal. He’s likely to be replaced by Herbert Diess. (NYT) • The head of Britain’s Serious Fraud Office, David Green, is to step down; the C.O.O, Mark Thompson, will be interim director. (WSJ) • A.P. Moeller-Maersk wants a female C.F.O., its first, to combat a widening gender gap in its senior management ranks. (Bloomberg) • The European Commission raided the London offices of 21st Century Fox as part of an antitrust investigation into sports programming. (Bloomberg) • Martin Shkreli must pay a defrauded hedge fund investor $388,000 in restitution, a federal judge ruled. (CNBC) • A fat-finger error at Samsung Securities involving more than $105 billion of accidentally issued shares has prompted South Korea’s National Pension Service to cut ties. (WSJ) • Theranos reportedly laid off most of its remaining workers to put off bankruptcy. (WSJ) • Bank loans to nonbank financial firms increased sixfold between 2010 and 2017 to a record high as banks tried to avoid direct exposure to riskier loans. (WSJ) • Farmers are hitting the road to reach shoppers before Amazon does. (NYT) • Norway’s sovereign wealth fund cannot invest in private equity, but may be allowed to put money into renewable infrastructure. (FT) • China ordered Beijing Bytedance Technology to shut a popular joke-sharing app and delete its WeChat account as part of a censorship campaign. (Bloomberg) • China’s central bank chief filled in details on President Xi Jinping’s promise to open up the financial sector. (Bloomberg) We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. "
nyt://article/620bc420-d6ba-52fe-b0ac-40095b115306,https://www.nytimes.com/2020/03/16/world/live-coronavirus-news-updates.html,2020-03-16T04:05:21+0000,article,News,3344,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"President Trump recommended strict new guidelines, but they fell short of what experts wanted. France and the San Francisco Bay Area are ordering residents to stay home as much as possible. This briefing has ended. Read our global live coverage here. transcript This afternoon we’re announcing new guidelines for every American to follow over the next 15 days as we combat the virus. Each and every one of us has a critical role to play in stopping the spread and transmission of the virus. We did this today, and this was done by a lot of very talented people, some of whom are standing with me. And that’s available. And Dr. Birx will be speaking about that in just a few minutes. It’s important for the young and healthy people to understand that while they may experience milder symptoms, they can easily spread this virus and they will spread it, indeed, putting countless others in harm’s way. We especially worry about our senior citizens. We’ve made the decision to further toughen the guidelines and blunt the infection now. We’d much rather be ahead of the curve than behind it. And that’s what we are. Therefore, my administration is recommending that all Americans, including the young and healthy, work to engage in schooling from home when possible, avoid gathering in groups of more than 10 people, avoid discretionary travel, and avoid eating and drinking at bars, restaurants and public food courts. If everyone makes this change or these critical changes and sacrifices now we will rally together as one nation, and we will defeat the virus. And we’re going to have a big celebration all together. With several weeks of focused action, we can turn the corner and turn it quickly. A lot of progress has been made. I’m also pleased to report today that a vaccine candidate has begun the Phase 1 clinical trial. This is one of the fastest vaccine development launches in history. Not even close. We’re also racing to develop antiviral therapies, and other treatments, and we’ve had some promising results — early results, but promising — to reduce the severity and the duration of the symptoms. And I have to say that our government is prepared to do whatever it takes, whatever it takes we’re doing.   ‘Every One of Us Has a Critical Role’: Trump Releases New Coronavirus Guidelines   The Trump administration released new guidelines on Monday to slow the spread of the coronavirus, including closing schools and avoiding groups of more than 10 people, discretionary travel, bars, restaurants and food courts. Mr. Trump, flanked by task force members including Dr. Anthony Fauci, the director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, said the guidelines would apply for 15 days. “It seems to me if we do a really good job, we’ll not only hold the death down to a level that’s much lower than the other way had we not done a good job, but people are talking about July, August,” Mr. Trump said about the duration of the crisis. The new measures reflected the increasing gravity of global attempts to contain the virus as governments around the world, from Canada to Hungary, moved to close their borders to foreign travelers. They left unanswered the question of precisely what individuals and local governments should do, or how business owners and workers might survive financially, at a time when vast sections of the economy were ceasing to function. “If everyone makes this change or these critical changes and sacrifices now,” Mr. Trump said, “we will rally together as one nation and we will defeat the virus and we’re going to have a big celebration all together.” Hours earlier, Mr. Trump told a group of governors they should not wait for the federal government to fill the growing demand for respirators needed to help people diagnosed with coronavirus. “Respirators, ventilators, all of the equipment — try getting it yourselves,” Mr. Trump told the governors during the conference call, a recording of which was shared with The New York Times. The suggestion surprised some of the governors, who have been scrambling to contain the outbreak and looking to the federal government for help with equipment, personnel and financial aid. At the briefing with the president, Dr. Fauci said the first phase of testing of a possible vaccine had begun on Monday. He stressed that some of the White House guidelines were inconvenient, but that they would help stop the spread of the virus and were not an overreaction. “When you’re dealing with an emerging infectious diseases outbreak,” he said, “you are always behind where you think you are.” It was clear on Monday that most of the American economy was grinding to a halt, and would remain that way for months, because of the coronavirus outbreak and the sweeping steps being taken to try to halt it. On Wall Street, brokers and analysts were acting as if an economic collapse were inevitable, despite the Federal Reserve’s emergency moves on Sunday night to stoke economic growth through an aggressive bond-buying program. The S&P 500 fell nearly 12 percent on Monday and global oil prices slid below $30 a barrel, a four-year low. “We’re calling the recession,” said Gregory Daco, chief U.S. economist at Oxford Economics. “We have the three elements to make that call — a profound, pervasive and persistent contraction in economic activity.” Business groups, local and state leaders and a growing chorus of lawmakers and economists begged the federal government to spend trillions of dollars to pay workers to stay home and funnel money to companies struggling with an abrupt end to consumer activity. The administration floated several ideas for helping industry without conveying a clear plan. After the main trade group for airlines suggested a $50 billion bailout, Mr. Trump’s chief economist, Larry Kudlow, said, “We don’t see the airlines failing, but if they get into a cash crunch we’re going to try to help them.” Employers and employees are torn between fears of being exposed to the virus and fears of running out of money to pay for food and electricity. And government officials are left with the unhappy task of shutting down businesses that provide wages for large swaths of their communities, while wondering what steps their neighbors are taking. On Monday, Senator Mitt Romney of Utah called for the government to cut a $1,000 check, immediately, to every American. “People don’t have reserves, they live hand-to mouth,” said Joseph Stiglitz, a Nobel-winning economist. “People won’t be able to pay their rents, landlords won’t be able to pay their oil bills, the whole system could break down.” The consequences of China’s harsh measures to halt the virus — restricting the movement of about 700 million people at one point — became apparent on Monday when the government released economic data showing industrial output falling to its lowest level in decades and unemployment rising at its highest rate ever in February. transcript “It started for me with a pretty severe sore throat.” “I started to feel symptomatic five days after traveling.” “It’s different than the bronchitis that I’ve gotten before.” “Everything had kind of settled in my lungs. And I was just coughing a ton.” “I had a headache and felt feverish.” “It felt like I had a bowling ball on my chest. Nobody’s willing to see me, and nobody has the test kit and even C.D.C. is refusing to test me.” “I traced back, you know, my wife, she works at Amazon. They had a confirmed case.” “Four different planes in four different airports. So I don’t know who sat next to me or who I was in contact with.” “It’s one person coming in from China, and we have it under control. It’s going to be just fine.” “We’re going down, not up. We’re going very substantially down. Not up.” “Anybody that needs a test, gets a test. They’re there. They have the tests. And the tests are beautiful.” “We have a president saying anyone who wants tests can get a test. And I’m thinking, That is so not true.” “It was just interesting, because there was this kind of gray area for a while of people who felt like they were really sick and should have been tested just as, even as a rule out. And the state of Washington just did not have the capacity to do that, because the government had not supported us at that point essentially.” “I got through to public health after about an hour, and they told me that I did not meet the criteria for being tested.” “They said, ‘There’s no way to get tested. We don’t have tests right now. There’s nothing set up in Delaware.’” “I looked at the C.D.C. website and it said, call your doctor if you have the symptoms. So I called the doctor’s office and they told me to go to an urgent care facility. I called an urgent care facility and they said that there’s nothing that they can do. And they don’t have the tests. And they told me to go to the E.R. And I called a hospital, and they told me that they don’t have the test either.” “I just felt like I was getting the run-around. It was clearly obvious that they just are under capacity, and they’re not able to test.” “I eventually just gave up because, at that point, the testing criteria was so strict. It was, you travel to China or have you been in contact with someone known diagnosed Covid. And I didn’t meet any of that.” “As a nurse in an E.R., it’s pretty vital if I have an infectious disease that I know what it is because I could be spreading it to people who are really vulnerable.” “I actually work in a building that’s a fairly public place. There’s people of every generation coming in there. There’s a private school there. There’s a senior center.” “Southwest Florida is full of elders. There is a lot of snowbirds coming here. They’re all in their 70s and 80s. I cannot get myself, like I cannot convince my conscience to leave the house just thinking about that, Hey you went grocery shopping and now like five people died. So I just self quarantined myself and basically started working from home.” “We stocked up on food items as much as possible. I bought a 25 pound bag of rice. We bought beans. We got ready basically just to hunker down for those two weeks. At this point, I’m telling people like make — if you have a decision to make, think about survival and make the decision based on survival for yourself, your family and your community.” “We knew this was coming. The federal government is just completely bungling this, and our lives are at stake. I feel like they’re just leaving us here to die in Seattle.” “The most overwhelming feeling was you are on your own.” “I’m just really concerned for those that this is going to affect the hardest. And I think we pretty much failed at early testing, early containment. We had more time than other governments.” For the first time since World War II, the Kentucky Derby will not take place on the first Saturday in May. The Derby, the first jewel of horse racing’s Triple Crown, became the latest marquee sporting event forced to postpone because of the deepening coronavirus pandemic. Churchill Downs will hold a conference call on Tuesday morning to announce a makeup date for the race, which is expected to be Sept. 5. The Courier-Journal newspaper in Louisville, Ky., where the race is held, had earlier reported the postponement. The race, which touts itself as the “most exciting two minutes in sports,” regularly draws more than 150,000 spectators to the famed racetrack with its twin spires. The coronavirus has transformed the sporting landscape. The N.B.A., the N.H.L. and Major League Baseball have all suspended play, and the N.C.A.A. canceled all of its championships. Racetracks across the country have been shuttered to the public, but races are still being run and bets are still being welcomed. According to The Courier-Journal, the Derby and the weeks of celebration that surround it infuse the region with about $400 million yearly. In 1945, the Kentucky Derby was held on June 9, about a month after the government lifted a ban on horse racing that it put in place because of World War II. The only other year the race did not take place on the first Saturday in May was in 1901. Stringent measures were imposed over the weekend in several Latin American nations, where the outbreak has generally arrived later than in Europe or North America. In Venezuela, President Nicolás Maduro — an authoritarian leader whose government is considered illegitimate by the United States and about 60 other nations — seized on the upheaval caused by the pandemic to present himself as a responsible guardian of public health. On Monday night, in an announcement made on state TV, Mr. Maduro said a nationwide quarantine would take effect Tuesday at 5 a.m. local time. The country is now at 33 cases, according to Mr. Maduro, who called the move “a drastic and necessary measure.” Earlier in the day, he responded to 17 confirmed cases of coronavirus in the country by ordering a lockdown of the capital, Caracas, and six other states on Monday. “We either go into quarantine, or the pandemic could brutally and tragically bring down our country,” he said in a terse televised speech on Sunday that was a departure from his typically rambling addresses. He called on the United States to loosen sanctions against his government. Other Latin American countries have also responded to dozens of confirmed cases. Ecuador and Peru announced countrywide lockdowns. President Iván Duque of Colombia shut the borders to nonresidents. In Costa Rica, the government decreed a state of emergency that included closing its borders. In contrast, President Jair Bolsonaro of Brazil encouraged mass demonstrations by his supporters against his opponents in Congress on Sunday. Though Mr. Bolsonaro has been close to people who tested positive for the virus, he shook hands and posed for photos with supporters. Scientists tracking the spread of the coronavirus reported Monday that, for every confirmed case, there are most likely another five to 10 people in the community with undetected infections. On average these people are about half as infectious as confirmed ones, but they are responsible for transmitting the virus in nearly 80 percent of new cases, according to the report, which was based on data from China. The researchers modeled the virus’s natural spread in China before the government instituted a travel ban and an aggressive testing policy. During that time, from December 2019 through late January, about 85 percent of cases went undetected. That situation is analogous to the current state of affairs in the United States and other Western countries, where tests are not widely available, the researchers said. “If we have 3,500 confirmed cases in the U.S., you might be looking at 35,000 in reality,” said Jeffrey Shaman, an epidemiologist at Columbia University and the senior author of the new report, which was posted by the journal Science. The report is among the first to address two pressing questions: How many people are walking around with unrecognized infections, and how infectious are they? American policymakers have begun taking more aggressive measures to slow transmission, like canceling events and closing restaurants, but access to tests has been difficult or nonexistent in much of the country. The top official of the European Union said on Monday that she was proposing a shutdown of all nonessential travel into the bloc. President Emmanuel Macron of France said national leaders would approve the plan on Tuesday. “We propose to introduce a temporary restriction to non-essential travel to the European Union,” said Ursula von der Leyen, president of the European Commission, after a teleconference with G7 leaders. “Of course there will be exemptions for E.U. citizens coming back home, health care workers, doctors and nurses.” The restriction would last for 30 days, and would not interfere with travel from one European Union country to another. But some of the member states have already taken steps in that direction. Ten of the 26 countries that make up the passport-free Schengen Area have reintroduced border controls, partly or fully suspending the rules of the flagship European Union program, a spokesman for the European Commission said. Infighting, turf wars and a president more concerned with the stock market and media coverage than policy have defined the Trump White House. They have also defined how it has handled a pandemic. The White House culture that President Trump has fostered and abided by for more than three years has shaped his administration’s response to a deadly pandemic that is upending his presidency and the rest of the country, with dramatic changes to how Americans live their daily lives. It all explains how Mr. Trump could announce he was dismissing his acting chief of staff as the crisis grew more severe, creating even less clarity in an already fractured chain of command. And it was a major factor in the president’s reluctance to even acknowledge a looming crisis, for fear of rattling the financial markets that serve as his political weather vane. Mr. Trump has refused repeated warnings to rely on experts, or to neutralize some of the power held by his son-in-law, Jared Kushner, in favor of a traditional staff structure. He has rarely fully empowered people in the jobs they hold. “Part of this is President Trump being Donald J. Trump, the same guy he’s always been, and part of it is a government he has now molded in his image, rather than having a government as it has traditionally been, to serve the chief executive, and to serve the job of governing the country,” said David Lapan, a former spokesman for the Department of Homeland Security and the Pentagon, and a former aide of Mr. Kelly. Six counties in Northern California have ordered all residents to “shelter in place” in an effort to stop the coronavirus from surging. The order, which takes effect Tuesday, is expected to disrupt life for millions of residents in Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara counties. The city of Berkeley also issued the same order. That means staying at home except for the most essential reasons. Officials said people would be allowed to leave the house for essential work, to go to a grocery store, pick up medication, or even walk the dog. But they urged everyone to practice social distancing while outside. “It is now time to do your part,” Dr. Scott Morrow, the San Mateo health officer, said in a statement. “It’s asking people to go home with their families and to stay there until they are told otherwise,” said Mayor Joe Goethals of San Mateo, adding that only “essential” businesses like hospitals, grocery stores and pharmacies would remain open. “I don’t expect anyone to get arrested,” said Mr. Goethals, who said people will still be allowed to go outside for limited activities, like buying food and getting fresh air. “But it’s not optional. This is mandatory for all of us.” The number of coronavirus cases in the United States crossed the 4,000 mark on Monday, with more than 70 deaths, including the first deaths in Indiana, Nevada and South Carolina. A growing number of cities and states have taken significant actions to slow the coronavirus, shutting down schools, restaurants, bars, movie theaters and gyms. The restrictions stretched from the now-empty sidewalks of New York City, where officials had made the wrenching decision to shut down public schools, to the fields and urban centers of Ohio. Millions of Americans are now hunkered down at home for the foreseeable future. Declaring “we are at war,” President Emmanuel Macron of France prohibited public gatherings of any size, postponed municipal elections and told people to stay in their homes except for essential needs. His order, which goes into effect on Tuesday, is one of the most stringent anywhere in Europe. Officials said that going out for a walk to get some fresh air would be allowed, but meeting a friend on a street or in a park would be punishable with a fine. Christophe Castaner, the interior minister, said anyone on a public outing would need to carry a document justifying it, even if only a sworn statement written by that person. He said that 100,000 law enforcement officers would be deployed to enforce the order. Olivier Véran, France’s health minister, said that the government was asking each French person to limit human contact to a maximum of five people a day. France, with more than 6,600 coronavirus cases and 148 deaths by Monday, had already ordered all “non-indispensable” businesses closed. “We will be able to end the confinement,” Mr. Véran said in a post on Twitter. “But without confinement, we will not be able to end the epidemic.” Spain, with almost 10,000 cases and more than 300 deaths by Monday, also ordered residents to mostly stay at home, though it is still allowing most people to go to work and has not announced any punitive measures. Schools, restaurants and bars were ordered to close. The pace of new coronavirus infections reported in Europe accelerates daily — roughly 6,000 on Thursday, 7,000 on Friday, 8,000 on Saturday, 9,000 on Sunday and 10,000 on Monday, bringing the total to about 62,000. France and Spain warned that their health care systems could be overwhelmed. And in Italy, still the hardest-hit country in Europe and the first to impose nationwide restrictions on movement, the government announced $28 billion in emergency aid to individuals, businesses and the health care system to stave off chaos and financial ruin. Italy had almost 28,000 infections and more than 1,800 deaths as of Monday. The government’s aid package delays mortgage, loan and tax payments, and offers extended parental leave, sick leave for people in quarantine, babysitting vouchers, and grants for self-employed and seasonal workers. “We never considered fighting a flood with buckets,” Prime Minister Giuseppe Conte said. “We are trying to build a dam to protect businesses, families and workers.” Ohio’s governor on Monday night said he and top state heath officials would ignore a court ruling and postpone Ohio’s presidential primary by declaring a public health emergency because of the coronavirus outbreak. The governor, Mike DeWine, said that the state’s health director, Dr. Amy Acton, had issued the order based on concerns that the coronavirus outbreak placed both voters and poll workers in potential danger. His announcement came just hours after Judge Richard A. Frye of the Franklin County Court of Common Pleas rejected the state’s request to push back voting to June 2. Ohio was one of four states scheduled to vote on Tuesday. The other three — Arizona, Illinois and Florida — said that they planned to proceed with their elections while taking additional health precautions. Kentucky also announced that it was delaying its primary. The lobbying group for America’s biggest airlines called on the government on Monday to provide more than $50 billion in grants, loan guarantees and tax relief. The group, Airlines for America, warned that the current situation was not sustainable for the industry and that there was no end in sight to the crisis. “This is a today problem, not a tomorrow problem,” said Nicholas E. Calio, chief executive of Airlines for America. “It requires urgent action.” The industry group said that flight cancellations are outpacing new bookings and that the decline in demand is getting worse by the day. The request included $25 billion in grants for passenger carriers, $4 billion in grants for cargo, $25 billion in loan guarantees. On Sunday, United Airlines executives said they were in talks with union leaders about reducing payroll costs. The moves being considered include furloughs, pay cuts and reducing minimum hours. United’s corporate officers will be taking a 50 percent pay cut, Oscar Munoz, the chief executive, and Scott Kirby, the president, said in a letter. Both have already said they would forgo their base salaries through June. In a sharp reversal, Prime Minister Boris Johnson said on Monday that everyone should avoid unnecessary travel and contact with others, should work at home and should stop going to places like bars, restaurants and theaters. Mr. Johnson called the measures “very draconian,” but he stopped well short of the kinds of steps taken by some harder-hit European countries. He did not order schools or businesses closed, did not tell people to stay in their homes, and said the steps were not mandatory, but rather “giving very strong advice.” Mr. Johnson and his government had faced harsh criticism for its laissez-faire approach to the pandemic. They had spoken hopefully of “herd immunity” — in which many people would be infected, recover and then, it is hoped, be immune — while it was inevitable that many people would take ill and die. But at a news conference on Monday with top medical officials, he said: “Now is the time for everyone to stop nonessential contact with others and to stop all unnecessary travel.” In particular, people over 70 and those with serious illnesses should avoid contact with others, Mr. Johnson said, suggesting that as a result, people should not visit nursing and retirement homes. The English actor Idris Elba, who was in the HBO series “The Wire,” announced on Monday that he had tested positive for the coronavirus, sharing the news with fans in a video that he posted on Twitter. “Transparency is probably the best thing for this right now,” said Mr. Elba, 47. “If you’re feeling ill or you feel like you should be tested or you’ve been exposed, then do something about it. It’s really important.” Reporting was contributed by Michael Powell, Elisabetta Povoledo, Tim Arango, Thomas Fuller, John Eligon, Maya Salam, Conor Dougherty, Jim Tankersley, Niraj Chokshi, Matina Stevis-Gridneff, Ian Austen, Catie Edmondson, Peter Baker, Katie Robertson, Jonathan Martin, Michael Cooper, Karen Weise, Reid J. Epstein, Katie Glueck, Shane Goldmacher, Jeanna Smialek, Alissa J. Rubin, Sarah Mervosh, Neil Irwin, Thomas Gibbons-Neff, Safak Timur, Emmet Lindner, Marc Santora, Megan Specia, Aurelien Breeden, Raphael Minder, Melissa Eddy, Tiffany May, Matt Stevens, Nick Corasaniti, Elian Peltier, Constant Méheut, Josh Katz, Margot Sanger-Katz, Kevin Quealy, Adeel Hassan, Aimee Ortiz and Neil Vigdor. world nyregion world world world nyregion opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/7f169423-e0ad-5747-9b8a-7481109417ec,https://www.nytimes.com/2018/04/10/business/dealbook/mark-zuckerberg-congress-hearing.html,2018-04-10T11:15:51+0000,article,News,3760,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Cohen, Michael D (1966- )', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Trump, Donald J', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Mueller, Robert S III', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bannon, Stephen K', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Xi Jinping', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Russian Interference in 2016 US Elections and Ties to Trump Associates', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Good Tuesday. Here’s what we’re watching: • Mark Zuckerberg’s first Congressional hearing is here. • Sprint and T-Mobile have restarted merger talks. • Wall Street continues to wade into the gun control debate. • The raid on Michael Cohen’s office and residence raises a number of issues. • The C.B.O. is still underestimating how bad the deficit is going to be. Get this in your inbox each morning. Sign up here. Congressional hearings focusing on corporate missteps often reveal little, in part because lawmakers lack the expertise and the executives taking questions are good at stone-walling. Still, Tuesday’s hearing turned out to be a serious attempt to grapple with the growing influence of a powerful company that is entwined in the lives of millions of Americans. Lawmakers, it became clear, no longer see Facebook and other large tech companies as mostly benign forces for innovation. In his responses, Mr. Zuckerberg was competent but notably did not reveal much that was new about how Facebook will respond to its enormous challenges. On balance, the hearing probably leaves Facebook and its peers on the back foot in three important ways. Legislation to rein in social media companies is now a possibility. Lawmakers now seem much more aware of how much power large technology companies have. This was encapsulated in questions posed by Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina. He framed Facebook as a monopoly and brought up the possibility of regulating Facebook, asking Mr. Zuckerberg: “But you as a company welcome regulation?” Mr. Zuckerberg gave a response often heard from C.E.O.s: “I think if it’s the right regulation, then yes.” Senator Graham then secured something of a commitment from Mr. Zuckerberg to work with the Senate on what regulations are necessary. A Senate with a Republican majority may be less likely to pass legislation, but if the Democrats gain control, top senators from that party might push for new laws ahead of a potential run in 2020. Some of the most penetrating questions on Tuesday came from Kamala Harris, Democrat of California, and Cory Booker, Democrat of New Jersey. Recidivism may now be taken more seriously. One of the reasons that Facebook is under scrutiny is that it has been the source of several scandals. Patience has apparently worn thin in the Senate. Facebook has not convincingly explained why it took so long to reveal Cambridge Analytica’s misuse of the data of 87 million users. Senator Bill Nelson, Democrat of Florida, sounded bewildered by that misstep: “You apologized for it. But you didn’t notify them. And do you think that you have an ethical obligation to notify 87 million Facebook users?” Facebook may now only be one big scandal away from a stringent government response. Large technology companies sense an economic threat. Mr. Zuckerberg made an intriguing comment that suggested Facebook could, in theory, offer a paid version, presumably to users who do not want ads or to share certain data with Facebook. He said: “There will always be a version of Facebook that will be free.” This suggests that Facebook has begun to think about how it can adapt to a situation in which it gets access to less data from users. In other words, it may be taking a threat to its business model seriously. The fact that Facebook’s stock rose through the hearing should not be taken as a sign that the company is in the clear. — Peter Eavis Investors certainly liked Mark Zuckerberg’s testimony on Capitol Hill Tuesday. Facebook’s shares rose 4.5 percent on the day. It was the strongest single-day performance for the stock since April 2016. After being down as much as 24 percent this year, Facebook is steadily clawing back ground. Tuesday’s gain left it down only 11.4 percent in 2018. — Matt Phillips Among the dominant themes of the hearing, and the past few weeks, has been whether Facebook needs to be regulated. In fact, Mr. Zuckerberg said he open to Facebook being regulated during his first interview after the Cambridge Analytica scandal. But some lawmakers expressed skepticism toward regulation during the hearing. Senator Dan Sullivan, Republican of Alaska, raised an important point about the impact of regulation: That it often benefits the biggest companies, at the expense smaller firms and startups. Here’s Senator Sullivan’s question to Mr. Zuckerberg: “Regulations can also cement the dominant power. Do you think that that’s a risk, given your influence, that if we regulate we’re actually going to regulate you into a position of cemented authority?” In other words, if the government decides to crack down on Facebook, could that end up holding back the next Facebook? Mr. Zuckerberg conceded that that would be a risk. That’s the question that Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina hit on and its a sensitive one for Facebook. In the weeks since the Cambridge Analytica scandal, many have said that Facebook can’t be fixed and needs to be broken up. On Tuesday, Mr.Graham asked Mr. Zuckerberg to name Facebook’s biggest competitor. Mr. Zuckerberg responded that Facebook has a lot of competitors. Then Mr. Graham pointed out that if a customer has a problem with the Ford they bought, they can buy a car from another auto maker. Here’s their back-and-forth. Mr. Graham asked: “Is there an alternative to Facebook?” Mr. Zuckerberg: “Well, we provide a number of diff...” Mr. Graham: “You don’t think that you have a monopoly?” Mr. Zuckerberg: “It certainly doesn’t feel like that to me.” The gap in knowledge about how Facebook’s business works was on display at times during Mr. Zuckerberg’s testimony. The company has faced questions about the possibility of creating a paid service that would allow users to opt-out of sharing their data or seeing advertisements. Mr. Zuckerberg insisted on Tuesday that there would always be a free version of Facebook, so that anyone in the world can afford to be part of its online community. At that point, Sentor Orrin G. Hatch, the Utah Republican, asked Mr. Zuckerberg how he could sustain a business without charging anything for it. “Sir, we run ads,” Mr. Zuckerberg explained. Mr. Hatch replied: “I see.” — Alan Rappeport Senator John Thune of South Dakota, the chairman of the Senate Commerce Committee, called Facebook and its role in society “extraordinary” and began the hearing by explaining why Facebook is being singled out and why Mr. Zuckerberg was asked to appear alone. He said the Cambridge Analytica situation underscored how Facebook can be used for nefarious reasons, saying it appeared “to be the result of people exploiting the tools you created to manipulate users’ information.” In an indication that he may support legislation for internet companies, Mr. Thune said, “In the past, many of my colleagues on both sides of the aisle have been willing to defer to tech companies’ efforts to regulate themselves. But this may be changing.” Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, who chairs the Judiciary Committee, said the tech industry “has a responsibility” to protect its users and said “the status quo no longer works.” — Cecilia Kang Mr. Zuckerberg is the only technology chief in the room, but it is clear that members of Congress are treating him as a stand-in for the entirety of Silicon Valley. Mr. Grassley called the entire tech industry to account, saying “the tech industry has an obligation to…restore the public’s trust.” Mr. Nelson put it even more bluntly: “If you and other social media companies do not get your act in order, none of us are going to have any privacy.” In his opening statement, Mr. Zuckerberg, who is 33, made a point to remind Congress that he was young when this all began. “I started Facebook when I was in college,” Mr. Zuckerberg said. This is a recurring theme for Mr. Zuckerberg—in many recent interviews, he has referred to starting Facebook in his Harvard dorm room. And perhaps it’s wise to keep bringing up the fact that Mr. Zuckerberg is much younger than most of the business executives who come before Congress. But the strategy could also backfire. After all, Mr. Zuckerberg is a long way from his dorm room—on paper, he has been a billionaire for more than a decade—and by reminding lawmakers of his youth, he could also lead them to question whether he’s mature enough to handle such enormous responsibilities and whether Silicon Valley needs more adult supervision in the way of additional federal regulation. — Kevin Roose That’s when Mark Zuckerberg will testify before the Senate Judiciary and Commerce committees; you can watch here. In his prepared testimony, published yesterday, he apologized for not doing more to stop fake news. Here’s where lawmakers are likely to press him: • Privacy, and whether 2 billion Facebook users can consider their data safe. • The reach of Russia’s election chicanery, and how slow the company was to publicize it. (According to a Columbia researcher, Peter Eavis notes, Facebook is still understating that reach. The company disagrees.) • The F.T.C.’s 2011 consent decree with the company, and whether it was violated in the Cambridge Analytica scandal. (Facebook says not.) • Political bias and violent radicalization (an especially big topic in countries like Myanmar). The bigger point: Andrew writes in his latest column that, however harshly lawmakers question Mr. Zuckerberg, the public still seems willing to be hand Facebook personal information. More from the column: The problem is that Mr. Zuckerberg has been apologizing for years for all sorts of breaches of trust with his “community.” And guess what? After each mea culpa, the Facebook community has grown. Elsewhere in Facebook news: Wildlife preservation advocates complained to the S.E.C. that the company is serving ads on the pages of wildlife traffickers. Bank of America will stop lending money to gun manufacturers that make military-inspired firearms for civilian use, such as the AR-15-style rifles that have been used in multiple mass shootings, a company executive said Tuesday. “We want to contribute in any way we can to reduce these mass shootings,” Anne M. Finucane, vice chairwoman at the Bank of America, said on Bloomberg TV. The bank works with “just a handful of manufacturers,” with whom it has had “intense conversations over the last few months,” Ms. Finucane said. Their reactions to the new policy have been “mixed,” she said. Bank of America would not name any of the gun manufacturers it works with, but its clients include well-known, publicly held brands. The bank will wind down its relationships with the companies that choose to continue making AR-15-style rifles and similar guns. For now, Bank of America will continue to offer banking services to firearms retailers. Asking gun shops to stop selling certain types of handguns or long guns “gets into civil liberties” and is “a ways off,” Ms. Finucane said. Last month Citigroup announced that it would require business customers to restrict certain types of firearms sales. And earlier this month BlackRock said it plans to offer new funds that exclude gun makers or sellers is the latest prominent step by a financial firm to offer some support to gun control. — Tiffany Hsu Shares in Sprint leapt 17 percent on Tuesday after the WSJ reported on the restarted talks. Shares in T-Mobile were up 5.7 percent as well. Let’s recap the tortured history of the telecom merger that hasn’t quite been able to cross the finish line (which I’ve covered multiple times over the years): • Sprint pursued T-Mobile in 2011, but lost out in the end to AT&T — which failed to complete the deal after the Justice Department sued to block that combination. • In 2014, Sprint, now owned by Masayoshi Son’s SoftBank, held talks with T-Mobile, but eventually broke off the discussions after Washington regulators hinted strongly that they would move to block a union. • The two companies tried again in 2017, but this time the talks — which culminated over dinner at Mr. Son’s home in Tokyo — fell apart because of disagreements about control over the combined company. But there’s little surprise that the companies wouldn’t give up on a deal. Mr. Son pursued Sprint in the first place with the idea of merging it with T-Mobile, creating a stronger competitor to Verizon and AT&T. But since SoftBank’s acquisition, Sprint has continued to labor under an enormous debt load and has struggled to catch up to T-Mobile as the most popular low-cost carrier. Sprint's operating income declined over the course of last year to $648 million in its fourth quarter. It also has reported losses in all but two quarters since 2015 (its $7.2 billion profit in the fourth quarter arose from the Republican tax overhaul). T-Mobile, by contrast, has done better, having gained customers by emphasizing its low prices and network improvements. Its operating income in the fourth quarter came to $950 million, while its net income totaled $2.7 billion (another beneficiary of the tax cuts). — Michael J. de la Merced The report in The New York Times that the F.B.I. seized records from the office of President Trump’s longtime lawyer Michael D. Cohen raises a host of issues about how prosecutors might be able to review those materials. One challenge will be dealing with the attorney-client privilege, which shields communications between lawyers and clients from any outside review. Under Justice Department guidelines, when a lawyer’s office is search there must be procedures in place “to ensure that privileged materials are not improperly viewed, seized or retained.” One means to deal with privilege issues is to put in place a “taint team,” consisting of agents and government attorneys who are not part of the underlying investigation to review the seized materials to determine what is arguably privileged. Once that determination is made, Mr. Cohen can argue that privileged materials should be returned because they are protected. Despite President Trump’s tweet that “the attorney-client privilege is dead,” the protection remains in place. But there is an important way around the privilege that the Justice Department may pursue. Under a doctrine called the crime-fraud exception, communications between a client and lawyer designed to assist the client to engage in a pending or future crime are not protected by the privilege. The government would not have to prove a crime to avoid the privilege, only that there is enough evidence to support a reasonable belief that an otherwise privileged communication was for the purpose of committing a criminal or fraudulent act. In fact, under the Supreme Court’s decision in United States v. Zolin, prosecutors could ask a judge to review the communications privately to decide whether they may yield evidence of a potential crime or fraud. This is a slow process, likely to drag out for months. But don’t be surprised to see the Justice Department claiming that communications with Mr. Cohen were made for a criminal or fraudulent purpose – whatever that might be. — Peter J. Henning An interesting dissenter: One critic of Mr. Trump’s contention that the Cohen raids violated attorney-client privilege is George Conway, who’s of counsel at Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz — and the husband of Kellyanne Conway. (For non-lawyers: Mr. Conway’s link points to the Justice Department’s policies for conducting searches of lawyers.) The Congressional Budget Office now says that by 2027, the United States’ budget deficit will be $1.6 trillion larger than it previously expected, thanks in part to President Trump’s tax overhaul, which sharply cuts revenues. But close observers of the Treasury bond market — where Uncle Sam will have to turn to borrow the money it needs to cover those budget gaps — say it will doubtless be much higher. Goldman Sachs economists point out that the C.B.O.’s projections only extrapolate discretionary spending increases through 2019 fiscal year, whereas the bank’s analysis points to more spending through 2021 fiscal year, raising the Goldman’s deficit projections higher. Elsewhere, Jefferies economists noted that the analysis from the C.B.O. doesn’t take into account the Federal Reserve’s gradual reduction of the amount of government bonds it is holding, which means that the Treasury has to replace the Fed as a buyer. All else equal, the disappearance of a buyer like the Fed — which can create as much money as it needs — along with surging supply of Treasury borrowing needed to cover deepening deficits should add up one thing: Sharply higher interest rates. — Matt Phillips Critics’ corner:  The Peterson Foundation said, “It’s clear that lawmakers have added significantly more debt on top of an already unsustainable trajectory.” Harm Bandholz of UniCredit said, “The C.B.O. strongly contradicts the administration’s claim that the stimulus will pay for itself.” • A year before Apollo Global Management lent millions of dollars to Kushner Companies, Jared Kushner reportedly approached its co-founder Josh Harris about leading the Office of Management and Budget. (The Guardian) • Investors are looking for a “Kudlow put” or a “Powell put.” (The Upshot) • Russian markets, bonds and the ruble plunged yesterday after the U.S. imposed new sanctions. (NYT) • Gov. Rick Scott’s run for Senate in Florida could hurt Democrats nationwide: It’s an expensive market, he’s rich, and he’s ready to spend. (Politico) • Qatar may be bringing President Trump around to its point of view on the blockade against it. (NYT) Gary Shteyngart’s New Yorker profile of Mike Novogratz — hard-partying financier turned accidental cryptocurrency evangelist — is worth a read. Some notable lines: • “Some of Novogratz’s fellow hedge funders have questioned his grasp of the finer details of his trading strategies. ‘He acts like a visionary, but at heart he’s still a salesman,’ one manager told me.” • Novogratz is said to consider himself “halfway between center-left and progressive,” and “During my lunch with him at the Mercer Kitchen, he told me, ‘I’ve always said I’d run for office if I had a five-year period in my life where really I felt, like, Hey, my behavior is laudable.’” Public negotiations between the corporate siblings have intensified. Viacom’s counterproposal — 0.68 of a CBS share for every Viacom share, or $14.7 billion; CBS had offered 0.55, or $11.9 billion — is likely to be rejected. Price may be less of a sticking point, however, than CBS’s insistence on keeping its chief operating officer, Joe Ianniello, in the No. 2 spot after a merger. That’s the job Viacom wants for its C.E.O., Bob Bakish. Michael has heard that this is a serious disagreement, with little movement toward a compromise as yet. • The Justice Department has reportedly approved Bayer’s $56 billion purchase of Monsanto after the companies agreed to sell more businesses. (WSJ) • Ant Financial is reportedly raising another $9 billion, making it the world’s biggest unicorn. (WSJ) • How Saudi Arabia’s Tadawul stock exchange — current value listed: $500 billion — is preparing to host Aramco, at a valuation of up to $2 trillion. (WSJ) • Uber has agreed to buy Jump, a maker of electric (sorry, “pedal-assist”) bikes after the two tested a bike-sharing program in January. (NYT) • Elliott Management has raised its stake in Telecom Italia to 9 percent ahead of a vote at the company’s board on May 4. (FT) • I.P.O. corner: Why the San Mateo Superior Court, Calif., hears so many cases about listings. Regulations might not be responsible for a drop in U.S. publicly traded companies. And a plan to turn Eminem royalties into a publicly traded company has collapsed. The Information and Social Capital just released their third survey of diversity at the big tech investment firms. Key findings: • Canvas Ventures and Kirsten Green’s Forerunner Ventures tied for first place on The Information’s V.C. Diversity Index. Tied for last: Tiger Global Management and Slow Ventures. • The number of women in senior positions at U.S. venture firms rose to 14.2 percent last year, from 10.7 percent. The percentage of Hispanic decision makers rose to 2.3 percent from 1.9 percent, while that of black senior leaders stayed roughly flat at just over 1 percent. On April 14 at 5 p.m., hear from Chobani’s founder and C.E.O., Hamdi Ulukaya, who has resurrected economies in two communities and made headlines for his leadership practices. He’ll be interviewed by David Gelles for a live version of the Corner Office column. DealBook readers get $10 off tickets. • Galaxy Digital, the cryptocurrency start-up run by Mike Novogratz, has hired a C.O.O.: Richard Kim, most recently a London-based V.P. at Goldman Sachs. (Bloomberg) • Glencore’s C.E.O., Ivan Glasenberg, has left Rusal’s board after the Russian aluminum producer was sanctioned by the U.S. (CNBC) • Coinbase has hired Rachael Horwitz, formerly head of marketing at Spark Capital, as its first V.P. of communications. (Recode) • The C.E.O. of Gizmodo Media Group, Raju Narisetti, has left, as Univision reportedly considers deep cuts. (The Daily Beast) • The Consumer Financial Protection Bureau is seeking a record fine against Wells Fargo for abuses in auto insurance and mortgage lending, unnamed sources said. (Reuters) • Investors from the Middle East and Asia have offered about $25 billion to buy an expanded version of FIFA’s Club World Cup. (NYT) • The S.E.C. has widened the definitions of “micromanaging” and business relevance, making it harder for shareholders to put up proxy resolutions. (WaPo) • Elon Musk likes it in Adelaide, but the Australian city hasn’t fully transformed manufacturing decline into technological progress. (NYT) • WPP is expected to publish the findings of its Martin Sorrell investigation next week. (Reuters) • Wynn Resorts has created a culture and community department after its sexual misconduct scandal. (WSJ) • Pressure is mounting on Deutsche Bank’s chairman, Paul Achleitner, over the messy sacking of John Cryan and the rush to replace him with Christian Sewing. (FT) • The European Court of Justice ruled that the French government had the right to ban some transport services, including Uber, without notifying European officials first. (FT) We’d love your feedback. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com. "
nyt://interactive/982a191e-932b-5b04-b42f-339ddc408d33,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2020/climate/earth-day-history.html,2020-04-22T01:52:16+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Air Pollution', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Endangered and Extinct Species', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Greenhouse Gas Emissions', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Global Warming', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Earth Day', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"
  
Here are 10 big environmental victories — and 10 big failures.
 
  
  
By Brad Plumer and John Schwartz | Graphics by Nadja Popovich | Illustrations by Mathilde Aubier
 
  
  
April 21, 2020
 
  
	Earth Day turns 50 today. The original wave of coast-to-coast demonstrations in 1970 not only transformed American priorities, leading to landmark legislation like the Clean Air Act, but helped shape the modern global environmental movement.
 
	In the past half-century, air and water pollution have plummeted in the United States, the bald eagle is no longer endangered, and environmental laws pioneered in America have set a model for nations around the world. But since then, other threats have grown, including climate change, tropical deforestation and a staggering loss of global biodiversity.
 
	Here is a look at what’s gotten better and what’s gotten worse in the five decades since millions of people marched to demand a cleaner, healthier environment.
 
	In 1969, oil-soaked debris on the Cuyahoga River near Cleveland briefly caught fire. The blaze was small, and extinguished quickly, but consequential: It became a galvanizing symbol for a clean-water movement at the heart of the first Earth Day.
 
	The nation’s waterways were astonishingly dirty at that time. Cities large and small were flushing raw sewage into rivers without treating it. One study found that 90 percent of drinking water systems in eight metro areas had excess levels of microbes of the sort that were making people ill by the thousands.
 
	“There was a sense that rivers and lakes had just become sewers,” said Adam Rome, a historian at the University at Buffalo.
 
	Time magazine in 1969 captured the filthy state of the nation’s water in an exposé that highlighted the fire on the Cuyahoga, elevating the blaze to legendary status (even though river fires were a fading problem by then, thanks to local efforts).
 
	Congress soon accelerated the cleanup. The Clean Water Act of 1972 restricted the dumping of waste and led to more than $650 billion in spending on treatment plants. Today, places like Boston Harbor, once a stew of toxic chemicals, are home once again to striped bass, seals and even whales.
 
	Plenty of problems linger. The Environmental Protection Agency still classifies a significant fraction of rivers and streams as “impaired,” though over all, the nation’s waterways are significantly cleaner. And today there is a new water concern: The health of the high seas.
 
	Back then, all eyes were on rivers. Today, a bigger concern is the world’s oceans.
 
	A major reason is global warming, which was barely on the nation’s radar in 1970. Ocean temperatures have soared in recent decades, because of increases in heat-trapping greenhouse gases from vehicles and power plants. Many of the richest coral reefs, including the Great Barrier Reef off the coast of Australia, now suffer frequent die-offs.
 400 zettajoules Estimated heat accumulation in the world’s oceans  versus the atmosphere, land and ice 300 200 Oceans 100 Atmosphere, land, ice 1990 2000 2010 1960 1970 1980 400 zettajoules Estimated heat accumulation in the world’s oceans versus the atmosphere, land and ice 300 200 Oceans 100 Atmosphere, land, ice 1990 2010 1970 
	There is a wealth of evidence, which didn’t exist during the first Earth Day, that climate change is imperiling a vast array of marine life. By the early 2000s, scientists realized that carbon dioxide emissions from industrial activity would make the oceans dangerously more acidic, throwing ecosystems into disarray.
 
	Fish populations are now declining in many parts of the world as waters warm. Combined with unsustainable fishing practices, that could threaten food supplies and livelihoods.
 
	After Earth Day, environmentalists and policymakers concluded that local efforts were insufficient to clean America’s rivers and lakes. Similarly today, experts say that no single country alone can solve the oceans’ problems. Instead, nations need to work together to limit plastic pollution, rein in overfishing and reduce greenhouse gas emissions to reduce the pressure on marine life.
 
	You know those photos we see today of polluted air above the cities of India and Eastern Europe?
 
	It used to be like that in the United States: Pollution thick enough to blot out the sun.
 
	In the 1940s, Pittsburgh was so dark it kept the street lamps on during the day. And in New York City in the decade before 1970, deaths from emphysema rose 500 percent. Air pollution was increasingly considered a key factor. “On the autopsy table, it’s unmistakable,” a city medical examiner said at the time. “The person who spent his life in the Adirondacks has nice pink lungs. The city dweller’s are black as coal.”
 
	A few months after the first Earth Day, Congress passed the Clean Air Act, one of the most far-reaching environmental laws in American history. It was part of a wave of government action that would include the creation of the Environmental Protection Agency.
 
	Since then, air quality in the United States has improved tremendously, which has been a boon for public health. Power plants and factories have had to adopt scrubbers and other techniques to clean up emissions. And while automakers initially resisted, they eventually agreed to install technologies like catalytic converters to remove exhaust pollutants.
 
	Today, cars are cleaner. Acid rain has become a trivia question. The E.P.A. estimates that hundreds of thousands of lives were saved in 2020 alone because of the Clean Air Act. And although industry groups initially said regulations would impose crippling burdens, the costs of compliance haven’t kept the economy from growing.
 
	Even so, the E.P.A. says that more than 110 million Americans still live in counties with unhealthy pollution today. And since 2016, particulate pollution has begun to tick back up.
 
	Now, about the air in China, India and other developing countries.
 
	Things have gotten bad.
 
	Part of the backdrop for the first Earth Day was that, by 1970, many Americans had become financially secure enough, thanks to decades of economic growth, to focus on curbing the pollution caused by industrial progress.
 
	But it has taken longer for other countries to reach that tipping point.
 Fine particulate matter pollution around the world In China, air quality has improved but remains poor. Northern India regularly sees hazardous spikes in pollution. More pollution Fine particulate matter pollution around the world In China, air quality has improved but remains poor. Northern India regularly sees hazardous spikes in pollution. More pollution Fine particulate matter pollution hotspots More pollution China Northern India 
	In China, which has built several hundred coal plants since the 1990s, air pollution is reducing life expectancy by about three years on average, one study estimated. In New Delhi, the air became so foul in 2019 that officials declared an emergency, closing schools and distributing millions of face masks. In Poland, aging cars and coal plants have smothered cities in smog.
 
	There are signs of change: China has begun restricting vehicles and coal plants around cities like Beijing. India is investing heavily in solar power.
 
	Still, there’s a long way to go. The World Health Organization estimates that air pollution causes about 7 million premature deaths annually worldwide — more than those from AIDS, malaria and tuberculosis combined.
 
	From the start, oil has been a dirty business.
 
	The immense gusher at Spindletop, Texas, in 1901, the dawn of the modern age of oil, created a mess so sprawling that “the countryside and crops for miles around were covered with a blanket of oil,” Stephen Harrigan wrote in “Big Wonderful Thing: A History of Texas.”
 
	The oil barons were not environmentalists, and the nation was hungry for energy.
 
	But in 1969, a blowout off the coast of Santa Barbara changed all that, befouling 35 miles of California coastline, sparking national outrage and serving as a catalyst for the first Earth Day. The disaster helped drive dozens of state and federal environmental laws, as well as curbs on offshore drilling.
 
	Despite that, we still see horrific damage including the Exxon Valdez oil spill in Prince William Sound, Alaska, in 1989, and the Deepwater Horizon disaster in the Gulf of Mexico 10 years ago this month. Overall, though, “the annual number and volume of oil spills have shown declines — in some cases, dramatic declines,” according to a  2017 Congressional Research Service report.
 
	Back then, it was an oil-spill crisis that rallied attention. Today, it’s the climate crisis.
 
	Between 1970 and 2018, the global use of fossil fuels like coal, oil and natural gas more than doubled.
 
	While that energy has helped lift more than a billion people out of poverty, the burning of fossil fuels releases carbon dioxide, a greenhouse gas that is warming the planet — a threat not as widely appreciated during the first Earth Day.
 
	Scientists have known since the 19th century that shifts in carbon dioxide levels could cause planetary warming. Since then, the scientific evidence has only firmed up that human activity, particularly the burning of fossil fuels, is warming the planet. “It is already happening now,” the NASA scientist James Hansen told Congress in 1988.
 
	Earth has now warmed roughly 1 degree Celsius (1.8 degrees Fahrenheit) since the dawn of the industrial age, and will heat up further unless nations limit and ultimately reverse the rise in emissions. That means finding alternatives to fossil fuels such as oil.
 
	Failure to do so looks ugly. The United Nations scientific panel on climate change said in 2018 that, without aggressive action, many millions more people worldwide could soon be exposed to life-threatening heat waves, water shortages and coastal flooding.
 
	In recent years, renewable energy sources, notably wind turbines and solar panels, have become credible alternatives to fossil fuels, thanks to tumbling costs.
 
	One result: Some now say climate change might not be as intractable a problem as it once seemed. Al Gore, the former vice president who’s been issuing warnings about climate change for years, said in 2015 the sudden viability of renewables had given him new optimism. “I think most people have been surprised, even shocked, by how quickly the cost has come down,” he said.
 
	It’s quite a shift from 50 years ago. Back then, energy options were largely limited to burning fossil fuels or building nuclear power plants or immense hydropower projects. The latter two often sparked controversy: Think Three Mile Island, or the nasty fights over dams that submerged communities.
 
	Wind and solar were considered fringe during the first Earth Day. Only after the oil crises of the 1970s did policymakers start seriously promoting renewable energy, and those efforts took decades to gain traction. In 1979, President Jimmy Carter installed 32 solar panels on the White House roof to heat water. Two years later, Ronald Reagan ordered their removal.
 
	Today, both wind and solar are mainstream.
 
	The cost of solar panels has fallen more than 99 percent since 1975, and in some regions it has become cheaper to build new wind or solar farms than it is to operate existing coal plants. Solar and wind supplied 6 percent of the world’s electricity in 2017 and are growing at double-digit annual rates.
 
	Wind turbines, solar panels and electric cars may be gaining acceptance, but they aren’t growing nearly fast enough to break humanity’s addiction to fossil fuels.
 
	Solving climate change remains a herculean challenge, and the world still isn’t close.
 
	To achieve the goal set by the world’s governments — keeping total global warming well below 2 degrees Celsius (3.6 degrees Fahrenheit) — scientists say that greenhouse gas emissions from coal, oil and natural gas will need to peak within a decade and then rapidly decline to zero well before the end of the century. But the International Energy Agency recently said emissions were still on track to rise for another 20 years.
 15,000 million tons oil equivalent Renewable energy consumption worldwide versus all other fuels Solar, wind  and other Hydroelectric 10,000 Natural gas Nuclear Coal 5,000 Oil 1965 2018 15,000 million tons oil equivalent Solar, wind  and other Renewable energy consumption worldwide versus all other fuels Hydroelectric 10,000 Natural gas Nuclear Coal 5,000 Oil 1965 2018 
	While renewable energy has been growing, that’s been offset somewhat by the decline of nuclear power. And global energy demand keeps growing rapidly, particularly in emerging economies. That means fossil fuel use has continued rising to fill the gap.
 
	To meet the world’s climate goals, experts say, most countries would need to set much more aggressive policies. Those might include taxing carbon dioxide emissions, investing more heavily in clean energy and efficiency, and curbing methane leaks from oil and gas operations.
 
	There have been positive steps. The European Union and California, for instance, have set goals of net zero emissions by 2050.
 
	Nevertheless, China, the world’s largest emitter, has resisted setting a date for zero emissions. And in the United States, the world’s second largest source of carbon pollution, the Trump administration has disavowed action on climate change.
 
	Before the first Earth Day, there was the pioneering environmental journalist Rachel Carson. She wrote about the threat of pesticides like DDT in her 1962 bestseller “Silent Spring.”
 
	Chemical companies attacked her, but her work helped inspire the first Earth Day: Organizers demanded that DDT be banned, alongside calls for the removal of lead from paint and gasoline. Lead use was common at the time, although there is no safe level of exposure, and children are particularly vulnerable.
 
	In 1972 the newly created Environmental Protection Agency prohibited DDT. A year later, the E.P.A. announced rules to gradually phase out lead from gasoline. The government later tackled other sources of exposure, banning the sale of lead paint in 1978 and lead plumbing in 1986.
 
	Actions like these paid off. Between the late 1970s and 2016, the lead level in the blood of most Americans dropped by nearly 94 percent.
 
	Still, in some parts of the United States, lead in drinking water remains a threat from old pipes still in use. In Flint, Mich., some samples have shown 100 times the level set by the E.P.A. to trigger government response. Similar spikes have occurred in Washington, D.C., and Newark, N.J.
 
	Those early successes gave way to endless arguments over many other chemicals and whether  to restrict them or not.
 
	Congress passed the Toxic Substances Control Act in 1976. President Gerald Ford said the law would provide “broad discretionary authority to protect the health and environment,” and the E.P.A. over time developed a list of 85,000 chemicals in commercial use.
 
	Not all of those are hazardous, of course. But known toxic chemicals like methylene chloride, a paint stripper linked to dozens of deaths, and TCE, a degreaser associated with cancer, have been caught up in battles between regulators and industry over restricting their use.
 
	Why the slow progress? Not only did the law provide little power to the E.P.A. for curtailing toxic chemicals, but courts later enfeebled the agency further. Two years after regulators banned most products that contained asbestos in 1989, a federal appeals court overturned much of the rule.
 
	Congress toughened the law in 2016 when it passed requirements that the E.P.A. evaluate untested chemicals. Under President Trump, however, the E.P.A. postponed long-sought bans on three chemicals used in consumer products that have been tied to inhalation deaths, cancer and birth defects.
 
	The administration also weakened a proposed standard for cleaning up drinking water polluted with the chemicals commonly known as PFAS, and rejected the advice of its own chemical safety experts who in the previous administration had recommended banning the commercial use of the insecticide chlorpyrifos. These are just some of nearly 100 environmental rollbacks under the Trump administration.
 
	The California condor. The bald eagle. The Florida manatee.
 
	By the time of the first Earth Day, all these species were facing shocking declines.
 
	In 1967, for the first time, the Interior Department officially listed 78 bird, fish and mammal species as “endangered,” but the agency lacked the authority to protect them.
 
	One of the major legacies of the first Earth Day was a strengthened Endangered Species Act. In 1973, Congress dramatically expanded the law, giving the government more power to restrict activities that could harm at-risk species.
 
	The act has scored some striking successes: More than 1,700 plants and animals have since been protected under the law and roughly 99 percent have avoided extinction. The bald eagle has rebounded impressively in the lower 48 states, going from just 487 nesting pairs in the 1960s to more than 11,000 by 2007 (although the ban on DDT, which had weakened eagles’ egg shells, also gets credit there).
 
	Grizzly bears, gray wolves, whooping cranes and California sea otters have all increased in number since gaining protections.
 
	But there have also been plenty of challenges.
 
	Critics point out that, to date, fewer than 50 species listed under the act have recovered to the point where they no longer need protection. Industry groups and landowners have often argued that the law can impose unreasonable costs on them, while the Trump administration and some Republicans in Congress have pushed to overhaul the act, arguing that it unduly restricts ranching, logging and oil drilling.
 
	And dozens of species have gone extinct while awaiting the sometimes protracted decision on whether they warranted protection.
 
	Despite successes in saving individual species from near-extinction, like the whooping crane, the world is still losing natural habitat at an astonishing rate.
 
	Scientists warn that as many as one million plant and animal species could face extinction in the decades ahead, as a result of ever-expanding farming, ranching, logging, hunting, fishing and mining worldwide.
 
	Since 1970, the World Wildlife Fund estimates, the sizes of thousands of different wildlife populations have declined by 60 percent on average. In Indonesia, the replacement of rain forest with palm oil plantations has ravaged the habitat of endangered orangutans and Sumatran tigers. In Mozambique, ivory poachers helped kill nearly 7,000 elephants between 2009 and 2011 alone.
 
	And a new threat has emerged: Global warming is shifting or shrinking the local climates that various creatures and plants have evolved to survive in.
 
	Last year, a comprehensive scientific assessment from the United Nations warned that unless nations step up their efforts to protect what natural habitats are left, they could witness the disappearance of 40 percent of amphibian species, one-third of marine mammals and one-third of reef-forming corals.
 
	The authors of that report noted that the risk to biodiversity has become so severe that piecemeal efforts to protect individual species may no longer be sufficient. They called for “transformative changes” that include lowering consumption, slimming down agriculture’s environmental footprint and cracking down on illegal logging and fishing.
 
	Around the world, efforts to create vast protected areas have accelerated.
 
	Nations like Costa Rica and Kenya have realized that wildlife refuges can become tourist attractions and moneymakers. In 1992, under the Convention on Biological Diversity, 168 countries vowed to do more; today they have protected more than 15 percent of the world’s land and 7 percent of its oceans by setting up nature reserves and wilderness areas.
 
	At the same time, some countries have had success in returning once-degraded landscapes back to nature. In Europe, woodland areas have increased by roughly 35,000 square miles since 1990, an area the size of Portugal. China has engaged in a major reforestation campaign in recent decades.
 
	Satellite images show that, since 1982, the world has seen a net increase in forest cover.
 
	This year, the nations of the world plan to update the Convention on Biological Diversity. Experts warn that they’ll need to greatly expand protected areas in order to avoid an extinction crisis. That might mean setting aside 30 percent or even fully half of the Earth for nature, although anything remotely approaching that scale would pose big challenges. What about the people who depend on those lands for livelihood?
 
	Meanwhile, the reforestation trend itself isn’t entirely positive. Some of the new forests planted in recent years have far less biodiversity than old-growth forests. What’s more, in some areas forests are expanding because global warming has enabled trees to grow in places they previously couldn’t.
 
	And, of course, tropical rainforests continue to suffer serious declines.
 
	Tropical forests are home to at least half of all species on Earth. They are crucial to regulating the planet’s climate.
 
	And they are being cut down at a dramatic rate.
 
	In 2018, about 30 million acres were lost, down only slightly from similar losses in 2016 and 2017. Efforts to slow this have been mixed.
 
	In the Brazilian Amazon, deforestation declined 70 percent between 2005 and 2014 as governments toughened their oversight and farmers found ways to increase their yields without needing to clear more land. And since 2016, Indonesia has worked to slow the spread of palm oil and paper plantations.
 
	But those gains show signs of eroding. Brazil’s leader, Jair Bolsanaro, has pledged to open more of the Amazon to business, and deforestation there is rising again. Indonesia’s recent forest protections have been offset by accelerated loss in Ghana, Ivory Coast and elsewhere.
 
	Scientists say it will be extremely difficult to tame global warming without limiting tropical forest loss. Trees pull carbon dioxide out of the air and store it in their wood and soil. Cutting and burning those trees releases that carbon, warming the planet. By one estimate, tropical deforestation now creates more emissions each year than the entire European Union.
 
	Some countries like Norway and Japan have offered tropical nations billions of dollars to preserve their forests, but progress has been limited. “We’re trying to put out a house fire with a teaspoon,” Frances Seymour, a senior fellow at the World Resources Institute, said in 2018.
 
	Four years after the first Earth Day, scientists warned of a new threat to the planet.
 
	The threat came from hair spray.
 
	Gases released by aerosol cans, they said, were “depleting the ozone layer” that envelops the planet and protects against ultraviolet radiation, which can contribute to skin cancer and damage crops.
 
	By 1977 the U.S. government had banned the chemicals in spray cans. But, of course, threats to the ozone layer weren’t only in aerosol cans; chlorofluorocarbons could be found in air conditioners, refrigerators and elsewhere.
 
	So the spray-can ban wasn’t enough, and by 1985 researchers had discovered a “hole” in the ozone layer. That led to one of the great moments of global environmental unity: The Montreal Protocol, signed by the nations of the world in 1987 to phase out CFCs altogether.
 
	The treaty largely worked. In 2018, NASA said the treaty had led to a sharp decline in ozone depletion, according to years of satellite analysis.
 
	Still, recovery is slow. “Think of it like a patient with a disease,” said Susan Solomon, an atmospheric chemist at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, in a 2016 interview. Healing takes years as the molecules already in the atmosphere slowly break down.
 
	And people cheat.
 
Monitoring in 2013 showed that progress was slowing; it seemed that factories in China were likely making more CFCs. But then, last year, the numbers were declining again, suggesting China had cracked down.
 
 
	Nations teamed up to fix the hole in the ozone layer. So why can’t they do the same for climate change?
 
	In other words, why not get all the countries to agree to phase out the greenhouse gases that are warming the planet, much like they did with the CFCs that were creating a big ozone hole?
 2019 +1.0°C Global average temperature difference compared to the middle of the 20th century +0.5° –0.5° 1880 1900 1920 1940 1960 1980 2000 2019 +1.0°C Global average temperature difference compared to the middle of the 20th century +0.5° –0.5° 1880 1920 1960 2000 
	To some extent, this is what the 2015 Paris climate agreement tried to do. Nearly 200 countries came together to set broad goals for reducing greenhouse gases.
 
	But there are key differences: Unlike the earlier ozone treaty, which set mandatory deadlines for each country to phase out CFCs, the Paris climate agreement allows nations to chart their own course with voluntary goals. Some nations are still struggling to meet even those modest, self-imposed pledges, while President Trump is withdrawing the United States from the agreement altogether.
 
	As it turns out, phasing out greenhouse gases is a vastly more complicated task. By the time nations were ready to ban CFCs, there were readily available substitutes, allowing companies to make relatively easy swaps. By contrast, shifting away from fossil fuels will require transforming how we produce electricity and transport people and goods around the world. It will mean changing how we farm, eat, dress ourselves, build things, and more.
 
	There’s not one simple technological fix. The global economy will need a rethink.
 
	One of the starkest warnings of the 1970s was that there were simply too many people, and not enough food. Widely read books like “The Population Bomb” warned of the collapse of civilization.
 
	Things didn’t turn out that way.
 
	The world’s population has more than doubled since 1970, to nearly 7.8 billion people. Yet the share of people living in extreme poverty has plummeted.
 
	How did the world avoid mass famine? Technology helped. Researchers developed high-yielding crops, and today’s farmers can grow more than twice as much corn, rice and wheat on a given area of land, on average, than in 1970.
 
	Population growth has also slowed. In the 1960s, the world’s population was rising by about 2 percent annually. But as societies get wealthier and better educated, people tend to have fewer kids. Today, the growth rate is about 1 percent per year and falling.
 
	Granted, not all the fears were baseless. As populations have risen, the natural world around us has often suffered, and we are warming the planet at a dangerous pace.
 
	But the conversation has changed dramatically. Fifty years ago, there was mainstream alarm about population growth, which led to sterilization campaigns and other gruesome policies. Today, that message is virtually absent from environmentalism.
 
	By 2050, the United Nations projects that the world will be home to nearly 10 billion people, up from “just” 7.8 billion today.
 
	One of the big challenges will be to keep feeding everyone without further damaging the natural world. That’s a daunting task.
 
	Already, global food production occupies about half of all habitable land, generates about one-quarter of humanity’s greenhouse gas emissions and is a major factor behind the decline of biodiversity worldwide. If farmers continue meeting growing demand by clearing forests and other ecosystems, as they’ve done in the past, it would transform an area twice the size of India. That, in turn, could make it impossible to keep climate change in check.
 
	Making things tougher, global warming is expected to put new stress on crops and reduce water supplies in many countries.
 
	One recent study by the World Resources Institute found that it’s technically possible for the world to keep feeding everyone by 2050 without vast ecological destruction. But doing so would require a sweeping shift in agricultural practices — involving everything from developing new technologies to simply wasting less food. How much is wasted? In the United States, about one-third of the food supply, according to the federal government.
 
	The first Earth Day was a defining moment in the great American experiment. Twenty million people nationwide — at the time, roughly one in 10 citizens — took part.
 
	You can see the descendents of Earth Day activism today in protests over fossil fuel infrastructure like the Dakota Access Pipeline at Standing Rock, or in the support for people like Greta Thunberg, the Swedish teenager who last September helped inspire millions of people to march worldwide in protest of climate change.
 
	Last year the Pew Research Center reported that nearly 70 percent of Americans said the government was not doing enough to protect the water quality of lakes, rivers and streams, or to protect air quality. And this year, Pew reported that, for the first time in two decades, a majority of Americans believed dealing with climate change should be a top priority for the president and Congress, a 14-point rise from just four years ago.
 
	In the 1970s, environmentalism was overwhelmingly bipartisan.
 
	Democrats and Republicans worked together to create the Clean Water Act, the Clean Air Act and the E.P.A.
 
	Today that kind of teamwork seems all but unthinkable. While research by Pew shows that voters’ interest in climate and environmental issues is soaring, it also reveals an astonishing split: More than 75 percent of Democrats called climate change a top policy priority, while less than 25 percent of Republicans did.
 
	Fossil fuel companies and political donors have funded denial of the overwhelming evidence for climate change, and the message has been successful with conservative politicians and voters. The Trump administration is trying to roll back regulations around climate change as well as broader environmental measures.
 
	Still, there are some signs the split isn’t as intractable as it seems.
 
	Renewable energy sources like wind and solar have been embraced in red states as well. Disasters fueled by climate change, such as flooding and wildfires, are forcing politicians to confront the reality of global warming. And voters are noticing: According to the Yale Program on Climate Change Communications, majorities of people surveyed in every congressional district in the country say that climate change is occurring.
 
	But perhaps the simplest reason to think the partisan divide could soften may be the younger generation. Some 52 percent of Republicans between 18 and 38 feel the government is doing too little on climate, Pew said last year, making the issue an electoral time bomb for the party.
 
	Whether that leads to a revival of bipartisan environmentalism is yet to be seen. For now, the coronavirus pandemic could well reshape national priorities for a time. But when that disaster has passed, the fact remains: We’re warming the world and without forceful action, the crisis will get worse.
 For the 50th anniversary of Earth Day, The New York Times is bringing you The Greenhouse, a five-part digital event series on climate change. Join us for a live video call on Friday at 11:30 a.m. Eastern with Times climate journalist John Schwartz as he speaks with Denis Hayes, the co-founder of Earth Day, and young climate leaders to talk about what’s better and what’s worse 50 years after the first Earth Day. Additional photo credits: Bengal tiger, Navesh Chitrakar/Reuters; Galápagos tortoise, Rodrigo Buendia/AFP/Getty Images; Galápagos penguins, Josh Haner/The New York Times Because of incorrect information supplied by the photo agency, a picture with an earlier version of this article did not reflect the correct time period. The initial picture of the New York City skyline was from the 1930s or 40s, not 1973. It has been replaced. "
nyt://paidpost/803edb38-401d-5f93-a16e-e442d753bde5,https://www.nytimes.com/paidpost/td-ameritrade/tired-stressed-check-your-wallet.html,2019-09-11T01:40:47+0000,paidpost,,6515,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'TD Ameritrade Holding Corp.', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"TD Ameritrade Paid Post Share TALKING GREEN PODCAST | EPISODE 6 How is financial stress different from regular stress — and what is it doing to our brains and our bodies? Host Mike Norton wraps up the first season with a focus on financial well being, and how to use money as a source of happiness. Go back to homepage 00:00   AS: [music] Mike, can I tell you about a stressful time in my life?   MN: Yes, please.   AS: I went to college in Scotland. And I had finished and I was needing to move back to New York and my moving budget, because I'd run out of money, was $150 for a transatlantic move. And I remember just being like, ""I don't know how I'm gonna get this to America."" And then I found this guy who lived in Glasgow, and he said something in between all the garbled Scottish accent about $100, and he'd come pick it up. And six months later, they showed up and, in very rough shape, but you know, they made it. And I did manage to do a transatlantic move for 100 bucks.   MN: Are you gonna do your Scottish accent for us now? Or is that ... That just reminded me of, in my, I think similar time in my life, in my first job, I was a paralegal, and they very kindly opened up a 401(k) for me, automatically. And I used to track my 401(k) every single day. And one day I lost literally half of my net worth. And I felt like, ruined. Like it was like the Great Depression kind of story. In retrospect,  01:00   I had about $200 in my 401(k). So I lost about $100. But again, at the time, it was a huge, huge deal because it really did feel like half of my life savings had gone. And the stress of that was actually really, really hard to deal with.   AS: Well, I mean, half your life savings was gone, so I think that stress was justified. [laughter]  MN: Of course, we can worry and stress about so many things. And literally, there's unlimited number of things that we can worry and stress about, but it does feel like from our stories, and talking to other people that financial stress, worry about money, and stress about money seems to have this really unique, negative effect on us. And that's exactly what we're going to talk about in this episode.  01:38   [music]  01:46   MN: I'm Mike Norton, and I'm the host of Talking Green. I'm also a social psychologist at Harvard Business School, and I study the way people behave, and misbehave. On Talking Green we explore how psychological forces drive attitudes and decisions around money and investing. This episode, like every episode,  02:00   I'm joined by Allison Schrager, an economist, journalist and culture maven. She's the author of the recent book, An Economist Walks Into a Brothel.   AS: Hey Mike, today we're talking about the idea of financial wellness and how financial stress affects us all. Emotionally, of course, but also physically. Money stress may make us less healthy. But there are some ways to flip the script and we'll learn how we can use money to improve our health and well being.  MN: This is Talking Green.  AS: An original podcast from TD Ameritrade and T Brand Studio at The New York Times.  02:30   MN: So we are going to chat today about the huge rise in wellness in general, and in particular in financial wellness. But before we get into that, I want to ask you if you know what, I apologize to people listening who actually know how to pronounce it, ""hygge"" is?  AS: I do not.   [laughter]  MN: My understanding is it's this Danish concept of coziness.   AS: Oh.   MN: So the idea is that your environment is structured in a  03:00   way that makes you feel, and again, I realize these aren't the right words, but they're not a good translation, sort of like, snugly, [laughs] sort of the way to think of that. If you think of Danish design, it has this sense of kind of, comfort, and kind of, safety, in the design. I think it's interesting to think about that desire that we seem to have for that feeling of being sort of protected and comfy. I think this is the best word in English that we have for that. And how that plays out in our financial lives as well. So what are we looking for that, that comfiness in our financial lives and how does it affect our behavior?   AS: Well, I guess the equivalent is a big bank balance. [laughter] Right? 'Cause nothing gives you comfort like knowing you have enough money to pay for stuff.  MN: What about like a snuggly bank mascot [laughter] that you could take home? No, not as good?  AS: Um, but the, I mean that, that is a beautiful concept because financial wellness to me means security. Knowing that you can survive your car breaking down, you needing to fix your hot water heater,  04:00   relieves a lot of stress. And there's a lot of comfort.   MN: Hmm. Let's take people who have enough in the bank where if things go wrong, their car breaks down, that they'd be able to cover it. Even though technically, an accountant might say you're okay, they still experience the world as though it's really, really stressful and they don't feel well at all about their finances.  AS: Personal finance gets a really bad rap in my opinion. I think everyone thinks it's easy 'cause everyone does it.   MN: Um-hmm.  AS: But, in a lot of ways it's a very complex financial problem. I think harder than almost everything else that goes on in finance.   MN: Hmm.  AS: 'Cause it is very complicated to be this individual who has, gonna have all these shocks coming at you throughout your life, and to figure out how you can finance them.  MN: I feel like we have no problem connecting the dots between going to a doctor regularly for our physical health, or doing certain activities that are good for our mental health, but it seems like when it comes to money, so rarely do we think, ""I should go talk to somebody about my financial health.""  AS: Yeah. Although to be fair to people, we don't really promote financial wellness. We don't really promote financial literacy. Like, the  05:00   purpose of personal finance is smooth, consistent consumption across your lifestyle. And never having to experience a huge dramatic drop in your standard of living.  MN: Can you say a little bit more what you mean by, ""smoothing our consumption""?   AS: Yeah, so we generally assume in economics, like one of the worst things that could happen to you would be a meaningful decrease in your quality of life, or standard of living. And, we assume that that is, you know, causes you the most pain or discomfort. So the goal of personal finance in, at least in academia, although, and it should be in the real world, but somehow has gotten lost, is that you should have, you have predictable consumption every year of your life and it never falls.   MN: Um-hmm. And how do you think about, sort of the, we've been thinking, about sort of your own life, your own finances and what's coming down the road for you? How do you think about that in terms of kind of the macro economic context where, on the one hand, it seems now like the economy's going okay, and yet people seem to be reporting a lot of financial stress. So how do we kind of try to interpret the signals from the world and  06:00   incorporate them into our own feeling of financial wellness?  AS: Well, it's an interesting thing. People on paper might have more than ever, but they also are dealing with more risk. And risk is also a cost, right? And managing risk costs money. I mean we have much more what we call ""systematic risk,"" which is this feeling of whenever we have these huge changes and the economy is going through a huge change, with more globalization and technology where there's a risk your job might not exist in 10 years. So even if you're doing okay now, you sense this big existential risk that people didn't have before. And, as well, we have to bear more sources of these risks ourselves, we're le-, less likely to have a defined benefit pension. So, more risk is on you and you're facing these bigger existential risks that are unpredictable. So I think that's why anyway, everyone kind of looks okay right now. They also at the same time have more anxiety.  MN: Thinking back to this idea of hygge, the, the Danish concept of comfiness, it, it seems like not only in finance but also in every domain of life, everything is  07:00   followed by the word, ""Wellness,"" now. And that we're support, we're supposed to be, ""Well."" Where do you think that, that's coming from? It, it's relatively recently that, ""wellness,"" is this word that really matters a lot.   AS: I mean, maybe as I said, as the economy is changing, and people are feeling more insecure, and at the same time feeling more of a need to consume more, maybe even what they can't afford, that this feeling of peace and wellness becomes more and more valuable.   MN: Hmm. [music starts] I wonder if people are buying snugglier clothes and comfier couches, and stuff like that to feel more secure in the world. [laughter]  AS: Yeah, I think there's a reason why we feel like we need more hygge in our life right now. Americans are more stressed about life and about money. We're overwhelmed in many ways and it's taking a toll on us physically.   MN: I just want to say the, the word, ""hygge,"" again so that everyone can criticize both of us for saying it completely incorrectly. I think whatever that word is, it's such a powerful feeling of, of wanting to have less stress and be less overwhelmed and I think this financial stress in particular,  08:00   really seems to be exerting a negative impact on people's well being. I talked with Brigid Schulte about how modern life is compounding these issues and what we can do about it. Brigid is a prize winning journalist, author of The New York Times bestselling, Overwhelmed: Work, Love, and Play When No One Has the Time. And she's currently director of the Better Life Lab in Washington, DC.  08:20   [music]  08:24   MN: Brigid, thanks so much for joining us.  BS: Hey, thank you so much for having me.   MN: So my number one thing when I talk to basically anyone in the world about how they're doing is they say, ""I'm stressed."" It seems like no matter, [laughter] and no matter what domain, too, it's like, ""How's, how's work? How's home? How's life? How's your hobbies?"" Everyone says, ""I'm stressed. I'm stressed. I'm stressed."" Can you tell us a bit about your view of stress and why it seems to be so pervasive?  BS: Yeah, I think it's really a common feeling, particularly in the United States. You know, the American Psychological Association puts out sort of annual stress reports and [laughs] we are an incredibly stressed-out nation. Uh, anxiety levels are  09:00   very high. The World Health Organization rates us as one of the most anxious countries in the world.   MN: I love this idea that you have about stress versus overwhelm, because it's, it's not that stress is always bad, right? I mean, sometimes it can be good to be a little stressed, but this idea of overwhelm feels like the one that people are really struggling with.   BS: Yeah, I think that's a really important point is that a little stress is actually really good for us. That actually helps clarify your focus, and, and you do need that. But when you're in that constant state of, like, constant vigilance, constant stress, constantly in that fight or flight, there's been more and more medical research, physical research, to show how it's been tied to, not only poor health and chronic diseases, but you know, but things like inflammation, uh, diabetes, cardiovascular disease, high blood pressure, and even cancer.  MN: Um-hmm.  BS: But we're also, I spent some time at the Yale Stress Center where they're looking at what is that overwhelm and can-, constant stress doing to the  10:00   brain? And they're actually finding that people who feel more stressed out, and have been through stressful events, their prefrontal cortex is actually smaller, physically smaller, 20% smaller in volume. And that's critical because that's the part of our brain where we learn and remember and make decisions. It's sort of like the, the human part of us. And so when we're in those kind of overwhelming situations, it's not only bad for our health, we can't even think well.   MN: Do you think about this role of financial stress, in particular, and, and all the struggles that people are having?  BS: Yeah, I think that financial stress is a huge part of, of all of this. It's tied with uncertainty and precarity, a sense of wellbeing. Time and money is something that we need to think about because both are so critical when you think about wellbeing and, and the good life.   MN: If we think about a hierarchy of stresses, let, let's say, and there are so many different kinds of, of stresses we can have, from our relationships, to work, to our time, to our money, are they  11:00   different from each other?   BS: I think when you think about money or financial stress, I, I think one of the things that, that creates so much, you know, so much energy, or, or you know, so much power around it, is that it's, it feels really existential, right? It feels like it's, you know, almost, uh, it's a survival question.   MN: Hmm. And I think on that, on that macro level, there's this tension between right now versus, as you're saying the, the longer term. What makes us more stressed? Is it kind of, ""Can't pay my bills this week?"" Or is it, you use the phrase, ""the good life,"" before. Is it sort of that we feel that even if I could pay the bills this week, I still don't feel like I'm building toward a good life for me, or for my family, or for my children?  BS: You've really hit an important point. Human beings, when we think about how we make decisions, we have, what would, what I guess what some people would call, ""present bias."" Where we are in the moment is very powerful. You know, it's very concrete in this moment. It's hard for us to think in the future. Like, even though I may want to save for retirement in the  12:00   future, or even though I may have these larger goals for my life, uh, for the good life in the, in the longterm, it's, it's so much more theoretical. It's, it's hard to grasp. And so we tend to focus on the here and now. And that's where things like the behavioral economist work around 401(k)s and flipping from making choices, and decision fatigue, instead, turning it into a default of every time you get a new job or a company offers a 401(k), instead of opting in, the default is you have to opt out. That has completely changed the way people save over the long term.  MN: Trying to set some rules or guidelines or defaults, in a sense, might be one way to help us stick a little bit better to spending our time in ways that we might prefer and also maybe being a little bit sounder with our money.  BS: Yeah, so that's been really some interesting behavioral science on scarcity, like when you feel money scarcity, or poverty, or when you  13:00   feel like time scarcity, and this time pressure, that what happens is, uh, you know, it's a phenomenon that they've actually found, they call it, ""tunneling."" You know, you just think about it, your breath gets shorter. And so you, your, what they found is that, like, our cognitive bandwidth, if you will, shrinks. Our ability to see other options shrinks. And we tend to, like in a tunnel, we're only able to see the things right immediately in front of us, you know, low value tasks, or, you know, low hanging fruit. And so what happens, then, when you're making those kinds of low value decisions, it just perpetuates that feeling of stress and overwhelm, and [deep inhale] you know, that you don't know what's going on. And so one of the most important things, like the first thing to do, is to just break that cycle, to just take that deep breath. You know, uh, the cortisol levels do go down. Three deep breaths do amazing things in your body to calm your stress and cortisol levels down. You know, it brings back some of that cognitive  14:00   bandwidth. Gets you out of the tunnel, so that you can make those decisions that are good for now, as well as in the future.  MN: I'm always so interested in the idea that we, the things that we prescribe, for example, for, for children to try to help them be a little bit better in their lives, we never apply them to ourselves, like the the idea that when little kids are angry, we say, ""Now take some deep breaths."" [laughter] Or maybe, you know, ""Go to another room and calm down for a minute before you decide whether you want to punch that person or not.""   BS: Right. Right.  MN: You know, we say these things and then we turn around and we don't apply it in our own lives at all. But in fact, it can really help us to make slightly better decisions.   BS: Yes.   MN: Is there any chance, and I'm just asking is for a friend, that reducing these levels of stress can cause your, the hair on your head to grow back? [laughter] And it's totally not related to me, but does this, anybody at Yale study that at all? Is there any hope?  BS: You know, I, if they do, I don't know about it. So if, uh, if I find out, I will certainly let you know.  MN: Maybe the Better Life Lab could kind of get on that for, for, for my friend, excuse me, and we could have another discussion  15:00   in a few months, Brigid.  BS: I'll see what we, I'll see what we can do.   MN: Final thoughts on what we can do to solve this problem in just one easy step? That was a joke. [laughter]  BS: Yeah, one easy step, no. But I do, what I do want, the important thing to remember, so many, you know, it's not like stress is ever going to go away. But we learn how to manage it better. Recognize that there are choices that we can make, and really focusing in on what's the most important. And making decisions is tough. I mean the, the root of the word, ""decide,"" comes from like, ""kill."" You know, you have to kill off other options. And part of the problem is there's so many great options out there. But to recognize that you, you know, you have finite time, you have finite cognitive bandwidth. You can't do everything in a day. You can't do 75 things on your To Do list. What is the one thing you can do? [music starts] What is the one thing at home that's most important, or one relationship that you're going to focus on that day or that week? And I think if we can manage our  16:00   expectations more, that can go a long way in helping us manage that overwhelm, and busyness.  MN: Brigid Schulte, thank you so much for joining us.  BS: Hey, thanks so much for having me.  16:10   [music]  16:15   AS: I like what Brigid was saying about all the ways we don't always have control over what's happening to us, day to day, or in the wider world. And that certainly can make us feel vulnerable or overwhelmed. But she also points out ways in which we have more control than we think.  MN: Yeah, I think this idea that money can be a source of stress, and it is for a lot of us. But we also could use our money in more productive ways to actually relieve stress, and maybe even use money instead of being unhappier, actually be happier by changing the way we spend our money. I spoke with Ashley Whillans who's a social psychologist, and actually colleague of mine here at Harvard Business School, about her research on how shifting the way we spend our money, and also just how we think about our money, can not only reduce our stress, but also improve our health.  16:56   [music]  17:02   MN: So, we're gonna talk about your research on happiness and how we can get happier.  AW: Um-hmm.  MN: But I want, we need to start on something a little bit negative.  AW: Yeah.  MN: Which is, can you explain to us mainly how to avoid, but also, what is ""stink eye""?   AW: Oh, okay. So, you know, I used to be an actor before I was an academic and,   MN: Like most professors,   AW: Yeah.  MN: Yeah.   AW: So to be clear, I wasn't a very good actor. So I had to pick another profession after acting was done with me. And uh, my biggest claim to fame is a two second part in the movie, Juno, in which Polly Bleecker says to Ellen Page's character, ""Your little girlfriend gave me the stink eye in art class yesterday."" And then Ellen Page says, ""That's not my girlfriend. That's just the way her face looks. That's just her face."" And then there's a two second clip of my face.  MN: And how did that not then lead to like TV commercials with stink eye in them? You'd think that would have built out to a stink eye  18:00   career?  AW: It unfortunately did not. But I do sometimes pull that out, you know, while MBA teaching,  MN: So, moving on from stink eye to something a little more positive, what I really wanted to talk to you about is this idea of money and happiness. And I bet you get asked all the time, ""What's the salary at which money doesn't matter anymore for our happiness?"" Sometimes people say seventy thousand dollars a year, goes around in the media from time to time. Do you know the exact number? Or is it more complicated than just one single number?  AW: It's more complicated than one number. I think the, the best paper on this was published about a year ago, kind of updating that number. It's much higher than $75,000. Closer, more, to a hundred thousand, one-twenty. So it used to be that once your basic needs were met, money no longer predicts your overall evaluation of your life,  MN: Um-hmm.  AW: How well you think you're doing generally in life.  MN: So if you hit a certain salary, like $75,000 or maybe $100,000. Any more money after that isn't really gonna make you that much happier, because your basic needs, food and shelter and healthcare, are being met.  19:00   AW: Yeah. Exactly. And the story has shifted a little bit such that it's better to meet more than your basic needs. Meeting your basic needs and, and then some. The question that you're asking is also depends on what we're looking at in terms of the outcome.   MN: Um-hmm  AW: So there's different facets of happiness that researchers like to look at.   MN: I see.   AW: So when you're looking at overall evaluation in life, this kind of global sense that you're, you're doing well on average, this is where you get that kind of leveling off. After about this $100,000 point, money no longer predicts greater overall life satisfaction. And if anything, in most countries around the world, when you make a lot of money, overall life satisfaction sort of dips. But, in terms of how much joy you experience on an everyday basis, that actually has really no association with how much money you make. So the amount that you make doesn't necessarily predict how much you laugh or smile on a daily basis.   MN: I see.   AW: And it's because money, unless, unless you're using it in ways that promote happiness, like social connection or having good positive  20:00   experiences in your everyday life, actually it doesn't necessarily change the way that you spend minutes, hours, weeks, in terms of all of these kinds of daily activities, these time-use activities, which really do matter for, for happiness.  MN: And so are we, are we doomed? Is there anything we can do?   AW: Yeah. I think when we think about work/life balance, when we think about freeing up some more of our time, when we think about changing our behavior in ways that are going to have these really dramatic increases in our happiness, we're thinking about things like, quitting my job,   MN: Uh-hmm.  AW: Uh, leaving my partner. Uh, moving to a completely different country. And our research really suggests that it's small changes around the margins that, that can have powerful and unexpected impacts for happiness. And some of these small changes that kind of allow us to, to have more time, in my research, have pretty significant increases for, for happiness, both the overall evaluation of my life and also how much  21:00   joy we experience on an everyday basis as compared to how much stress. So some of these small, simple decisions that people can make around the margins to have more and better time are things like, when you're making a consumer decision, be willing to give up some of your discretionary income to have more time, like taking a direct flight, which will get you from point A to point B faster, will cost more money, but will save you those terrible moments in the airport going through security lines.  MN: Some people may have a, uh, spouse or partner who spends like 11 to 12 days booking each flight trying to find the optimal flight path. And then they feel really good about finding the like, optimal, cheapest flight path. But they've wasted 11 days of your   AW: So,  MN: Time together. And so people often aren't thinking, ""Let me see if I can save time in that flight or something."" But they're forgetting that it's taking up time that they might use for other things.  AW: Yeah, exactly. So one way you can actually trick yourself into making better decisions is simply reminding yourself of the opportunity costs.  22:00   Even just reminding yourself, ""By me doing these three loads of laundry, as opposed to outsourcing them on this really busy weekend, that means I have to do laundry versus doing literally anything else."" And even just reminding people they could do anything else other than the laundry with those two or three hours, makes people more likely to want to outsource some of their disliked tasks. So we need to kind of, you know, kind of remind ourselves, we're living in this fast-paced society that really values work and that it's okay to ask for help. It's okay to pay, if that means that you can actually spend more enjoyable time with people that you care about.   MN: Are there things we can sort of commit ourselves to? You talked a little bit just now about sort of outsourcing,   AW: Um-hmm.  MN: How do we get ourselves to outsource tasks so that we can use that time for, for something else?  AW: Yeah, so the gig economy has made this increasingly easy and accessible and affordable. So it's kind of getting over the guilt. So we have a lot of data showing that, in general, we feel bad asking for help. We also even feel bad paying someone to help us. So even when there's a market transaction, we feel guilty.  23:00   Like, ""We can't, we're so busy that we can't keep up with all of the demands in our everyday life that we can't even do our laundry? Like, that's sad. I'm a sad person now.""   MN: I see.  AW: I've had this experience and I study this. I'm like, in the middle of my teaching semester, I see like three weeks of laundry on the floor and I'm like, ""Ashley, you, you can do your laundry."" And then I just leave it there. And I walk out the door.   MN: So it's like I, you want to be the kind of person that can handle it yourself.   AW: Um-hmm.  MN: And that could be a barrier to trying to outsource at least some small tasks, some of the time.  AW: Exactly. Again, I think it's about thinking about the opportunity costs. We're really bad at spontaneously thinking about what we're not doing in the moment of doing.   MN: So, we've been talking a lot about using money to buy yourself better time in lots of different ways. One of them is definitely outsourcing, as we already discussed. But there's also lots of ways that spending money doesn't seem to pay off in much more happiness. And we know that the biggest category is buying stuff for yourself.  AW: Yeah.  MN: And the problem is it feels so good to buy stuff for yourself in the moment. Like, every new  24:00   product we buy we're so, so happy about buying it. But all the data shows that that wears off so quickly, and then we end up exactly back where we were before. Not only the small purchases like, you know, buying new clothes and buying new music, and things like that, but even the biggest purchases we make. So, the size of our house has no relationship to how happy we are with our life. Or, how nice our car is has no relationship to how happy we are with our life. Any other ways we can think about using our money to actually be happier?   AW: Yeah. So another line of research says a really profitable path to greater happiness through our spending is by spending money on others. So using our money to help those in our communities and, and in our social networks. And so some of the research that I've, I've done, uh, I know you've done lots of this research, uh, but some of the work that I was involved in looked at not only how helping others has happiness benefits, but also how it can protect against these stressful feelings that I've been talking about, that we all experience so much in our everyday lives.  MN: And how does that work? So, so, how do you show that people,  25:00   is it just that helpful people are kind of healthier people?  AW: Yeah. We recruited participants, um, for an eight week long study and we, we gave them three payments of $40 that they could spend on themselves or that they could spend on others. And then we tracked their stress levels and their physical health over the course of the study. And I think it's worth pointing out that we recruited a sample that we thought would benefit most from pro social spending, which are older adults who are experiencing, kind of lower quality of life. And what we found is that these older adults with high blood pressure who were randomly assigned to spend money on others over the course of the study showed a significant reduction in systolic and diastolic blood pressure, two major indicators, over the course of the study that were similar in magnitude to starting a new aerobic exercise program. So they're pretty striking findings. People were protected from the negative experience of stress in the context of their everyday lives. And helping others has these kind of protective effects, or what researchers call, ""stress  26:00   buffering effects,"" because it, helping others makes us feel in control and competent. We can see the positive impact that we're making in the world and it helps us feel capable.  MN: Some of the research you talked about is that when we use our money to spend on others or to change our time, some of it is that it kind of improves things for us. And then another part of it seems like it, it buffers the bad things away from us, so that stress doesn't hit us as much as it might otherwise. So people are so worried about their time, they're so worried about their money, and stressed. Are those kinds of stress the same? Is, is stressing about money, worse or more important, or something that we should really try to cope with first?  AW: Yeah. So I have some data suggesting that money stress, being really concerned about our finances, does have more of a detrimental effect than, than maybe being time stressed, or, or worrying about how we're going to get everything done in a day. So, this feeling of, one, financial insecurity, so just feeling like you don't have enough,  27:00   regardless of how much money you actually have, can have really negative effects for stress and, and wellbeing. And people who base their self worth on their finances are really stressed out by, you know, small, simple decisions around time and money, and wellbeing.   MN: It sounds like there's at least two components to this, this sense of money stress that can be so, so detrimental. And one is feeling that we don't have enough, which, which some people don't have enough, but it also sounds like it almost doesn't matter how much you have. Some people still are always going to feel like they don't have enough, even if they had millions of dollars and they'll be stressed. And then the other component seems to be feeling that we don't sort of have as much as others, kind of the, ""I need to be, my self esteem is all about having like a slightly, you know, larger house than my neighbor."" Or whatever it might be. And those two things combined, which many people experience, of course, it seems like maybe that's why this money stress can be so impactful on our wellbeing.  AW: Yeah. And, and we actually have data showing that people at the very top end of the  28:00   distribution in most countries around the world are less happy. Their reference points changed. Their neighbors have larger yachts and larger homes than they do. Or maybe they're looking to, to even people with higher levels of wealth to compare themselves to, which undermines even their happiness.  MN: Now, what I've done in that situation is I just buy more yachts. So rather than compete on size of the yacht, right, you just diversify and have yachts in various marinas.  AW: I think that's a good strategy. Yeah. You know, you shift to, to a category that you can win. [music starts] I think. I think that seems like a healthy coping response to that.  MN: Ashley Whillans, thanks so much for joining us.  AW: Thanks so much.  28:35   [music]  28:44   AS: Hey, Mike, after talking to Brigid and Ashley, how optimistic do you feel about the future of the human race?   MN: I think I would say five out of seven.   AS: That's not bad.   MN: But I'm not, I'm not really sure what the, what the scale is. But I feel there's some bad news. But there's also some good news. So we're,  29:00   we're not like a one out of seven. But we're not a seven out of seven. So I feel like five is good, like some stress is necessary. It's good that we have it. It motivates us to do stuff. But too much stress is kind of detrimental and can have really bad effects on our health, but also on our decision making, which then can have effects on our finances, which then has more effects on our well being.  AS: So you know, some stress is good. But it's also important to do some meditation.  MN: If you can find the time. [laughs] I think meditation is so fantastic. But I do think for Ashley thinking about how can we use money to help us have better time. So instead of being stressed about money all the time thinking about money as a resource to change what we're doing. Thinking about the opportunity cost of the choices we make, and using our money to make better choices, so that we can spend time in ways that give us peace of mind, make us spend more time with our friends and family, and improve our quality of life.  AS: Or you could buy an app that helps you meditate.  MN: And it only takes a couple seconds to download.   AS: Yeah, and probably only $1.99.   30:00   MN: Of course, one of the curses with that is you think that you will, when you make those changes, you'll constantly keep using that app or making that decision every day that will make your life better off. But we're also really present-biased. So we might have these lofty plans for later in the future. We might think we're making great decisions that will change our life. But we often slip down the road. So I think both Brigid and Ashley talked about putting things in place right now that make sure that we'll stick to our different behavior and our new goals going down the road.  AS: Yeah, like my meditation app zaps me with a little volt of electricity if I don't meditate every day.  MN: Yeah. And also I think zaps your loved ones as well. So you have even more guilt, that you didn't do the good thing. It's a good idea for a product actually. [laughter]   30:45   [music]  30:47   MN: The last thing I thought that was so interesting that Ashley talked about was this idea that we often think of stress as emotional or psychological. And of course it is that. But so much research says actually that it's physical as well, that stress has these negative  31:00   physical consequences on us. And, and her research showing that, that giving money to others, that spending on others, that being generous, can actually improve heart health. I think it's such an interesting example of how the decisions we make with our money really end up influencing us in our lives overall. And that we're not sort of helpless, that we can actually change what we do with our money, and how we think about our money, and end up being better off.  31:25   [music]  31:40   AS: Talking Green is an original podcast from TD Ameritrade and T Brand Studio at The New York Times. Learn more about financial wellness at NYTimes.com/TalkingGreen.  MN: This was the last episode of season one. Subscribe to listen to the rest of the season and to make sure you don't miss out on future episodes. I'm Mike Norton.  AS: And I'm Allison Schrager.  MN: Thanks for listening  32:00   [music]  32:27  Go back to homepage  The news and editorial staff of The New York Times had no role in this post’s creation. "
nyt://interactive/064f1408-e21c-5e81-b575-97b3cc95498d,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2020/01/15/opinion/andrew-yang-nytimes-interview.html,2020-01-15T10:00:01+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Yang, Andrew (1975- )', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'New York Times', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Presidential Election of 2020', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Mr. Yang interviews for the New York Times’ endorsement Businessman from New York Kathleen Kingsbury: Wonderful. Thank you. Yeah. So I have a serious question to ask you, but first we wanted to ask, were you wearing a helmet while you were biking here?Mr. Yang biked to the Times from his Manhattan home. More New York City cyclists died biking in 2019 than in any other year since 2000; Gothamist counts 29 deaths. I was wearing a helmet. I have a staffer with the helmet as proof. Jesse Wegman: Is the inside of the helmet warm?  My team then had me take the helmet off and then tried to make my hair look good. So that’s why I didn’t show up with the helmet. KK: It looks sharp. I commented to one of my team members, I feel like running for president is at least a glimpse into what it’s like to be a professional womanHe’s right, of course. Women in politics have long been subjected to much closer scrutiny than men; in 1917, the first female member of Congress, Jeannette Rankin, took office and The Washington Post ran an article headlined: “Congresswoman Rankin Real Girl; Likes Nice Gowns and Tidy Hair.” because I feel like I care about my appearance more now than I ever did. And there are people that are always like looking after —— Brent Staples: Scrutinizing you. Scrutinizing, looking after it, because I’m just like, “What? My hair? Who cares? No one.” And then people are like, “No, no,” and they have to put time in, smooth it out. KK: So let’s get into it. We have about 90 minutes together. In your assessment, what are the policy breakdowns that lead to Americans still being hungry today? Wow, I love this question. There are many causes of poverty, and the fact that we’re not able to put food into people’s houses and on their tables is a structural problem. My campaign’s based upon the premise that we’re going through this profound economic transformation, the fourth industrial revolution.Mr. Yang is not the first to label this period “the fourth industrial revolution” — the term was made popular by Klaus Schwab, founder and executive chairman of the World Economic Forum, at its annual meeting in Davos in 2016. Mr. Schwab’s book of the same name argues that “the fourth industrial revolution” is transforming every sector of the economy and industry through new technologies that merge the physical, digital and biological realms. And one of the major problems is that we still pretend we’re in the economy of the ’70s or ’80s.  In the ’70s or ’80s, your labor and overall productivity were more or less in lock step. And we still pretend that if someone wakes up in the morning and says, “Hey, I need to put food on the table,” he can go out to his main street, he can sell his time for money at some hourly rate, and then he’ll be able to make a good enough living so he can feed his family, raise kids and the rest of it. That has become progressively less true over the last 40 years, unfortunately, where wages have stagnated while productivity has gone up and up,Starting in 1979, productivity and pay sharply diverged — productivity rose nearly 70 percent, while typical hourly pay essentially stagnated, according to the Economic Policy Institute. and that’s going to accelerate because of the convergence of capital and technology now, in unprecedented ways. Especially for people who are at the lower end of the skills ladder, which is most Americans. Only 33 percent of Americans will graduate from college, 42 percent if you include two-year degrees.  So you’re looking at a nation of high school graduates. And what do high school graduates do for a living? The top five occupational categories are retail and administrative, which includes call center work, retail, food service and food preparation, transportation, primarily truck driving, and attendant supportive jobs and manufacturing still. We all know that we have gutted many of these industries, and their labor bases have shrunk.  So for a high school graduate in America to get by, if you have one health problem or car breakdown, it can take a very tenuous financial situation and send it in a downward spiral. Then how do you put food on the table? In theory, there are nonprofits and food pantries that would see to this, but we all know that they’re dramatically underresourced relative to the need. And so when you look at the causes of food poverty, to me the best solution is instead of trying to create organizations that will put food into people’s hands, which we should do obviously, we should just put money into Americans’ hands and then they would be able to procure food to provide for themselves and their families.Mr. Yang’s candidacy has centered on the idea of his Freedom Dividend, essentially universal basic income — which has a long history, drawing support from Thomas Paine, Martin Luther King Jr. and Friedrich von Hayek, but also a controversial one. (Later annotations will look at why.) KK: So I assume you’re referring to [your] universal basic income plan. Your campaign platform, you have tons and tons of proposals, everything from U.B.I. to universal daylight saving time.Mr. Yang has prided himself on injecting the race with new thinking through proposals like yearlong daylight saving time. Daylight saving time was instituted during World War I for energy-efficiency purposes. Mr. Yang argues that extending it year-round would decrease traffic accidents, increase economic activity and lower crime.  Plans don’t really mean anything unless you have priorities. What would you do immediately when you enter office? What would be first on your agenda? What would you want to accomplish in the first 100 days? To me, the economic imbalances are causing many of our other problems. If you look up and down the line, health problems, poor educational attainment and results, even political polarization, they stem from the fact that we have this pervasive financial insecurity where 78 percent of Americans are living paycheck to paycheck. Almost half can’t afford an unexpected $400 or $500 bill.The statistic that 78 percent of Americans live paycheck to paycheck was reported in a 2017 study by the human capital management firm CareerBuilder. Read the study here.  If you can’t pay next month’s rent, it’s very hard to worry about climate change. I come and talk to you and say, “Hey, we need to fight climate change.” And you look up and say like, “I’m worried about next month. Next year, next decade has to wait in line.”  And that’s probably a generous response. Some of the responses would be worse than that. So if you get the boot off people’s throats, then you can start making progress on our health, on our educational outcomes, on our political polarization.  Everyone knows my flagship proposal is this Freedom Dividend of $1,000 a month for every American adult, which is not a new idea. And it’s not my idea. Thomas Paine was for it at the founding of the country. Martin Luther King fought for it and was fighting for it when he was assassinated. So after I’m the nominee and I defeat Donald Trump, everyone will know that I’m in the White House because of the Freedom Dividend.  Democrats and progressives will be so thrilled to have defeated Donald Trump, they will love the fact that we’re going to put buying power into families’ hands, make children stronger and healthier. But here’s the great thing: The Republicans will look up and say, “Wait a minute, do I hate the Freedom Dividend?” And they look up, and they notice only one state’s had a dividend for almost 40 years, and it’s Alaska, a deep red conservative state, that was passed by a Republican governor.Since 1982, Alaska has been giving every resident an annual check from its $66.3 billion permanent fund, which gets at least 25 percent of the state’s mineral royalties every year. The results of the experiment have been mixed — crippling poverty is low, but unemployment rates are among the highest in the country, and the fund’s value fluctuates with oil prices. The reason I am drawing, in some polls, 10 percent or more of Donald Trump voters to my campaign is that Republicans and conservatives do not hate economic buying power in citizens’ hands.Mr. Yang’s argument that he is pulling 10 percent or more of Trump supporters was not rated favorably on PolitiFact — the 10 percent figure comes from a July YouGov poll, and subsequent polls found the number to be lower.  What they hate is a giant bureaucracy making everyone’s decisions. So you ask what my main priority will be as president, it will be to get the Freedom Dividend across the finish line and get buying power into Americans’ hands, which will then lead us to be able to solve many other problems much more quickly. KK: Have you spoken to Republican lawmakers about the Freedom Dividend? I haven’t sat down with a lot of sitting senators and congressmen and women, but I’ve talked to literally thousands of people who supported Donald Trump in the last election who say they are now supporting me. I’ve talked to many folks who are Republicans who say they are, at least, sympathetic to my message, in large part because they understand the numbers. When I talked to 70 C.E.O.s here in New York City, not that far from here, it was a fancy bank office, most of them were Republicans. I said, “How many of you are looking at replacing your back-office clerical workers with artificial intelligence and software?” Guess how many hands went up out of 70. All of them. The truth is, you should fire any C.E.O. who was not looking to make that happen, because their incentives are all tied to the bottom-line profitability of their firm. And most of them were Republicans. So they understand the need for what I am proposing.  Jamie Dimon, who is a Democrat but is a numbers person, has looked at the numbers and said, we should declare a national emergency around the fact that the economy is not working for most Americans. And he’s proposing a negative income tax, which is a close cousin to the Freedom Dividend that I’m championing. Unlike universal basic income, a system that would provide some cash to every person regardless of income level, a negative income tax system would give cash to people below a certain income threshold. Milton Friedman made the case for the tax as a poverty alleviation tool in his 1962 book “Capitalism and Freedom.” So this is not a left or a right idea, this is bipartisan. And many Republicans will see that this is going to be a huge win for their constituents, for rural areas, for red states on the interior. We don’t need 80 percent of Congress to pass it, we just need a majority. KK: I want to move on to some other questions, but I actually have one last for you, which is why run as a Democratic versus a Republican if you have such bipartisan issues? I’ve been a registered Democrat since the Clinton years; I was an Obama appointee. I had a fund-raiser for John Kerry. It wasn’t a great fund-raiser because I was kind of young; it wasn’t one of those fancy ones where you generate tens of thousands. KK: How much money did you raise? I want to say we raised maybe $5,000, and I was quite pleased. It was at a lounge. KK: With inflation, though, it would be higher, right? Well, thank you for saying so. Yeah, in 2019 dollars it must be at least $6,000. I’ve been a Democrat for years and years, and if you look at my alignment on the vast majority of issues, they’re lock step with the Democratic Party.Mr. Yang, a former technology executive and entrepreneur, has distinguished himself from Senator Sanders and the far left of the Democratic Party in making the case for a more humane capitalist system, what he calls “human-centered capitalism.” So it was very natural for me to run as a Democrat. I’ve ruled out completely any third-party bid because that would in my mind increase the chances of Donald Trump winning, and the mission is to defeat Donald Trump and help move the country forward. KK: O.K. Moving onto a perhaps slightly less serious topic.In hindsight, this was not an accurate assessment of the next question. I like it already. Aisha Harris: Back in September, you actually spoke out on behalf of the comedian Shane Gillis, who had been hired on “SNL” and then was quickly fired after some racist comments were stirred up that he had made in the past on one of his podcasts. And you said you didn’t want to be judged for something you had done 25 years ago.Mr. Gillis was hired by “Saturday Night Live” last September, then dropped days later after clips surfaced showing him using slurs and language offensive toward Asian and L.G.B.T.Q. people, including one specifically about Mr. Yang. Mr. Yang later said the comedian should have had the chance to keep his job and explained: “As a society, we have become unduly punitive and vindictive about people making statements that some find offensive or distasteful.” But Gillis’s comments were maybe a year ago. So I’m curious as to, in your mind, how long of a period of time should it be before someone faces some sort of consequences for something they’ve done in the past? So when I heard that Shane Gillis had called me “Jew chink” — I think was the slur — my reaction was the same reaction anyone would have, which was like, who the heck is this guy, and he sounds like a total jackass. Well, my wife actually had heard about it independently and was also like, “Who the heck is this guy?” And so then I sat down and started to figure out who Shane Gillis was, what he did for a living, and then I sat down and watched some of his comedy to try and get some context.  After watching his comedy, I felt that he wasn’t a malignant racist and that his slur toward me was just very, very bad comedy run amok. Which did not strike me as a fireable offense, and I realized that if I was the individual who was actually directly slurred, and I did not feel that he should lose his job over it, then I should probably share that sentiment with other people.  Particularly because I think we’ve become unduly vindictive and punitive toward statements that people find objectionable. A friend of mine said something, he said, “If the online universe descends on someone, and they lose their job, the online universe moves on a week later, but that person still does not have a job a week later.” That the impact on the individual lasts much, much longer than the rancor. So I shared this.  The comment about I wouldn’t want to be judged for something 25 years ago was about something completely independent. I think I’d seen something where Joe Biden was being called out for something he’d said 25 years ago, when I said I wouldn’t want to be called out for some misstatement I’d made 25 years ago.Mr. Yang was asked on CNN’s “The Van Jones Show” about cancel culture and whether Americans have gone “too far in the direction of a lack of grace or a lack of forgiveness.” He responded: “I’m new to politics, but I certainly would hate to be judged by something I did 25 years ago.”  And then I joked, good thing no one cared about what I was doing 25 years ago, because I was at that point a 20-year-old man, and the internet didn’t really have full documentation of how I spent those years.  So the Shane Gillis opinion was not based upon the timeline, it was just based upon my reaction as a person, and the person that was directly named. I certainly think there should be consequences for one’s statements and actions, and I certainly think that obviously he made the statements within the year, and that if you did have some sort of time frame when you would want to overlook something, it would be much longer than a year.Mr. Yang’s comments, on Mr. Gillis and on judgment more broadly, contribute to a growing conversation among political and cultural figures about the merits and downsides of “cancel culture.” Former President Obama, for example, spoke out about the prevalence of “call-out culture” during an interview in October, arguing that criticizing people on social media for not being “woke” enough is “not activism” and “not bringing about change.”  AH: But do you think, I mean, he never truly apologized. He just said, “I’m sorry you’re offended.”Mr. Gillis issued what some saw as a non-apology, writing on Twitter that he is a comedian “who pushes boundaries” and his “intention is never to hurt.” He added, “I’m happy to apologize to anyone who’s actually offended by anything I’ve said.” And while you may not have felt that way, there were other jokes he made about just Asian-Americans and Asian people in general, and there were other people who were obviously affected by this. So I mean, what kind of consequences do you think someone who makes those kinds of statements and who doesn’t show any sort of remorse for it, should they face? If not firing, what should happen? What would the steps be? Well, in this case, what’s interesting is it’s up to the employer, and it was NBC and “Saturday Night Live.” Even as I made the statement saying I didn’t think he should be fired, I thought he probably would be fired. Because if you’re NBC and “SNL,” you look up and say, what is my upside for keeping this guy? He’s not exactly a huge moneymaker, he hasn’t worked a day on the set. Like, that’s not a really powerful set of incentives. And so I thought they probably would fire him. I’d suggest that the extent there are consequences for people’s misstatements, they should be somewhere commensurate to the level of power and influence they have and the harm that they’re doing. In Shane Gillis’s case, he was a comedian. I’d never heard of the guy before.  AH: I mean, I don’t think most people had. No, certainly not before the statements had taken place, and in terms of consequences, I would suggest that someone like Shane had probably paid a price in many ways. Like, aside from being fired, there are many circles that, if he shows up in, he’d be labeled very, very negatively. He reached out to me personally, and I had a conversation with him. The conversation with him made me feel more confident that I’d done the right thing.After Mr. Gillis was fired, Mr. Yang tweeted that the comedian had reached out to him. “Looks like we will be sitting down together soon,” Mr. Yang wrote. Neither the comedian nor the candidate appears to have spoken publicly about the content of the meeting.  Because I think in many cases we’re trying to follow up on a sense of shame and humiliation that the person might already feel. KK: I think we have some questions around economics. Binyamin Appelbaum: Yes. After every invention basically since the plow, people have found new uses for the time saved by new technologies. You’ve argued that this time, this won’t happen quickly enough.Mr. Yang has argued that his Freedom Dividend is one answer to the needs of the millions who will lose their jobs to automation. Why will this time be different? What gives you the confidence that we’re confronting something new in all of human history? The numbers. So keep in mind, I didn’t just wake up and say, “Hey, technology is changing the world.” I spent seven years working in Detroit, Cleveland, Birmingham, St. Louis, Baltimore and other cities that have been blasted by the waves of automation.This work was through Mr. Yang’s nonprofit, Venture for America. More on that in a bit.  Detroit is a city of 680,000 people. Its peak population was 1.7 million. If you look this direction, you can see a thriving neighborhood, and then you turn 90 degrees and you see abandoned buildings as far as the eye can see. If we were adapting, you would see not multidecade low rates of interstate migration, which we have right now. You would not be seeing 80 percent of the country have multidecade low levels of business formation, which we have right now. You would not be seeing historic lows of business formation among young people, which we have right now.Mr. Yang argues that the automation of manufacturing jobs — especially in Michigan, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Wisconsin, Missouri and Iowa — helped breed the discontent and economic desperation that led to Mr. Trump’s election. You would not see labor force participation at 62.9 percent, a multidecade low which we have right now. You would not see record-high levels of drug overdoses and suicides to the point that America’s life expectancy has declined for three years in a row, which we have right now. BA: But we also have record low unemployment, and when you mention labor force participation, some people think a big factor there is that the government already is giving people too much money.Labor force participation — the share of Americans either employed or “actively looking for work” — declined precipitously from the late 1990s, dropping to 62.7 percent in 2014 (its lowest rate since the Carter administration). Critics of President Obama liked to argue that this was because of government handouts. But there’s a counterargument to be found in demographic trends — the Congressional Budget Office estimates that a sizable portion of the decline in labor-force participation is a result of the aging of the work force.  Well, the labor force participation rate has declined precipitously, so I don’t buy that somehow the government started giving people more money over the last number of years. And the headline unemployment rate, and I’m sure you know this, it doesn’t measure underemployment, 40 to 44 percent of recent college graduates are now doing a job that does not require a college degree. It does not measure the fact that 94 percent of new jobs in the economy are temp, gig or contract jobs that do not have health care benefits and can disappear at any moment.A 2016 study from the economists Lawrence Katz at Harvard and Alan Krueger at Princeton found that 94 percent of net job growth between 2005 and 2015 was “alternative work,” including independent contractors, freelancers and temps. It doesn’t include the fact that you might be doing two or three jobs to make ends meet.  Uber is literally advertising to schoolteachers saying, “Hey, we’ve figured out schoolteachers make really good Uber drivers.” And if you look at that situation, the headline unemployment rate says, “Check, this person is employed. Heck, this person might be employed twice.” The headline unemployment rate when Donald Trump was running for president, he castigated it as fake news, and then he got into office and all the sudden it became real news. He was right the first time. The number is almost intentionally designed to obscure any of the difficulties in the labor market. If I drop out of the labor market, I no longer count. I actually help the number.  Right now we have three flagship numbers we’re beating the American people over the head with, telling them that things are going great. No. 1, the headline unemployment rate. No. 2, gross domestic product, which is obviously putting up record highs even as our life expectancy is declining. And No. 3, corporate profits and shareholder value. Stock market prices correspond to the fortunes of the top 20 percent of Americans, many of the people, obviously, who live here in Manhattan.The American cities with the highest number of high-net-worth individuals are New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco and Washington. California has the most number of people on the Forbes list of wealthiest Americans.  The bottom 80 percent of Americans own 8 percent of stock market value. The bottom 50 percent own essentially zero.  If these are your measurements, then of course you’re going to think things are going in one direction, while your way of life disintegrates. Even the inventor of G.D.P., Simon Kuznets, said 100 years ago, this is a terrible measurement of national well-being, and we should never use it as that.  If you run an organization, imagine having an organization that has the wrong measurements. How is that organization going to fare over time? That is where we are in the United States of America right now. We’re riding a century-old measurement off a cliff, while our way of life deteriorates underneath our feet.Gross domestic product is a measure of a country’s entire economic output. Its inventor worried that it might be mistaken as a measure of citizens’ well-being. Mr. Yang’s campaign has proposed that America measure its economic prosperity with a different index that accounts for human and not just monetary factors, including inequality and quality of life.  If you looked at levels of anxiety, stress, mental health, depression, suicides, drug overdoses, you would see that we’re in a mental health recession or depression, we’re in a wellness or life expectancy recession or depression, and the corporate profits are going to keep on going up, because in the 21st-century economy, companies can do very, very well while not hiring a lot of people, not treating them as full-time employees, and they don’t need to care what happens in their own backyard because they sell everywhere. BA: But you’re not proposing to fix any of that. People don’t just work to make money; they do work for a sense of self-worth. They work so that they can develop skills, they work so they have the possibility of earning more money someday. You’re proposing to replace a portion of the income they may have lost, but not any of those other things. Why is that a solution? I love work, and the numbers also clearly show that people need work. Men in particular, without work, they volunteer less than employed men.Harmful effects of unemployment are felt by men and women, but men are more likely to experience negative health effects including depression and increased risk of suicide. So think about that for a second. They have higher rates of substance abuse, their health deteriorates, all these social ills accompany. Of course, we need to create jobs in as many communities as possible.  The question is, what is the means to creating those jobs? What I’m suggesting is that if you were to put $12,000 a year into the hands of every American adult … Let’s say there’s a town in Missouri of 10,000 people. Let’s say after I’m president, their disposable income goes up by $10 million a month. Where is that money going to go? It’s going to go into car repairs, day care expenses, Little League sign-ups, the occasional night out.  If you were a person in that town in Missouri and you wanted to start a bakery, before the dividend, it’s a dumb idea. Post-dividend, it might be a great idea. You can hire someone to help staff the bakery, you know if the bakery fails, you’re going to survive because you have this income that you can rely upon. This is the most stable and secure way to create jobs that actually reflect our community’s needs and values.In the 1960s and 1970s, the federal government commissioned a series of experiments to look at how guaranteed income effects labor participation. Researchers discovered that a program like U.B.I. doesn’t have the drastic effect on work that some might predict; households overall reduce their workload by roughly 13 percent, according to a paper in the Canadian Public Policy journal. What are the other alternatives? For the government to come in and say, “Hey, we’re going to designate five people to clean up this park forever.” “We’re going to designate 10 people to make our people stronger forever, regardless of whether or not they’re ——” BA: So a Republican would say that alternative is to let markets work. Is that what makes you a Democrat — you don’t think the market will create enough jobs for Americans? Oh, I think the market will work beautifully toward what it’s designed to do. The market is designed for maximal capital efficiency, and it is doing a phenomenal job. That’s why you see the returns on capital outstripping the returns on labor at historic levels. The market is not designed to maximize human well-being.  And again, all you have to do to look at it is to say, stock market prices and G.D.P. record highs, life expectancy declining.Mr. Trump likes to say that the economy has reached historic highs under his administration. However, life expectancy has been falling and other measures of well-being have declined, including rising rates of depression diagnosis. Like, that sums it up. You know? You don’t need any clearer divergence than that.  What I’m suggesting is we actually make capitalism’s goals align with ours, as human beings, as parents, as Americans. Instead of maximizing these capital efficiency measurements, we should be maximizing our own health and life expectancy, our children’s education and success rates, our mental health and freedom from substance abuse, our environmental sustainability. Then we can line up the power of the markets with how we are doing. But the markets do not care one whit about us and our children. BA: I want to ask you about the — Oh, sorry, go ahead. KK: Oh, sorry, I just wanted to ask you, you know, there are some people who would suggest that a better use of money, instead of giving a Freedom Dividend, would be to dramatically overhaul America’s high schools and start teaching people different skills instead of trying to continue the race against A.I.The Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development’s Future of Education and Skills 2030 project is exploring the ways education systems internationally need to change to prepare students for a rapidly automating economy.  Why isn’t that a path? Why couldn’t we instead change how we do education in this country? We should definitely do that, in a very big and dramatic way. And I have proposals to help move us toward a better model of high school education. Only 6 percent of American high school students are in technical, trade or apprenticeship tracks. In Germany, that’s 59 percent. Think about that gulf. Meanwhile, there are millions of those trade and middle-scale jobs that are left unfilled. Why is this?  One, it’s a lot easier and cheaper for us to throw kids into a classroom with textbooks and a teacher and say, “You’re going to go to college,” than it is to try and train them in skills that are going to give them a secure livelihood. Number two, we have fetishized college and stigmatized anything that’s not college. We’ve beaten Americans over the head, pretended everyone’s going to college and say, “It’s going to work for you.” And the Democrats are guilty of this. That’s why they’re yelling, “Free college, free college.”The question of whether to prioritize free public college has divided the Democratic candidates. Senators Warren and Sanders say that four-year public colleges should be free, and Senator Cory Booker signed on to legislation that could make it debt-free. Senator Amy Klobuchar previously criticized the idea of “free college for all,” but then signed on to a version of a free-college proposal. Mr. Yang, though, has said he supports forgiving more student loan debt but thinks the Freedom Dividend is a better solution to inequality than free college. Meanwhile, again, only 33 percent of Americans are going to go to college, and that is a relatively stable number. KK: But access to college is still a civil rights issue in this country.President Obama referred to education as the “civil rights issue of our time,” as did former Secretary of Education Arne Duncan. Indeed, the gap between education outcomes for black and white students has barely budged in recent decades, according to research from the Brookings Institution.  It very much is. But if you were to apply resources, you would want to apply resources in ways that don’t necessarily advantage the top third of your population by educational attainment exclusively. You would be trying to build more paths with the other two-thirds, which investing in trades and apprenticeships would do, and you would try and provide for the people who are the weakest and most vulnerable in the job market, which are not going to be the people that are attending college. Most American laborers work in the services sector, according to Pew Research — in July 2019, 107.8 million people worked in private service-providing industries including trade, transportation and utilities. Our economy is breaking down on all levels. Again, if you are fortunate enough to graduate from college today, you’re in the top third of the population, you’re graduating with tens of thousands in school loans very, very often, and there’s a 40 to 44 percent chance you’re going to do a job that does not require your college degree. That’s if you’re one of the winners in our society today. I spent seven years working with, frankly, some of the top educational products in our country. I saw that even the winners are not winning right now. And so imagine if you’re a nonwinner, what this looks like. BS: Would you dilate what you’re talking — seven years doing what? I started and ran a national nonprofit called Venture for America that recruited enterprising college graduates to help grow businesses in Detroit, Cleveland, St. Louis, New Orleans, Birmingham, Baltimore, and nine other American cities.Mr. Yang founded Venture for America, a fellowship program for recent college graduates, in 2011, with the goal of creating 100,000 new jobs in the country’s most underresourced cities. As of 2019, the nonprofit has created around 3,500 jobs.  We helped create several thousand jobs. I’m very, very proud of that. But I realize that the jobs we were creating were only going to apply for a small slice of the population. And these jobs were pouring water into a bathtub that has a giant hole ripped in the bottom. I’m running for president to let America know that it is not our imagination, the water is rushing out of the bathtub. Immigrants have nothing to do with it. It’s the fact that we’re going through the greatest economic transformation. BA: Just before we move on, maybe I can ask one more question. Of course, sure. BA: Your proposal is oddly regressive. On the benefits side you’re proposing that people will have to choose between this benefit and their existing federal benefits while someone like me just all the sudden gets a new check in their mailbox every month. On the funding side you’re relying on a VAT, which is an inherently regressive funding mechanism.A VAT (value-added tax) is a tax on consumption, so the burden disproportionately falls on low-income households, who spend a larger portion of their income. You’ve proposed some offsets, but I still don’t understand why you don’t just embrace a progressive approach to taxation. Either raise top rates or a wealth tax. If there are people who need help, why aren’t you trying to help them as much as possible? I’m for a more progressive tax structure. It’s clear that the people at the top of the income chain are not paying enough. I don’t think a wealth tax will work. I like the spirit of a wealth tax, but if you look at other countries’ experience, Germany, France, Denmark, Sweden, very sophisticated developed countries, they tried a wealth tax and they wound up repealing it because it had massive compliance problems, and it did not generate anywhere near the revenue that was projected.  So if you cannot learn from the experiences of other countries, what can you learn from?In 1990, 12 European countries had some form of a wealth tax, while today only three have kept the policy — Norway, Spain and Switzerland. Reports by the O.E.C.D. and others have found that the tax led to an exodus of the wealthy and didn’t raise as much revenue as anticipated. We have to take a policy that actually works, and what those countries and every other developed country have determined works, is a value added tax. Because a value added tax is impossible to game your way out of. If you’re a trillion-dollar technology company — you know, I was just in New Hampshire campaigning yesterday, and you know what I say to them? I say to everyone around the country, Amazon, a trillion-dollar technology company sucking up $20 billion in business every year, closing 30 percent of your stores and malls, paying zero in taxes, how do you feel about that? You know? And they are angry. They say, how the heck can Amazon be paying zero in taxes? And I was like, I know. And it’s up to you, the people of New Hampshire, to change it. So if you look at other countries ——  BA: But that doesn’t make our tax code more progressive. So if you look at other countries, they have a value-added tax and then they take those resources and put them to work toward various social programs in ways to balance out the inequality. Now, another thing I love about the value-added tax is you can either reduce it or exempt things like diapers, toilet paper, eggs, milk, things that Americans consume just to make ends meet, and you can dial it up on things like artificial intelligence, yachts, luxury watches. There are ways that you can make it so that it falls more heavily on people that would barely notice. And we’re taking the resources plus an additional hundreds of billions of dollars and putting it directly into the hands of working Americans. This would increase the buying power of literally 90 percent of Americans. BA: But just to be clear, it’s still not a progressive tax. There’s no model that says that you can use these kinds of exclusions and exemptions to make that progressive. You can make it less regressive. You’re still fundamentally proposing a nonprogressive means of revenue raising.A progressive tax is one in which the rate increases with income, while a regressive tax increases inversely with income. In a vacuum, you’re 100 percent correct. But it’s failing to account for the fact that we’re taking that money, and then some, and putting it directly into the hands of the American consumer. BA: But that just brings us to the other side of it, where what you’re proposing is not to give as much more money to the people who need it the most. You’re saying, if you get food stamps, the amount by which your government benefits increase will be less than for me or you.A working paper from the National Bureau of Economic Research found that U.B.I. could redirect spending to more affluent and middle-income families, therefore leaving low-income families worse off; a U.B.I. large enough to direct more funds to low-income households would be extremely costly. Read the paper here. Let’s say I’m on food stamps, and I’ve got a 15-year-old son and a 12-year-old daughter. I’m concerned about their future, very, very deeply. And then Andrew Yang becomes president, and I find out that my 15-year-old is going to get $1,000 a month starting at age 18 for the rest of his life, and my 12-year-old is going to get $1,000 a month for the rest of her life. I’m going to say, wow. That’s actually the biggest value gain I’ve ever even heard of in history.Other candidates have taken a different approach to creating a nest egg for low-income youth — Senator Booker, for example, favors baby bonds, which would provide every infant with a savings account that the government would contribute to annually depending on family income.  My kid will have a financial literacy class in high school, the first semester of their senior year. It is impossible to teach financial literacy to someone who does not have money. So the kids will actually learn about what to do with the money before they start getting the money.  This is a game changer for Americans in any circumstance. And I am not for reducing or curtailing any of these social programs. For me, we’re trying to lay a foundation that works for all Americans, and then we need to keep building on top of it. So if there are people that post-Freedom Dividend need additional programs and assistance, I’m all for it. KK: I want to ask you, you were the C.E.O. of Manhattan Prep.Mr. Yang was the C.E.O. of a boutique test prep company that was purchased by Kaplan in 2009. The company flourished during the 2008 financial collapse, becoming the country’s foremost preparatory company for the GMAT as more people flocked to business school.  How does test prep — doesn’t that contribute to income inequality in the United States? Yeah, it does. It’s one reason why I think we need to de-emphasize — excuse me. KK: Take your time. Not at all. We originated the SAT during World War II as a way to determine which kids we did not want to send to the front lines.The SAT was first administered in 1926 and evolved out of a test used for admission to Princeton University and Cooper Union. It was inspired by military experiments with I.Q. testing. Now we treat our kids like every year is wartime. I’ve talked to parents and teachers around the country, and I’ve said, we need to de-emphasize these standardized tests. They are a terrible measurement of human value, certainly have nothing to do with character. At this point, as you said, they are more likely to test your parents’ socioeconomic status than anything else.  So we need to have better, more holistic ways of measuring how our kids are doing educationally, and we need to empower teachers and let teachers do their jobs. Because if you are a teacher and you’re teaching to the test, you end up making decisions in the classroom that you know are not right for the students. KK: Actually, I also want to ask you about your time at Manhattan Prep. Your colleague Kimberly Watkins told City Council in September that she had faced both gender harassment and pay inequity under your leadership there. Could you respond to those allegations? I believe your reporters then talked to maybe half a dozen or more of Kim’s contemporaries at the organization and found out that those allegations were completely groundless, which they were.In an essay published by the Gotham Gazette, Kimberly Watkins alleged that Mr. Yang fired her from Manhattan Prep because he did not think she would “continue working as hard” after getting married. Mr. Yang appeared on “The View” shortly after and said there was “zero truth” to Ms. Watkins’s account. After publication, Ms. Watkins reached out to the editorial board, noting the question contained an error — she testified before a New York City hearing on pay equity, but, as she wroteto us , “I have on multiple occasions drawn contrast to ‘pay equity,’ with what I experienced, which concerns long term economic stability. The reality that my economic future was destroyed by Yang, right after my marriage, after an unblemished six-year commitment to this company, has been the focus of my story, not pay inequity…Yang’s response [also] grossly overstates the investigative process and draws a false conclusion.” Nick Fox: Can I clarify one point on taxation? Are you proposing any new or increased taxes on the wealthiest Americans or corporations, or is it strictly the VAT? If you look at our proposals, we have a tax on financial transactions, which would obviously end up falling most heavily on the wealthiest Americans and the wealthiest companies. We have a carbon tax, which tends to fall most heavily on the wealthiest industries, which are emitting a lot.A Times evaluation of Mr. Yang's tax plan by N. Gregory Mankiw, professor of economics at Harvard, found that Mr. Yang’s tax plan would target the affluent who spend their money lavishly while incentivizing people to save. The value-added tax would obviously be enormously generative from people who benefit from society and consume the most. I’m for trying to restore our income tax levels to previous levels to be more progressive. Michelle Cottle: Now, I think it’s clear that people are responding to you in part because you have this big vision,Mr. Yang has a fervent online following that calls itself the Yang Gang. but Washington has a problem achieving even kind of modest —— Yeah, we noticed. MC: So, and we are currently enjoying a businessmen president who has no experience in government or the military. What is your argument to people, that we should trust you with no experience in government and the military, in the same position, and that you will do a better job dealing with the peculiarities of Washington.Many of Mr. Yang’s supporters say they are drawn to his perspective as a political outsider; in The Wall Street Journal, some say they previously supported Senator Sanders but now look for a candidate who offers an even fresher non-Washington perspective. Well, it sounds like you’ve been there. MC: Quite a lot. Did you come up for this? MC: Yeah, I’m based out of —— Oh, man. Well, thank you for making the trip. Then you know. First, any person who says they’re going to run government like a business does not know what they’re talking about, because they are two completely different things.  In a business you can say, “Hey, we’re going to go this way,” and people generally have to do what you’re saying. In government it’s much more analogous to my role as the founder of a national nonprofit, where you have hundreds or even thousands of stakeholders, and you have to try and generate energy around a vision.Mr. Yang told Vox’s Recode that one of the reasons he quit Venture for America, the nonprofit he created, was because he realized it couldn’t achieve the change he wanted at the necessary scale. For instance, it had fallen short of the 100,000 jobs he set out for it to create.  Let people see that it’s in their self-interest or the self-interest of the people that they represent to get on board with your vision. And that you’re willing to compromise and work with them. That is the way I would lead as president.  Donald Trump does not speak for every non-politician or nonmilitary officer. But there is a deep need, and you’ve seen this, because you spent time in D.C., the D.C. establishment will not generate big solutions.  One of the reasons why Donald Trump is our president is that millions of Americans feel like our government is unresponsive to our needs and the needs in our communities.Mr. Yang has frequently said that automation contributed heavily to Mr. Trump’s win, because voters feel disaffected and worry that the futures of their jobs and industries are in jeopardy. They’ve been casting about for some sort of change agent for years. And it’s not just Donald Trump’s victory; it was Bernie Sanders outsized success. In some ways, it was even Obama’s victory in 2008. If you remember that campaign, it was oh, hope, change. It was not, get the most experienced person in the seat as possible, because we are decades behind the curve in addressing the problems and challenges that are tearing us apart. Now —— KK: Do you feel like President Obama achieved the change that he had promised in the 2008 campaign? I think that he did a lot of great things and he did a lot of what he could, but to the extent that there was a missed opportunity, it was in the wake of the financial crisis.A critique of President Obama’s financial policies by Matt Stoller, of the Open Markets Institute, argues that the Obama administration let banking executives off the hook for their role in the financial crisis and enabled nine million foreclosures. And it’s very hard to Monday morning quarterback a team when they literally felt like the economy itself was at stake, but we should have done much more to recapitalize homeowners as opposed to the banks. We could have kept many more people in their homes. We could’ve kept many of these communities —— BS: Without a doubt.  —— more strong and more whole. There’s a saying, I think it was actually, and maybe in this … no, it was an earlier administration, but a crisis is a terrible thing to waste.“A crisis is a terrible thing to waste” is a quote attributed to the Stanford economist Paul Romer. He made the comment at a meeting in 2004, referring to the competition America faces from the rising education levels around the globe. Rahm Emanuel, Mr. Obama’s chief of staff, later echoed the statement after President Obama’s election. There was a crisis. There was a massive opportunity to help rebalance our economy, but we instead recapitalized the banks to the tune of $4 trillion. And what I say to Americans around the country, I say, “Hey, do you remember voting for the $4 trillion bailout of Wall Street”? And it gets this laugh. But then they answer, “Wait, we did that”? And it’s, “Of course we didn’t vote for that.”  So, that to me was the biggest missed opportunity in the Obama administration, and it happened very, very early on. I wish that they owned and reflected a little bit on the fact that maybe they could have done some things differently at that stage, because we’re still angry. This country is still angry. I was so shocked by what happened in the financial crisis, I quit my job and started a national nonprofit and ran it for seven years. I had — my wife was pregnant. I mean, what happened to this country then is still tearing us apart.Mr. Yang started Venture for America in 2011, shortly after selling his test prep company to Kaplan. He said that he saw, in the wake of the financial crisis, how certain communities were rapidly losing jobs and wanted to create new work opportunities in those underserved areas. Lauren Kelley: Mr. Yang, can you say who is on your short list for running mate? I love this question. LK: So do we. Well, one of the joys of running for president is you get to know incredible people on the trail, including some of the other contenders. I’m on the record saying I would prefer to have a female running mate.Mr. Yang confirmed this summer that he would like his running mate to be a woman.  I think teams run better if you have men and women leaders at the highest possible levels. I joke, but it’s mostly true, that if you get too many men alone for too long, we kind of become morons. So we need to keep that from happening at the highest levels. MC: He has my vote. All right. [LAUGHTER] But at the same time, in order to have someone at that level of relationship, you need to have as much trust as possible and I’m still developing that kind of relationship with some of the other, not just candidates, but also people who could be running mates that are not currently running.Mr. Yang has scored internet points with some tweets paying tribute to former 2020 Democratic rivals, for example by tweeting “I miss Beto.”  LK: So no names yet. No names yet, no. KK: Do you feel like you need to have a running mate who has operated in Washington before or who has previous government experience? Almost certainly, yes. And you saw it a little bit with Barack Obama where he tapped Joe Biden in part because Joe had very deep relationships on Capitol Hill. If you had another outsider like me, we’d still be trying to figure out who to call. So, you need to have folks who have deep relationships on Capitol Hill from day one. LK: Speaking of women, I wanted to ask you about reproductive rights as well. You told some of our colleagues in the newsroom that you would consider some executive actions to protect reproductive rights, but I haven’t seen any details about what actions you’re considering. Do you have any details to share with us about that? Well, I’m all about trying to improve the reality on the ground, to the extent that we can actually put resources and funds to work in communities to make sure that women have access to reproductive rights in clinics. Certainly any way we can make sure that there aren’t any obstacles to the funding of Planned Parenthood clinics around the country. I would take those actions immediately. A lot of the legislative actions, you need a bit more time and a bit more buy-in from Congress, but at the Supreme Court level, I would consider appointing more justices if it was necessary to safeguard women’s reproductive rights.Mr. Yang has argued that more legislative oversight on reproductive issues should come from physicians rather than politicians. He tweeted: “I personally don’t think male legislators should be weighing in on women’s reproductive rights and freedoms.” KK: You mean, you would in addition to the nine that we already have? In addition to the nine we already have. I believe that — so if you look at the Constitution, there is nothing there that stipulates the number of Supreme Court justices. We’ve had fewer than nine, we’ve had more than nine. I think that appointing new justices would be helpful on several levels. It would help depoliticize the process, at least marginally, because if you have 17 justices and one steps down, then it’s not as much of an earthquake. Well, right now we we’re hinging our laws on the health of an octogenarian. It would literally be rational for us to all just to follow Ruth Bader Ginsburg around and just scrub any door knob she touches.Justice Bader Ginsburg has had a series of health scares in recent years, including surgery for lung cancer and radiation treatment. She also had surgery for early-stage pancreatic cancer in 2009.  You know what I mean? JW: You remember what happened the last time a president tried to do this, right? Yeah. And I think in some ways, there’s some positive lessons to be drawn from that time, because there were some significant accomplishments during that era.President Franklin Roosevelt tried to advance a “court-packing” strategy to ensure favorable rulings on New Deal legislation. He wanted to appoint up to six additional justices, one for every justice older than 70 years. The plan was unpopular in Congress and among the Supreme Court’s justices. KK: So, can you give us some names of people you would nominate to the Supreme Court? That’s a fun exercise, too. I haven’t gotten into the judicial appointment shortlist yet, but safeguarding women’s reproductive rights would be one clear criteria. Because women’s reproductive rights are fundamental human rights in my mind.  I think it’s actually unfortunate that I get asked about those sorts of questions, in the sense that I feel like men should leave the room and let women decide what to do with your bodies. I have a feeling I know what you would decide, and then we could come back and say, “Hey, what did you decide”? I also think that if men got pregnant, this would be a very, very different conversation. And we’d have a completely different approach to these issues. So, I don’t have a short list of Supreme Court justice appointees, but safeguarding women’s reproductive rights and having an evolving sense of the law would be very important. We need to modernize the court. Lifetime appointments might have made sense at one point a long time ago, but when the Constitution was drafted, people did not live as long. And also, people stepped down from the Supreme Court for any of a range of reasons. They did not wait until they were at death’s door. This is not a way to run a 21st-century society.  We should have 18-year term limits, increase the number of justices, make it so it’s predictable that you lose an election, the other party might get one or two justices, and then we don’t need to literally be monitoring the health of our justices. Or, the most ridiculous thing is you’re literally looking at the age of the person you’re appointing being, “Ooh, this person will be there for 30, 40 years.” What kind of system do you want where you’re having a society decide 30 years ago what women’s rights are today? Doesn’t make any sense. JW: Are you concerned that you wouldn’t be triggering a sort of a war of — a back and forth between Republicans and Democrats, who were continuing to add justices to the bench with each new administration to satisfy their own policy priorities? If you have term limits, it is bipartisan. Because —— JW: Right, but you’re talking about expanding the court, too, and if you expand the court, as you say correctly, that it’s a federal law, there’s nothing in the Constitution about the number of justices. You expand it to 13, the next Republican who comes in, who is furious about women having too many reproductive rights, will expand it to 17 to overturn the rulings you just got.Court packing isn’t a violation of any part of the Constitution, but it is widely debated with critics pointing out that it would trigger severe political backlash. So, how doesn’t that just become — doesn’t devolve into —— BS: An arms race. Well, I would suggest that one side has been acting as if it is an arms race. And so, in that environment, it’s only appropriate to respond in a way that you think would help move the country and our legal system in the right direction. Can I talk — oh. Jeneen Interlandi: Oh no, go ahead. JW: I just wanted to tie together the question — a question from Lauren and a question from Michelle, and ask you about Washington, both with regard to Supreme Court confirmation process and your agenda more generally. You said at the very beginning of our conversation, in response to Katie, that you don’t need a — you were talking about various [cross talk].  Yeah, you said you don’t need 80 percent of Congress, you need a majority. And I would push back and say neither of those is correct. You need 60 percent of the Senate currently. The question is, how do you plan to get things done, even if you had a Democratic majority in the Senate? Which I think is right now less than an even chance. How do you propose getting your agenda through Congress when the filibuster is in place? To your earlier concern, I think we should examine the filibuster. I think that gridlock is bad for anyone trying to get anything done and solve problems. This might be controversial in this room, but I am for the restoration of earmarks, because it helped make legislation possible. That if I was a congressperson in a district, and there was a bill being passed, it’s, “Hey, at least I can get some pork for my local museum.” And that’s a very small price to pay for a functional legislature. So, getting past the filibuster to me is one possible necessity, and the restoration of earmarks could be another.Earmarking allows Congress to appropriate discretionary funds for specific projects. Mr. Yang supports them because he feels they allow representatives to generate revenue for their constituents to offset costs their area might experience from a given piece of legislation.  JW: And let me just, one last follow-up on that. If Democrats don’t take back the Senate, how do you feel with the Supreme Court — how do you, I mean, put aside expanding the number of justices, how do you even get a justice onto the court in the first place? It’s obviously much harder. I’m all about trying to maximize the possible. And so, if we don’t get a majority — I expect the Democrats will win a slight majority in the Senate. I’m very optimistic that way, but we’re going to get done what we can get done with the branch of the government we have control of. And I will say too, I believe that we can get some things done that are traditionally bipartisan, regardless of who has control of the Senate. To me, I cannot believe that we did not get infrastructure done during the first couple of years of the Trump administration. I thought at least he would build some bridges and roads, and I was even willing to accept the Trump name on those bridges and roads if it got some bridges and roads built. I was, “At least we’re going to get this.”The editorial board recently called for the Trump administration to break the impasse on funding for the proposed rail tunnel under the Hudson River in an editorial titled: “Build the Donald J. Trump Tunnel.” The vital infrastructure project has stalled because of political infighting.  KK: We’ve called for that, too. Really? So, we have to get done what we can get done. And if we have to focus on things that are traditionally bipartisan, I’d be excited to lead with that. I mean, I’d be much more excited to lead with a much bigger agenda to balance out this economy, to work for people. And I will say that’s bipartisan, too. When I go around to Americans around the country, if you were to go to a room of Republicans and say, “Hey, how do you feel about Amazon paying zero in taxes”? They’re not excited about that. They feel like this economy is rigged against them and their families, and they’re generally correct, and that is bipartisan. JI: You’ve proposed legalizing gambling at the federal level, regulating it. KK: Online. JI: Yeah, online gambling. Just online poker. JI: Yes. Regulating it heavily and using the revenue to treat gambling addiction. Can you talk through that? You say on your website that you think gambling addiction doesn’t get nearly enough attention, and it is a really important issue. How does legalizing gambling, even if you use the revenue, not make that problem worse? Any American who wants to gamble online on a poker site can do so from any state in the country right now. If it’s illegal in your state, you just end up using an offshore betting site, which is shady, has problems, but it’s not going to ease your gambling addiction at all. So the question is, do we want Americans, in the vast majority of the country, on offshore betting sites, dealing with shady characters and generating no revenue and still being addicted?Mr. Yang’s campaign estimates that federally regulating the U.S. online poker market could raise $2.2 billion just in its first year. The campaign also argues that federal regulation would make it easier to combat money laundering.  Or would we prefer that they do business with American firms, where we do have better regulations, we know they’re not getting cheated, we know they’re not getting exploited, and you generate tax revenue that you can use to treat gambling addiction. JI: So, what steps would you take to take that money and create a gambling addiction treatment program or system? So, what exactly would you do to get from A to B? I mean, you could make it so it’s analogous to what happened in the tobacco industry,President Obama signed into law the Family Smoking Prevention and Tobacco Control Act in 2009, which gave the Food and Drug Administration authority to fully regulate the sale of tobacco products. where there’s a certain level of revenue that gets set aside and then you have various public service announcements. JI: In that system, a lot of that money didn’t actually go to treating tobacco-related health problems. A lot of it went to shoring up state budgets, and some of them even went to the tobacco industry actually,In 2007 the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommended that states direct 14 percent of funds from tobacco taxes and the national settlement toward antismoking campaigns, but most states have funneled it toward other areas, from agriculture to literacy. so I don’t know if that’s the best model. Oh, you might not want to push the money to the states and then have them determine how to use it in their budgets. You could empower a national program or an agency to help administer it at the federal level, if you didn’t trust the states to actually use it in the right way. JI: I actually really quickly want to go back to a question that Binya was asking you. You said, you gave us the example of parents with two kids and you’re on food stamps and you’re worried about your kids’ future. And at the end of that explanation, you said that you are not for curtailing social supports, but isn’t your plan such that, that mother, aside from what the kids would get in the future, that mother would have to choose between the food stamps and the actual U.B.I., right? Is that correct? That is correct. But when I’ve dug into it, very, very few Americans are getting $1,000 in food stamps. And most of the people who are on government assistance live in fear of losing that assistance because there are various requirements that tend to come with it. And when, if you ask them, say, “Hey, would you prefer $1,000 unconditional that you can rely upon,” they actually think that’s too good to be true. JI: Sure. But to Binya’s point, it’s still a trade-off. So, if I’m on food stamps, I’m getting less of a benefit than, say, Jesse, who’s not on food stamps. Well to me, playing the relative benefit game, I mean of course in any large scale national program, it’s you can’t calibrate it precisely to everyone’s individual situation. To me the test is more, is that person going to be better off tomorrow than they are today? KK: So I want to move on. We have some more personal questions for you. Really? KK: I think Mara’s going to kick you off. MG: So, if you become president, what government secret are you most excited to learn about? Definitely aliens, of course. KK: O.K. That’d be my first question if I got in there, I’d be, “All right, let me see them. Let’s see what we’ve been hiding all of these years.” KK: And, who has broken your heart? Wow, these questions are really fun. Who’s broken my heart? BS: Don’t be tactical now. This is — I mean, this is going to make me very sad to say, but I feel like I had an arc or a relationship with President Obama, where it was inspirational when he won. I was celebrating with my wife in the streets. And then over the years I began to feel like we’d missed a great opportunity. So, I’d say there was some heartbreak attached to that. And I worked with the president afterward, and I still admire him a great deal, but I think we could have done a lot more, and I don’t think opportunities like that come along very often.The Obama administration named Mr. Yang a Presidential Ambassador for Global Entrepreneurship in 2015 and a Champion of Change in 2012. KK: For millions of Americans, church and religion are the centers of their communities. Do you believe in God? Do you go to church regularly? Who are your spiritual advisers? I grew up in an entirely secular household. Mr. Yang was raised in New York; his parents immigrated from Taiwan. My parents did not talk about God in the house, but I had this instinctive belief in a higher power. I had many Christian relatives. I went to church over holidays growing up quite often. And then I married my wife, Evelyn, who’s Christian. And so, we’re raising our kids in a Christian church. I go to church when I’m home, which is not very often unfortunately nowadays. I enjoy it. My faith is still very much a journey, but I’m unreservedly thrilled about the impact it has on my wife, my boys, my family, my community. BS: Which denomination? It’s a progressive Protestant church.Mr. Yang and his family began attending Sunday services at the Reformed Church of New Paltz after they purchased a home nearby in 2015.  We primarily go upstate, where we have a house in a town called New Paltz. They’ve got a rainbow flag up front. It’s a very welcoming community. MG: Actually just a quick follow-up. When was the last time you rode the subway? I rode the subway maybe six weeks ago or so. It’s become much more of a pain in the neck now that I actually get recognized. I confess that that’s been the biggest adjustment in running for president. Because I was, “No, I’m not going to get recognized on the street.” Of course, keep in mind, when I started my run I was completely anonymous. I mean none of you had ever heard of me. And also there is, and this is not to make too much of it, but there’s also this invisible Asian man thing. That you feel like all you have to do is just not want to be seen and then you disappear, and that doesn’t work anymore.  When I’m on the subway, people will look at me and then look at me. And then eventually someone will inch over and say, “Hey, you running for president”? And then I’ll say, “Yes, I am.” They’ll say, “Yeah, yeah, I like you. Thousand bucks a month,” something like that. And then they want to take pictures. And then as soon as someone breaks the seal, then it’s safe for everyone to do it. And so, then I’ll be — and then there’s this uncomfortable period in this subway car after you’ve taken the pictures with him, you’re still sitting there. And so then they’re, “So, where are you going? Or, how’s Bernie”? Or whatever the questions are. And so, I have not been riding the subway lately, but I’ve ridden the subway an awful lot over the years. Now my preferred mode of transportation is the bike, because if someone recognizes me, it’s generally too late. KK: I thought you were going to say it’s a lot harder to ride the subway now because of the breakdowns of New York infrastructure.In 2017, Gov. Andrew Cuomo declared a state of emergency in New York’s subway and pledged $1 billion for improvements. The editorial board has repeatedly called for action to make the subways workable for this paper’s millions of readers. That too. I mean, it’s rough. But I mean, New York’s going through — I just want to bring some things to you from experience. Like yeah, the infrastructure breaking down. I mean, we’re coasting on the investments made decades ago and they’re starting to fall apart. But also what you all do in terms of journalism — I’ve been campaigning around the country and over 1,200 local papers have gone out of business because the local establishments that used to advertise are gone. All of their classified revenue went off to Craigslist and democracy works much less if you don’t have local journalism. A report released by PEN America in November found that more than 1,800 local print outlets have closed since 2004, and at least 200 counties have no newspaper. This, to me, is an emblem of what’s gone wrong in American life. Where the market is all knowing and all powerful, and if the market decides that local journalism has zero value, then it has zero value. And that is not the way forward for us. We need to make our own independent determination of our own value as people, of the value of local journalism, of the value of arts, of the value of volunteering, of caregiving, of — like all the most important things in American life. And so you, in many ways, you’re like the guardians of this incredible journalistic tradition, and it’s like a unique privilege because the people who’ve pursued the same vocation in other parts of the country are just seeing it disappear. KK: Do you believe in government subsidies for journalism? Yes. I have three major pro-journalism proposals on my website, including federally funding journalists for every congressional district, billions of dollars in grants to help transition local journalism.One criticism of government subsidized journalism is that it could stifle the media’s capacity to serve as a watchdog.  Matching grants, so you’re not like saying, “Hey, we’re going to do this.” But matching grants to help transition them to cooperative models of ownership to nonprofit and philanthropic models.  You can build it around the town library, because a lot of them have this bulletin board that serves as the skeleton of a local paper when the local paper has gone out of business. A lot of these papers would be able to get by if they did not have to generate stock market level returns for hedge fund owners and private equity owners. If you had a cooperative model and it’s made a certain amount of money, spent a certain amount of money, ran as a nonprofit, you could restore and sustain local journalism and thousands of communities, but it will not happen without government support. It just won’t. KK: Think you might be overly optimistic. Maybe we’ll move on to foreign policy, if you don’t mind? Sure. Yeah. Alex Kingsbury: Another thing the country’s invested in quite a lot is the military, and as commander in chief, you’d be in charge of that. Can you tell me how many aircraft carriers the United States Navy has? Oh my gosh. AK: Whether or not the Navy is big enough to meet its commitments with the Chinese and the South China Sea? What’s going on in the Persian Gulf? What do you think? I think the number of aircraft carriers is either seven or nine.The correct answer is 11. I confess to not knowing precisely. In terms of our investment, we’re spending $650 billion plus on our military. Certainly more than any other country, but I think more than the next four countries combined, and we have to examine, at this stage, whether that $650 billion is making us safer and more secure.  What are the true threats of the 21st century? Climate change is number one, and then cybersecurity and A.I., loose nuclear material, military drones in the hands of nonstate actors. It’s very hard to secure a location from something the size of a flying vacuum cleaner. That’s very, very difficult. So we’re entering an era where it’s going to be much easier to be offensive than defensive, and you don’t need massive levels of resources to cause significant levels of damage. To me, a new aircraft carrier does not make our elections any more secure from Russian hacking, which is the most direct threat to our democracy upcoming in this cycle. We’re spending money on the threats of the 20th century, and we need to try and modernize our approach as quickly as possible. AK: The president at the moment is at a NATO summit, or he might’ve left —— I saw the headlines about how people were making fun of him.Mr. Trump canceled a planned news conference at a NATO gathering in December after a video circulated that showed world leaders including Prime Minister Justin Trudeau of Canada and President Emmanuel Macron of France in what appeared to be a conversation mocking Mr. Trump.  I was like, “Oh man, this is really — we really have to put an end to this administration.” AK: But one of his priorities has been to get our European allies to spend more money on their own defense. And I wonder if you think that that’s a worthwhile goal and how you might go about it, if you agree that that’s something that should be a priority for the United States. To me, one of the worst things you can do in a relationship is if you have this longstanding understanding or a friendship or partnership, and then you try and change the understanding at a particular point in time and do it unilaterally.  We need to let our historic allies know that our commitments are good, and that if we want to make a change, we want to do it in a way that’s not pulling the rug out from under you but actually consultative. If we want other people to invest more, then we have to try and sit down with them and drive them to do so without questioning our commitment to NATO wholesale. But to me, trying to nickel-and-dime our relationships with our historic allies is not the best way forward. I think it was James Mattis that said that if you invest more in diplomacy, you have to invest less in ammunition, which should be the goal.In response to announcements about Mr. Trump’s planned cuts to State Department funding, retired generals wrote a letter to lawmakers citing Secretary of Defense James Mattis’s 2013 comment, “If you don’t fund the State Department fully, then I need to buy more ammunition ultimately.” So we need to make sure our partnerships and alliances are actually strong, stable and secure, and then we can put pressure on Russia and China with more of a global consensus, and maintain the international world order that’s benefited us for decades that now is falling apart because Donald Trump is so erratic and unreliable, even with the people we’ve been allies with for decades. AK: Speaking of allies, should Ukraine be invited to join NATO? I know that Ukraine’s received sort of undue influence on this election, but going forward? I mean, that’s not solely an American decision. NATO expansion is something that is fraught and elevates tensions with Russia in particular. I think we should explore it. I’m sympathetic, but it’s not a decision we can make alone.A recent poll found that roughly 50 percent of the Ukrainian population favors joining NATO, though Hungary’s foreign minister recently said his country would block Ukrainian membership unless Ukraine changed a policy restricting its citizens’ use of minority languages. KK: Do you think — speaking of allies, do you think Turkey is still an ally to the United States, and do you think the U.S. should have nuclear weapons there? This is what’s so tough right now is that countries are trying to figure out what are the benefits of being an ally of the United States and doing what we want them to do, and then what are the costs. Unfortunately that calculation is going against us more and more. Turkey’s relationship with the U.S. has been stronger than our relationship with many other countries in that region. I think we should invest in that relationship if we’re going to be able to accomplish any of our goals there. And that includes, to me, being a little bit more accommodating about behaviors that we might find objectionable or troubling from them than we might from another country. Serge Schmemann: Yeah. And staying with relationships and alliances, President Trump has reversed several key policies the United States has had toward Israel. He’s moved the embassy to Jerusalem, he’s recognized sovereignty over the Golan Heights, et cetera, et cetera. Would you reverse those? Historically, we’ve endorsed a two-state solution, which has always struck me as the best way forward, and I think it’s really unfortunate that Donald Trump has moved us away from that to the extent that he has. I would try to move us back in that direction.Mr. Yang has frequently reiterated his commitment to a two-state solution but has not released any detailed plans about how he would advance an Israeli-Palestinian peace plan or address Mr. Trump’s policies in the region. He told the Council on Foreign Relations, “I don’t want to prescribe the specifics of a two-state solution, as the Israeli and Palestinian people both need to be leading any conversation, and I look forward to engaging with all stakeholders.” SS: O.K. Again, about your responsibilities as president. One of the heaviest ones would be waging war. When you look back on the conflicts into which recent presidents have put us, would you support this? Is this something you would have done in Syria, in Libya, in Kosovo? Would you have sent troops there? So I have a three-part test for sending troops into harm’s way. Number one, it needs to advance a vital American interest or avert a humanitarian catastrophe. Number two, it has to have a clearly defined timeline where we can look troops in the eyes and say, “It’s going to take this long and you’re going to be able to accomplish our mission and then you’re going to be able to come home.” And not some boardroom self-delusion, like you actually believe that you’re going to get it done and then be able to bring them home in that time frame. And number three, we’re not going in alone; there are allies joining us in the mission. If those three things are in place, then I would consider sending our troops into harm’s way. Generally speaking, I think we have become overly aggressive and optimistic about what we can accomplish in various foreign theaters. I’ve signed a pledge to end the forever wars because I don’t believe it’s the will of the American people for us to be in a constant state of armed conflict in foreign theaters for years and even decades at a time.Common Defense’s “End the Forever War” pledge advocates for an “expedient conclusion” to the global war on terror and American military involvement in Afghanistan, Iraq, Syria and elsewhere, and Mr. Yang became the fourth candidate to sign on, in May, following Senators Sanders and Warren (and former Senator Mike Gravel).  Our Constitution says that it’s in Congress’s hands to declare war, but Congress has completely ceded this authority through the A.U.M.F. [Authorization for Use of Military Force] and then just said, “Hey, executive branch, you can do what you want.” And now they want nothing to do with it, and that is not the will of the American people, and it’s not the will of the Constitution. So we should repeal the A.U.M.F. and say, “Look, Congress, if we want to authorize armed conflict, it should be on you and it should be the will of the people.” SS: Concretely, would you have sent troops, say, to Syria? No. I’d have to look at the facts at the time that that decision was being made. James Dao: Can I pose a future hypothetical? If the Chinese government were to flood Hong Kong with military troops after you were president and impose a violent crackdown, similar to, say, Tiananmen Square in 1989, what would you do? I have family in Hong Kong. I spent a semester there in college, and so when I see those streets wracked with riots and violence, I actually remember being on those streets. And so it’s incredibly jarring, and it’s an extraordinary situation because of Hong Kong’s status as this semiautonomous region that’s being reintegrated back into China.  Our best path forward with China is to try and have them continue to show restraint, but also see that the costs to human rights abuse is not just in Hong Kong, but with their ethnic minorities and the Muslim population of Uighurs, that the costs are higher than their perceived benefits of maintaining social order and stability. In order to have those costs feel real to the Chinese, we can’t just moralize and say, “Hey, do the right thing.” Because at this point they’re looking at us and saying like, “Keep your opinions and value statements to yourselves.”  We have to be working toward China’s second main priority, which is maintaining robust economic growth. So there are two goals. There are two primary goals that are sometimes in tension, of maintaining social order and maintaining robust economic growth. And the best way we can try and contain their behavior in Hong Kong is to say, “Look, the economic costs are going to be very, very high.” And the best way we can do that is to build global consensus around certain norms and behaviors.  At the last debate, I proposed a world data organization, because to me, China’s in position to leapfrog us in artificial intelligence. They’re investing tens of billions in a way that our government is not. It’s a national effort. And they’ve now separated their technology ecosystem from the West’s and they’re trying to sell their software and operating systems to other countries with very limited success right now, but this parallel tech universe, to me, is something that we can actually use to bring China back to the table.  That’s why something like world data organization is so vital. When they had to join the W.T.O. [World Trade Organization], they realized this was going to be vital to their economic growth, so they’re going to have to make some decisions and compromises in order to join the world order. We can create an analogous situation for data and technology and then use that to try and curb some of their worst abuses and behaviors. Now, is this going to happen in time to help Hong Kong? I certainly hope so. I mean, I certainly hope that they don’t flood the streets of Hong Kong with troops any time in the next number of days or weeks.Mr. Yang has been critical of China’s “increasingly authoritarian” behavior and told the Council on Foreign Relations the United States must in reply demonstrate “a model for democratic capitalism.” KK: And do you think President Xi is a dictator? I think he meets just about every conventional definition of dictator. Yes. Charlie Warzel: You were talking about data and that’s a good segue into some of the — I mean, you’re probably the candidate who sort of runs on understanding the internet better than anyone right now. And I’m curious first about this worldwide data organization.Mr. Yang has proposed what he describes as “a W.T.O. for data” and has argued that data ownership should be made a property right. Some argue that such an organization could enable more partnership among countries in setting standards for artificial intelligence and data.  For someone like China, wouldn’t it actually be better for them to sort of hoard that data and hoard that information and keep that closed system? So this is the carrot and the stick. So imagine if you had data standards that were endorsed by the U.S., the E.U., and Japan, and it had certain technology protocols associated with it. Then China said, “Hey, I don’t want to adhere to that.” Because like you said, they like to hoard data, and one of the reasons why they’re in position to leapfrog us is they have more data than we do and they have essentially nonexistent privacy rights or regulations. They have complete surveillance. That’s one reason why they’ve banned masks in Hong Kong, so that their surveillance technology can pick up who the protesters are. So China has its own vast hoard of data.There has been a continuing controversy over Hong Kong’s law banning masks to target anti-government protesters. One court ruling found it unconstitutional, but a later ruling temporarily reinstated it.  But for them the challenge is not even what’s happening internally. The challenge is whether or not they can get developing countries on board with their technology standards to be able to roll them out internationally. So if you’re a third party, let’s say you’re a developing country in Africa or Latin America, then you have a choice essentially between the global standard and the Chinese standard. And if you’re the Chinese, you do not want a standard that only you are using over time, because that’s going to curb your economic upside to all of the software that you’re building. One of the reasons why our tech companies are so successful is that they export it to virtually the entire rest of the world, and China does not want to be in the opposite position. CW: I’m curious, then, focusing on the U.S., a couple of months ago the general counsel for the N.S.A. wrote an Op-Ed for us and was worried about this big challenge of the government not being able to acquire the tech talent. That Silicon Valley is actually so much more attractive, so much more interesting there. And that when you’re looking at 5G technology, quantum computing, technology, A.I., not having engineers in that space and sort of outsourcing that to the private sector is potentially incredibly dangerous. Like how do you actually make people want to come and bring that engineering talent to the federal government, rather than ——  KK: Especially given your proposal for Department of the Attention Economy. Well, the Department of the Attention Economy would likely be based in Silicon Valley, and it’d be run by a guy named Tristan Harris,Mr. Yang has been the most vocal of all candidates about privacy issues. Tristan Harris, whom he has alluded to in discussing the Department of the Attention Economy, spent three years as a Google design ethicist. He left to found the Center for Humane Technology, a nonprofit that seeks to address the “digital attention crisis.”  who’s a design ethicist. He started Time Well Spent. So I don’t think it’s necessarily the case that you need to try and bring everyone into the cubicles in D.C. to get the rules —— KK: I meant more make people want to work for government? And I think that’s your question, right? CW: Yeah. Rather than, you know, a big exit or something like that. Sexy start-up. So the clearest emblem of this is NASA and space travel where we all watched the Apollo 13 movies and we’ve seen the armies of research scientists helping launch these missions. Now where those research scientists? They’re all at Space X and Blue Origin and they’re there working for the tech guys who are putting billions into it. It’s going to be very, very difficult to somehow reverse essentially decades of talent migration into the private sector. And if you’re a talented kid out of Stanford, why would you work for the federal government? It’s like if you’re working in the private sector, you feel like you’re going to go faster, you’re certainly going to get paid more. You’re going to be working with smarter people and you idolize Elon Musk, like who the heck, you know? KK: Yeah, that’s literally our question. AY: Yeah. And I will say on a personal level, I spent seven years recruiting some of our top educational products to Detroit, Cleveland, Birmingham, St. Louis. So I have seen that essentially the tide has turned in the direction it’s gone and we should not be relying upon the government as the primary employer of a lot of this tech talent.Through Venture for America, Mr. Yang created opportunities for college graduates in under-resourced American cities — but almost half of V.F.A. alumni left the cities they were placed in through the fellowship. We have to face facts and say, at this point, most of the intellectual capital is being attracted to these private firms and we need to instead try and support and work with the private firms. CW: Well, what about when it comes to like the N.S.A. and the technology they have and the surveillance? You don’t want Google doing surveillance of people here and abroad? BS: Any more than they already are. CW: More than they already are. Right. More than they already are. CW: But doing it in a national security sense. Or do you? I mean, the question is what trade-offs you’re willing to make, really. The N.S.A. is going to be able to recruit the tech talent that he can recruit and you want to try and ramp that up. So one thing —— CW: They’re worried about it. They should be, I mean clearly. Because if you spend time on these campuses, you know where they’re going. So one thing you can do that’s very, very fast and immediate is you can become much more flexible in terms of compensation and a type of work environment.  So if you had, for example, a rule that said, “Look, the government is allowed to match whatever salary a private sector employee is being offered, then you’d have more success.”Mr. Yang has said “most Americans don’t want to work for the federal government” and argued that his Freedom Dividend would therefore be more effective than a program like a federal jobs guarantee. If you said, “Look, you don’t need to move to Washington, D.C., and sit in the thing that was built decades ago, that’s like solace, and you have this giant parking lot and you just feel miserable being there for like a day, let alone a career.” It seems like a nice place to work. Then you might have greater success. We also saw this happen even with the rollout of healthcare.gov. Remember this? It’s like they had the consultant and then they totally botched it and then they needed to bring in the —— BS: Remember The New Yorker cartoon? Hm? BS: The New Yorker cartoon. They had a secretary with like a floppy disk. With her glasses pulled down and her fingers crossed.See The New Yorker satirizing the Affordable Care Act rollout here. And it’s not just the leading edge N.S.A.-type stuff. If you look around congressional offices or the I.R.S., they’re all using technology from the ’90s or whatever it is. I had a whiz kid who said he got yelled at for writing a script in a congressional office that automated a task. They were like, “No, we just wanted you to do it manually forever.” So there needs to be a massive modernization effort. Not just in terms of how we recruit tech talent at the highest levels, but how we function even in the basics. CW: Sort of pivoting off of that, you said that Senator Warren’s taking sort of a 20th-century antitrust framework to big tech. What does a 21st-century framework look like in that? The 21st-century framework. First, you don’t use price as your primary determinant of whether or not there are antitrust problems, because the tech companies would say, “What? We would never gouge anyone. It’s free. We’re underselling everyone.” So that you have to get rid of, and that’s not something she’s advocating, but what she is advocating, which I find to be a bit backward looking, is thinking that competition is the answer in these spaces. And competition misses the point in one way and another way.The Electronic Frontier Foundation, like Mr. Yang, has argued that the country’s approach to antitrust regulation is outmoded. In early 2019, the Federal Trade Commission created a new task force focused on monitoring competition in technology markets, which the foundation celebrated as a step toward modernizing antitrust.  Let me explain. I’m a parent. I’ve got — how many of you all are parents? So if your kids are like my kids, they are mesmerized by any screen that is nearby. I regularly challenge my kids. I say, “What’s more important? People or screens?” And they know the right answer’s people. And then if they say screens, then I hold them upside down by their ankles until they say, “People, people.” And the people that are most diligent about screen time are the tech folks in Silicon Valley. You go there, and all of a sudden there’s not a screen to be had because they know that we have the smartest engineers in the country turning supercomputers into dopamine delivery devices for kids, because that’s how they make their millions of dollars.  So if that’s your problem and you break Facebook into Facebook, Instagram, WhatsApp, does that somehow make the kids stronger or healthier? No. If anything, it actually ratchets up the incentives to try and further their engagement.  So if that’s your problem, you have to go and try and solve it directly by getting into the guts of the apps and say, “What are the design choices you made?” Let’s calibrate them so they actually balance our kids’ health and not just your financial returns. So that’s one way she’s missing the point.  The other way is that many of these competitive markets end up very quickly accelerating toward one or two winners and saying, “I’m going to break you up.” Does not solve that problem. I joke that it would be cruel and unusual punishment to say you have to use the fourth-best navigation app. Like what is that? Apple Maps. We all hate Apple Maps, right? If you use that thing, you’re like, “Oh.” You curse the gods until you figure out how to get Google Maps going. So going up and saying, “Look, you’re the winner in the space. We’re going to break you up,” it doesn’t revive Main Street businesses, and it doesn’t actually end up solving the competition problem.  If you want to solve the hyperacquisition problem, which is a problem, then you have to go in and say, “Look, you have to not acquire businesses that are in your space with these criteria.” That would be a legitimate stance to take, because right now the business model in Silicon Valley is not to try and outcompete the behemoth. It’s just to get bought by them. Over the past five years, 90 percent of A.I. start-ups in Silicon Valley were acquired by major companies, according to TechCrunch.If you get to a point where they’ll offer you $1 billion and you win, your investors win, you’re rich and then these get folded in, and it doesn’t even matter what they do with your business at that point. BA: You’ve expressed profound distrust of market forces. You just compared the major tech companies to drug dealers, and you want the N.S.A. to outsource national security work to them? I do not want the N.S.A. to outsource national security work to them. I want them to try and fight fire with fire and actually recruit using some of the same methods, and I want the N.S.A. to try and work with them to the extent that they’re realistic, and they know that Google is going to be innovating in ways that the N.S.A. will not be able to do. CW: Going back though, my question is, there’s an issue of power here. I mean, sure. You might not want to. You might not be able to address the problems of Facebook if you break it up from Instagram, and I understand that, and there’s still going to be addictive products, but there’s an issue of the consolidation of actual power, the ability to buy those companies, to make those acquisitions. Just simply the leverage that Mark Zuckerberg can use to have a meeting with Donald Trump that they won’t tell us about, I mean, how do you — if you don’t break them up, how do you get rid of that conglomeration of power? NF: I mean, is there still a role for 20th-century antitrust? Yes. All of this is a prelude to say that, should some of the tech companies be asked to divest parts of their businesses? One hundred percent yes. Like Amazon should not be selling its own house brand to its advantage to other goods. These companies do have excessive power and influence. At this point you could argue they control our democracy.  So, and I know The New York Times, I mean you’ve had your issues with Facebook and the rest of it, and they made a change and then all sorts of things happen.Listening to the tape, we have no idea what this means. So, right now, the government is like this flopping appendage behind a lot of this stuff. I mean, honestly. The Office of Technology Assessment was eliminated in 1995. So our legislature is literally 24 years behind the curve on technology, and they don’t understand. They’re totally outgunned. They don’t know what’s going on.  So you definitely need to bring the tech companies to heel and say, “Look, here are the list of problems we’re concerned about.” But the solution to the abuse of power is not to say like, “Hey, we’re just going to try and keep anyone in the country from having the ability to do wrong.” What you have to do is you have to figure out what the abuses you’re concerned about are, and then actually address them directly. CW: Who else besides you that you’re running against understands the internet? I haven’t hung out with enough of them to know, but I’m confident I understand the internet better than the [cross talk]—— CW: What’s your gut feeling? Who gets it? I’m going to say I do not have confidence that any of my opponents get the internet. KK: We’re running out of time.One area we had hoped to ask about but ran out of time was climate solutions, specifically diving deep on his plans for nuclear energy. So I’m actually going to — Jesse has one last question. Jesse Wegman: I wanted to ask you — I was looking at the pin on your lapel, “MATH,”The slogan stands for “Make America Think Harder.”  and I just wanted you to sort of get down to nuts and bolts a little with regard to what you’re trying to do here. What’s your math to winning the —— To victory? KK: Can we add to that? What do you attribute your fund-raising to from last month? Taking in $750,000 in 24 hours. Well, we put up a goal on the website, and my supporters do not like to miss goals. And so we just had an aggressive goal, and we were $750,000 short in the last day. So then we raised $750,000 in that day and then we made the goal. So it turns out having goals is very positive for human beings, and our campaign’s continuing to grow by leaps and bounds.Mr. Yang surprised the Democratic field with a 257 percent fund-raising surge in October.  That’s one reason why we’re going to shock the world when the voting starts in February. KK: So walk us through Jesse’s —— JW: So you’re polling in the low single digits now. What’s the math to get you into the top tier and through the first primary states? Sure. So if you look at the numbers, you’ve seen the same things that we see. You have four front-runners, but the support is very, very soft. Most people are saying they could change their mind. And there are a lot of people that say they still have not made up their mind. Then you have my campaign, which is growing organically. We’ve grown by, essentially, a percent a month over the last period. And that’s without the benefit of any paid messaging or advertising. We started advertising approximately three weeks ago. The lag time before advertising actually starts showing up in the polls is between three and six weeks. So you are likely to see our poll numbers rise. And more and more Americans are tuning in right now. We’re going to grow and grow and peak at the right time. We think we can do well, particularly, in New Hampshire, upcoming, because it’s an open primary and my campaign has a very strong appeal to independents, Libertarians and many, many disaffected Trump voters. I spoke to half a dozen Trump voters at my events in New Hampshire yesterday and they said that they are crossing party lines to support me. JW: Do you support ranked choice voting? Yes. I have all these democracy reforms. So ranked choice voting, make Election Day a holiday, have vote by mail. I would lower the voting age to 16. Make every high school in the country a hotbed of political activity. Sixteen-year-olds can pay taxes, and they’re going to be on this planet longer. They should have a say in where their taxes go.Mr. Yang is the first presidential candidate to support lowering the voting age to 16. A recent poll found that 84 percent of Americans oppose the idea.  KK: Michelle, do you have a —— MC: You’ve got a week to make the next debate. I might have made it while we’re sitting here. MC: It’s true. I have not checked my phone. But if you don’t, how do you work around this? Do you have a plan B? What do you do? I expect we’re going to make the debate, but we’ve been growing independent of the debate, I’m happy to say.Mr. Yang’s support has indeed been growing in Iowa in recent months, with some polls finding him ahead of Pete Buttigieg. And for better or for worse, the influence of the debates seems to be waning along with the viewership. So we’re going to be here the whole way, regardless. Our support base is independent of those appearances. But we’re going to make the debate. I’m going to continue to make my case to the American people. You’re going to see us grow and grow, and peak at exactly Feb. 3. KK: For our last about minute, Brent, do you want to —— BS: What are you likely to fail at as president? I will fail at many things, I’m sure. Keep in mind, I am married. So I understand my daily failures.  BS: Your failing. One thing I’ve learned, even as a candidate, that I’ve struggled with, truthfully, is that an entire organization hinges upon your day-to-day decisions or movements. And I know as president that will be amplified to a very, very high level.  I like being a relatively normal citizen. I like being able to go to places and find things out and have normal conversations. I think that’s going to be a real challenge for me because I’ve seen, even now, people are more likely to tell you positive things or things you want to hear than the bad stuff. And so I think it’s going to be a challenge for me to understand what’s happening behind the smiling faces and the people that work for me and my administration. It’s going to be hard for me to get out to the American people because anytime you go out, you’re going to be surrounded by a phalanx of press and staff and the rest of it. So I need to find ways to overcome that challenge.  I’m feeling it even now, because I am a layperson who decided to run for president, currently fifth in the polls, and that there’ve been many transitions on a personal level. I think one of my primary qualifications to be president of the United States is that I actually do not socialize very easily. By that, what I mean is, I don’t take myself that seriously. I don’t stand on ceremony. I don’t think I’m better than anyone. And I think that’s the kind of leader we need right now. BS: You’ve made clear, at least in your early comments, that it’s of primary importance for you to defeat Trump. Yes. BS: At some point, you may decide that your chances of becoming nominee are diminishing. What could you do, outside of being a nominee, to help defeat Trump? There are many of the candidates that I’ve built a rapport with, I would be thrilled to campaign for. I believe I can help make sure that Donald Trump is a one-term president. Best as the nominee, but as someone campaigning for the nominee, I believe I could be very helpful there, too. KK: Would you support any Democratic candidate who ultimately won the nomination? Yes, I would. KK: All right. Thank you very much for your time. "
nyt://article/d95b8a60-fa47-54e8-83d6-1e274ec8239f,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/08/25/business/consumer-retail-shopping.html,2023-08-25T13:39:34+0000,article,News,855,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Abercrombie & Fitch Co', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Affirm Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar Tree Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Foot Locker Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Cards', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discount Selling', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Consumer spending remains resilient, but retailers’ latest earnings offered a glimpse into worrying shifts in shopping habits. Consumers power the U.S. economy, and their capacity to spend has repeatedly defied predictions. In early 2020, after a short but severe recession caused by the pandemic, consumers splurged on big-ticket goods, from patio furniture to flat-screen TVs and home gym equipment. Then came what economists called “revenge spending,” with experiences that were off limits during lockdowns, like traveling and going to concerts, taking precedence. Now there are signs that some shoppers are becoming more cautious, as Americans’ savings erode, inflation continues to bite and other factors tighten their wallets — namely, the resumption of student loan payments in October. Financial reports from retailers — including Macy’s, Kohl’s, Foot Locker and Nordstrom — that landed this week suggest a shift is underway, from consumers buying with abandon to spending more on their needs. “Last year it was more psychological,” said Janine Stichter, a retail analyst at the brokerage firm BTIG. “But now that we’ve been dealing with inflation for as long as we have, I just think we’re getting to a point where savings are depleted.” In the aggregate, consumer spending remains solid. Retail sales in July were stronger than expected, leading some economists to raise their forecasts for economic growth this quarter. A robust labor market and rising wages have buoyed consumer confidence. But even retailers with strong sales say there are signs of economic strain among shoppers. “It is clear that the lower-income shopper, our core customer, is still under significant economic pressure,” Michael O’Sullivan, the chief executive of the off-price retailer Burlington Stores, said in a statement on Thursday. In the three months through July, Burlington’s sales rose 4 percent and its profit more than doubled. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Discounters historically perform well during times of economic uncertainty as shoppers across the income spectrum look to save money. Burlington, along with Walmart, Dollar Tree and TJX, the owner of T.J. Maxx and Marshalls, all reported a rise in sales last quarter, as shoppers sought discounts on essential items like groceries, turned to cheaper private label products and reined in spending on discretionary goods. The strong performance at off-price and discount retailers stands in contrast to those at department store chains and many fashion and footwear retailers. In calls with Wall Street analysts this week, retail executives also flagged rising credit card delinquencies and higher rates of retail theft, ominous signs that consumers could be more strapped for cash. Jeff Gennette, the chief executive of Macy’s, the largest department store in the United States, said shoppers had “more aggressively pulled back” on spending in the discretionary categories, resulting in an overall decline in sales last quarter. Half of Macy’s shoppers make $75,000 or less. “They are not converting as easily and becoming more intentional on the allocation of their disposable income,” he said. “Probably the most important thing people are spending money on is general merchandise,” said Max Levchin, the chief executive of Affirm, which extends credit to shoppers at checkout via a so-called buy-now, pay-later model. “People are looking for more value for less money, or simpler functionality and lower price,” he said. The company reported an 18 percent rise in active customers from a year earlier. The finance chiefs of Macy’s, Kohl’s and Nordstrom told analysts that delinquencies on the department stores’ credit cards had risen. In Macy’s case, the increase in nonpayments last quarter was “faster than expected.” “When people are not paying their credit card bills, that suggests a really stretched consumer,” Ms. Stichter of BTIG said. And that means consumers are being more selective about where they shop and what they buy. “You’re going to see brands that are winners and losers,” Fran Horowitz, the chief executive of Abercrombie & Fitch, said in an interview. The fashion retailer reported a jump in sales of more than 10 percent last quarter, as it was able to “chase” the new styles that got more shoppers through the doors, Ms. Horowitz said. The back-to-school shopping season now underway is crucial for retailers, a harbinger of whether there will be strong sales for the rest of the year. And a new dynamic will soon come into play. In October, student loan payments will resume for about 44 million Americans, after a pandemic relief measure put them on hold in March 2020. Retail executives have warned that the payment resumption could further squeeze their shoppers’ budgets. Halloween, which is just weeks after repayments resume, will also be a barometer for people’s willingness to spend on discretionary items like costumes and candy, said Nikki Baird, vice president of strategy at Aptos, a technology company that works with retailers like Crocs, L.L. Bean and New Balance. She said that the repayments will most affect the age group that typically spends on Halloween. “I think that will really tell us what does this mean for the holiday season,” Ms. Baird said. “If Halloween is a bust, then I think we have to really start looking at whether consumers are going to go big for Christmas, because I think it says they won’t.” An earlier version of this article misspelled the surname of a retail analyst at the brokerage firm BTIG. She is Janine Stichter, not Stitcher. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/9a726bc0-5382-550f-b558-307f6656d9d5,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/26/business/inflation-shopping-habits-unilever.html,2022-07-26T11:03:04+0000,article,News,773,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Unilever NV', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Coca-Cola, McDonald’s and Unilever said some consumers were shifting their spending in response to rapidly rising prices, after Walmart rattled the market with a warning about unsold inventory. A day after Walmart warned investors that its profit would shrink as rising prices forced shoppers to make fewer purchases at its stores, Unilever, Coca-Cola and McDonald’s, three other consumer-facing giants, reinforced the message, to different degrees, providing a window into how companies are navigating this fragile economic moment. On Tuesday, Unilever, the maker of Dove soap, Ben & Jerry’s ice cream and Hellmann’s mayonnaise, said it raised prices until they were 11 percent higher than in the same quarter last year, offsetting a 2 percent decline in the volume of things that consumers bought. It was the fourth consecutive quarter in which prices outpaced volume growth at the company. Unilever raised its forecast for revenue this year but said that its profit would most likely be at the bottom of its expected range, held back by a sharp increase in the prices of plastics, palm oil, aluminum and other commodities it uses as inputs. Alan Jope, Unilever’s chief executive, said on a call with analysts that “peak cost inflation” was likely to come in the second half of the year. Sales volumes may fall more in the second half than the first, Mr. Jope said, “as the full impact of pricing lands.” Passing higher prices on to shoppers has led some to buy less or trade down to cheaper store brands, Unilever’s results suggested, a trend also seen in Walmart’s recent financial reports. To keep its higher-priced brands in consumers’ minds, Unilever said that it added about $200 million to its marketing budget in the first half of the year, another factor that put a dent in its profits. Investors appeared heartened by Unilever’s ability to balance prices and costs, with its London-listed shares rising almost 3 percent. What is inflation? Inflation is a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Coca-Cola’s stock also traded higher on Tuesday, rising 1.6 percent, after it reported better-than-expected revenue growth in the second quarter, driven by a double-digit percentage rise in prices. Crucially, it also recorded growth in the volume of drinks it sold, suggesting that shoppers are sticking with favored brands despite higher prices. In a similar vein, Unilever noted that it sold more ice cream in the quarter, one of its few product categories to register volume growth. Consumers’ willingness to pay higher prices has “largely held up better than expected,” James Quincey, Coca-Cola’s chief executive, said on a call with analysts. “We are watching closely for signs of changing consumer behavior as the year goes on and as the average cost of the consumer basket continues to go up.” Like Unilever and its closest rival, PepsiCo, which reported results this month, Coke raised its revenue forecast for the year. And like at those companies, prices are rising faster than volumes, which when combined with rising commodity and transportation costs has dented profits. Coca-Cola reported a 28 percent fall in profit for the second quarter, compared with the same period last year. McDonald’s, the fast-food giant, said revenue at its restaurants, excluding those it sold in Russia, grew by almost 10 percent partly because of “strategic menu price increases,” it said. Its stock rose by 2.7 percent on Tuesday. On a call with analysts, executives at McDonald’s said that while consumers have generally accepted higher prices for Big Macs and other items, lower-income customers are beginning to trade down to less expensive menu items, like those in its “value” range, or choosing fewer combination meal deals. The situation in Europe is even murkier, McDonald’s executives acknowledged, as inflationary pressures there are expected to remain high throughout the year. “The inflationary pressures in Europe are elevated even beyond what we’re seeing in the U.S.,” said Chris Kempczinski, the chief executive of McDonald’s, “and that’s having an impact on consumer sentiment and what we’re needing to do from a menu board and pricing.” The upbeat parts of Tuesday’s earnings reports weren’t enough to buoy Walmart’s stock, which fell 7.6 percent, making it one of the worst-performing stocks in the S&P 500 for the day. The retail giant’s warning that it would need to continue marking down inventory that wasn’t selling because many shoppers were shifting to cheaper, lower-margin products showed how quickly inflation has gripped the economy. Last month, Target also warned that its profits would be lower because of inventory markdowns. The Federal Reserve is expected to act aggressively this week to rein in stubbornly high inflation with another large interest-rate increase, a move designed to cool consumer demand that may, ultimately, tip the economy into recession.Concerns over the outlook for the global economy helped drag down the S&P 500 stock index by 1.2 percent. Consumer staples, the industry that includes Coca-Cola and Walmart, fell 0.5 percent, while consumer discretionary stocks, which include McDonald’s, fell further, down 3.3 percent. Michael Corkery and Joe Rennison contributed reporting. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business arts magazine Jason Karaian is the editor of DealBook, based in London. He joined The Times in 2020 from Quartz, where he was senior Europe correspondent and later global finance and economics editor. More about Jason Karaian Isabella Simonetti is the 2022 David Carr Fellow at The New York Times. More about Isabella Simonetti Julie Creswell is a New York-based reporter. She has covered banks, private equity, retail and health care. She previously worked for Fortune Magazine and also wrote about debt, monetary policy and mutual funds at Dow Jones. More about Julie Creswell "
nyt://article/93226df9-b803-5988-b7a7-351465e16f45,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/01/14/business/stock-market-sectors.html,2022-01-14T10:00:10+0000,article,News,822,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Asset Allocation (Personal Finances)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The returns for 2020 and 2021 followed a familiar pattern. One year’s winning investment picks were losers the next year. Chasing one year’s hot market sectors often means losing money in the next year. That’s an old lesson in investing, and it has been borne out once again. Stock sectors that were big losers in 2020 soared in 2021 to become the year’s biggest winners, while the highfliers of the previous year posted returns that ranged from mediocre to awful. There are 11 sectors in the benchmark S&P 500 stock index: information technology, health care, financials, consumer discretionary, communication services, industrials, consumer staples, energy, utilities, real estate and materials. They rise and fall with disturbing regularity. The big winner in 2020 was the consumer discretionary sector, with companies like Amazon.com, Tesla, Home Depot and Nike. It returned 58 percent, including dividends, that year but only 19 percent in 2021, the third-worst of all sectors. That was well behind the nearly 29 percent return, including dividends, posted by the overall S&P 500 index. The biggest loser for 2020 was energy, with a decline of 35 percent. But it provided investors with a whopping 53 percent gain for 2021. “Over history, there’s tremendous rotation between the best- and worst-performing sectors,” said Scott Helfstein, executive director of thematic investing at ProShares. “Trying to pick a single sector to outperform the market is like trying to hit a piñata with a broadsword after you’ve been blindfolded and spun around.” Despite that, analysts continue to predict winning sectors for the year ahead. In December, Bank of America forecast that energy and financial stocks would outperform the market in 2022. That would require both sectors to repeat their impressive results from 2021, when energy was No. 1 and financials were third, with a 36 percent return. Bank of America and Charles Schwab both said they expected health care stocks to outperform the overall S&P 500 in 2022, after virtually matching it in 2021. It’s easy to bet on sectors using exchange-traded funds, which mirror their performance quite closely. Some representative funds include State Street’s Energy Select Sector SPDR Fund, Vanguard Financials E.T.F. and the iShares US Real Estate E.T.F., which returned 38.7 percent. The question for individual investors isn’t whether analyst predictions are going to be right or wrong, but whether they should consider sector investing at all. In an economy recovering from a serious downturn or a recession, for example, one might bet that interest-rate sensitive companies such as those in the consumer discretionary sector will outperform the market, along with financial and real-estate stocks. That trend held true after the coronavirus pandemic sent stocks plummeting in early 2020. During the three next quarters, consumer discretionary stocks led the way, showing the best performance for the year before heading down in 2021, while the real estate and financial industries followed, recovering from their respective 2020 downturns to top the market for 2021. All that activity took place in just 20 months, which is why sector trading requires a lot of attention and a willingness to try to time the market. That’s an approach that isn’t likely to be successful for most individual investors focused on the long-term goal of building a nest egg, noted Elisabeth Kashner, vice president and director of global fund analytics for FactSet Research Systems. “Every time you add a market call, you’re increasing the risk that you might get it right, but you might get it really wrong, too,” Ms. Kashner said. “It makes for a bumpy ride.” No matter what sector is rising or falling, taking a broader approach to the market allows an investor to capture those results without having to take on additional risk, said Warren McIntyre, a certified financial planner who runs VisionQuest Financial Planning in Troy, Mich. “You’re going to get all the sectors in proportion to what they represent in the market. You’re not making a judgment call as to whether a sector is over- or undervalued,” Mr. McIntyre said. Other drawbacks to sector-focused investing include the cost of more frequent trading, as well as taking the focus away from a longer-term strategy focused on the investor’s financial goals, said Randy Jones, a wealth management adviser with the First Financial Group in Reston, Va. “Whether it’s one sector or another, that’s still a guess. Look at when will you need your money and find a good portfolio that has a mix of sectors that can handle any kind of change in the economy,” Mr. Jones said. “You want to make sure the money is there when you need it.” Investors who nevertheless want to pursue a sector-based strategy will need to move away from a passive investing mind-set, warned Matthew Bartolini, head of SPDR Americas Research at State Street Global Advisors. “This is not something you throw into your account,” Mr. Bartolini said. “You need to do ongoing monitoring because you are deviating from the traditional market-weight paradigm.” The ordinary rules of buy-and-hold investing, which enable you to put your money into broad-based funds and then walk away, will no longer hold. “You definitely don’t want to take the wrong approach of set it and forget it.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine "
nyt://paidpost/0f56bf87-d0d7-57bb-ab6e-7341f1c5cffb,https://www.nytimes.com/paidpost/accenture/built-for-change/getting-to-know-the-reimagined-consumer.html,2021-09-22T21:06:06+0000,paidpost,,4148,[],consumer discretionary,"Accenture Paid Post Share Episode 7 Consumers worldwide are re-evaluating what’s important to them since the COVID-19 pandemic began. How can companies contend with these shifting priorities — and turn uncertainty into an opportunity for growth? Listen to learn more. Episode Transcription Go back to Homepage 0:00    Marc: What has changed over the past year? Oh my God. The question should be what hasn't changed over the last year, because so much has changed. My God, what has changed? My way of life has changed.  Elise: Needless to say, the pandemic has changed all of our lives - dramatically.  Michelle: During the first lockdown, it was new for everyone. It was unprecedented. Nicole: ...It's been a big adjustment... Abby: Guess I'm not the only person who has found that the COVID outbreak has changed my life. Zach: Life has been a challenge not being able to travel.  Raymond: ...not being able to meet close family and friends... Suzanna: ...not being able to see friends and family...  Raymond: I've really just felt frustrated to be honest.It's been difficult, I think, for everyone.  Elise: And when everything turned upside down, many of us found new ways to spend our time.  Abbe: I first went through a period of organization, cleaned out all my drawers, my cupboards.  Marc: I discovered that I love to binge watch TV shows.  01:00  Michelle: I spent a lot of time in my garden. Paul: ...been able to spend more time cooking...  Abby: ..trying new recipes...  Nicole: ...get outside and get some workout in   Josh: We’ve seen incredible disruptions to our daily lives… and for many of us, that meant discovering a whole new way of ...working.  Nicole: So these are my work pants. I am not even sure if they fit me anymore. I have been a fully remote worker. And so I have had no reason at all to wear these pants.  Paul: I try not to work long hours. Glenda: ​​...even though I’m working from home...  Zach: I can be kind of a workaholic. Aidan: It’s quite hard to get, um, the work-life balance. Paul : Work-life balance–   Elise: ...And, the pandemic has completely changed the way we shop.   Zach: I'm definitely doing a lot more online shopping than I was before. Raymond: ...online shopping... Aidan: I'm shopping online a lot more often... Paul: I've been ordering a lot more online... Nicole: ...pretty much exclusively online shopping...  Zach: We were all getting so many packages at home and I really started to think about the waste that was creating and how it was bad for the planet. Paul: ...sustainable sourcing...  Suzanna: ...more sustainable products... Michelle: I'm quite concerned about our planet and our environment. And this pandemic is a result of that. And this does impact which brands I do and don't use.   02:00  Josh: As we continue to battle the virus, one thing is clear. This experience has changed more than just our work, hobbies, and shopping habits. The pandemic changed us.   Zach: It was definitely a tough year and it kinda changed my outlook on a lot of things… Raymond: My priorities have really changed over the last year...  Adian: And then you realize that actually I should probably prioritize life more. Zach: ...work is not the most important thing in life... Nicole: I am focused a lot more on politics... Michelle: I've been really worried about health… Paul: ...mental health... Nicole: My mental health... Michelle: I've found it really positive, staying with my family and with my grandchildren  Zach: I do feel like I've gotten a bit closer to my family… Paul: ...made me feel more close to people...  Suzanna: ...so it's made me value human interaction more...  Marc: ...to really look at the things that I fill my life with and say, do I really need this?  Michelle: So what do I really want to do? Just want to hug my husband.   Josh: So here’s a question for businesses:   03:00  Do you still know your customer?   MUSIC  MONTAGE   Nicole: I have really high expectations for how in-store shopping kind of goes about.  Glenda: Convenience is at the top of my list.  Marc: I would probably pay $10 more and get it today.  Nicole: How they treated their employees… Zach: Black Lives Matter. Glenda: Especially when it comes to like racism  Nicole: What is inside of those products?  Marc: free shipping.  Aiden: free delivery Abby: easier return policies would be nice.  Raymond: that were made by local businesses.. Nicole: I want to be able to get it and I want to be able to get it easily.  Glenda: Cause I hate going in and waiting in a long line Abby: They have an app that you can download.  Marc: That’s the best way to get me to shop online. Zach: ...you can find out information about the store and what they have in stock... Suzanna: That affects my decision to buy.  BEAT  Elise: I’m Elise Hu  Josh: And I’m Josh Klein  Elise: And this is Built for Change, a podcast from Accenture.  THEME  JOSH: Elise, I don’t know about you but I’m hearing so much there that I really relate to…  ELISE: Absolutely, me too. The thing about this pandemic   04:00  is that it was so universal. Every single person has been affected, and a lot of people are coming out of it completely changed. I know I am.  Josh: Yes, Yeah, me too. For example, I'm being way more intentional about the way that I spend my free time, the people that I choose to connect with. And also just the reprioritization of time with family.   Elise: Yeah - I'm definitely spending a lot more time with my family than I ever have before. I've also thought, especially now that I'm spending so much more time outdoors and in nature, I've thought a lot more deeply about what I can individually do about climate change. We're all re-evaluating what our priorities are, as people, as professionals and even as consumers.  Josh: Yeah. Consumers are different now they have different values and they expect brands to help them live by those values. The challenge is really on brands now to meet those expectations.   Elise: Right. So, today, we're doing something a little different. Instead of talking to business leaders, we'll be hearing from a consumer and we'll talk to Accenture's experts to learn more about how businesses can contend   05:00  with this shift and use it as an opportunity for growth.  ACT I  Kevin: I wouldn't say there's a period of modern history that we've had an event like this, that affected global consumers so universally over roughly the same time period.   Elise: This is Kevin Quiring, a customer sales and service expert with Accenture Strategy.  Kevin: We track consumer attitudes to things like pricing, quality promotion, experience, trust, loyalty, digital adoption...  Elise: They also track what compels customers to switch brands or service providers. Over the last 16 years, their surveys have revealed shifts in customer expectations. Things like good customer service and strong brand purpose became more important in recent years. But, these trends have always come second to the main drivers of consumer behavior: price and quality.   MUSIC  Kevin: The traditional motivations are low price and high quality.  BEAT  Elise: But in this year’s research, something big happened.  06:00  Kevin and his team found that consumers… changed.   Kevin: The thing that really shocked us was the answer to a key question that we added this year for obvious reasons. And that question was, 'the pandemic made me totally revise my personal purpose and what's important for me in life.' It's a really powerful and unambiguous statement that consumers were asked to respond to. And what we found was that half of consumers agreed.   Elise: Only 17% disagreed, and the rest? Kevin calls them purpose-curious. They’re unsure if the pandemic made them totally revise their purpose in life, but their answers did indicate that they’re evolving. That means, in total, 83% of consumers are evolving in their big ideas about life.   Kevin: Typically when you see something like that, um, you're going to go to a demographic   07:00  Kevin: or a geographic sort of explanation, right? But it wasn't that way. This reset in purpose was not limited to gen Z and millennials and urban residents, you know, the usual suspects for progressive attitudes. They don't have clear demographic distinctions, not gender, not employment, not income level, not age and not geographical location. They are generally a heterogeneous group.   Elise: Accenture calls them reimagined consumers – a group of people that find themselves fundamentally changed because of the pandemic. They have taken stock in what matters to them in life, what they value, how they spend their time… and that has directly affected the way they shop.  MUSIC  Nevine: Consumers have really, really changed. I think the circumstances we found ourselves in have been exceptional and people have stopped to think about their own purpose and that has meant that they have reconsidered what's important to them, both in terms of how they live their lives. But also in terms of what brands   08:00  and services they engage with, they buy.  Elise: This is Nevine El-Warraky. She’s a Managing Director of Marketing Advisory at Accenture Interactive.   Nevine: I think the value equations for consumers have changed and they're not spending less they're spending differently. And I think that's quite important. The focus on price and quality has always been there. But increasingly we're seeing that people are much, much more focused on values that matter to them as a driver of choice, in terms of which brands and services they engage with.  Elise: The Accenture team discovered a new set of motivations - ones tied to consumer’s reimagined purpose - and, when taken all together, these new motivations can actually surpass the importance of price and quality. So - what does the reimagined consumer want? First - health and safety.  Nevine: Given the pandemic is very much around health. The safety of the environment that people are in well beyond their homes, it's become really important. You've got some supermarkets, for example, now talking about how they  09:00  spray all their carts with antibacterial spray to ensure that there's no contact. Contactless payments, all sorts of things that basically help you look after yourself and your family and people you love.  Kevin: And - consumers told us it's not just about keeping me safe. It's keeping your employees safe. Consumers, especially the re-imagined consumers, told us categorically that they make purchasing decisions based on how they perceive companies treat their employees.  Elise: Second, customers are increasingly demanding personal care and service.   Kevin: Are you there when I need you? It's those service levels, the return policies, the personalization...  Elise: This can take the form of quick-responding customer service, or small gestures that let the customer know that they, as individuals, are valued. Thirdly – they want those personalized experiences to be easy and convenient.   Nevine: Being able to find things quickly, being able to have things delivered to you within an hour.  10:00  Kevin: It's about meeting me where I am and the digital world and the physical world – that digital, physical are connected.  Elise: Things like, being able to change a flight on an app, or over the phone. Or, buying something online and picking it up in person. Or – being able to virtually try-on for products like makeup or glasses in order to prevent the hassle of returns when shopping online. Ultimately, does the company make the experience easy, so I can spend my time in the ways I want?  Nevine: They want things that make their lives frictionless. You know, they want things that allow them to spend their own time and energy on the things that matter to them.   Elise: At the same time, customers very much expect that they can receive all of the above service without compromising on ethics. The fourth motivator is sustainability and product origin.   Kevin: The re-imagined consumers specifically care very much about the environment, about the societal and corporate responsibility...about where companies get their raw materials,  11:00  where their products are made, and whether or not they support the local community.  Elise: And finally, customers are looking for brands that they trust. Do they operate by the values they’re presenting to the public?  Kevin: It's about trusting you, the organization, you, the company to do the right thing for me and not just for your business. Can I trust your brand to be who you say you are and to consistently stand for things that you say you stand for?  Elise: All of this research adds up to something big. Yes, if companies can meet these reimagined consumer expectations, they can tap into growth. But on the other hand, companies who do nothing risk losing the customers they once had. Because they’re different now. Just offering the best quality at the lowest prices might not be enough anymore...  Nevine: And they're voting with their wallets. More than ever before. We're seeing switching behavior or at least the preparedness to switch if the company or the service or the brand you're engaging with,  12:00  isn't playing the role they are meant to be playing. I just feel consumers have become a bit more empowered after this. Not only have they reconsidered what's important. But they've realized that the possibilities are endless if they go searching, um, and brands then therefore have a sort of a high bar of expectations to meet.  Josh: This reminds me of that classic salesperson interview challenge. You know, the the “Sell me this pen.”  Elise: Oh Yeah. Well, since I'm not a salesperson, my intuition goes to selling you the pen by telling you about how affordable it is, how well the pen could write and how well, like, the ink flows smoothly onto the paper.  Josh: Right...like, price and quality, which have been the, the typical motivators forever. But what we're seeing now is that it's about what the customer actually wants.  Elise: right  Josh: Like, now, you don't want to sell it by saying how affordable and high quality the pen is. You have to first know what the customer needs, and today they need to feel good about buying that pen. So instead you might need to talk about how the   13:00  pen is made artisanally from recyclable materials or that there's a free and automated ink refilling service or that it’s specially nibbed to sign birthday cards for your grandma.   Elise: Awww, such a story behind the pen. But businesses have been stuck on selling pens based on the old way, how high quality and affordable they were for a long time. But now customers are motivated by the things you're talking about. Josh.   Josh: Yeah.   Elise: And it's not necessarily that these purpose motivators weren't there before, but the pandemic has really crystallized them. So next, we're going to talk to a consumer to hear about her new expectations of brands.  ACT II  Riddley: I love to shop. (laughs) I think my husband will definitely tell you that I love to buy things.  Elise: This is Riddley Gemperlein-Schirm. She’s a super shopper. She’s the kind of person that people go to when they’re looking for a recommendation, because she’s probably already done the research, tried a few options, and has a strong opinion on which is best.  14:00  Riddley: Over a certain price point, I, I usually don't buy something without looking at what a professional reviewer has said.  Elise: Riddley does this because she is also a professional reviewer – of kitchen equipment.   Riddley: Things like toasters, knives, cutting boards, non-stick skillets, carbon steel, skillets...  Elise: Ridley reviews these items’ performance, price, durability – and then, she makes recommendations on which is the best to buy. And Riddley says her profession bleeds into her personal life. She is a well-researched consumer in all categories.   Riddley: I'm still looking for the same things. Like, is it easy to use? Is it intuitive? Is it durable? Does it perform well? I have a pretty high expectation for many different things and I don't like wasting my money.   Elise: Like everyone else, Riddley’s life changed drastically during the pandemic.  Riddley: The pandemic has changed my life so much.   Elise: Right when it started, she and her sister, their partners and dogs, moved back home with her parents  15:00  in order to help them with high-risk activities like grocery shopping.   Riddley: A lot of it was really nice. With my dad being older, a big part of me really appreciates having gotten to spend that time with him.   Elise: She instantly became a remote worker, testing and reviewing kitchen equipment in her parent’s kitchen.   Riddley: When we got there, everything just bled into one. The workday, um, Monday, Tuesday, Saturday, it was all basically like the same day. And I felt like that's how it continued on for a while.  Elise: Riddley says that she carried a lot of anxiety for her and her family’s health. And at times, she even questioned her purpose. Especially as she watched front-line workers contributing so much to care for people as the world went into lockdown.   Riddley: There's definitely been moments of, like, major self doubt and reckoning like, oh, should I go back to school for something? Or should I volunteer for X or Z? I don't know, who doesn't doubt their place in the world?   16:00  So the pandemic did take a pretty significant toll on my mental health. There's still so much lingering- lingering fear.   Elise: Over the months, Riddley adapted and settled into her pandemic lifestyle. And during a difficult time, she says she found little pockets of joy and satisfaction through online shopping,   Riddley: I don't get dressed to go to work, like, I wear sweatpants or a hoodie or whatever. And I don't often put on makeup anymore, but I find myself despite not using them, buying more and more of these, like, splurgy picks like a $30 thing of lipstick, or a really nice perfume just to make myself feel a little bit better. I think it’s definitely a way of showing myself a little bit of love.   Elise: Ridley says that she noticed her standards increasing. Yes, she still wanted high-quality products for a good price, but she was more vigilant about making sure that she felt good about her purchases.  Riddley: Buying so many more things has  17:00  been like a big eye opener for me.  Elise: Were the companies treating their employees well during the pandemic? Were the items high enough quality to last in order to cut down on waste?   Riddley: That's the reason I am so picky about what I buy, because I really don't like that idea of you know, contributing to that waste cycle. There are many things that I buy in the food space and the home space that you could absolutely find cheaper versions of that product. But if it's a better company, that's where I want my money to go.  Elise: Ridley says she’s even willing to pay a lot more money for a product if she knows it's from a sustainable brand with a good mission. And likewise – she’s fully prepared to end the relationship with brands who fall short.  Riddley: One of my favorite clothing brands that I love... They bill themselves as eco-friendly and super chic. It came out that they weren’t actually eco-friendly and that their workers were working  18:00  in warehouses without any air conditioning and that their employees were not being offered health care, even at the corporate level. And I stopped buying them. I felt gaslit into buying from a company that I thought was climate neutral. And they were absolutely not. That was very, very disappointing.   Riddley: I don't expect all companies to align with very values, in terms of sustainability and how they treat their employees, but I will seek them out. And if they say they align with my values, I will be really disappointed if they don't, and I won't buy it again.  Josh: Yeah, I can definitely empathize with the idea that there's brands that I'm just not willing to buy from anymore. And that there's others that I might be willing to spend a little more, you know, in order to feel good about the purchase.   Elise: For me, it's independent booksellers when I buy books, right? Or when I go to the grocery store, I'm willing to spend more on eggs so long as the chickens were ethically raised and they're cage free. Ever since the  19:00  pandemic, I've been really focused on sustainable clothing and just not buying fast fashion. So I think about these things a lot more.   Josh: Yeah, me too. I'm focusing a lot more on where things are produced than I ever was before. And that goes from, you know, for food all the way to furniture.   Elise: Sure.   Josh: For me, it's a lot about convenience, you know, like, um, my wife and I were trying to get a recipe aggregating app and I just downloaded the top six. And the first one that didn't ask me to fill out a bunch of information to try it? That's the one we're using, right? Like, if it's not convenient, you're out.   Elise: Right, Right.  Josh: So I can imagine how, how this reshuffling changes things drastically for business. You know, if a business was built around a certain number of assumptions about who your customers are and what they care about, and then there's this big, gigantic global event that shifts the priorities of, you know, the entire world. How do you choose what new motivations to prioritize?   Elise: Exactly. So now we're going to talk to Accenture's consumer research experts to learn what businesses can do to take advantage of this shift.   ACT III  20:00  Elise: Here’s Accenture’s Kevin Quiring and Nevine El-Warraky again.   Kevin: At the onset of the pandemic companies had to rapidly stand up offerings and services that they didn't provide before, and many you know, at great expense and unsustainable expense.  Nevine: The types of services that people provided meant that as we start coming out of the various lockdowns around the world, people have wanted these things to remain permanent and have started using them as criteria for evaluation.  Kevin: Consumers aren't going to unlearn what they've learned and our clients know this.   Elise: Kevin says that his clients now want to know which pandemic-era initiatives they can scale back, and which are worth scaling up?  Kevin: Likely a strategy for any organization that takes this research to heart would be, “Hmm. I have price and quality on one hand: Low price and high quality. That's generating a lot of   21:00  demand for my products and services. Now I have these five new motivations on the other hand. Can these five new motivations actually give me an angle? An angle I didn't have before?” These somewhat nebulous attributes are now real buyer values in the consumer's mind. They're worth money. Health and safety is worth money. Trust and reputation is worth money, sustainability has a business case associated with it.  Elise: He says companies are going to have to make some tough choices. A lot of these services that customers really valued during the pandemic were expensive, and they might no longer be needed. But, in order for businesses to consider the trade-offs they’re facing, they need to relearn who their customer is now, and what they value.   Nevine: Get to know them, listen to what they're saying, understand, engage in a dialog.  Elise: A business may have to reorient itself in order to deliver this new experience.   22:00  Nevine: And be open to collaboration because no brand or a company is an island anymore. I think if we're genuinely going to provide the type of experiences the consumers are asking us for, I think we need to think differently.  Elise: And Nevine also suggests that businesses fully engage their employees on this journey.   Nevine: Because your people are the brand and the face of the brand. And you want somebody to put their discretionary energy into thinking about the company, the brand, and how to connect better with consumers. Then you need them to believe in the purpose of the company. You need their own personal purpose to fit with the purpose of the company. And there's nobody better to bring that to life for you.   Josh: So what I love most about this is that it, it demonstrates that consumers have a totally different reality that they're dealing with and that that's driving all the business imperatives for the companies they shop from.   Elise: Yeah and it feels pretty empowering. Right? I mean, these are things that we probably wanted all along, but didn't know we could get, and now we can get them.  Josh: Yeah. Yeah.   23:00  And it's prompting a lot of innovation from the companies that we buy from.   Elise: Yeah.  Josh: So, to learn more about the trends in today’s episode, check out the Life Reimagined report at Accenture dot com slash Built For Change.   Elise: Thanks to Accenture’s Kevin Quiring and Nevine El-Warraky  Josh: And to Riddley Gemperline-Schirm and everyone in Accenture’s Consumer Focus Group for talking to us!  Elise: Built For Change is a podcast from Accenture.  Josh: More episodes are coming soon. Follow, subscribe, and if you like what you hear, leave us a review.  MUSIC OUT 23:34 Go back to Homepage  The news and editorial staff of The New York Times had no role in this post’s creation. "
nyt://article/49146b55-122f-5655-b8c2-07340d35dc26,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/23/business/macys-earnings-2q-2022.html,2022-08-23T14:59:38+0000,article,News,422,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The chain said in its earnings report that selling its excess inventory had become harder as shoppers pulled back on discretionary spending. Excess inventory weighed less on Macy’s balance sheet last quarter than it did for other retailers, but the glut of unpurchased goods throughout the retail sector is still having an impact on the way the department store chain does business. Macy’s slightly lowered its outlook for the rest of the year on Tuesday, saying it expects to see net sales of $24.3 billion to $24.6 billion, compared with the $24.5 billion to $24.7 billion it previously forecast. It said the lower expectations resulted, in part, from the “level of inventory within the industry.” Inventory increased 7 percent from a year earlier, Macy’s said in its earnings report, adding that in July it became more difficult to sell all of its merchandise as shoppers pulled back on discretionary spending. Other retailers have been experiencing double-digit merchandise increases. Last week, Kohl’s said inventory was up 48 percent, and Target said its inventory had increased 36 percent. Even though Macy’s was able to keep its excess inventory much lower, it was still a drag on the quarterly profit. Higher delivery expenses were also a factor. Gross margin dipped to 39 percent, down from 41 percent last year. Comparable sales decreased 1.5 percent, and online sales fell 5 percent. Macy’s stock rose 3.4 percent in trading on Tuesday. Macy’s monitored competitors’ online prices for certain categories, particularly those that performed best during the pandemic. It adjusted prices to keep up with the discounts, as a way to keep shoppers from straying. Those price changes were compounded by the markdowns on seasonal apparel. “We’re responding to make sure that our customers are getting the fair value, and we’re liquidating the inventory that needs to be out by a certain date,” Jeff Gennette, Macy’s chief executive, said in an interview. Others retailers this summer have been doing the same. Executives at Ross and BJ’s Wholesale Club have said the proliferation of discounting has pushed them to offer lower prices on their merchandise just to stay competitive. Macy’s said it planned to deal with its excess inventory by the end of the year, a crucial time for retailers. It’s focusing specifically on discounting categories it has deemed “pandemic-related,” such as activewear, sleepwear and home goods. It said it was also lowering prices on private-brand merchandise and seasonal goods. The retailer pointed to its Polaris strategy, a turnaround plan put in place in February 2020 that focuses in part on strengthening relationships with existing customers, as part of the reason it was able to price better and respond more quickly to changes in what shoppers wanted to buy. "
nyt://article/ca1c8852-af3d-5059-b7f9-de4d055eb33c,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/05/26/business/macys-dollar-general-dollar-tree-earnings.html,2022-05-26T14:07:42+0000,article,News,587,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar Tree Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar General Corp', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Macy’s, Dollar General and Dollar Tree bucked a trend of retailers struggling to overcome inflationary pressures. Data delayed at least 15 minutes Source: FactSet Shares of Macy’s, Dollar Tree and Dollar General jumped on Thursday after all three retailers reported profits that defied Wall Street’s expectations and cut against recent concerns about spending by American consumers. The results lifted the stock market, with the S&P 500 gaining 2 percent. The tech-heavy Nasdaq composite, — which has for months been in a bear market, which is commonly defined as a 20 percent fall from a recent peak — rose 2.7 percent. Thursday’s gains put the S&P 500 on track to snap a stretch of weekly losses that had gone on seven consecutive weeks and had pushed the index to the brink of a bear market. Macy’s shares rose 19.4 percent after the company said profit for its latest quarter more than doubled from the same period a year earlier. Macy’s also raised its profit forecast for the year, saying that shoppers had shifted away from the leisure wear of the pandemic and back to pricier clothing. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “We saw a notable shift back to occasion-based apparel and in-store shopping, as well as continued strength in sales of luxury goods,” Macy’s said in a statement. Discount chains also beat analysts’ expectations, with Dollar Tree’s profit climbing more than 40 percent in its latest quarter. Dollar General reported that profit fell 18 percent, which was smaller than forecast. Both companies upgraded their sales expectations for the year, and Dollar Tree also raised its forecast for profit growth. Shares of Dollar Tree jumped 21.9 percent, the best performance in the S&P 500, while Dollar General rose 13.8 percent. Other retailers jumped too: An index tracking the consumer discretionary industry, which includes retailers, gained 4.8 percent, making it the best-performing sector of the day. The better-than-expected results and outlooks could help ease concerns about how supply chain woes and rising prices might hit consumer spending, which accounts for the bulk of economic activity in the United States. Those worries came to the forefront last week after Target and Walmart reported disappointing results and said that inflation had taken a toll on profits. Costco said profit rose 11 percent in its most recent quarter from a year ago, exceeding expectations. Earlier this week, Nordstrom’s profits and sales came in higher than expected, while Dick’s Sporting Goods said consumer spending remained strong. Nordstrom’s shares were up 5.3 percent and Dick’s Sporting Goods rose 8.2 percent on Thursday, adding to sharp jumps on Wednesday. Retailers were still striking a note of caution. “We are in the midst of a very challenging time for consumers as many are living paycheck to paycheck,” Richard W. Dreiling, the executive chairman of Dollar Tree, told analysts on a call. “They are facing the highest inflation since the early 1980s, record-high gas prices, the effects from the pandemic, geopolitical uncertainty and much more.” Lower-income households “are squeezed much more dramatically by high prices for fuel and food and have less for discretionary spending,” said Beth Ann Bovino, the U.S. chief economist at S&P Global. “If you have a clientele that’s leaning toward higher-income households, that retailer can fare better than those who are tied to lower income households.” Some industry watchers cautioned that earnings reports would likely continue to be mixed from one period to the next. “The retail business throughout Covid went up, down, sideways, depending on the products involved and the retailers’ capacity to pivot and service customers,” said Mark A. Cohen, the director of retail studies at Columbia Business School. Overall, he said, conditions would remain unpredictable: “Keep your seatbelt fastened and your helmet on, and be prepared for a bumpy ride.” Coral Murphy Marcos contributed reporting. Melina Delkic writes the Asia Briefing newsletter. More about Melina Delkic "
nyt://article/71a893b1-1025-568a-97ec-062dc1ff7aeb,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/25/business/dollar-stores-2q-earnings-inflation.html,2022-08-25T13:12:51+0000,article,News,767,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar General Corp', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar Tree Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"American consumers are gravitating toward less expensive stores as inflation drives up rent, food and fuel costs. The two largest chains of dollar stores in the country posted higher sales and profits in their latest quarter, a sign that consumers are flocking to discount retailers as rapid inflation eats into their budgets. Tellingly, both companies said on Thursday that higher-income shoppers were visiting their stores more frequently. The dollar-store business model — to attract consumers in rural areas and neighborhoods with fewer shopping options by offering prices that are lower than at local retailers — is designed to work even when its customers are hurting financially, as many are with inflation running stubbornly high. In the past year, the majority of new customers at Dollar Tree had an annual household income of at least $80,000, Mike Witynski, the chain’s chief executive, said on a call with analysts. At its rival Dollar General, there was also growth in higher-income shoppers, which Todd Vasos, its chief executive, described as a push by more consumers to “seek value.” Dollar General’s revenue rose 9 percent in the second quarter, versus the same period last year, to $9.4 billion, and its profit grew more than 6 percent. Dollar Tree’s revenue increased nearly 7 percent in the quarter, to $6.8 billion, and its profit jumped 27 percent. “The consumer is trying to make ends meet, and when you have limited funds in your wallet, the dollar stores provide the ability to do that,” said Joseph Feldman, a senior analyst at Telsey Advisory Group. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Signs of the emerging strains on consumers were also evident in the retailers’ results. Shoppers were visiting more often but buying less, Mr. Vasos of Dollar General said, describing buying choices as hewing “closer to need” than less essential, discretionary purchases. At Dollar Tree, there has been a “huge shift from cash into credit, which tells us the customer is pressured,” Mr. Witynski said. These pressures will loom over the retailers in the coming months. Dollar Tree lowered its forecast for profit this year, in large part because it is planning to cut its prices to bolster its competitiveness, as other retailers — like Target and Walmart — mark down their inventory to shed goods that they are struggling to sell. Dollar Tree’s share price fell more than 10 percent on Thursday. And although Dollar General upgraded its forecasts for sales and profit, investors showed nervousness about the outlook for consumers and pushed its stock down less than 1 percent. Still, the shares of both chains have outperformed the market this year, posting small gains while the S&P 500 has fallen by more than 10 percent. Instead of abandoning retailers like Walmart, which recently reported a 6.5 percent increase in sales, shoppers would often make weekly visits to Walmart to stock up on essentials and then buy miscellaneous items at the dollar stores to cut costs, Mr. Feldman said. Retailers have struggled with excess inventories as shoppers cut back on their spending. Macy’s inventory increased 7 percent from one year earlier, the company reported this week. Last week, Kohl’s said its inventory was up 48 percent, and Target said its inventory was 36 percent higher. At Dollar Tree, inventory rose about 50 percent to $5.4 billion in the quarter, from $3.6 billion the year before. Inventory at Dollar General was up 25 percent to $6.9 billion compared with $5.3 billion one year earlier, which the company attributed to inflation as well as more valuable products. “We were well ahead of any inventory issues that may pop up unlike some of our competitors out there,” Mr. Vasos said. “We canceled orders as early as December because we saw where the customer was headed.” Dollar Tree, whose shares are up about 18 percent since the beginning of the year and is one of the best-performing stocks in the consumer discretionary sector of the S&P 500, reported a 6.7 percent increase in sales, to $6.77 billion from $6.34 billion in the same period last year. At Dollar General, sales rose 9 percent, to $9.4 billion from $8.7 billion in the second quarter of last year, which the company said was a result of positive performance in new and existing stores and customers spending more per visit. Dollar Tree said profit increased 27 percent, to $359.9 million from $282.4 million a year earlier. Dollar General’s profit rose 6.4 percent, to $678 million, compared with $637 million a year before. “Our second-quarter performance reinforces the relevance of our brands for millions of households pressured by higher costs for food, fuel, rent and more,” Mr. Witynski said in a news release. Dollar General also announced it was promoting John Garratt, its chief financial officer, who would retain his current responsibilities in addition to serving as Dollar General’s president. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Isabella Simonetti is the 2022 David Carr Fellow at The New York Times. More about Isabella Simonetti "
nyt://article/f66db37d-6415-596c-a10b-ac9b31dff7fb,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/02/22/business/macys-sales-report.html,2022-02-22T20:00:06+0000,article,News,514,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Bloomingdale's"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gennette, Jeffrey', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'New York City', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Herald Square (Manhattan, NY)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Homeless Persons', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Overall sales last year were $24.5 billion, compared with $24.6 billion in 2019. Net profit was $1.4 billion. Macy’s, the owner of the Bloomingdale’s and Bluemercury chains, saw its overall sales last year recover to prepandemic levels. But the retailer’s top executive said he expected a “transitional” year ahead because of the pandemic and high inflation. Macy’s said on an earnings call on Tuesday that while inflation might “erode consumer discretionary income,” it had a number of strategies to manage the pressure. It’s aiming to reduce its costs by sourcing from more countries and buying less inventory. It’s also using customer data to figure out the optimal opening price points on everything from shirts to sofas, personalizing offers through its loyalty program and deploying deeper markdowns at individual stores based on how products are performing there. (Normally, markdowns would take place at a regional level.) “The big difference at Macy’s now versus previous times we dealt with inflation is we have this data analytics and pricing science at a much more granular level that is helping us make the right choices,” Jeff Gennette, the chief executive, said in an interview. Macy’s performance in 2021 signals the revival of a leaner and more digitally driven retail sector in the United States, and the company stands to benefit this year from increasing demand if more people resume social events and return to work. Overall sales last year were $24.5 billion, with a net profit of $1.4 billion, compared with 2019 sales of $24.6 billion and a net profit of $564 million. Revenue had plummeted to $17.4 billion in 2020. Macy’s posted a net loss of $3.9 billion that year, with most consumers isolated, holiday plans canceled and tourism all but nonexistent. The company’s latest fourth-quarter sales — which include the all-important holiday season — exceeded those in 2019, despite the Omicron wave of the coronavirus. Mr. Gennette said that in New York City, where Macy’s is based, the company is anticipating international tourism to return in 2023, and that its flagship Bloomingdale’s location had already seen an uptick. International sales make up about 3 percent to 4 percent of the business at Bloomingdale’s and Macy’s. About half that business returned in 2021, largely because of e-commerce. Macy’s is developing a plan for its office workers to return in a hybrid fashion, and it hopes more shoppers will come back to its stores. Mr. Gennette said he “applauded” Mayor Eric Adams’s efforts to focus on safety in New York. Macy’s, he said, has been working with Breaking Ground, a nonprofit affordable-housing organization, to help with outreach and service referrals for homeless adults in the Herald Square area, where the retailer’s headquarters and flagship store are. “I appreciate what the mayor is doing around Herald Square and what he’s doing with Penn Station, and you see that playing out across other major cities across the nation where you have similar mayors taking an active approach to making sure that’s safe for colleagues and customers,” Mr. Gennette said. He added that while the Omicron wave had pushed back a reopening of offices in the city, “it’s starting to loosen up again, and so I do expect you’re going to see more and more people in offices.” nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari "
nyt://article/fe72576a-8739-5144-bbd7-0b6aec3c8f3f,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/08/17/business/walmart-consumer-spending.html,2023-08-17T12:01:53+0000,article,News,710,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The company raised its forecasts for revenue and profit this year, a sign that consumers, the engine of the U.S. economy, remain resilient. Walmart, the largest retailer in the United States, on Thursday reported stronger-than-expected growth in sales and profit as it attracted more shoppers willing to open their wallets, a sign that consumer spending, the engine of the U.S. economy, remains resilient. Walmart’s results capped a week of major retailers opening their books, including Home Depot, Target and TJX, which owns T.J. Maxx and Marshalls. Home Depot and Target reported declines in their latest quarterly sales, while TJX’s off-price retailers reported a bigger-than-expected rise in sales and the company revised its forecast for the full year higher, like Walmart. The earnings offer a glimpse into consumers’ purchasing habits as they continue to navigate stubborn inflation and shift their spending from goods like furniture and electronics to services like travel, dining out and going to the movies. Rising prices have brought new shoppers to Walmart, in the form of higher earners attracted by cheaper groceries and other essentials at the big-box stores. By drawing in higher-income shoppers — a trend that Walmart executives have called out in the past few quarters — the retailer had an “opportunity to drive conversion in more discretionary categories,” Doug McMillon, Walmart’s chief executive, said. “It isn’t as surprising to us that the consumer is as healthy as they continue to be,” said David Silverman, a retail analyst at Fitch Ratings. “I think that what we’ve been surprised about is that the consumer is still spending on goods while they have clearly been spending more and more on services, particularly this summer.” Walmart’s comparable sales rose more than 6 percent in the second quarter from a year earlier, comfortably beating Wall Street’s expectations. Grocery sales were particularly strong, the company said, while spending on general merchandise fell slightly. What is inflation? Inflation is a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Walmart expects to continue drawing in more shoppers, even as economic headwinds like inflation and the resumption of student loan payments squeeze household budgets. Walmart reported a rise in revenue of nearly 6 percent in the second quarter; it expects sales for the full year to grow between 4 and 4.5 percent. “We see families that are discerning about what they’re spending on,” Mr. McMillon said on a call with analysts. “They’re setting priorities and spending on the things they care most about.” Executives noted that shoppers were buying more private-label brands, groceries and meal options for eating at home. Foot traffic and the amount spent per trip rose last quarter at Walmart’s U.S. stores. The company also reported a 24 percent rise in e-commerce sales. It raised its full-year growth forecasts for the second consecutive quarter. Executives at a variety of retailers have described a situation in which consumers are wary but still willing to spend. “A more cautious and value-driven consumer” has affected sales, Rosalind Brewer, the chief executive of Walgreens Boots Alliance, told analysts recently. Customers were “feeling the strain” of high inflation and interest rates, she said, as well as general economic uncertainty and the end of many pandemic stimulus measures. “They are pulling back on discretionary and seasonal spend, and responding strongly to promotional activity,” she said. That said, consumer spending has largely held up, propelled by a resilient labor market and rising wages. Retail sales in July rose 3.2 percent from a year earlier, according to data released on Tuesday, surpassing economists’ expectations. In July, many retailers ran promotions around Amazon Prime Day, which has become a significant sales event during the summer. “Fears of a recession, or at least a severe recession, have largely subsided, and the consumer is generally healthy,” Ted Decker, Home Depot’s chief executive officer, said Tuesday on an earnings call. But retail industry watchers have noted that the restart of student loan repayments in October could weigh on consumer spending. “The upcoming resumption of student loan repayments will put additional pressure on the already-strained budgets of tens of millions of households,” Michael Fiddelke, Target’s chief financial officer, told analysts on Wednesday. “Against this backdrop, we remain cautious in our planning.” Once back-to-school spending ends, retailers and analysts will look ahead to the crucial holiday shopping season to gauge the health of American consumers. Shoppers will start to see those seasonal products, like lanterns, ornaments and artificial Christmas trees, roll out in a few weeks.  “Typically when back-to-school is strong, it bodes well for what happens with Halloween and Christmas,” Mr. McMillon, the Walmart chief, said. Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/616053e4-3872-5876-92f9-f2b32af46985,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/18/business/walmart-earnings-1q-2023.html,2023-05-18T12:03:50+0000,article,News,929,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Real Estate (Commercial)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The retailer reported revenue that beat expectations and said it expected net sales to rise 3.5 percent for the year. Walmart, the largest retailer in the United States, raised its annual guidance on Thursday, a sign that it expects shoppers to continue to gravitate toward its value-oriented stores as they become more selective about their purchases.  The retailer said it expected net sales to increase 3.5 percent for the fiscal year and operating income to rise up to 4.5 percent. Revenue in the first quarter was $152.3 billion, beating Wall Street’s estimate of $141.7 billion. Both the transactions and average amount customers spent rose in the quarter. Higher-income households and younger customers are shopping more at Walmart, the company said, reflecting a trend that its executives have called out in recent quarters as Americans face higher-than-usual inflation. The retailer said it had also gained market share in the grocery category. “We had a strong quarter,” said Doug McMillon, Walmart’s chief executive, in a statement on Thursday. On a call with analysts, Mr. McMillon said inflation was slowing down consumer spending in discretionary categories like apparel and home goods. That, in turn, is causing uncertainty for Walmart executives as they plan for the year ahead. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “We all need those prices to come down,” Mr. McMillon said. “The persistently high rates of inflation in these categories, lasting for such a long period of time, are weighing on some of the families we serve.” Retail earnings reports this week provided a glimpse into the mind-set of the American consumer and the state of the industry. Target, Home Depot and TJX, which owns T.J. Maxx and Marshalls, all reported first-quarter earnings that showed sales had moderated compared with the past few years, when shoppers were spending more freely. Home Depot on Tuesday lowered its full-year guidance and said sales in the first quarter declined 4.2 percent from a year earlier. Executives said they had expected 2023 would be a “year of moderation” for the home improvement sector, but the company’s performance was below expectations. Target’s quarterly sales increased a modest 0.5 percent. The retailer maintained its full-year guidance, but said that “based on softening sales trends” in the most recent quarter, it was planning for a wide range of sales outcomes in the second quarter. Overall sales at T.J. Maxx’s parent company increased 3 percent. Its T.J. Maxx and Marshalls brands, which offer name-brand items to shoppers at discounted prices, posted an increase, but sales at HomeGoods declined 7 percent. It maintained its full-year guidance and forecast an increase in sales of 2 to 3 percent. Analysts said the sales declines were a sign of consumers being more selective about what they bought, along with spending patterns gaining some semblance of normalcy after being less predictable during the pandemic. Broadly, the economy has remained resilient, with wage growth strong and jobs being added across a wide range of industry. “We’re not seeing a collapse of revenue,” Simeon Siegel, managing director at BMO Capital Markets, said. “We’re seeing revenue disappointments. Consumers are still spending on the things that they decide they want to spend on.” Retailers are facing a profit challenge. Walmart said on Thursday that its gross profit rate, or the difference between the cost of the goods and their sales, had fallen to 23.7 percent, slightly missing Wall Street’s estimates. The rate declined in part because shoppers were buying more groceries and products in Walmart’s health and wellness category and less general merchandise. Groceries typically have lower profit margins than discretionary categories like apparel.  Target said on Wednesday that its gross margin rate increased to 26.3 percent from a year earlier, when it had a glut of inventory and supply chain costs were higher. It said higher prices had also helped lift that number. But Target warned that shrink, the industry’s term for inventory that entered a store or warehouse but left without being accounted for, would hurt its profitability by more than $500 million compared with last year. Retail analysts have expected thinner company margins this quarter, given more promotions to entice shoppers and more purchases of items, like groceries, that bring in lower profits. That consumer behavior was reflected in this week’s retail sales report for April. Retail sales increased at a modest 0.4 percent from March, reversing a two-month decline. (The number is not adjusted for inflation and sometimes is revised.) Department stores, health and personal care stores, and grocery stores all recorded increases. Spending at furniture stores, electronic stores and home improvement retailers declined. Spending at restaurants and bars increased 14.5 percent. Restaurants and flights are usually considered discretionary, but they are also experiences, which Americans are spending more on. There is less emphasis on buying big-ticket items for the home given that many shoppers spent the early stages of the pandemic doing just that. “Part of what we’re experiencing now is a bit of a rebalancing in the consumer budget,” said Michelle Meyer, chief economist at Mastercard. “As we look forward, should we expect this split between experiences and goods to last forever? Of course not. But there’s still more catch-up that needs to happen for some of these experience-based spending categories where consumers are still very eager to satisfy their lingering demand.” Some analysts, though, warn that a confluence of factors — including less money in savings, tightening credit and continued high prices — will make shoppers pull back in the second half of the year. Michael Lasser, a retail analyst at UBS, said the “very clear pattern” with retailers’ earnings results this week showed that consumers were being more discerning about what they purchased. “My personal belief is that that’s going to continue for the foreseeable future,” Mr. Lasser said. “What will greatly influence the direction of spend from there is what happens to the labor market.” Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/bd9aeb67-54d2-54f0-8ba6-3f26fa49dba9,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/16/business/october-retail-sales.html,2022-11-16T20:17:13+0000,article,News,903,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Cornell, Brian C', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Retail sales rose last month, and several companies reported strong earnings. But discounts seemed to drive a significant portion of purchases. Despite months of unease about the state of the economy, Americans remain willing to spend money on all sorts of goods. But they are making it clear that retailers must work harder than they have over the past two years to win their dollars. Retail sales rose 1.3 percent in October, the Department of Commerce said on Wednesday. That was higher than expected and a promising reflection of consumer sentiment during the holiday shopping season, especially since the near-record-high inflation Americans have felt this year has moderated a bit.  But that spending was boosted by the earlier-than-usual holiday deals that enticed shoppers last month. For the first time, Amazon held a Prime Day in October, filling the site with discounts, in addition to its usual time in June. Target rolled out its Deal Days. And Kohl’s offered promotions on toys throughout the month. After last year’s holiday season, which featured few traditional doorbuster sales, many shoppers, it now seems, are looking for discounts before they buy. “Broadly speaking, retailers could price products wherever they wanted to over the last two years and consumers would buy them,” said Mike Graziano, a senior analyst of consumer products at RSM US, an audit, tax and consulting firm. “Now consumers are looking for deals like they do over the holiday, and consumers are taking advantage of that, and October was a clear example of that.” Holiday promotions were a significant driver of October retail sales, he said. Categories like online spending, furniture, and health and personal care all saw an increase in demand in October compared with September. Spending at clothing and sporting goods stores remained flat or declined, which could mean people are waiting until later in the season to make those purchases. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Target is an example of the importance discounts have played. The company’s sales rose in early October, coinciding with a round of holiday promotions. But demand tapered off when those deals went away, and October ended up its weakest month in the third quarter, the company said, after it reported earnings on Wednesday. “Nearly all of the slowdown was driven by our discretionary categories — apparel, home and hard lines — as our guests became increasingly cautious in their spending in those categories at Target and the industry more broadly,” Michael Fiddelke, the company’s chief financial officer, said on a call with analysts. Executives are expecting more of the same. The National Retail Federation said this month that it expected holiday sales from November to December to increase 6 to 8 percent, which is below the pace of inflation. With Black Friday now a little over a week away, it is imperative for companies to quickly adjust to changes in shopper behavior. This period is crucial, particularly for department stores and specialty apparel chains, which spend much of their energy preparing for the large number of sales they handle at the end of each year. On Thursday, Macy’s and Kohl’s will report earnings, which will give a glimpse into the department store chains’ relative financial health heading into the season. Throughout much of the pandemic, when shoppers were spending freely and supply chain snarls were front of mind for retailers, discounts were offered infrequently. Last year, consumers had more money saved up and were spending it on refreshing their closets and upgrading their electronics after a year of being stuck at home. The spending sprees ended this year, largely because of worries around inflation. And with shoppers being more discerning about how they spend, many retail executives have said they expect a return this year to the usual kind of holiday deals that were absent from many stores last year. “Last year was just an unbelievable year for any retailer, but especially apparel,” said Zachary Warring, an equity analyst at CFRA. “Coming off of that, it’s going to be a tough quarter for retailers.” Public perception will also play a role. Retailers that are associated with value and good prices or that already have a frequent and loyal shopper base will probably fare well in the coming months, Mr. Warring said. For those not perceived that way, the holiday season could be bumpier. For instance, Walmart, which has long performed well with lower-income shoppers, said on Tuesday, when announcing its robust third-quarter earnings, that people who earn more than $100,000 were increasingly shopping with them. The company has increased its full-year forecast for revenue and profit. All this comes at a time when Americans at various income levels are looking for ways to save money, especially as trips to the grocery store and gas pump take a larger bite out of their wallet. This could make days like Black Friday and those leading up to Christmas Day — known for having deeper discounts — even more relevant for shoppers. “You could see this concentration of sales when you have these big pushes around promotions,” said Michelle Meyer, chief economist at Mastercard. “It’s like a fits and starts of spending in the holiday season based off of promotions.” It’s a pattern retailers will have to be mindful of as they navigate the next few months. “We’re going to watch it carefully throughout the holiday season,” Brian Cornell, Target’s chief executive, said on a call with analysts. “I do think it is a byproduct of a consumer who has been facing higher costs throughout the year and is working with their budget, shopping very carefully, looking for value and recognizing that they’ve got to start with core staples before they spend in discretionary categories.” Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/819a462b-7dd9-5289-a632-c3ab634cf076,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/10/25/business/coca-cola-q3-earnings.html,2022-10-25T15:25:41+0000,article,News,509,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Beverages', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Soft Drinks', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Coca-Cola Company', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Quincey, James (1965- )', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The soft drink giant’s latest quarterly earnings defied worries about consumer cutbacks amid rising inflation and fragile economic growth. Coca-Cola generated better-than-expected earnings as consumers continued to pay higher prices for soft drinks and juices, further evidence that shoppers are willing to keep spending in the face of record inflation and rising interest rates. The company, whose brands include Sprite and Minute Maid, said on Tuesday that third-quarter revenues increased by 10 percent and profit grew by 14 percent versus the same period last year. The biggest driver was a 12 percent jump in growth linked mostly to raising prices, alongside shifts in the mix of products sold in the quarter. At the same time, the volume of products sold rose by 4 percent, showing consumers’ willingness to pay more for the company’s products. When Coca-Cola’s rival PepsiCo reported its third-quarter earnings this month, price increases were accompanied by weaker growth in volumes. Coca-Cola’s results highlighted consumers’ willingness to continue buying their favorite products despite being squeezed by higher prices at the grocery store and the gas pump. “In the face of these pressures, consumers stayed resilient,” James Quincey, Coca-Cola’s chief executive said on a call with investors. He added later, however, that he saw emerging changes in consumer behavior as “the impact of inflation running ahead of wages is starting to come through.” That led to shoppers putting off purchases of “more discretionary, higher-ticket” items, Mr. Quincey said, and seeking out cheaper options for other products. “Their ability to make sure that they have affordable options in these price-sensitive consumers’ hands is critical,” Bonnie Herzog, an analyst at Goldman Sachs, said of Coca-Cola. “That is something that they have done very well.” Investors are watching closely as big companies begin to report their latest quarterly earnings to get a sense of the health of the economy and the path of inflation. The Federal Reserve is on a campaign to bring down stubbornly high inflation by increasing interest rates, which raises the cost of borrowing for companies and consumers. Food and drink giants like Coca-Cola, Pepsi, Procter & Gamble and Nestlé all reported significant price increases in earnings reports this month, a sign that the cost of food — a major factor lifting overall inflation in recent months — is set to remain high. While some companies have warned that their profit margins are coming under pressure, they have mostly been able to pass on higher costs to consumers. Prices at Chipotle Mexican Grill might increase as much as 15 percent year over year before falling to 11 percent at the beginning of next year, Jack Hartung, the company’s chief financial officer, said on a call with investors on Tuesday. Executives said lower-income consumers were dining at Chipotle less because of high prices. “We’re continuing to see some pressure on the low-income consumer,” Brian Niccol, Chipotle’s chief executive, said on the call. Coca-Cola raised its forecasts for revenue and profit growth this year and said it was “encouraged by the underlying top-line momentum” going into next year, when it expects to sustain its growth. “The company expects global inflation to continue to impact its expenses across the board, and also expects commodity prices to remain volatile,” it said. Isabella Simonetti is the 2022 David Carr Fellow at The New York Times. More about Isabella Simonetti "
nyt://article/cec21fe6-e5bd-5981-ac43-9334daba589b,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/31/opinion/stock-market-tech-recession.html,2023-05-31T19:00:03+0000,article,Op-Ed,978,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-sub-only-nl', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'S & P Dow Jones Indices', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Science and Technology', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Subscriber-only Newsletter Gains in the U.S. stock market this year have been concentrated among a handful of immensely valuable tech companies. Technology and communications services stocks in the S&P 500 are up more than 30 percent this year to date. Consumer discretionary stocks are up this year as well — by around 18 percent — but all of the other eight S&P 500 sectors are down. Stocks in the energy sector are collectively down more than 10 percent. Of the S&P 500’s 10.3 percent total return including dividends so far this year, 9.99 percentage points owe to just eight stocks, two of which represent parts of Alphabet, Google’s parent, “leaving a mere 0.3 percent return for the entire rest of the market,” JoAnne Feeney, a portfolio manager at Advisors Capital Management in Ridgewood, N.J., wrote heading into the Memorial Day weekend. What is the hypernarrow stock market advance telling us about prospects for the economy, and should we pay attention? I can tell a pessimistic story and an optimistic story, but I’m going to lean into the optimism. The pessimistic take is that it’s unhealthy for a market — and an economy — when all the good news is concentrated in a handful of sectors. “It can reflect overcrowding in one area and uncertainty around the broader economy in others,” Mona Mahajan, a senior investment strategist at the brokerage firm Edward Jones, wrote last week. Stock prices reflect investors’ expectations about corporate profits, and profits are tied to the performance of the economy. So there should be — and is — a positive correlation between the stock market and the economic outlook. But the performance of particular sectors also reflects factors that are unique to those sectors: oil prices, interest rates, tech breakthroughs and so on. The artificial intelligence craze is the most likely explanation for the tech sector’s outperformance this year. That seems like a slender reed on which to build a broad economic expansion. But it’s not so unusual for one or two sectors to power an expansion. In 1980, seven of the top 10 S&P 500 members by market cap were in energy, according to data compiled by Howard Silverblatt, a senior index analyst at S&P Dow Jones Indices. Assume for the moment that only the tech sector benefits from A.I. Diversified investors still benefit from the A.I. craze because a big portion of their portfolios is in tech stocks. The people who get hired to work on A.I. also benefit. Some of them may transition into tech from sectors that aren’t doing as well. Meanwhile, rising stock prices induce more consumer spending. The S&P 500 index is capitalization-weighted, meaning that the most valuable companies carry more weight. A change of 1 percent in the price of Apple shares affects the index more than the same change in the price of the 500th-most-valuable index member. You can make a case that the economy is also weighted, although not by market value: The performance of a big, powerful sector such as tech matters more to gross domestic product and even employment than the performance of, say, the materials sector. Even that understates the potential gains from A.I. and other tech advances. Economic historians point out that while companies on the leading edge of technology production score the early gains, over the long term most of the benefits go to the customers. Take Microsoft’s Excel spreadsheet program. Sure, it’s been a cash cow for Microsoft for decades. But the gains to Microsoft and its investors aren’t as big as the gains to people all over the world who use Excel to run their businesses more effectively. Artificial intelligence is likely to turn out the same way as Excel. In fact, we’re already seeing it. Early adopters are finding clever uses for A.I. tools such as ChatGPT, including memo drafting, language translation, software code generation and debugging. Deutsche Bank strategists recently compared A.I. with automobiles, which created jobs in not just auto production but also dealerships, road construction, tourism and the development of the suburbs. I worry about the downsides of A.I. I also worry that the U.S. economy is headed for a recession, if it isn’t in one already. In spite of those concerns, I think the narrowness of the stock market’s rise — so heavily driven by a handful of tech giants — isn’t the problem that many strategists make it out to be. “Investor exuberance has some solid foundations,” Feeney wrote. I think she’s right. The buying power of the federal minimum wage is at its lowest point since December 1949, according to a calculation by the Economic Policy Institute. The wage floor has been stuck at $7.25 an hour since July 2009, the longest period without change in its history. Its buying power has been eroded by inflation. In December 1949, the minimum wage was 40 cents an hour, or $4.48 in April 2023 dollars. It rose to 75 cents the next month, which is $8.44 in April 2023 dollars. At its peak value, in February 1968, the minimum wage was worth $12.44 in April 2023 dollars. To adjust for inflation, the Economic Policy Institute splices together several price indexes to make up for the fact that the CPI-U — the price index for all urban consumers — isn’t defined consistently over time. Today’s minimum wage would appear even lower, going strictly by the CPI-U, which is what the Bureau of Labor Statistics uses in its online inflation calculator. “A human being should be able to change a diaper, plan an invasion, butcher a hog, conn a ship, design a building, write a sonnet, balance accounts, build a wall, set a bone, comfort the dying, take orders, give orders, cooperate, act alone, solve equations, analyze a new problem, pitch manure, program a computer, cook a tasty meal, fight efficiently, die gallantly. Specialization is for insects.” — Robert Heinlein, “Time Enough for Love” (1973) Peter Coy has covered business for more than 40 years. Follow him on Twitter.  @petercoy  "
nyt://article/b28030b6-f5b4-5794-86ea-c7c4fdd8650b,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/19/business/retailers-sales-inflation.html,2022-08-19T18:05:59+0000,article,News,1043,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discount Selling', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""BJ's Wholesale Club Inc"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Ross Stores Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'TJX Companies Inc', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"In earnings reports this week, companies showed it has been a struggle to adapt to a consumer mind-set that is vastly different from what it was during much of the pandemic. This hasn’t been the year retailers planned for. After two years of navigating the pandemic — which brought record online sales and shoppers willing to buy all manners of items, to the point that the global supply chain became strained — executives knew a new normal would take shape. Sales might slow, the thinking went, but people would still want TVs, fashionable dresses and throw pillows. So, with supply chain issues in mind, companies stocked up. But this spring it became clear that those items weren’t selling quickly enough. As people watched the prices of food and gas rise, their spending became more selective, leaving retailers with shelves of inventory they couldn’t get rid of. The magnitude of the miscalculation was crystallized this week in a batch of quarterly earnings from major retailers like Walmart and Target, which showed a mix of declining sales of discretionary goods and lower profits. A number revised their guidance, lowering expectations for both sales and profits for the rest of the year. A glut of inventory weighed on companies’ balance sheets: Inventory at Walmart rose 25 percent from this time last year. At Target, it increased 36 percent. And Kohl’s said inventory was up 48 percent.  “Since our last earnings call in May, a weakening environment, high inflation and dampened consumer spending are having broad implications across much of retail, especially in discretionary categories like apparel,” Michelle Gass, the chief executive of Kohl’s, said on a call with analysts. “Given our penetration in these categories, this is disproportionately impacting Kohl’s.” Taken together, the results show that the robust sales retailers grew accustomed to during the course of the pandemic have ceased — and the consumer landscape that awaits may be more austere than what they prepared for. (There were exceptions. Home Depot, for instance, said sales were still strong, driven by home improvement projects.) On earnings calls, executives said lower- to middle-income consumers were the most hesitant to spend. Stores are responding by pushing more discounts and highlighting private-label brand to shoppers, and, in some cases, canceling billions of dollars’ worth of orders with vendors. It remains to be seen which strategies will be most effective. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “The last two years was great for retailers because consumers were buying everything they had to offer,” Liza Amlani, founder of Retail Strategy Group, which works with brands on their merchandising and planning strategies. “They just can’t do that anymore. You have to understand what the consumer wants more now than ever.” In July, U.S. retail sales were virtually unchanged, according to data from the Commerce Department released Wednesday. Excluding the sales of gas and cars, retail sales actually increased 0.7 percent. But 85 percent of U.S. consumers said that inflation is altering the way they shop, according to a survey released this week from Morning Consult. Most retailers are hoping this pullback period is only temporary. In the meantime, companies are trying to signal to customers that it’s worth doing what spending they do in their stores. Kohl’s, for instance, said that its private-label brands outperformed the national ones it carries last quarter, and that shoppers gravitated toward buying more basic apparel that could be worn with many different outfits. Retailers are also turning to the familiar strategy of discounting merchandise to entice shoppers to open their wallets. It’s one they didn’t have to deploy for most of the pandemic, when people showed they were willing to pay full price for a wide range of items. Target, Walmart and Ross Stores all said they have marked down goods in recent weeks. In turn, retailers like BJ's Wholesale Club — even if they were content with their balance sheets — said they lowered prices on some categories in order to stay competitive. Robert Eddy, chief executive at BJ’s Wholesale Club, even said that the company was willing to “alter the scope and the depth of those promotions” for the holiday season. The strategy of discounting might not actually get to the root cause, analysts say. “There is a point at which lower prices don’t trigger incremental demand because the consumers already have it,” said Simeon Siegel, a managing director at BMO Capital Markets. “It’s not an indication that the company is dead. It’s not an indication that they’re never going to buy it again. They just need the time lag.” Retailers need to realize that consumers are thinking differently, Mr. Siegel said. Some big-ticket purchases — like an exercise bike, living room couch or patio grill — will happen just once. In other cases, the amount of time between purchasing and replenishing will be longer. A person might now buy a candle every few months, compared to doing it every month in the early stages of the pandemic when they were home more often. And more people are choosing to spend their money on things like air travel and movie tickets this summer compared to last.  With all of these variables, lowering prices might not trigger the demand a retailer wants, Mr. Siegel said. It might simply just cut into a company’s profits. For the stores that did see sales growth, like the big-box retailers Walmart and Target, most of that volume was attributed to higher food prices. Groceries have narrower margins than, say, a retailer’s private-label dress brand, and the shift in sales from one category to another affects the company’s overall profitability. Along with pricing, retailers need to figure out how to deal with their inventory issues, especially with the all-important holiday season just a few months away. “Getting through the inventory levels allows them to have a cleaner store, a cleaner supply chain,” said Bobby Griffin, equity research analyst at Raymond James. “They won’t be able to predict it perfectly, but getting through excess inventory will give them more flexibility to try to adapt to what the holiday is throwing at them.” For all the challenges, some retailers saw a brighter path ahead. While inventory at TJX, the owner of the T.J. Maxx and Marshall’s chains, was up 39 percent for the quarter, the company said it was comfortable at that level because they had what shoppers actually wanted. “They’re looking for an exciting treasure hunt, an entertaining shopping experience in stores,” Ernie Herrman, TJX’s chief executive, said in a call with analysts, “and along with that value equation, we continue to provide those two things.” Isabella Simonetti contributed reporting. "
nyt://article/97f9d3e8-db16-5289-a217-18498eb0584d,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/19/business/hasbro-2q-earnings.html,2022-07-19T18:36:24+0000,article,News,429,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Toys', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Hasbro Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The toymaker was able to raise prices to offset higher costs, but its revenue took a hit overseas because of a strong dollar. Despite higher prices, people continued to spend on Nerf blasters, Power Rangers action figures and Magic the Gathering cards, helping Hasbro overcome rising costs for materials and freight, the company said on Tuesday. Hasbro said its revenue for the second quarter increased 1 percent from a year earlier, but profit grew by 10 percent, beating analyst expectations, as price increases and demand overcame higher costs and currency losses. Hasbro’s earnings report is a promising sign for other companies that also sell discretionary products as consumers are being squeezed by rising inflation and higher costs are eating into corporate profit margins. Many of those companies will report their quarterly results in the weeks to come. Consumer prices in the United States jumped 9.1 percent in June, the fastest pace in 40 years. But that didn’t stop some shoppers from opening their wallets, with retail sales rising more than expected in June. Hasbro raised prices in the second quarter, which helped the company make up for higher costs for materials like paper and plastic, Deborah Thomas, Hasbro’s chief financial officer, said on a call with analysts. The move could benefit its profit margin even more in the third and fourth quarters, she said. Hasbro’s toys and games “tend to be small luxuries that consumers value pretty highly,” Chris Cocks, the company’s chief executive, said on the call. During economic downturns, fans of games like Magic the Gathering and Dungeons & Dragons in particular are “very resilient,” he said, “with a deep well of savings and a large amount of passion.” The company’s business unit that includes Magic the Gathering and Dungeons & Dragons had its best quarter for sales ever, $420 million, up 3 percent from a year earlier. Hasbro recently teamed up with The New York Times to develop a board game based on Wordle. In what is likely to be a theme at other multinational companies, Hasbro’s revenue was held back by a strong dollar, the company said, particularly for sales in Europe, where the euro recently fell to parity with the U.S. dollar for the first time in 20 years. Converting sales from other currencies into dollars cut nearly $33 million from revenue in the second quarter, Hasbro said. The toymaker also said Russia’s invasion of Ukraine would affect its results this year. Last year, $115 million of the company’s revenue came from Russia. “We will not have this revenue and associated operating profit in 2022,” Mr. Cocks said. Hasbro’s shares jumped nearly 3 in early trading before settling at a gain of about 1 percent. Its rival toymaker Mattel will report its latest quarterly earnings on Thursday. Gregory Schmidt covers New York real estate. More about Gregory Schmidt "
nyt://article/679d59dd-80e2-5726-9ed1-091fb95b070f,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/18/business/second-quarter-bank-earnings.html,2022-07-18T18:14:19+0000,article,News,578,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Regulation and Deregulation of Industry', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bank of America Corporation', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Citigroup Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Goldman Sachs Group Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'JPMorgan Chase & Company', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Morgan Stanley', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Fraser, Jane (1967- )', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gorman, James P', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Wall Street bank executives said consumer spending was up, markets were volatile and they did not think the economy was headed for a recession. Investors have been sifting through the first batch of company earnings this quarter to monitor the chances of a recession, the state of consumer spending and the outlook for the markets. Reports from the nation’s biggest banks at the start of “earnings season,” as Wall Street calls it, sent mixed signals. Second-quarter profits at all the banks were down from a year earlier. The last two to open their books were Bank of America, where quarterly profit fell by a third, and Goldman Sachs, where profit fell by half. But in some cases, the decline in profit wasn’t as severe as analysts expected. Consumers continued to spend and borrow. Markets were volatile, but there was money to be made in trading. And bank leaders struck a tone of caution, but none thought a recession was underway. “It’s a challenging market, but I think it is important to say that it’s not 2008 complicated,” James Gorman, Morgan Stanley’s chief executive, told analysts. Bank chiefs said they expected the economy to slow but not slip into outright contraction. “Nothing in the data that I see signals that the U.S. is on the cusp of recession,” Jane Fraser, Citigroup’s chief executive, said on a conference call. “While a recession could indeed take place, it is highly unlikely to be as severe as others we have seen.” Executives at JPMorgan Chase also said there were no clear signs of a recession yet. Retail banking customers are still spending money on discretionary purchases like travel and restaurants, they said. “We’ve looked a lot very carefully into our actual data,” Jeremy Barnum, JPMorgan’s chief financial officer, said on a call with reporters. “There is essentially no evidence of actual weakness.” Michael Santomassimo, Wells Fargo’s finance chief, said the bank’s management was preparing for a range of scenarios but flagged that “things will probably get worse.” Lending was up at nearly all the banks, in a positive sign for the economy. Consumers and companies increased their borrowing from the largest banks by an average of 6 percent in the second quarter compared with the same period last year. The biggest gains were in corporate loans, which rose nearly 20 percent from a year earlier at both JPMorgan and Bank of America. Home mortgages slowed in the quarter, a reflection of higher interest rates, but were still up at most of the banks. And for the most part, consumers and business customers continued to pay their debts on time. For instance, at JPMorgan, just 0.5 percent of customers’ credit card loans were past due by 90 days or more. Nearly all the banks, citing economic uncertainty, said they expected an increase in the number of borrowers, particularly individuals, who would fall behind on their loans. The six biggest banks collectively expect nearly $2 billion more in loan losses over the coming year than they did three months ago. Most investors lost money in their investment accounts in the second quarter, but market volatility was a boon for the banks. That was particularly true at Goldman Sachs, where trading revenue rose 31 percent, outpacing its rivals. Citigroup also reported better-than-expected results driven by increased trading commissions and market gains. In the wake of the financial crisis a decade ago, the large banks, driven in part by regulators and changes in the law, vowed to shy away from making risky bets in the market. Now, many of them are generating an increasing portion of their revenue from trading, though banks still say they are taking fewer risks than they did before. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Stephen Gandel is a news editor for DealBook. He was previously a senior reporter for CBS News, and a columnist at Bloomberg. He has covered Wall Street and financial firms for most of his career. More about Stephen Gandel Isabella Simonetti is the 2022 David Carr Fellow at The New York Times. More about Isabella Simonetti "
nyt://article/21bb76b9-2ae9-5dda-a9da-26f92b471055,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/07/26/business/gap-ceo-mattel-barbie.html,2023-07-26T15:22:56+0000,article,News,552,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Dickson, Richard (Retail Executive)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Gap Inc', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Mattel Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Fashion and Apparel', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Barbie (Doll)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Richard Dickson helped improve Barbie’s image, culminating in the blockbuster film. Now he faces a similar turnaround challenge at the retailer. Gap hopes its new chief executive can help it achieve a Barbie-like turnaround. Just days after the blockbuster opening weekend of “Barbie,” Gap announced on Wednesday that it had hired Richard Dickson of the toymaker Mattel to become its chief executive. Mr. Dickson is Mattel’s president and chief operating officer and has been at the toymaker since 2000. He helped improve Barbie’s image by focusing on creative marketing campaigns, rolling out Barbies of different races and body shapes and spearheading brand collaborations to help change the perception of the well-known but often fraught doll. Over the weekend, the Greta Gerwig-directed “Barbie” brought in $162 million at the North American box office. That success followed months of a can’t-miss-it marketing campaign that put Barbie at the top of mind for a wide range of consumers, from children to adults. Audiences draped in pink flocked to the film. “Bringing that brand back and having it resonate with large parts of the public is super important to the Mattel turnaround,” said Jonathan Reid, director of retail and consumer at Fitch Ratings. “Richard was a big part of that.” Gap, which owns its namesake brand as well as Old Navy, Banana Republic and Athleta, is in need of a revival akin to Barbie’s. The 52-year-old retailer has been facing falling sales and a customer base whose clothing needs continue to change. The mall stalwart has faced increased competition from online retailers that have chipped away at its market share. It is also contending with an industrywide challenge of U.S. consumers spending less on discretionary categories like clothes. In May, Gap Inc. said that overall net sales had fallen 6 percent from a year earlier and that sales at all of its brands had declined. “It’s the work ahead that excites me most — the chance to work hand in hand with the teams to evolve Gap Inc. for a new era,” Mr. Dickson said in a statement. He previously held roles at Bloomingdale’s and founded an online cosmetic retailer that was later acquired by Estee Lauder. Mr. Dickson will step down from Mattel on Aug. 3 and begin at Gap on Aug. 22. The search for Gap’s leader was a prolonged one. Its previous chief, Sonia Syngal, left the company last July amid falling sales and supply chain issues that dampened the company’s earnings. Gap’s Athleta brand was also without a chief executive for months, before naming Chris Blakeslee, formerly of Alo Yoga, on Monday. “Gap has lost its brand relevance with its core consumer,” Mr. Reid said. “It’s unclear where the brand sits. That was Mattel a few years ago.” A focus on collaborations and figuring out how to get Gap to be ubiquitous among a wider range of shoppers would be a start. (Gap and Barbie rolled out a collaboration ahead of the movie’s premiere.) This year, Gap’s stock has decreased more than 12 percent. The stock rose nearly 8 percent on Wednesday. Mr. Dickson has been on Gap’s board since November. “Amidst a deliberate and thoughtful search process, it became clear that Richard is destined for this role at this moment,” Bob Martin, who was interim chief executive of the company and will continue as chair of the retailer’s board, said in a statement. “His experience as a proven transformational brand builder and belief in the power of inclusivity, make him a perfect fit for Gap Inc.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/f6850d92-9b81-5ba2-8f30-f9d4953bd972,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/25/business/walmart-lowers-profit-forecast-inflation.html,2022-07-25T22:08:16+0000,article,News,504,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Citing the need to cut prices to move inventory, the company slashed its earnings outlook for the year, sending its stock price tumbling in after-hours trading. Walmart lowered its profit outlook on Monday, saying inflation is pressuring its customers to make fewer purchases of general merchandise and to focus on necessities like groceries. Walmart, the nation’s largest retailer, said it expected operating profits for the full year to fall by as much as 13 percent, as the company is forced to continue marking down inventory that isn’t selling. Another factor narrowing profits: More of Walmart’s sales are coming from its less profitable grocery business instead of from departments with higher margins, such as electronics and clothing. The announcement, which was made after the stock market closed and a few weeks before the company is set to report second-quarter earnings, is another sign of how inflation is squeezing consumers and upending businesses. The Federal Reserve is preparing this week to announce its latest interest rate increases to tame inflation, which has reached the highest levels in four decades. “The increasing levels of food and fuel inflation are affecting how customers spend, and, while we’ve made good progress clearing hard-line categories, apparel in Walmart U.S. is requiring more markdown dollars,” Walmart’s chief executive, Doug McMillon, said in a statement. Walmart’s stock price plunged more than 9 percent in after-hours trading, after ending the regular trading day only slightly in the red, down 0.1 percent. The shares of other major retailers, including Target, also fell after hours. Retailers have been struggling with rising inventory levels since the spring, when customers began pulling back on discretionary spending. Last month, Target also warned that its profits would be lower because of inventory markdowns. Initially, many companies attributed the glut of goods on their shelves to shipping delays that caused seasonal items to arrive late, after demand for them had faded. But, as inflation — particularly food and gas prices — has continued to climb since the spring, it has become clear that consumers are pulling back on certain purchases. The inventory problems at the retailers follow nearly two years of strong sales and profits during the pandemic, when consumers, flush with government checks, were loading up on electronics and home improvement items. The profit warning is a rare moment for Walmart, which even before the pandemic had consistently been increasing its profits as it expanded its online presence and redesigned its store network. The inventory challenges that Walmart and other retailers have faced in recent months show how quickly inflation has gripped the economy and why the Federal Reserve is expected to act aggressively this week in trying to rein it in. On Monday, Walmart said it had “made progress reducing inventory, managing prices to reflect certain supply chain costs and inflation, and reducing storage costs associated with a backlog of shipping containers.” Despite the inflationary pressures, Walmart said it expected its total sales in the second quarter to increase 6 percent. But, because the company was selling more food and other groceries, it would nonetheless post lower profits. The company said it expected earnings per share to decline as much as 13 percent for the second quarter and as much as 8 percent for the full year. Michael Corkery is a business reporter who writes about low-wage workers, the economy and industry. Before joining The Times in 2014, he reported for The Wall Street Journal and The Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery "
nyt://article/a6308516-77fa-5075-9d1d-c2ccfe136781,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/29/us/politics/debt-ceiling-economy.html,2023-05-29T09:26:04+0000,article,News,1227,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McCarthy, Kevin (1965- )', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"With low unemployment and above-trend inflation, the economy is well positioned to absorb the modest budget cuts that President Biden and Republicans negotiated. Reporting from Washington The last time the United States came perilously close to defaulting on its debt, a Democratic president and a Republican speaker of the House cut a deal to raise the nation’s borrowing limit and tightly restrain some federal spending growth for years to come. The deal averted default, but it hindered what was already a slow recovery from the Great Recession. The debt deal that President Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy have agreed to in principle is less restrictive than the one President Barack Obama and Speaker John Boehner cut in 2011, centered on just two years of cuts and caps in spending. The economy that will absorb those cuts is in much better shape. As a result, economists say the agreement is unlikely to inflict the sort of lasting damage to the recovery that was caused by the 2011 debt ceiling deal — and, paradoxically, the newfound spending restraint might even help it. “For months, I had worried about a major economic fallout from the negotiations, but the macro impact appears to be negligible at best,” said Ben Harris, a former deputy Treasury secretary for economic policy who left his post earlier this year. “The most important impact is the stability that comes with having a deal,” Mr. Harris said. “Markets can function knowing that we don’t have a cataclysmic debt ceiling crisis looming.” Mr. Biden expressed confidence earlier this month that any deal would not spark an economic downturn. That was in part because growth persisted over the past two years even as pandemic aid spending expired and total federal spending fell from elevated Covid levels, helping to reduce the annual deficit by $1.7 trillion last year. Asked at a news conference at the Group of 7 summit in Japan this month if spending cuts in a budget deal would cause a recession, Mr. Biden replied: “I know they won’t. I know they won’t. Matter of fact, the fact that we were able to cut government spending by $1.7 trillion, that didn’t cause a recession. That caused growth.” What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. The agreement in principle still must pass the House and Senate, where it is facing opposition from the most liberal and conservative members of Congress. It goes well beyond spending limits, also including new work requirements for food stamps and other government aid and an effort to speed permitting for some energy projects.  But its centerpiece is limits on spending. Negotiators agreed to slight cuts to discretionary spending — outside of defense and veterans’ care — from this year to next, after factoring in some accounting adjustments. Military and veterans’ spending would increase this year to the amount requested in Mr. Biden’s budget for the 2024 fiscal year. All those programs would grow by 1 percent in the 2025 fiscal year — which is less than they were projected to. A New York Times analysis of the proposal suggests it would reduce federal spending by about $55 billion next year, compared with Congressional Budget Office forecasts, and by another $81 billion in 2025. The first back-of-the-envelope analysis of the deal’s economic impacts came from Mark Zandi, a Moody’s Analytics economist. He had previously estimated that a prolonged default could kill seven million jobs in the U.S. economy — and that a deep round of proposed Republican spending cuts would kill 2.6 million jobs. His analysis of the emerging deal was far more modest: The economy would have 120,000 fewer jobs by the end of 2024 than it would without a deal, he estimates, and the unemployment rate would be about 0.1 percent higher. Mr. Zandi wrote on Twitter on Friday that it was “Not the greatest timing for fiscal restraint as the economy is fragile and recession risks are high.” But, he said, “it is manageable.” Other economists say the economy could actually use a mild dose of fiscal austerity right now. That is because the biggest economic problem is persistent inflation, which is being driven in part by strong consumer spending. Removing some federal spending from the economy could aid the Federal Reserve, which has been trying to get price growth under control by raising interest rates. “From a macroeconomic perspective, this deal is a small help,” said Jason Furman, a Harvard economist who was a deputy director of Mr. Obama’s National Economic Council in 2011. “The economy still needs cooling off, and this takes pressure off interest rates in accomplishing that cooling off.” “I think the Fed will welcome the help,” he said. Economists generally consider increased government spending — if it is not offset by increased tax revenues — to be a short-term boost for the economy. That’s because the government is borrowing money to pay salaries, buy equipment, cover health care and provide other services that ultimately support consumer spending and economic growth. That can particularly help lift the economy at times when consumer demand is low, such as the immediate aftermath of a recession. That was the case in 2011, when Republicans took control of the House and forced a showdown with Mr. Obama on raising the borrowing limit. The nation was slowly climbing out of the hole created by the 2008 financial crisis. The unemployment rate was 9 percent. The Federal Reserve had cut interest rates to near zero to try to stimulate growth, but many liberal economists were calling for the federal government to spend more to help bolster demand and accelerate job growth. The budget deal between Republicans and Mr. Obama — which was hammered out by Mr. Biden, who was then the vice president — did the opposite. It reduced federal discretionary spending by 4 percent in the first year after the deal compared with baseline projections. In the second year, it reduced spending by 5.5 percent compared with forecasts. Many economists have since blamed those cuts, along with too little stimulus spending at the recession’s outset, for prolonging the pain. The deal announced on Saturday contains smaller cuts. But the even bigger difference today is economic conditions. The unemployment rate is 3.4 percent. Prices are growing by more than 4 percent a year, well above the Fed’s target rate of 2 percent. Fed officials are trying to cool economic activity by making it more expensive to borrow money. Michael Feroli, a JPMorgan Chase analyst, wrote this week that the right way to assess the emerging deal was in terms of “how much less work the Fed needs to do in restraining aggregate demand because fiscal belt-tightening is now doing that job.” Mr. Feroli estimated the agreement could function as the equivalent of a quarter-point increase in interest rates, in terms of helping to restrain inflation. While the deal will only modestly affect the nation’s future deficit levels, Republicans have argued that it will help the economy by reducing the accumulation of debt. “We’re trying to bend the cost curve of the government for the American people,” Representative Patrick T. McHenry of North Carolina, one of the Republican negotiators, said this week. Still, the spending reductions from the deal will affect nondefense discretionary programs, like Head Start preschool, and the people they serve. New work requirements could choke off food and other assistance to vulnerable Americans. Many progressive Democrats warned this week that those effects will amount to their own sort of economic damage. “After inflation eats its share, flat funding will result in fewer households accessing rental assistance, fewer kids in Head Start and fewer services for seniors,” said Lindsay Owens, the executive director of the liberal Groundwork Collaborative in Washington. Catie Edmondson contributed reporting. Jim Tankersley is a White House correspondent with a focus on economic policy. He has written for more than a decade in Washington about the decline of opportunity for American workers, and is the author of ""The Riches of This Land: The Untold, True Story of America's Middle Class."" More about Jim Tankersley "
nyt://article/d5d605d1-e7c8-5bba-842b-4da23a7be35c,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/30/business/retail-returns-liquidation.html,2022-07-30T09:00:19+0000,article,News,1531,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Warehouses', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Liquidity Services Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'National Retail Federation', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Scranton (Pa)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Consumers are buying fewer discretionary goods and returning more. To clear their shelves, retailers are selling to liquidators at steep discounts. The warehouse in Pittston, Pa., run by Liquidity Services, a company that collects retailers’ unwanted and returned goods.Credit... Photographs by George Etheredge PITTSTON, Pa. — Once upon a time, when parents were scrambling to occupy their children during pandemic lockdowns, bicycles were hard to find. But today, in a giant warehouse in northeastern Pennsylvania, there are shiny new Huffys and Schwinns available at big discounts. The same goes for patio furniture, garden hoses and portable pizza ovens. There are home spas, Rachael Ray’s nonstick pans and a backyard firepit, which promises to make “memories every day.” The warehouse is run by Liquidity Services, a company that collects surplus and returned goods from major retailers like Target and Amazon and resells them, often for cents on the dollar. The facility opened last November and is operating at exceptionally high volumes for this time of year. The warehouse offers a window into a reckoning across the retail industry and the broader economy: After a two-year binge of consumer spending — fueled by government checks and the ease of e-commerce — a nasty hangover is taking hold. With consumers cutting down on discretionary purchases because of high inflation, retailers are now stuck with more inventory than they need. While overall spending rebounded last month, some major retailers say shoppers are buying less clothing, gardening equipment and electronics and focusing instead on basics like food and gas. Adding to that glut are all the things people bought during the pandemic — often online — and then returned. In 2021, shoppers returned an average of 16.6 percent of their purchases, up from 10.6 percent in 2020 and more than double the rate in 2019, according to an analysis by the National Retail Federation, a trade group, and Appriss Retail, a software and analytics firm. Last year’s returns, which retailers are not always able to resell themselves, totaled $761 billion in lost sales. That, the retail federation noted, is more than the annual budget for the U.S. Department of Defense. It’s becoming clear that retailers badly misjudged supply and demand. Part of their miscalculation was caused by supply chain delays, which prompted companies to secure products far in advance. Then, there is the natural cycle of booms — whether because of optimism or greed, companies rarely pull back before it’s too late. “It is surprising to me on some level that we saw all that surge of buying activity and we weren’t collectively able to see that it was going to end at some point,” J.D. Daunt, chief commercial officer at Liquidity Services, said in an interview at the Pennsylvania warehouse earlier this month. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “You would think that there would be enough data and enough history to see that a little more clearly,” he added. “But it also suggests that times are changing and they are changing fast and more dramatically.” Strong consumer spending may have saved the economy from ruin during the pandemic, but it has also led to enormous excess and waste. Retailers have begun to slash prices on inventory in their stores and online. Last Monday, Walmart issued the industry’s latest warning when it said that its operating profits would drop sharply this year as it cut prices on an oversupply of general merchandise. Many companies cannot afford to let discounted items ‌linger on their shelves because they have to make room for new seasonal goods and the necessities that consumers now prefer. While some retailers are discounting the surplus within their stores, many would rather avoid holding big sales themselves for fear of hurting their brands by conditioning buyers to expect big price cuts as the norm. So retailers look to liquidators to do that dirty work. Additionally, industry executives say the glut is so large that some retailers could run out of space to house it all. “It’s unprecedented,” said Chuck Johnston, a former Walmart executive, who is now chief strategy officer at goTRG, a firm which helps retailers manage returns. “I have never seen the pressure in terms of excess inventory as I am seeing right now.” So, much of the industry’s flotsam and jetsam washes up in warehouses like this one, located off Interstate 81, a few exits from the President Biden Expressway in Scranton, the president’s hometown. The giant facility is part of an industrial park that was built above a reclaimed strip mine dating back to when this region was a major coal producer. Today, the local economy is home to dozens of e-commerce warehouses that cover the hilly landscape like giant spaceships, funneling goods to the population centers in and around New York and Philadelphia. Liquidity Services, a publicly traded company founded in 1999, decided to open its new facility as close as it could to the Scranton area’s major e-commerce warehouses, making it easy for retailers to dispense with their unwanted and returned items. Even before the inventory glut appeared this spring, returns had been a major problem for retailers. The huge surge in e-commerce sales during the pandemic — increasing more than 40 percent in 2020 from the previous year — has only added to it. The National Retail Federation and Appriss Retail calculate that more than 10 percent of returns last year involved fraud, including people wearing clothing and then sending it back or stealing goods from stores and returning them with fake receipts. But more fundamentally, industry analysts say the increasing returns reflect consumer expectations that everything can be taken back. “It’s getting worse and worse,” Mr. Johnston said. Some of the returns and excess inventory will be donated to charities or returned to the manufacturers. Others get recycled, buried in landfills or burned in incinerators that generate electricity. Liquidators say they offer a more environmentally responsible option by finding new buyers and markets for unwanted products, both those that were returned and those that were never bought in the first place. “We are reducing the carbon footprint,” said Tony Sciarrotta, executive director of the Reverse Logistics Association, the industry trade group. “But there is still too much going to landfills.” Retailers will probably receive only a fraction of the items’ original value from the liquidators but it makes more sense to take the losses and move the goods off the store shelves quickly. Still, liquidation can be a sensitive topic for the big companies that want customers to focus on their “A-goods,” not the failures. Mr. Sciarrotta calls it “the dark side” of retail. On a tour through the Pennsylvania warehouse, Mr. Daunt and the warehouse manager, Trevor Morgan, said they were not allowed to discuss where the products originated. But it was not difficult to figure out. An 85-inch flat-screen TV had an Amazon Prime sticker still on the box. Bathroom vanities came from Home Depot. There was a “home theater” memory foam futon with a built-in cup holder from a Walmart return center. Many unopened boxes on the warehouse floor carried the familiar bull’s-eye logo of Target. Air fryers, baby strollers and towering stacks of Barbie’s “Dream House,” which features a swimming pool, elevator and a home office. (Even Barbie, it seems, has grown tired of working from home.) When Target’s sales exploded during the first year of the pandemic, the company was a darling of Wall Street. But in May, the retailer said it was stuck with an oversupply of certain goods and the company’s stock price plummeted nearly 25 percent in one day. Other retailers’ share prices have also fallen. Target’s stumbles have been an opportunity for people like Walter Crowley. Mr. Crowley regularly rents a U-Haul and drives back and forth to the liquidation warehouse from his home near Binghamton, N.Y. Mr. Crowley, who turns 54 next month, focuses mostly on discounted home improvement goods, which he resells to local contractors, like multiple pallets of discontinued garage door openers, tiles and flooring. But on a sweltering day earlier this month, he stood outside the warehouse in his U-Haul loading up on items from Target. “I saw its stock got tanked,” said Mr. Crowley, a cigarette dangling from his mouth and sweat pouring down his face. “It’s an ugly situation for them.” He bought several cribs, a set of sheets for his own house and a pink castle for a girl in his neighborhood who just turned 5. “I end up giving a lot of it away to my neighbors, to be honest,” he said. “Some people are barely getting by.” The buyers bid for the goods through online auctions and then drive to the warehouse to pick up their winnings. It’s a diverse group. There was a science teacher who stocked up on plastic parts for his class, as well as a woman who planned to resell her purchases — neon green Igloo coolers, a table saw, baby pajamas — in the Haitian and Jamaican communities of New York. She ships other items to Trinidad. The Pennsylvania warehouse, one of eight that Liquidity Service operates around the country, employs about 20 workers, some of whom have been hired on a temporary basis. The starting pay is $17.50 an hour. Charles Benincasa, 39, is a temporary worker who has had numerous “warehousing” jobs, the most recent at the Chewy pet food distribution center in nearby Wilkes-Barre. Mr. Benincasa said his friends and family had gotten in the habit of returning many of the goods they buy online. But as he’s watched the boxes pile up in the Liquidity Services warehouse, he worries about the implications for the economy. “Companies are losing a lot of money,” he said. “There is no free lunch.” Michael Corkery is a business reporter who writes about low-wage workers, the economy and industry. Before joining The Times in 2014, he reported for The Wall Street Journal and The Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery "
nyt://article/4095e620-6b01-5002-9fb6-37884ed9ac89,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/01/10/your-money/student-loans-income-driven-repayment.html,2023-01-10T10:00:09+0000,article,News,1901,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Education Department (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Proposed changes to federal student-loan repayment plans tied to income could cut some borrowers’ monthly payments by more than half. Credit...Monica Garwood The Education Department on Tuesday released long-awaited details on a piece of President Biden’s student loan debt plan that would enable millions of borrowers to cut their monthly federal payments by more than half — perhaps the most consequential component of the president’s broader initiative to make the loan system more manageable. The Education Department’s proposed rules would revise one of its existing income-driven repayment plans — known as REPAYE — in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size, and after a set number of years, any remaining debt is forgiven. Unlike Mr. Biden’s one-time initiative to cancel up to $20,000 in federal debt, which has been stymied by legal challenges, the new repayment plan would become a permanent fixture of the student loan infrastructure and apply to current and future borrowers. The latest iteration of REPAYE will be the most affordable of the five existing plans, the first of which became available in 1995. Like the others, it doesn’t do anything to slow the rising cost of higher education, instead providing a new way to cope. A significant and rising share of borrowers is already enrolled in income-driven repayment plans, which are intended to ease the pressure when debtors can’t afford their monthly bill. Roughly 8.5 million federal student loan borrowers are enrolled in existing plans, representing about a third of all borrowers in repayment, up from 1.6 million, or 10 percent, in 2013. It’s still unclear when the new plan will be up and running: The proposal will be subject to public comment for 30 days, and the administration will take that feedback into account before the rule becomes final later this year. Here’s how it’s expected to work, with updates to follow as we learn more. Borrowers with federal undergraduate loans or graduate loans. But undergraduate borrowers are eligible for lower payments than graduate borrowers.  Parents who borrowed to pay for their children’s schooling using Parent PLUS loans cannot enroll in the new plan. That means if parent borrowers cannot afford to make their payments, they generally have access only to the most expensive income-driven repayment plan — known as income-contingent repayment — which requires borrowers to pay 20 percent of their discretionary income for 25 years; anything remaining is forgiven. Yes. In the past, new repayment plans didn’t lead to the shuttering of older ones, which is why there’s a confusing assortment of options on the books. (The amended REPAYE plan is generally more affordable than the four other (!) existing plans, including Pay as You Earn, Income-Contingent Repayment and Income-Based Repayment, which comes in two versions.) Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. But the Biden administration said it wanted to simplify the choices so that borrowers weren’t overwhelmed: It proposed phasing out new enrollments into the PAYE and I.C.R. plans, while limiting the circumstances where a borrower can later switch into the I.B.R. plan. Borrowers with Parent PLUS loans, however, will not lose access to the I.C.R. plan, according to senior administration officials. They can continue to enroll in that plan after they consolidate into a so-called direct consolidation loan. First, some quick background: All income-driven plans generally operate in the same fashion. Payments are calculated based on your earnings and household size, and are readjusted each year. After monthly payments are made for a set number of years — usually 20 — any remaining balance is forgiven. (The balance is taxable as income, though a temporary tax rule exempts balances forgiven through 2025 from federal income taxes.) The revised REPAYE plan would become more generous in several ways. To start, it would reduce payments on undergraduate loans to 5 percent of discretionary income, down from 10 percent in the existing REPAYE plan (and 15 percent in other plans). Graduate debt is also eligible, but borrowers would pay 10 percent of discretionary income on that portion. If you hold both undergraduate and graduate debt, your payment will be weighted accordingly. But the new rules also tweak the payment formula so that more income is protected for a borrower’s basic needs, which in turn reduces payments overall. That change will also allow more low-income workers to qualify for zero-dollar payments. Once you pay for basic needs like food and rent, any leftover income is considered discretionary income. In the land of federal student loans, income-driven repayment plans require borrowers to pay a percentage of their discretionary income. The proposed plan tweaks the payment formula so that more income is protected, generating less discretionary income and a lower payment. In the current REPAYE program, discretionary income is defined as income in excess of a protected amount set at 150 percent of the federal poverty guideline. It’s not much. That means single borrowers start making payments on income above roughly $20,400 (or just above $41,600 for a family of four). The revised REPAYE plan would increase the amount of income protected from repayment to 225 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. That means no worker earning under 225 percent of the poverty level — or what a $15 minimum wage worker earns annually — will have to make a payment, the administration said. Put another way, a single borrower who makes less than $30,500 would make $0 monthly payments. The same goes for a borrower in a household of four with income below $62,400. Yes. People who took out smaller loans — or those with original balances of $12,000 or less in total — would make monthly payments for 10 years before cancellation, instead of the more typical 20-year repayment period. Every additional $1,000 borrowed above the $12,000 amount would add one year of monthly payments before the balance is forgiven. Yes. Unlike other existing income-driven plans, borrowers’ loan balances will not grow as long as they make their monthly payments, even when they are not required to make any payments because their income is too low. In the proposed plan, if a borrower’s payment isn’t high enough to cover the interest due that month, the remaining interest will not be charged or tacked onto the balance. That will be a huge relief to borrowers who diligently make payments yet still see their balances balloon over the decades because they’re not paying enough to cover the interest owed. Undergraduate borrowers will receive the most significant savings, though graduate borrowers will benefit, too. Borrowers who rank among the bottom 30 percent of earners (or families with earnings less than $29,000 on average) would qualify for payments that are 83 percent lower per dollar borrowed over their lifetimes, on average, according to the Education Department, while those in the top 30 percent of earners (families with earnings exceeding $90,000) would see only a 5 percent reduction. A single borrower with an income below $30,500 per year would not be required to make any monthly payments — nor would a borrower in a household of four with income below $62,400. It depends on how you file your federal income tax return. Married borrowers who file their federal income tax return separately would be permitted to exclude their spouse from both their household income and family size. But joint filers must include any income earned by their spouse. The Education Department has proposed applying this rule to all income-driven repayment plans, not just the revised REPAYE program, to lessen confusion and simplify the application process. The proposed rule change would automatically enroll borrowers who are at least 75 days behind on their payments into a plan that will provide the lowest payment. This proposed change would apply to borrowers for whom the Education Department has approval to get their income information from the Internal Revenue Service. For the first time, borrowers in default would be permitted to enroll in an income-driven repayment plan. But there’s a catch: The proposed rule would only permit defaulted borrowers to enroll in the Income-Based Repayment plan, which has higher payments than the new REPAYE program. That’s hard to predict with any certainty, but probably not. It’s not yet clear when the new program will be ready for borrowers or when payments will resume. And even after the revised plan’s rules are finalized, loan servicers and the Education Department will still have to update their systems.  “But the Department has perhaps made it easier for itself and for borrowers by amending the terms of an existing plan — the REPAYE plan — rather than creating a totally new plan as it previously proposed,” said Abby Shafroth, a lawyer at the National Consumer Law Center who focuses on student loan issues. “As a result, it can work from the existing REPAYE architecture, and borrowers who are already enrolled in REPAYE won’t have to change plans.” Student loan payments have been postponed for most federal borrowers since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. The Biden administration has said that the payment pause would continue until the Education Department is allowed to move ahead with its debt cancellation plan or the litigation is resolved. But if those matters have not been settled by June 30, payments will resume 60 days after that. Borrowers will be notified in advance. Yes. Borrowers who are already enrolled in the existing REPAYE plan won’t have to change plans. Eventually, yes.  No, borrowers generally receive credit when they switch from one income-driven plan to another. If you can’t afford the standard payment plan, you should probably consider one of the existing income-driven repayment plans, including REPAYE: Borrowers in this plan would benefit from lower payments after the revised program replaces the existing one. Other repayment options may better suit your circumstances, and they can sometimes yield lower payment amounts. Those include the standard (with fixed payments), graduated (your payments rise) and extended (you pay over a longer time) repayment plans. Options that pause payments should generally be used as a last resort: Requesting a deferment or forbearance will temporarily postpone payments, but there can be significant added costs in the long run. There are tools and services that can help. The loan simulator tool at StudentAid.gov will guide you through the existing options and help you decide which plan best fits your goals — finding the lowest-payment plan, for example, versus paying loans off as soon as possible. The tool is easy to use. When you sign into your Student Aid account, it should automatically use your loans in its calculations. (You can manually add other federal loans if any are missing.) You can also look at plans side by side to compare how much they’ll each cost over time, both monthly and in total, and if any debt would be forgiven. Besides your loan servicer, groups like The Institute of Student Loan Advisors, known as TISLA, can provide free guidance on what options may work best for you. For New York State residents, EDCAP, a nonprofit organization focused on student loans, also offers help. And some employers and other organizations have hired companies like Summer, which helps borrowers sort through the options. Stacy Cowley contributed reporting. Tara Siegel Bernard covers personal finance. Before joining The Times in 2008, she was deputy managing editor at FiLife, a personal finance website, and an editor at CNBC. She also worked at Dow Jones and contributed regularly to The Wall Street Journal. More about Tara Siegel Bernard "
nyt://article/c78f8285-5484-5d26-b5b6-dd93be248f71,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/16/business/walmart-earnings.html,2022-08-16T11:49:27+0000,article,News,942,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Profit at the nation’s largest retailer fell as inflation raised costs and altered shopping habits, but the company issued a slightly improved outlook for the rest of the year. As prices on many goods have increased in recent months, even the most sophisticated retailers like Walmart have struggled to navigate the changes inflation has caused in consumer behavior. Walmart showed on Tuesday that it is continuing to grapple with the issue, saying in its earnings report that, while its U.S. comparable sales increased 6.5 percent from the same point last year, its operating income dropped 6.8 percent. The boost in sales for the quarter that ended July 31 was driven by shoppers’ buying necessities like groceries. That’s a sign that people are continuing to concentrate their spending on essential items — which often have lower profit margins — while curtailing spending in categories like electronics and apparel that they deem more discretionary. “We expect inflation to continue to influence the choices families make, and we’re adjusting to that reality,” Doug McMillon, Walmart’s chief executive, said on Tuesday during a call with analysts. Walmart prepared Wall Street for the report last month, when it revised its full-year outlook and said it expected operating profits for the full year to fall as much as 13 percent. It also said it expected comparable sales to be up about 6 percent for the second quarter, which it was able to beat slightly. On Tuesday, the retailer provided a somewhat improved outlook, saying it expected operating profits to decline between 9 and 11 percent for the full year. It also said it expected its U.S. comparable sales to increase about 3 percent in the second half of the year. The company’s share price was up more than 5 percent at the close of trading on Tuesday, one of its best days since 2020. What is inflation? Inflation is a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Walmart is also navigating higher than usual inventory levels for items that people are less willing to purchase amid higher food and gasoline costs. Consumers have felt some relief from inflation recently, with the average price of gas in the U.S. falling below $4 a gallon last week, the lowest level since March. “Its core customers are price-sensitive, and because inflation has eroded their spending power, they are more unwilling to add nonfood items to their carts when they do their shopping,” Neil Saunders, the managing director of retail at GlobalData, said in an email. “Fortunately, Walmart is not losing this footfall entirely as it is retaining customers on the food side, but it has become less successful at driving consumers to shop multiple categories.” While retailers’ sales volumes may increase this quarter, operating profits will show how successful companies are at carrying out their broader business strategies in the uncertain environment. “What we’re watching now is how well can they manage through a very difficult time,” said David Silverman, a senior director at Fitch Ratings. Walmart executives received several questions on the call with analysts about how the company was managing its excess inventory and price markdowns. John David Rainey, Walmart’s chief financial officer, said the retailer had canceled “billions of dollars” in orders. He added that inventory levels had peaked in the last quarter. Retailers aren’t just dealing with the effects of inflation, Mr. Silverman said. They’re also building out their digital capabilities, trying to attract workers in a tight labor market and dealing with supply chain logjams. For some businesses, the challenging economic moment could result in missed opportunities to invest in their operations — and in long-lasting implications for their market share. A strong performance now would help position retailers for success during the crucial holiday season. Walmart executives said lower-than-expected supply chain costs for the quarter had helped bolster results. “They seem to be managing better, managing smarter through this period,” Mr. Silverman said. “And they will deal with this missed execution probably better than we’ll see others.” Even still, the inventory struggles of major retailers have implications for the entire industry, said Mickey Chadha, the lead analyst at Moody’s covering Walmart. If Walmart is discounting to get rid of excess inventory, its competitors will follow suit. “That’s going to impact margins across retail across the board,” Mr. Chadha said. Walmart’s e-commerce sales in the U.S. increased 12 percent in the most recent quarter, and the company is looking at more ways to attract customers to its digital platform. On Monday, the retailer announced it had reached an agreement to include the Paramount+ streaming service as part of its Walmart+ membership package. Subscribers to Walmart+ pay $12.95 a month for perks that include free shipping and discounts on gas. The retailer has also had discussions with executives from Disney and Comcast about a potential deal that would bundle access to streaming entertainment with its membership service. Home Depot, which also reported earnings on Tuesday, surpassed Wall Street’s expectations for sales and profits in its latest quarter as well. Richard McPhail, Home Depot’s chief financial officer, said that he saw demand for home improvement remaining strong and that the company is positioning itself to expand its market share. During the pandemic, Home Depot has consistently outperformed analysts’ projections, and the company’s stock price was up about 4 percent on Tuesday. A decline in the number of second-quarter transactions combined with a significant rise in the average amount spent on each transaction suggested that some shoppers might be pulling back while professionals like contractors and builders are continuing to spend. Still, retailers are receiving mixed signals on what shoppers are willing to splurge on. In July, Home Depot started selling its Halloween merchandise. The category is not a major one for the home-improvement retailer, which is better known as a purveyor of power tools and plywood. But, within hours, a 12-foot-tall skeleton had sold out. “There aren’t many things more discretionary than a giant skeleton,” Mr. McPhail said in an interview, “so the customer is still an engaged one.” "
nyt://article/bd745e3c-a8db-594c-9fe8-a97c37884d8d,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/09/12/business/bloomingdales-ceo-olivier-bron.html,2023-09-12T11:00:13+0000,article,News,298,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bron, Olivier', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Bloomingdale's"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gennette, Jeffrey', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Olivier Bron is arriving from a Thai department store chain as Macy’s continues its leadership shuffle. Macy’s named Olivier Bron the next chief executive of Bloomingdale’s, the company’s luxury chain, on Tuesday, the latest move in a leadership shuffle this year. Mr. Bron was previously chief executive of Central Group’s Central and Robinson Department Stores in Thailand. He will start in November, succeeding Tony Spring. Macy’s announced this year that Mr. Spring would be elevated to chief executive of Macy’s in February after the planned retirement of Jeff Gennette, who has led the company since 2017. Macy’s has ambitions to become more competitive in e-commerce as younger shoppers pull away from department stores. Mr. Gennette previously said Bloomingdale’s, under Mr. Spring, had worked as a “scrappy incubator” for ideas that eventually made their way to Macy’s. Macy’s, the largest department store chain in the United States, has been feeling pressure as consumers increasingly tighten their purse strings amid stubborn inflation. In its most recent quarterly earnings report, Macy’s said sales had dropped 8 percent from a year earlier. Bloomingdale’s, which targets higher-earning shoppers, was less affected but still reported a 2.6 percent decline in sales. Macy’s also reported a “faster than expected” rise in credit card delinquencies. “Over the last several quarters, we have seen the Macy’s customer more aggressively pull back on spend in our discretionary categories,” Mr. Gennette told analysts in an Aug. 22 earnings call. “They are not converting as easily and becoming more intentional on the allocation of their disposable income with an ongoing shift to services and experiences.” Before joining Central and Robinson in 2021, Mr. Bron was chief operating officer of Galeries Lafayette, a French retail group. He has also worked at the business consulting firm Bain & Company. “His extensive international retail career and deep knowledge of the luxury market will be invaluable as we pursue additional opportunities,” Mr. Spring said in a statement. Jordyn Holman contributed reporting. J. Edward Moreno is the 2023 David Carr fellow at The Times. More about J. Edward Moreno "
nyt://article/04b91fba-6cd8-59d9-8235-9f925d2e7133,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/11/16/business/retail-sales-october.html,2021-11-16T13:40:05+0000,article,News,1243,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Commerce Department', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Retail sales jumped 1.7 percent in October, the third monthly increase, a rise that highlighted the resilience of the U.S. economy. American consumers are dour about the economy, worried about inflation and pessimistic about the direction of the country in general. But none of that is keeping them from spending. Retail sales set a record in October, before adjusting for inflation, as shoppers splurged on electronics and home-improvement projects. Major retailers like Walmart are posting strong profits. And Wall Street forecasters are predicting a holiday season that looks less like pandemic-constrained 2020 than like 2019, when a strong labor market powered robust sales. The continued strength of consumer spending reflects the resilience of the U.S. economy after a year and a half of disruptions, and the success of the government’s economic response in insulating many families from the damage. Households in the aggregate have trillions of dollars more in accumulated savings than before the crisis. But the heavy spending, particularly on goods rather than services, is also contributing to the economy’s problems, intensifying supply-chain snarls and shipping delays. That, in turn, is pushing up prices: Inflation in October hit its highest annual rate in more than three decades. “It’s the demand in the first place that’s causing prices to move higher,” said Aneta Markowska, chief financial economist for Jefferies, an investment bank. “There is a supply shortage, but it’s not because of bottlenecks. It’s because we’ve had this big shock to aggregate demand and supply can’t respond quickly enough.” Those issues are doing little to dampen the fortunes of the country’s largest retailers, including Walmart and Home Depot, both of which reported quarterly earnings on Tuesday that topped Wall Street’s expectations. Walmart in recent months began chartering ships to circumvent the shipping congestion and has been pushing to hire 150,000 workers ahead of the holidays. On Tuesday, the company said its inventory in the United States was 11.5 percent higher heading into the holiday season this year than last. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “The holiday season is here, and we are ready,” Doug McMillon, Walmart’s chief executive, said on a call with analysts. Consumers overall spent a record $638 million at stores and restaurants in October, the Commerce Department said Tuesday, up 1.7 percent from September and 21 percent above prepandemic levels. It was the biggest one-month gain since March, when the final round of government stimulus checks lifted spending. Inflation is eating up some of the increased spending. Sales at gasoline stations rose nearly 47 percent in October from a year earlier, the result of gas prices that are up roughly the same amount in that time. But overall, sales are rising faster than prices: Adjusted for inflation, retail sales were up 0.7 percent in October from the previous month, and up 9.5 percent from a year earlier. Krizzia Soto-Villanueva in Burlington, Vt., said she had been engaging in “retail therapy,” or shopping to make herself feel happier, after she realized she spent the last 18 months at home without spending much on herself. After she started a doctorate program at the University of Vermont and became a resident assistant in September, she decided to use her paycheck in the coming months to make up for what she didn’t spend before, buying clothes and hiking equipment. “I’m aware prices are going up, but I spent almost two years without spending money on myself,” Ms. Soto-Villanueva said. “I’m not going to spend all of my savings, but if I really want something, I’m not going to hesitate much.” Despite her free spending, Ms. Soto-Villanueva said she was “feeling a little pessimistic about the economy,” in part because she’s paying more for rent and utilities. She isn’t alone: The University of Michigan last week said that consumer sentiment fell sharply in early November and was lower than when the coronavirus outbreak was at its worst. The drop partly reflects partisan patterns — Republicans soured on the economy when President Biden took office — but even Democrats report being concerned about rising prices. The increase in inflation is partly a result of pandemic-induced shifts in how consumers are spending their money. Spending on goods — from groceries to cars to home-gym equipment — soared last year as people spent more time at home. That put extra pressure on supply chains already under stress from shutdowns at ports and factories around the world, leading to both product shortages and higher prices. Economists, including policymakers at the Federal Reserve, expected spending on goods to fall as the pandemic eased. So far, that hasn’t happened. The retail sales data showed growth in both online and in-person spending. “Everybody believed during 2021 that we’d see a significant shift away from goods back to services as the economic environment opened up as we got our arms around the pandemic,” Craig Menear, Home Depot’s chief executive, told analysts after the company reported its earnings Tuesday. “Clearly, we have not seen that.” Strong October sales may partly reflect an early start to the holiday shopping season. In mid-September, L.L. Bean added a banner to its website warning customers about holiday shipping delays and shortages and urging early shopping. Best Buy offered its Black Friday deals well before Halloween, from Oct. 19 to Oct. 22. Target started “early Black Friday” deals on Oct. 31. “I’m sure some folks started looking earlier because of worries that they won’t be able to find the item they’re looking for once everybody gets out to shop,” said Beth Ann Bovino, chief U.S. economist at S&P Global. There are some signs, however, that shortages are beginning to ease, in part because retailers, too, shopped early this year. At the Port of Los Angeles, holiday orders usually begin arriving in late August or early September; this year, they began arriving in June, Gene Seroka, executive director of the port, said at an event on Tuesday with Transportation Secretary Pete Buttigieg. Economists warned that if consumers simply got a head start on holiday spending, that could lead to disappointing sales in November and December. But most forecasters expect spending to remain strong because of the improved public health picture and the underlying strength of the U.S. economy. Unemployment has fallen to 4.6 percent, from close to 20 percent at the height of the pandemic, and wages are rising, particularly for low-income workers. Households are sitting on a collective $2.5 trillion in savings built up during the pandemic — and, unlike last Christmas, when the pandemic reduced the appeal of browsing, fitting rooms and lingering indoors, many Americans feel comfortable going out and spending. Tom Nolan, chief executive of Kendra Scott, a fashion jewelry business with 119 locations, said that its sales were up “materially” over both last year and 2019 and that he expected the performance to continue through the end of the year. “People have money to spend, they’re excited to be back out in the world again, they’re excited to be back with their families this holiday season,” Mr. Nolan said. Spending on services — particularly in-person, discretionary services like travel, live performances and exercise class — slumped last year and has rebounded only gradually. The spread of the Delta variant of the coronavirus has slowed the service-sector rebound: Restaurant sales were flat in October and have been mostly stagnant since July. “The thing that’s still missing is discretionary services,” said Ian Shepherdson, chief economist for Pantheon Macroeconomics, a forecasting firm. But barring a new spike in coronavirus cases, Mr. Shepherdson said, spending on services will rebound as Americans resume holiday travel. People may say they are pessimistic in surveys, he added, but their spending sends a different message. “There’s going to be plenty of money lying around, and I think spending is going to be very strong,” he said. Michael Corkery and Madeleine Ngo contributed reporting. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business upshot magazine Ben Casselman writes about economics, with a particular focus on stories involving data. He previously reported for FiveThirtyEight and The Wall Street Journal. More about Ben Casselman Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari Coral Murphy Marcos is a business reporter. More about Coral Murphy Marcos "
nyt://article/6f04f18b-2586-5b93-bb54-8a5c866ff4f5,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/18/business/kohls-sephora-expansion.html,2022-08-18T13:30:04+0000,article,News,617,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Sephora', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Cosmetics and Toiletries', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Fashion and Apparel', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The department-store chain, under pressure to bolster its finances, said that the beauty shops are a way to attract new and younger consumers. Kohl’s said on Thursday that it planned to open Sephora shops in all of its 1,165 stores, positioning its beauty unit for growth. Kohl’s announced its tie-up with Sephora in December 2020. At the time Sephora, a French multinational beauty retailer, wanted to re-establish a foothold in suburban areas, which it had gained in a previous arrangement with J.C. Penney. For Kohl’s, the partnership was a way to introduce more consumers to its brand, especially new and younger ones. Kohl’s has been under pressure to improve its financial fortunes, and was pushed to sell itself by some activist investors. It fielded takeover bids this year, and entered negotiations with Franchise Group, owner of The Vitamin Shoppe. Kohl’s terminated the talks in July, “in light of the current financing and retail environment, which has significantly deteriorated since the beginning of the process,” it said. The chain’s shares are down more than 30 percent this year. Beauty has been a mainstay category for shoppers throughout the pandemic and retailers are looking for ways to bolster their personal care offerings. In February, Target said it was adding 250 more Ulta Beauty shops within its locations. The retailer said it planned to open at least 800 in total. In interviews, Jean-André Rougeot, the chief executive of Sephora Americas, and Michelle Gass, Kohl’s chief executive, said that their hopes were playing out and that Kohl’s was gaining market share in the beauty business. The first 200 Kohl’s stores that have opened a Sephora shop-in-shop are seeing a sales lift in the high-single-digit-percent range relative to the Kohl’s stores that don’t feature a Sephora, Ms. Gass said. About half of Sephora transactions in Kohl’s stores included Kohl’s merchandise. Mr. Rougeot said that one million Kohl’s shoppers signed up for Sephora’s V.I.P. loyalty program within the first year of the partnership. He said some customers who had stopped shopping at Sephora had resumed by way of Kohl’s, attributing their return to the convenience of the department store locations. Kohl’s has invested heavily in the partnership. More than half of Kohl’s capital spending this year is directed toward constructing the Sephora locations and remodeling the stores that feature them, Ms. Gass said. Sephora’s name sits alongside Kohl’s on the outside of the buildings and the shop-in-shop is usually at the front of the store. Kohl’s, which has a partnership with Amazon that allows customers to return Amazon products at Kohl’s locations, will now advertise Sephora at those return counters. The tie-up has increased Kohl’s online sales for Sephora products, too. “We think we’re in a bit of a snowball effect,” Mr. Rougeot said. Kohl’s reported quarterly earnings on Thursday that showed an 8.5 percent fall in sales, and it sharply lowered its outlook for revenue and profit for the year. Like other retailers, it has faced a glut of inventory as shoppers show signs of pulling back on discretionary spending as inflation remains high. On Thursday, it said it was working to reduce unwanted merchandise and lower expenses as demand wanes. Kohl’s said that though there were signs consumers were pulling back on some items, it was still seeing strong demand for beauty and skin care products. “From a Kohl’s perspective we’re seeing these very strong results despite these headwinds that customers are facing around inflation and the macro pressures,” Ms. Gass said. “We’re certainly feeling that in parts of our business, but certainly Sephora and beauty has proven to be very resilient.” "
nyt://article/e53191e3-a698-5fcd-bda6-041110f5a06c,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/07/19/business/dealbook/skims-kim-kardashian-fundraise.html,2023-07-19T11:08:14+0000,article,News,594,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Venture Capital', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Fashion and Apparel', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Skims Body Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Kardashian, Kim', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"As the apparel company prepares to expand into physical stores and men’s clothing, its latest funding round may spur questions about when it intends to go public. Four years into its existence, Skims, the apparel company co-founded by Kim Kardashian, has become a unicorn four times over. Skims has raised $270 million in a new funding round that values it at $4 billion, the company plans to announce on Wednesday. That’s up from the $3.2 billion valuation investors gave the company last year. Ms. Kardashian and her business partner, Jens Grede, have sought to turn Skims into the next big apparel brand. “It has grown quickly, and we’re so proud of that,” Ms. Kardashian said in an interview. “We’ve had a really good flow of product launches.” The company started as a seller of shapewear to help customers fit into body-hugging clothing. But shapewear no longer represents a majority of its sales: Skims has expanded into an array of clothing categories, including loungewear and swimwear, with plans to branch out into men’s clothing this fall. And once known for selling directly to consumers, Skims is making a bet on physical retail, with plans to open its first flagship stores next year in Los Angeles and New York City. Mr. Grede, who is Skims’s chief executive, said in an interview that the company was now profitable and on track for $750 million in sales this year, up from $500 million in 2022. About 15 percent of its online customers come from outside the United States, and nearly 70 percent of its overall customers are millennials or Gen Z-ers. Over the last year, he said, 11 million people have joined wait-lists to buy the brand’s most popular items, which often sell out. It is that growth trajectory and popularity that drew investors to the company when executives began raising money in recent months, Mr. Grede said. The asset manager Wellington Management led the latest round. Other participating firms include Greenoaks Capital Partners and the existing backers D1 Capital Partners and Imaginary Ventures. “Skims has maintained unprecedented momentum since the brand’s inception,” Michael Carmen, a co-head of private investments at Wellington, said in a statement. “We’re thrilled to partner with the brand to support it through this pivotal growth stage.” Skims’s success has been among the biggest standouts in Ms. Kardashian’s business empire, which now includes skin care, fragrances and even a private equity firm. Already minted as a billionaire after Skims’s 2021 fund-raising round, Ms. Kardashian remains the company’s single biggest shareholder, and together she and Mr. Grede still own a majority stake. Early on, Skims had to contend with pandemic-driven supply-chain disruptions that made it hard to source fabrics for its clothing. Significant challenges now, according to Ms. Kardashian and Mr. Grede, include managing inventory as the company expands its offerings and opens physical stores, as well as competing against companies offering steep discounts as consumers cut back on discretionary spending in the face of high inflation. It is a problem that has bedeviled many retail companies, and will become more pressing as Skims opens its own stores, Ms. Kardashian said. Skims’s latest investment is likely to spur questions about when it intends to go public, given both the company’s swelling valuation and the involvement of Wellington, which is known for investing in companies before they go public. The apparel maker has taken other steps typical of businesses setting themselves up for initial offerings, including hiring a chief financial officer last year. Mr. Grede demurred on the topic of timing, saying he and Ms. Kardashian were in no rush. But he noted that investors had shown interest in recent months in consumer-facing businesses. And going public remains one of the company’s goals. “At some point in the future, Skims deserves to be a public company,” he said. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced "
nyt://article/8b20cbd9-ed56-569f-90e2-bd2001e53b58,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/06/23/world/australia/tipping-gets-more-in-your-face-and-not-everyone-likes-it.html,2023-06-23T04:35:24+0000,article,News,978,"[{'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Australia', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tips and Tipping', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Letter 312 Tipping is not unheard-of in Australia, but an increasing number of apps and payment platforms are actively asking for an extra dollar, or five, on bills. The Australia Letter is a weekly newsletter from our Australia bureau. Sign up to get it by email.  These days, when dining out, you might expect to be asked whether you’d like to add a tip when paying electronically. Ride share services often prompt customers to add an extra dollar, or three or five. Some online ordering or payment platforms will even automatically include a tip in your bill, unless you opt out. This is a relatively new phenomenon in Australia, a country where consumers are generally not expected to tip. It led to me wonder: Is our tipping culture changing? Is the practice becoming more common? It seems to be a point of pride for most Australians that we’re not like the U.S., where the minimum wage is so low for many restaurant workers that consumers are effectively required to subsidize their pay through tips. (The minimum wage here is 21.38 Australian dollars, or $14.34 — about double that of the U.S.) But tipping is not unheard-of in Australia — tip jars are common in bars and cafes, and it’s accepted that you can leave a bit of extra cash on the table at the end of a meal if you feel you’ve received fantastic service. What’s changed is that now, instead of leaving it up to the customer’s discretion, an increasing number of apps and online payment systems are actively asking whether you’d like to leave a tip, which can feel “more in your face,” said Tony Green, the chief executive of Australian Foodservice Advocacy Body, which was founded during the pandemic to help the hospitality sector recover. “It seems to be becoming something that is more often being requested,” he said. Mr. Green believed that part of the reason was that consumers are increasingly paying with debit or credit cards instead of cash, and more online payment systems and apps have built the option into their interface. Another factor: The hospitality sector is still recovering from the coronavirus pandemic and successive lockdowns, he said, and is grappling with labor shortages and inflationary pressures. “Everyone is doing it really tough at the moment,” he said, “Customers have got less money to spend, and restaurants and cafes don’t have enough staff to operate seven days a week like they used to. So I think there’s a real pinch point, and I think tipping, or being requested to tip, is almost a bit of a sign of that.” But Mr. Green noted that even though more venues might be prompting tips, that didn’t mean more customers were tipping. “I think the requests are building but from what I’m hearing, that doesn’t mean the number of tips is increasing,” he said. It seems that tipping became more normalized during the pandemic, as a way for Australians to support the hospitality sector. A survey conducted last year by OpenTable, an online restaurant reservation platform, found that 27 percent of Australians polled said they were more likely to tip than before the pandemic. Dario Mujkic, a director at the United Workers Union, suggested that during the pandemic, tipping might have become “a social contagion, a little bit,” and something that venues hoped would continue. But with inflation increasing financial pressures on households, it is unlikely that many people are currently tipping, he said. He noted that it can be unclear whether tips are actually going to workers, especially when given through online platforms. “On a machine, where’s the checks and balances on that? At least in a tip jar, you can count it,” he said. The risk with establishing more of a tipping culture in Australia is that employers could use it as an excuse to not give workers pay increases or to improve working conditions, Mr. Mujkic said. For example, “instead of getting a few dollars above the minimum wage an hour, you’re on the minimum but told that you might get $20 at the end of your shift in tips.” “The more it’s normalized, the more it suppresses wages,” he added. Things should become clearer once the cost-of-living crisis subsides, Mr. Mujkic said. Will consumers start tipping more again when they have more discretionary income? Or was the uptick in tipping during the pandemic just a blip? But right now, there is little sign our tipping culture is changing, he said. “The point of tipping is for exemplary service rather than subsiding the worker through consumerism,” he said. “It’s the owner’s responsibility to pay people and pay people fairly and well. It’s not my responsibility to be subsidizing that when I’m buying a meal or drink.” Now for this week’s stories: Where Housing Prices Have Crashed and Billions in Wealth Have Vanished. In New Zealand, high interest rates have sent property prices sliding nearly 18 percent since November 2021. A Closer Look at the Submersible Lost in the North Atlantic. On the vessel, there were five passengers packed into a tight interior with no seats and a single view port 21 inches in diameter. A North Korean Dissident Defects to the American Right. Yeonmi Park’s account of the horrors of North Korea made her a human rights celebrity. Her new claims that America is on the same path have made her a right-wing media star. A Superyacht Gave a Lifeline to 100 Migrants Thrown Into the Sea. A $175 million vessel responded to a distress call and helped rescue survivors in one of the Mediterranean’s worst wrecks in decades, reflecting the new inequality of the seas. This Nerve Influences Nearly Every Internal Organ. Can It Improve Our Mental State, Too? On social media, exercises that aim to “tone” one of our body’s longest nerves have been touted as a cure-all for anxiety and other psychological ailments. Here’s what the research says. Enjoying the Australia Letter? Sign up here or forward to a friend. For more Australia coverage and discussion, start your day with your local Morning Briefing and join us in our Facebook group. nyregion opinion world world nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Yan Zhuang is a reporter in The New York Times's Australia bureau, based in Melbourne. More about Yan Zhuang "
nyt://article/1bd8c78b-e5b3-5de3-8eab-1d756beadb07,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/08/10/business/tapestry-capri-merger-luxury-fashion.html,2023-08-10T12:13:50+0000,article,News,793,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Fashion and Apparel', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Luxury Goods and Services', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Tapestry Inc', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Capri Holdings Ltd', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Coach Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Kate Spade & Co', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Versace, Gianni, SpA', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Choo, Jimmy, Ltd', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Stuart Weitzman Holdings LLC', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Kors, Michael, Holdings', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The two fashion conglomerates, Tapestry and Capri Holdings, generate about $12 billion in combined revenue. Tapestry, the fashion company that owns Coach and Kate Spade, said on Thursday that it had acquired Capri Holdings, the parent of Versace and Michael Kors, for about $8.5 billion in cash, as consolidation in the luxury market gathers pace. The deal between two large American companies with familiar luxury brands comes as high-end retailers look for growth amid signs that U.S. consumers are pulling back on discretionary spending. It also comes as the most dominant luxury players jostle to snap up brands and broaden their portfolios. Combined, the two groups would generate about $12 billion in revenue, bringing brands like Coach, Kate Spade and Stuart Weitzman together with Versace, Jimmy Choo and Michael Kors. Once the transaction is completed, they will operate under the name Tapestry. The move is the boldest effort yet by American fashion executives to build a collective that might be able to compete with the might of European giants like LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton and Kering, which owns brands like Gucci and Saint Laurent. The chief executives of Tapestry and Capri stressed that the combination would bring their handbags, shoes and apparel to a broader consumer base and allow them to tap more resources. The acquisition will help expand Tapestry’s reach in Europe, the Middle East and Africa, while Capri’s brands will gain more exposure in Asia. The companies said the merger also presented an opportunity to increase their direct-to-consumer businesses and save $200 million in operating and supply-chain costs within three years. “It represents a very compelling financial opportunity,” Joanne Crevoiserat, the chief executive of Tapestry, said in an interview. “We’re finding with this combination an opportunity to deepen our engagement with luxury customers on the high end.” On a call with investors on Thursday, analysts focused their questions on how the two companies would integrate and the timeline for the cost savings that would result. Executives emphasized that pooling resources would allow their brands to share digital and marketing abilities, transportation and supply chains, a strategy that is often referred to as synergies. “Synergies are always easier said than done, so this will clearly bear monitoring,” Simeon Siegel, a retail analyst at BMO Capital Markets, said in a note to clients. “But if there were ever two companies to enjoy synergies, Tapestry and Capri align.” Executives expressed confidence at being able to integrate their brands. “By joining with Tapestry, we will have greater resources and capabilities to accelerate the expansion of our global reach while preserving the unique DNA of our brands,” John D. Idol, Capri’s chief executive, said in a statement. Tapestry said it would pour money into marketing and branding as it tied the two conglomerates together. “The consumers should see and feel the brand as they always have, perhaps feeling a little bit more innovative and relevant as we put them on a digital platform so that they communicate,” Ms. Crevoiserat said. “But they should not feel the brand differently in terms of the brand DNA.” Tapestry’s stock fell nearly 16 percent on Thursday. Capri’s shares soared almost 56 percent. The deal will be financed through debt, which Tapestry could “rapidly pay down,” the company’s chief financial officer said in a statement. In its most recent quarter, Tapestry’s net sales increased 13 percent, while Capri’s revenue in its most recent quarter fell 10.5 percent. “The potential deal comes at a time when luxury is facing something of a slowdown, especially in the North American market,” noted Neil Saunders, the managing director at GlobalData, a retail consulting firm. “This has put pressure on Tapestry and Capri, both of which are now looking to international markets to bolster growth. There is more security in embarking on bold international plans as a larger entity.” The deal also gives Tapestry more cachet in the luxury market, analysts said. “Tapestry has long eyed becoming a bona fide ‘house of luxury’” similar to Kering and LVMH, said Craig Johnson, the president of the consultancy Customer Growth Partners. “But its current brands are near-luxe rather than true luxe. Capri gives Tapestry a toehold in the true luxe world, which even though Kors is by far Capri’s largest brand, over time Versace may well be the real ‘jewel in the crown.’” The deal was the latest in the global luxury industry in recent months. This week, the upmarket Australian fashion house Zimmerman was bought by the private equity firm Advent in a deal worth $1 billion. Last month, Kering said it would buy a stake in Valentino, bringing another large fashion label under its tent. And speculation continues to swirl around a possible sale of Bergdorf Goodman to LVMH, the world’s largest luxury group by sales. Bergdorf’s department store on Fifth Avenue in New York is across the street from the glittering flagship boutique of Tiffany & Company, the jewelry house that LVMH bought for $15.8 billion in 2021. Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York. More about Elizabeth Paton "
nyt://article/9ca3f8b2-6633-5b51-997a-441b28c52cae,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/02/02/business/amazon-earnings.html,2023-02-02T21:52:02+0000,article,News,837,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Amazon.com Inc', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Cloud Computing', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labor and Jobs', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Delivery Services', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Jassy, Andrew R', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The company indicated the reduced growth and tight margins would continue in the first three months of this year. Karen Weise has covered Amazon from its hometown of Seattle since 2018. Amazon on Thursday reported almost no profit in the latest quarter, with unexpected weakness in its big cloud computing businesses helping to slow overall sales growth to one of its lowest levels in decades. The company reported $149.2 billion in sales in the three months ending in December, which included the vital holiday shopping season, up 9 percent from a year earlier. A year ago, Amazon had its most profitable quarter ever, with $14.3 billion in net income. But the downshifting economy and Amazon’s own attempt to roll back expansion plans cut into its earnings this year, hacking profit back to $278 million. The reduced profit included $2.3 billion in lower valuation for its investment in the electric-truck maker Rivian. The company indicated the slowing growth and tight margins would continue in the first three months of this year. While the overall sales surpassed Wall Street expectations, as compiled by FactSet, the overall profit and the performance of the cloud computing business fell short, sending shares of the stock down about 4 percent in aftermarket trading. Andy Jassy, the company’s chief executive, has spent the past year pushing the company to trim costs. Amazon has been working through plans to lay off 18,000 corporate and tech workers; it added fees for grocery deliveries that had once been free; and cut back from a breakneck warehouse expansion that left the company with too much space. “Being maniacally focused on the customer experience is alway going to be a top priority for us,” Mr. Jassy said in a call with investors. “We are working really hard to streamline our costs and trying to do so at the same time that we don’t give up on the long-term, strategic investments that we believe can meaningfully change broad customer experience, and change Amazon.” John Blackledge, an analyst at Cowen & Company, estimated in December that if investors stripped out the profitable cloud computing and advertising businesses, the rest of Amazon, which includes its retail operation, studios, devices and other consumer efforts, lost more than $25 billion in 2022. Investors closely watch how the company’s cloud computing division is faring, since it has been such a big profit generator. Last week Microsoft, Amazon’s closest competitor for cloud computing, warned that new business slowed in December and was expected to continue to slow in the current quarter as the fragile economy has led business customers to be cautious about spending. Amazon’s cloud business grew 20 percent to $21.4 billion, its slowest growth on record, and the segment’s operating profit fell slightly, to $5.2 billion. A key selling point for cloud computing is the ability to quickly reduce costs as demand or needs change, and “we are going to help our customers find a way to spend less money” and run their technology more efficiently, Mr. Jassy said. Business customers are acting cautiously, he said, adding, “You see it with virtually every enterprise, and we’re being very thoughtful about streamlining our costs as well.” Brian Olsavsky, the company’s finance chief, said on a call with reporters that customers were still signing deals, but “we do expect to see some slower growth rates for the next few quarters.” Consumers’ struggles with inflation and rising interest rates showed up in Amazon’s retail business. The profitable advertising unit saw sales grow 19 percent to $11.6 billion. But Amazon’s core e-commerce business of selling products directly to consumers was down 2 percent to $64.5 billion. The services it offers to third-party sellers, which provide 59 percent of products sold, was up 20 percent to $36.3 billion. Mr. Olsavsky said customers spent less on discretionary products and favored lower-priced items and value brands. He said that the company was happy with how the quarter went, given the overall economy. “We’re just cautiously optimistic as we move into 2023 because we know that some of that is holiday demand that people won’t cut back on,” he said. Mr. Olsavsky said some of the efforts over the past year to run its fulfillment and delivery operations more efficiently have been showing results, with the company more likely to have “right labor, in the right place, at the right time” to meet consumer demand. Some cost-cutting efforts have short-term expenses, including $640 million in severance costs for corporate and tech workers and $720 million to reduce where it operates grocery stores and Amazon Go markets. The company is also dealing with finding growth when it is already so large. Its Prime membership program may have reached a saturation point in the United States, the company’s most important market, according to Consumer Intelligence Research Partners. “Prime membership has essentially stopped growing in the U.S.,” the researchers wrote last month, estimating 168 million people in the United States have a membership. Subscription revenue, seen by investors as having high profit margins, was up 13 percent in the quarter. The company’s hiring from the pandemic, when it more than doubled its work force, ground to a halt. Between layoffs and unusually high turnover at its warehouses, it ended the year with 1.54 million workers, about 4 percent fewer than a year earlier. Karen Weise is a technology correspondent based in Seattle, covering Amazon and Microsoft. Her work aims to help readers better understand two of the most powerful companies in America and their growing influence on society. More about Karen Weise "
nyt://article/5ed6bf6e-15f3-5a80-9222-19b356835624,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/05/20/business/stock-market-inflation.html,2022-05-20T10:50:00+0000,article,News,1195,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Investors are selling as they worry about inflation, interest rates and a potential recession. Note: As of Friday Source: Refinitiv A chaotic day on Wall Street extended the longest period of market turmoil since 2001, with stocks on Friday briefly descending into bear market territory, a symbolic marker of investors’ deep pessimism about the health of the global economy and the buying power of the American consumer. The S&P 500 has fallen for seven consecutive weeks, its worst stretch since the dot-com bubble burst more than two decades ago. After a 3 percent drop this week, the index is down 14 percent since early April. Friday afternoon, the S&P 500 crossed the bear market threshold of a 20 percent decline from its peak on Jan. 3. But with less than 30 minutes left before trading ended, after hours of churn and a drop of as much as 2.3 percent, the market rallied and ended a hair above where it had started the day. That was little consolation for investors, many of whom have grown accustomed to years of robust returns and have never seen a market upheaval like this. With this week’s relentless slide and Friday’s wild swing was a constant worry on Wall Street that rising inflation, compounded by the war in Ukraine, might tip the economy into a recession. At the heart of those fears was fresh evidence reported this week from retailers like Walmart and Target that rising costs were now hitting corporate America. During the darkest days of the pandemic, the American economy was propelled by consumers. Even as the costs of goods, transportation and labor increased, companies were able to pocket record profits by raising prices, confident that people would continue buying. But this week brought indications that some consumers may have reached their limit, and profits have started to shrink. “What the companies are telling us is that they are starting to notice that their consumer is responding to inflation,” said Jay Sole, a retail analyst at UBS. “We were worried about this moment and we were waiting for this moment, and now it’s here.” Recessions have often followed bear markets, though one does not necessarily cause the other. A bear market occurred in the early days of the coronavirus pandemic, but it was the shortest on record, lasting just 33 days before stocks began to rally. Less than six months later, the S&P 500 began hitting new highs again, climbing 42 percent above its prepandemic level before starting to slide in January. Now the index is down more than 18 percent from its high point. Friday’s turbulent trading came after months of investors fretting about how serious and long-lasting inflation would be and how aggressively the Federal Reserve would have to raise rates to slow the rising cost of living. James Bullard, the president of the Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, said during an interview on Fox Business on Friday that raising interest rates by half a point at coming central bank meetings was “a good plan for now.” Mr. Bullard struck a relatively unconcerned tone about markets, despite the day’s volatility. “You would expect with the Fed raising rates, that all of these assets — trillions of dollars worldwide — would have to be repriced,” Mr. Bullard said. What set this week apart was a grim earnings report on Tuesday from Walmart, the nation’s largest retailer, which confirmed many investors’ worst fears about inflation. For the first time in many years, Walmart said its quarterly profits had fallen, a sign to many analysts that the retailer could not pass along many of its rising costs to consumers without risking a slowdown in sales. Target and Kohl’s also said quarterly profits had plunged, adding to Wall Street’s unease. Walmart said that some of its customers were buying less-expensive meats and other food items as costs soared, and that sales of certain discretionary goods like clothing had slowed, as budget-conscious shoppers focused instead on buying necessities like groceries. The company’s executives said they saw no signs of inflation starting to abate. “There is a lot of uncertainty moving forward,” Walmart’s chief executive, Doug McMillon, said in a conference call with Wall Street analysts on Tuesday. “Things are very fluid.” Globally, investors can find little comfort. The Russian invasion of Ukraine and the response from other countries has disrupted crucial supplies of energy, wheat and other staples. Poor countries face a gathering catastrophe over hunger and debt. Janet L. Yellen, the Treasury secretary, said high food and energy prices were creating “stagflationary effects” — the combination of high inflation and a stagnating economy. China’s economy, the world’s second-largest after that of the United States, is laboring under the government’s strict pandemic lockdowns. Before the war in Ukraine and Covid’s resurgence in China, the International Monetary Fund was projecting global growth of 4.4 percent this year. Now its forecast is 3.6 percent. Wall Street had been expecting that torrid consumer demand would have to slow at some point. Government stimulus checks that provided Americans with billions in spending money during the pandemic stopped long ago. The hope of both the Trump and Biden administrations was that the economy could eventually be weaned off the stimulus and that consumer demand would stay relatively strong. But inflation, which has risen faster and remained more persistent than many investors and even the Fed initially expected, has thrown the recovery into doubt. Unemployment is approaching the lowest rate in decades, and the economy has regained nearly 95 percent of the 22 million jobs lost at the height of coronavirus lockdowns. Average hourly earnings in the U.S. rose 5.5 percent in the year through April, but many of those gains are being eroded by inflation. Over that same period, prices rose 8.3 percent. “The government just turbocharged the economy, and we were partying on buying goods,” said Scott Mushkin, the founder of R5 Capital, a retail-focused consulting and financial research firm. “People wondered what the hangover would be like. We have never seen anything like this.” To be sure, some retailers said that not every consumer was pulling back or shifting spending. Walmart said better-off shoppers continued to spend freely on bigger-ticket items like patio furniture, and Target said it was not seeing a broad retreat in spending, either. Home Depot, which has benefited from a pandemic remodeling boom, said it was seeing no big slowdown in business. But Mr. Sole of UBS worries that if prices continue to climb, higher-income consumers will eventually shift their spending, too. “Right now, lower-income consumers are feeling inflation more acutely,” he said. “The worry is, what if it affects all income and demographic groups?” For months, the mixed signals have been confounding Wall Street as it tries to forecast future profits and how high interest rates will climb. The current conditions are also confusing to even the most experienced executives, who are finding it difficult to plan their inventory and staffing. Walmart, which is known for successfully navigating the last period of persistently high inflation, in the 1970s, acknowledged this week that it had too many employees in the first quarter and that it had not anticipated how rapidly the increase in gasoline prices would inflate costs in its supply chain. The company’s 25 percent decline in profit from the previous year was a big surprise to analysts. “If these companies can’t handle this, it tells you something really unusual is afoot,” Mr. Mushkin said. Coral Murphy Marcos, Jason Karaian, Jeanna Smialek, Lananh Nguyen, Marie Solis, Melina Delkic, Mohammed Hadi, Rich Barbieri, Stephen Gandel, Vikas Bajaj and William P. Davis contributed reporting. Michael Corkery is a business reporter who writes about low-wage workers, the economy and industry. Before joining The Times in 2014, he reported for The Wall Street Journal and The Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery "
nyt://article/48e0927c-867c-5acb-a205-2f2b78a9ea04,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/21/business/the-week-in-business-weworks-economy.html,2022-08-21T11:00:05+0000,article,News,957,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'WeWork Companies Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Powell, Jerome H', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Neumann, Adam', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'CNN', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Home Depot Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Stelter, Brian', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Jackson Hole (Wyo)', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Andreessen Horowitz', 'rank': 16, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"with interest It would be reasonable to expect that Adam Neumann might have a difficult time trying to win back Silicon Valley. But Mr. Neumann, whose shared office-space company, WeWork, imploded in 2019, does not appear to be facing many challenges so far. His new venture, Flow, is a service for landlords of residential real estate that has already attracted the backing of Andreessen Horowitz, a venture capital firm known for its early support of tech giants like Facebook and Airbnb. It invested about $350 million in Flow, valuing the company at $1 billion. Andreesen Horowitz’s co-founder wrote in a note that the firm loved “seeing repeat-founders build on past successes by growing from lessons learned.” Some may view this praise as misguided: Mr. Neumann was ousted from WeWork after a botched public offering and accusations of mismanagement caused the company to crash. At its height, it was worth $47 billion. Today: about $4 billion. Is the economy heading for a serious downturn? Are consumers starting to tighten their purse strings? The answers to these questions are not clear, and one reason can be seen in the mixed second-quarter earnings reports of Walmart, Target, Kohl’s and Home Depot. Walmart reported a rise in sales and issued a slightly improved outlook for the rest of the year. But it also showed that it was struggling to navigate the inflation-related shifts in consumer behavior. That challenge was much more pronounced for Target, whose profit in the second quarter fell 90 percent from the year before as it got rid of excess inventory that price-conscious consumers didn’t want. Kohl’s saw an uptick in sales at its stores with Sephora shops, and Home Depot beat Wall Street expectations. It made note of unexpected interest in Halloween merchandise in July — in particular, a 12-foot-tall skeleton that sold out within hours — suggesting that consumers still have enthusiasm for discretionary spending. Inflation in the United States appears to be starting to moderate, but that’s not the case in Britain. Inflation rose 10.1 percent in July compared with a year earlier, according to new data, squeezing household budgets that have already been strained by months of rising prices. Grocery stores are the source of a significant chunk of those increases: Food costs rose 2.3 percent from June to July, the fastest monthly increase in over two decades, and staples like milk and eggs are becoming noticeably more expensive. Many Britons have been forced to make adjustments to their usual grocery lists. Inflation in Britain is expected to peak in the fall, with sharply higher energy bills. Last month, the Commerce Department reported that economic growth in the United States fell for the second consecutive quarter — a sure sign of a recession, according to one accepted definition. But most economists look to a much broader set of indicators to assess the state of the economy, including measures of income, spending and employment. And besides, the latest gross domestic product data will be revised several times, including on Thursday, when the department will release another reading based on more complete data. It will also share a first look at gross domestic income for the second quarter, which could add to the uncertainty about the economic outlook. While G.D.P. was down in the first quarter, G.D.I. — a similar but not identical measure that tracks what people earn, like wages and profits — was up. If G.D.I. is positive again, the data will be a crucial piece of evidence that the United States is not in a recession. It has been a brutal year for Peloton, which went from being a pandemic sweetheart to a cautionary tale about the whims of consumers. In February, Peloton’s chief executive stepped down, and the company laid off 20 percent of its corporate work force. In May, it announced that it lost $757 million in the first three months of 2022. And in July, Peloton said it would no longer make bikes and treadmills at its factories and outsource all its manufacturing overseas to cut costs. What will its second-quarter earnings report bring, then? Probably nothing especially upbeat. Peloton’s shares have plummeted nearly 75 percent since January, and although its new head, Barry McCarthy, has said he’s confident that he can lead the company out of this low point, he has admitted to shareholders that “turnarounds are hard work.” Jerome H. Powell, the chair of the Federal Reserve, will speak on Friday in Jackson Hole, Wyo., where the Federal Reserve Bank of Kansas City has held an annual symposium for decades. Last year, Mr. Powell reassured the crowd — made up of other central bankers as well as economists and investors — that inflation was likely to be temporary. This time, he’ll have to answer why the opposite appears to be true. He is expected to focus much of his speech on the path ahead for inflation, which showed its first signs of easing last month. The financial markets will be listening closely for hints of whether the Fed will make another three-quarter point increase in interest rates at its September meeting or go with a half-point increase. Mr. Powell will be speaking on the heels of fresh data from the personal consumption expenditures price index, the Fed’s preferred inflation gauge, which last showed consumer prices climbing 6.8 percent over the year through June. Starbucks was ordered to reinstate seven employees who were fired in February after leading efforts to unionize the Memphis store where they worked. Brian Stelter is leaving CNN after the network canceled his show, “Reliable Sources.” House sales fell in July for the sixth consecutive month. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/e8ed2c33-7938-5af7-9f75-e752a68d999e,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/03/04/opinion/credit-card-rewards-points-poor-interchange-fees.html,2023-03-04T14:00:06+0000,article,Op-Ed,1213,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income Inequality', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Customer Loyalty Programs', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Cards', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Poverty', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'High Net Worth Individuals', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Guest Essay Ms. Xu is a finance professor at the Stanford Graduate School of Business. Mr. Reppucci is a candidate for a Master of Business Administration and Master of Public Policy at Stanford. There’s an undeniable feeling of excitement when you turn your daily credit card swipes at Starbucks into first-class airfare or a weekend jaunt to Costa Rica. Thanks to mobile banking and the ease of autopay, you can scrupulously avoid any additional costs by paying your monthly bill in full. Free flights and exclusive discounts abound. Something for nothing, right? Not exactly nothing. Credit card perks for educated, usually urban professionals are being subsidized by people who have less. In other words, when you book a hotel room or enjoy entry to an airport lounge at no cost, poor consumers are ultimately footing the bill. Demand for rewards is only going up. In 2016, Chase launched its Sapphire Reserve card. The card comes with perks, bonuses and points multipliers that for big-spending travelers and diners are worth far more than its steep $550 annual fee. There was so much initial demand that Chase ran out of the metal slabs it prints the cards on. Sapphire’s enormous success set off a credit card perks war, with numerous banks flooding the market with sign-on bonuses worth thousands of dollars. In 2022, the Federal Reserve published data showing that the cost of rewards, as a share of total transaction volume on credit cards, increased 25 percent from 2015 through 2021. This bonanza has helped affluent professionals flood Instagram with envy-inducing shots of white sand beaches, hotel suites and plush airport lounges. But these high-income travelers are also less likely to carry balances that incur interest charges and late fees, which traditionally increase profits for card issuers. So, to offset the cost of paying lavish rewards to these consumers, banks have sought to maximize other usage-based revenues. Enter interchange fees, or the money it costs merchants to accept noncash payments. A recent study at Stanford found that when credit card rewards increase, so do these fees. The United States now has some of the highest credit card processing costs in the world, typically at 2 percent to 2.25 percent of every purchase. This is eight to nine times as much as the prevailing swipe fee in the European Union. The vast majority of merchants pass these costs on to consumers by charging more for their products — regardless of how one pays. The result? Lower-income consumers are forced to pay higher prices on the goods they buy, but they rarely receive any benefit from rewards programs, according to the Federal Reserve, which has been tracking the distributional effects of card rewards. Its December 2022 report estimates an annual redistribution of $15 billion in rewards value from poorer people to richer people, from low-education people to highly educated people and from diverse communities to less diverse communities. Put another way, credit card rewards are essentially a tax on less affluent consumers, who are much more likely to pay for their goods with cash, debit cards or standard credit products that accrue no such rewards. According to the San Francisco Fed, Americans with annual incomes at the national median (a bit less than $70,000) use credit cards for 23 percent of purchases. The numbers drop off precipitously as income decreases. Roughly half of all households use cash or debit cards for most purchases. Households with annual incomes over $150,000 use a credit card the most frequently, or 44 percent of the time. The poor are much less likely to have access to rewards credit cards, even if they want them. Why? Cards with the highest value rewards are often available only to the rich. First, you’ll need a credit score of at least 700 to qualify for a premium card. That eliminates half the country. And only 21 percent of Black households have FICO scores above 700. Second, issuers consider your income and debt-to-income ratio, which can be used to disqualify card applicants with high credit scores. Banks just don’t want to issue rewards-heavy cards and pay lucrative sign-on bonuses to consumers who have low credit limits and spend much less overall. Now consider the design of these rewards programs: five times as many points on hotels, three times as many points on dining, a $300 credit to SoulCycle, a $100 credit to Saks Fifth Avenue. This generation of prestige points cards often rewards discretionary, even luxury purchases, further transferring dollars to the highest income card holders. Cash-back cards available to households with lower credit scores and incomes offer more modest rewards than their prestige alternatives do. Visa and Mastercard operate the two largest card networks, accounting for 77 percent of about 650 million general purpose credit cards in the United States. They act as agents for thousands of banks and dictate the terms and fees that merchants must pay. And business is booming. In 2021 these two companies generated $77 billion in credit card interchange fees, which they share with issuing banks. The aggregate costs of credit card points, driven by Visa and Mastercard’s longstanding interchange duopoly, spurred Senators Richard Durbin, Democrat of Illinois, and Roger Marshall, Republican of Kansas, to introduce the Credit Card Competition Act last July. The House soon followed with its own bipartisan bill. Yet multiple attempts to attach the legislation to military and omnibus funding bills by year’s end failed. The act would have forced Visa and Mastercard to compete head-to-head with other processors, reducing their overwhelming market power to set rates. Lower interchange fees can mean lower prices for consumers. (Despite expected opposition from the now-Republican-controlled House, Mr. Durbin plans to reintroduce the bill this year, his office said.) The American Bankers Association argues that such legislation would result in net harm. It points to reductions in credit card rewards programs and hints at the creation of new fees by banks to make up the lost revenues. The first part is certainly true; however, it’s hard to muster a defense for preserving rewards at Saks Fifth Avenue in the name of consumer welfare. The latter may also be true — and sounds like something the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau should look into. Opponents of the bill also correctly point out that network security could suffer in the short run: Introducing smaller players and novel technologies would create vulnerabilities that hackers might exploit. Visa and Mastercard do use their systemwide scale in the name of effective fraud protection. However, the economics of competition suggest that all companies, especially Visa and Mastercard, would be heavily incentivized to innovate on network security to preserve market share against new entrants. A problem for any reform that helps working-class families will be that consumers who enjoy great privileges from premium credit cards would end up worse off. But they would be returning economic value to working Americans, whose production and consumption sustains the economy in the first place. And prestige card holders surely will manage. They may have hoped to use points toward an overwater villa in the Maldives. If Congress acts, they can settle for a free hotel room in Hawaii. Chenzi Xu is a finance professor at the Stanford Graduate School of Business. Jeffrey Reppucci is a candidate for a Master of Business Administration and Master of Public Policy at Stanford. The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. nyregion business opinion opinion nyregion business arts nyregion magazine "
nyt://article/ab75b9cb-bde5-502e-8f12-e124f430dda1,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/03/16/business/Danone-Emmanuel-Faber.html,2021-03-16T13:50:06+0000,article,News,410,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shareholder Rights and Activism', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Danone SA', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"CtW, an adviser to union pensions, sent a sharply worded letter to Artisan Partners, the firm that led the revolt over Emmanuel Faber’s leadership. Emmanuel Faber, the chairman and chief executive of the French consumer group Danone, abruptly left the company on Monday under pressure from activist investors. Now, shareholders of the company, which owns Evian and several yogurt brands, including Dannon, are fighting among themselves about it. CtW, an adviser to union pensions with more than $250 billion in assets, sent a sharply worded letter to Artisan Partners, the firm that led the revolt over Mr. Faber’s leadership. The twist in the letter, which was reviewed by the DealBook newsletter, is that CtW owns a “substantial” number of Artisan shares — and said that the fund needed the sort of governance shake-up it pushed for at Danone. Artisan had criticized Danone’s performance versus competitors like Nestlé and Unilever, calling for boardroom changes, including someone other than Mr. Faber becoming chairman. Mr. Faber had been chief executive since 2014 and added the chairman role in 2017. Danone said at the beginning of the month that it would search for a new chief executive, but Mr. Faber would remain as chairman. Mr. Faber shed both of those roles on Monday. “The appointment of new leadership and better corporate governance will strengthen the company for the benefit of all stakeholders,” Artisan said in a statement on Monday welcoming Mr. Faber’s departure. CtW says Artisan’s own policies are inconsistent with its demands for Danone. Notably, one person, Eric Colson, serves as Artisan’s chairman and chief executive. “Artisan’s call for an independent chair at Danone while maintaining the positions of C.E.O. and chair combined on its own board is inconsistent with best governance practices,” wrote Dieter Waizenegger, CtW’s executive director. He also questioned the firm’s use of “large discretionary cash bonuses” and demanded a discussion with Artisan’s management by the end of the month. Artisan did not respond to a request for comment. Danone, which reported $28 billion in sales in its latest fiscal year, was the first public company to adopt the French legal framework of “Entreprise à Mission,” which allows companies to take greater consideration of social and environmental issues in their business model. Some 99 percent of shareholders, but not Artisan Partners, approved the move in June last year. The turmoil raises the question whether business models that take all stakeholders into account can survive resistance from activist investors focused primarily on shareholder returns. Danone said in a statement announcing the management changes that it “believes in the necessity” of combining “high economic performance” with Danone’s “unique model of a purpose-driven company.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Lauren Hirsch joined the New York Times from CNBC in 2020, covering business, policy and mergers and acquisitions.  Ms. Hirsch studied comparative literature at Cornell University and has an M.B.A. from the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth. More about Lauren Hirsch "
nyt://article/65cfb6e1-ab8f-590a-82e2-4e2a0dc4b2e7,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/09/09/realestate/luxury/-golf-homes-developer-what-do-buyers-want.html,2022-09-09T09:02:54+0000,article,News,1211,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Golf', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Second Homes and Non-Primary Residences', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Luxury Goods and Services', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Real Estate and Housing (Residential)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Private Equity', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'South Street Partners LLC', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Randolph, Chris (Real Estate Executive)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Bluffton (SC)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Charlotte (NC)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Chattanooga (Tenn)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Kiawah Island (SC)', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Southeastern States (US)', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"While navigating the industry’s ups and downs, Chris Randolph of South Street Partners says his firm has learned that “you can’t rinse and repeat.” This article is part of our latest special report on International Golf Homes. When it comes to second homes and golf communities, South Street Partners has more than a dozen years of experience under its belt, riding the industry through economic ups and downs and the increased popularity of drive-to developments in the wake of Covid-19. South Street, a private equity development firm based in Charlotte, N.C., and Charleston, S.C., has scored major acquisitions of the Kiawah Island Club in South Carolina and its two golf courses; Palmetto Bluff in Bluffton, S.C.; and the Cliffs development, which is set in the Blue Ridge Mountains and has seven separate communities in South Carolina and North Carolina. With $1 billion in assets, the company’s strategy has been to primarily focus on the southeastern United States, which has experienced sustained population growth partly because of the migration of families and older adults to warmer climates. Prices start around $2 million in their suite of developments, and Chris Randolph, a partner, says South Street is seeing no slowdown. In the coming year, South Street is building new homes at Kiawah and the Cliffs developments in South Carolina, particularly around Lake Keowee, and in Palmetto Bluff. Golf remains, depending on where you live, a popular — and lucrative — attraction, so South Street is planning two new courses at Palmetto Bluff in the coming years: a nine-hole short course by King-Collins (architects of the Sweetens Cove course outside Chattanooga, Tenn., which has attracted investors like Peyton Manning); and another course at a private club. At Kiawah, where Covid increased golf demand and drove up home prices, Beau Welling, Tiger Woods’ design partner, will work on a new course with a residential component. South Street plans to put a considerable amount of land into a conservation easement. Mr. Randolph spoke about his firm’s investment plans and residential golf developments. The following conversation has been condensed and edited. South Street just raised its first discretionary fund of $225 million. What does the fund allow you to do for the future, and how will it affect your existing portfolio of properties? This is the first discretionary fund in South Street’s history and allows us to be more acquisitive of new properties while continuing to work with our legacy investment partners in the private equity and hedge fund space. At the same time, it will also allow us to do deals entirely on our own, to the extent we would like to do that. As for existing properties, we will use the fund to make improvements at Palmetto Bluff, where we’re building a short course and a regulation 18-hole course, and Kiawah, where we will build a new 18-hole course, as well as other amenities and development activities. How will you handle the golf real estate at both Kiawah and Palmetto Bluff? Has anything changed about how South Street views residential golf communities? We may have a bit of a novel approach in that we’re not necessarily layering in real estate directly on the golf course. We want to create the best golf experience possible. From our perspective, that means what I would call a core golf course with little to no real estate impacting the golf experience. Our theory is that if you create an incredible world-class golf experience, just the proximity of homes to that course will yield higher prices than a traditional fairway-lined real estate golf course development. When you talk about giving the architects the best land, how much of that is member/customer-driven, and how much of that might be attributed to the average golfer’s growing understanding of what a good golf experience entails? I think it’s both. We think the golf consumer has gotten far more sophisticated in terms of what they expect. To deliver on that, we need to find the best land for the best golf. I used the term novel earlier, and I think it is probably still considered a little bit of a novel approach in our industry to not try and really integrate a ton of real estate on the golf frontage. Another factor that’s driving this for us is that, at Kiawah, we actually see premiums for lots and homes on the parks that we’ve developed versus golf courses. The theory there is that people, especially young families, will pay more for frontage on a park they can access 24 hours a day versus a golf course where you really are only getting out there before and after the golfers play. South Street has really made a push into offering turnkey homes at its properties. This seems to follow an industry trend. Is that consumer-driven, or simply the best way to maximize profit? It’s very much consumer-driven and probably the biggest change to our industry, meaning high-end second-home communities. Fifteen years ago, the product of choice was the estate lots where you buy a lot, find an architect, find a builder, find a landscape architect and manage that all yourself. Through the downturn of 2008 to 2010, people started taking a different approach, where they weren’t necessarily interested in taking on a project of that type. They still wanted a second home, but they were willing to trade some of the customization for a turnkey product that checked probably 90 percent of their boxes. If you look at our home building activity, we are now the largest home builder at Kiawah and the largest home builder at the Cliffs. We will soon be the largest at Palmetto Bluff, because we believe fully in that strategy of delivering a finished product and doing so with scale and efficiency. On Lake Keowee [at the Cliffs], we just set a record with a purchase price of $6.3 million. We designed it, built it and did the interiors, all the way down to the forks and knives in the drawers. To that point, what are other major developments you’ve noticed in the last 10 years, and where do you foresee things going in the next five years? As we enter into whatever this recessionary — whether it’s deep, shallow, long or short — environment, we’re going to be very conscious of what that means for our buyers. The good news is we’ve got a very long-term outlook at all of our projects of 10-plus years, if not more. So, we don’t concern ourselves too much with slowdowns in the market in terms of our business plan, but we also want to be conscious of overdeveloping during a time when sales might not be there. So, we’ll continue to build our amenities. We’ll continue to build the clustered neighborhoods around those amenities. Maybe we’ll scale back a little bit on some of the larger spec homes, but I don’t think it changes our business plan much at all, if any. One thing we know is that you can’t rinse and repeat. That might have worked in another time, in different cycles. We’ve got to create unique products and, more than anything, we have to deliver the best product possible from both a club and resort experience. At the end of the day, that’s what people are buying: the private club experience we can offer. The home is important, but you’re buying a lifestyle. Our buyers have worked a long time to have the ability to buy into these communities. The service, amenities and experience we offer need to be just world class. "
nyt://article/ddade966-d638-5d65-8dbe-9a35ee4a09b1,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/27/business/economy/holiday-shopping-retail-sales.html,2022-11-27T22:13:39+0000,article,News,1375,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discount Selling', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Holidays and Special Occasions', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"With an economic slowdown a distinct possibility, stores hope customers’ willingness to open their wallets will last through the season. Amazon held what amounted to an extra Prime Day in October, blanketing its site with deals. Best Buy rolled out Black Friday-level sales last month. And on Friday, Kohl’s entered the first 200 people to walk into each of its stores into a sweepstakes, with prizes including gift cards to Sephora and a family trip to a Legoland resort. With the arrival of the all-important holiday shopping season, retailers are not just competing with one another to attract customers. They are also competing against the clock. For now, Americans are spending, buoyed by pandemic-era savings and a red-hot labor market. But at the same time, prices are climbing at the fastest pace in decades and the Federal Reserve is attempting to rein them in by raising interest rates. That effort to curb demand by making borrowing more expensive is, in turn, making consumers pessimistic about the economy. And a recession is a distinct possibility. Retailers, some of them sitting on a glut of inventory, want to sell as much as they can while consumers are still pulling out their wallets. So they are barraging customers with discounts, hoping to entice them to buy before an economic slowdown causes a change in behavior once more. Whether retailers succeed will have profound implications. Billions of dollars are at stake, and companies will be watching the outcome closely as they make hiring and investment decisions for the new year. “We’re going to spend a lot of time right now focused on executing our plan, getting through the holiday season and then assessing the consumer and the overall retail landscape as we look to 2023,” Brian Cornell, the chief executive of Target, said on a call with analysts this month. More broadly, retail sales during the holiday shopping period could provide clues about the trajectory of the economy in the weeks and months to come. “For the overall economy, I think that it’s going to be very important to look at what the consumer is doing because really that’s going to be your key indicator,” said Lydia Boussour, an economist at EY-Parthenon. “It’s the key engine of growth.” Forecasters generally believe that consumer spending, which accounts for about 70 percent of total economic growth, will remain strong in the fourth quarter, in large part because of household savings. Collectively, Americans by the middle of this year were still sitting on about $1.7 trillion in extra savings accumulated during the pandemic, based on Fed estimates, thanks in part to government aid. But in September, the most recent month for which calculations were available, Americans saved only 3.1 percent of their after-tax income, less than half the share before the pandemic. And poorer Americans are seeing their savings dwindle even faster than wealthier ones. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Meanwhile, credit card balances in the third quarter swelled 15 percent compared with a year earlier, according to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. That was the largest increase in more than two decades, as consumers increasingly rely on credit even as borrowing costs are rising. And a University of Michigan survey this month showed a sharp decline in “consumer sentiment” — a measurement of how people feel about the economy and their financial situation. Even as consumers continue to make purchases, Ms. Boussour said, “they’re feeling depressed about the overall economic situation, and they are going to grow increasingly reluctant to spend.” Retail sales grew 1.3 percent in October, more than expected, as shoppers snapped up earlier-than-usual holiday deals. Some major retailers including Walmart and Home Depot reported strong third-quarter earnings, bolstered by sales for less discretionary goods like groceries or items related to home renovation and do-it-yourself projects. “Households are still spending money because they can,” said Aneta Markowska, chief financial economist at the investment bank Jefferies. “I still think there’s a lot of uncertainty about next year because the Fed obviously has raised rates very aggressively this year and we haven’t really felt the effects yet.” But several retailers said they saw demand for their products slow during the month, and when shoppers did buy, they seemed motivated by sales. Some companies have lowered their financial outlook or declined outright to provide forecasts for next year to avoid being caught flat-footed. This was not how the end of this year was supposed to be. For two holiday shopping seasons, retailers strained against pandemic disruptions. Now that the virus restrictions and supply chain snarls that defined those periods have largely abated, retailers had been expecting something of a return to normal. Instead, retailers find themselves trying to outrun a likely economic slowdown. To entice bargain-hungry shoppers and move unwanted inventory, many companies are promoting “value,” offering steep discounts and low prices more so than last year even as labor costs remain high. Many started their holiday blitzes early in the hopes of jump starting sales. Target held Deal Days in October and Old Navy rolled out a “Sorry, Not Sorry” holiday campaign. “Value clearly matters to everyone,” Corie Barry, the chief executive of Best Buy, said on an earnings call last week. At J.C. Penney, stores returned to 5 a.m. doorbusters on Black Friday, promoting the “pre-inflation pricing” for items like Instant Pots, hair flat irons and coats. Jeff Gennette, the chief executive of Macy’s, said that a feature on its website that allows users to peruse gifts priced from $15 to $100 seemed to be particularly tempting to shoppers. “If you’ve got an item that’s competing with the competitor, and you’re a higher price, you’ve got to make those adjustments,” he said. Retailers are trying to eliminate any obstacles between a shopper and a potential purchase. Jill Timm, the chief financial officer for Kohl’s, said the chain was providing more personalized offers to shoppers, as well as clearly laying out the discount amounts on certain items to prevent customers from being confused “because they had to do math.” Kohl’s is “really making sure that the offers that we’re putting in are meaningful to the customer to drive their behavior,” Ms. Timm said. Signaling value is part of the overall strategy for Primark, an international clothing retailer, as it looks to grow its presence in the United States. In a recently opened store at a mall in Garden City, N.Y., Primark executives pointed out large signs that advertised $11 hoodies, $4 biker shorts and $20 for a baby-blue bag featuring Stitch from the Disney movie “Lilo and Stitch” — and noted that a candle, at 90 cents without any holiday discount, cost less than at Walmart. “It needs to be a very clear moment when you walk in of that perception that there is amazing value throughout the whole store,” said Kevin Tulip, Primark’s U.S. president. Shoppers seemed price conscious on Black Friday and throughout the weekend. Retailers dropped online prices for merchandise like toys, electronics and computers, according to data released on Friday from Adobe Analytics. Discounts for sporting goods and TVs were far steeper this year than last year, according to Adobe data, and clothing prices were slightly lower this year. The average discount for Black Friday deals in the United States was 30 percent, according to Salesforce. In 2019, Salesforce said, the average discount rate for Black Friday was 33 percent. In-store sales on Friday rose 12 percent from last year, and e-commerce sales increased 14 percent compared with 2021, according to Mastercard SpendingPulse data released on Saturday. Those sales included spending not just in retail stores but also at restaurants. Still, not everyone was satisfied. On social media, people complained that Black Friday deals weren’t as sizable as they expected. In San Francisco, Riz Gordon, 24, woke up at 6 a.m. on Friday to shop with her parents and younger sister. Going to the stores that day is “a long family tradition,” she said, and they had already picked out stocking stuffers and smaller presents. But inflation was on their minds. “The prices are very much different than 10 years ago,” Ms. Gordon said. On Sunday, at a Target in Springfield, Ill., D.J. Baggerly, 69, made a quick trip for one final Christmas gift: a white knitted throw blanket. She had spent the weekend mostly shopping online, working through her grandchildren’s wish list. Ms. Baggerly lives on a fixed income, and the higher prices for gas and groceries, she said, have been “ridiculous.” Asked if she planned to cut back on spending in the coming weeks, she said, “Oh yeah. I’m done.” Ben Casselman and Kalley Huang contributed reporting. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Sydney Ember is an economics reporter. Previously, she covered Bernie Sanders's presidential campaign and the 2020 election, including living in Iowa for three months during the run-up to the state's caucuses. More about Sydney Ember Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/6106ea72-31f3-5a22-ba98-a2823477daf2,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/25/business/black-friday-shopping.html,2022-11-25T22:10:15+0000,article,News,1361,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discount Selling', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping Centers and Malls', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'JC Penney Company Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Black Friday deals returned, drawing shoppers back into stores, but inflation worries left many companies unsure what the holiday shopping season would look like. After two years of pandemic improvisation and in-store restrictions, this year’s Black Friday felt like a return to normalcy. Shoppers who ventured out on Friday, and even those who didn’t, saw a deluge of deals that had been missing the past couple of years. Many retailers pushed lower prices both in stores and online in response to Americans having recently shown they were more than willing to wait for a discount before making a purchase. “I think we’re going back to what we had before the pandemic with what we’re offering on Black Friday,” said Stephen Lebovitz, the chief executive officer of CBL Properties, which owns about 95 properties, including shopping centers and malls across the United States. “There are changes, but it’s going to feel a lot more like 2019 Black Friday than anything in the interim years.” Still, near-record inflation and dwindling savings kept some shoppers home and left retailers unsure what the season would ultimately bring. Many well-off consumers remain stable financially and appear ready to spend, but others face far more economic uncertainty. That isn’t expected to change anytime soon. Analysts, economists and retail executives are monitoring a potential economic slowdown in the first few months of 2023 that could worsen consumers’ wariness. That makes the holiday season — always the most important time for retailers — even more crucial this year. As the day began at Macy’s Herald Square, the department store’s flagship location in Manhattan, there was a steady flow of customers, and store employees clapped as people entered. Some said they were excited to shop but had concerns over prices. Tammy Freeman, 59, from New York, stood at the front of the line near the store’s main entrance, ready for her annual Black Friday excursion. She said that she was eager to buy various items, including a case for her daughter’s laptop, but noted that inflation was changing her general approach to spending. “I have to budget more,” she said. “I have to catch the sales more.” Eighty percent of holiday shoppers are likely to make a purchase from Black Friday through Cyber Monday, according to a survey from Bankrate. People shopping online pulled out their wallets on Thanksgiving Day as well, with sales up 2.9 percent compared with a year earlier, according to Adobe Analytics, which tracks online sales. Adobe estimated that online spending for the holiday season would increase 2.5 percent from last year. It said it had calculated that online prices were down 0.7 percent in October compared with last year, largely because of early holiday deals, though they rose 0.3 percent from September. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. On Friday, bargain-hunting shoppers definitely seemed to have the power. Stores posted signs advertising 50 to 60 percent off items. At a Target in Springfield, Ill., shoppers walked around with 65-inch televisions in shopping carts, and some wore matching T-shirts that said “Gather, gobble and shop.” In San Francisco’s Union Square, it was relatively quiet. By 7 a.m., when the line outside Macy’s had dissipated, it felt “more or less like a normal day,” said Clifford Cheng, a retail associate at the store. At a nearby Neiman Marcus, only about a dozen shoppers waited outside ahead of the store’s 9 a.m. opening. Natali Carrasco, 20, and Batechaa Steele, 20, were first-time Black Friday shoppers at the luxury department store. “We always come and shop here, but we always buy full price, so we wanted to see the sales,” Ms. Carrasco said. Even before the start of the season, some shoppers were already cutting back on discretionary purchases, leaving retailers with an unusually high level of inventory. They want to unload as much of that as possible before the start of the new year.  “The more sales merchandise that they move through now the better,” said Kristen Gall, president of the online platform Rakuten, which offers cash-back deals. “Because if you get caught holding a lot of inventory in January and February and consumers pull back because things feel significantly more recessionary, that’s where the worry comes in for retailers.” Despite the economic unease shoppers have expressed, retailers said they were optimistic. “Even in really tough years Black Friday is a very strong day for us,” Jeff Gennette, Macy’s chief executive, said in an interview. And there were promising signs. Forty percent of consumers said they planned to shop in malls this holiday season, higher than the 35 percent of consumers who did during the 2019 Christmas season, before pandemic lockdowns, according to a survey from the consultancy KPMG. Last year, the number of shoppers who said they planned to venture inside a mall was 31 percent. Americans were also still purchasing gifts online. Adobe said online sales for Black Friday were expected to total $9 billion, up 1 percent year-over-year. . Retailers took different approaches to entice shoppers to spend. Macy’s did not bring back the opening doorbuster deals — which went away during the pandemic amid social distancing guidelines — and instead offered sales throughout the day. It also continued the pandemic-era tradition of having Santa take photos with children while seated behind a desk, a sign that Covid concerns remain. J.C. Penney leaned back into doorbusters for the first time since 2019 because it said it wanted to motivate discount-focused shoppers to get out to stores. For its 5 a.m. doorbusters, the department store chain deliberately kept “pre-inflation pricing” on key items like Instant Pots, bath towels and boots. Signs in stores trumpeted 65 percent off discounts.  “We think we’ll have a big volume of customers at the store, and to bring them in we know that value is very important to the consumer right now,” said Marc Rosen, J.C. Penney’s chief executive. On its website, the mall owner CBL highlighted the discounts that stores like H&M and the children’s apparel retailer Carter’s were offering. Other retailers employed a similar strategy in the days leading up to Black Friday. J. Crew on Monday advertised 50 percent off purchases. On Gap’s website, a large black banner scrolled atop the page saying “HPY BLK FRI” and highlighting 50 percent off deals with an additional 10 percent markdown. There are risks for retailers, however, in relying more heavily on deals. The practice erodes profit margins that buoyed them during the pandemic, when many Americans spent plenty on all sorts of goods and retailers did not feel the need to entice them with too many deals. There are also worries that shoppers will become so accustomed to sales that they will only buy when promised a lower price. “Consumers understanding that they can wait out discounts, coupled with retailers’ drive to move goods, likely means that this Black Friday will be more important than Black Friday has been in a long time,” Simeon Siegel, a managing director at BMO Capital Markets, said. “Whether that’s good for the brands, whether that’s good for the consumer — that’s a separate conversation.” Retailers are also competing more with entertainment options, like concerts and dining out at restaurants, than they have in the past couple of years. Consumers are expected to allocate a larger share of their holiday spending on experiences this year compared with last. The average amount that middle-income Americans, who make between $50,000 to $99,000 annually, spend on experiences is expected to increase 15 percent this year, according to a survey released in October from Deloitte. Of course, not every retailer places so much importance on Black Friday. The outdoor equipment retailer REI has remained closed on the day since 2015. This year, the company said it had decided to permanently give its workers a paid day off on Black Friday, encouraging them to spend time outside instead. But that was the exception. Even while the total sales for Black Friday were still being tallied, many retailers were already looking to further entice shoppers by rolling out advertisements for more discounts on Monday. “We believe that the consumer is quite aware of the fact that there’s plenty of inventory out there,” Richard Hayne, the chief executive of Urban Outfitters, said on a call with analysts this month. “And what they’re doing is waiting for big promotional events that normally occur on Black Friday and Cyber Monday in order to make their purchases.” Retailers may need to offer more deals, he said, but “I don’t believe it will be a total blood bath.” Isabella Simonetti and Kalley Huang contributed reporting. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/5b9bc138-3548-5085-bfc8-aeaa4e033c1e,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/04/15/business/economy/economy-retail-sales-unemployment-pandemic.html,2021-04-15T21:27:16+0000,article,News,1380,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labor and Jobs', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment Insurance', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Hiring and Promotion', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Gross Domestic Product', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'American Rescue Plan (2021)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Travel and Vacations', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'AIRLINES AND AIRPLANES', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Confidence (Economic Indicator)', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Soaring retail sales and a sharp drop in jobless claims are the latest reflection of a quickening recovery and suggest a year of remarkable growth. The American economic recovery is gathering steam, renewing confidence that a vibrant revival awaits as the pandemic recedes. After months of false starts, evidence is mounting that the economy has definitively turned a corner, with more growth on the horizon. Job gains last month were the strongest since August. There are signs that the snarled global supply chain may be untangling. And in dual reports on Thursday, the government reported more good news: Retail sales in March blew past expectations, rising nearly 10 percent, and jobless claims last week fell to their lowest level of the pandemic. Even as the country is still straining to contain the virus, as millions of people remain unemployed and as a large portion of the population remains unvaccinated, the data suggests that the long-heralded economic rebound is within reach. “I’m feeling quite optimistic,” said Gregory Daco, chief U.S. economist at Oxford Economics. “I think what we’re seeing is evidence of this booming economy that we’re going to be seeing over the coming months.” In the year since the coronavirus smothered the economy, economists have held out hope for a significant turnaround defined by plentiful job opportunities, higher wages and supercharged spending after months of pent-up demand. But the tantalizing promise at times appeared unlikely at best: After a period of growth over the summer, job gains largely stalled heading into the new year. New state unemployment claims spiked to over a million in one week in January. Retail sales, bolstered by stimulus payments, jumped in January only to slide the next month. Seasonally adjusted advance monthly sales for retail and food services. Source: Commerce Department The New York Times Yet recent weeks have delivered increasing reason for hope. With a fresh round of federal payments in their pockets and vaccines in their arms, many Americans have begun shopping and dining out with renewed alacrity, driving retail sales. A 9.8 percent increase last month was a strong comeback from the nearly 3 percent drop in February, when previous stimulus money had dissipated and a series of winter storms made travel difficult across much of the United States. The increase was broad-based, including big-ticket purchases like cars and discretionary spending on sporting goods, which economists interpreted as a sign of strong household income and growing optimism. Sales of clothing and accessories rose 18 percent, while restaurants and bars recorded a 13 percent increase — demonstrating how many areas of consumption are bouncing back. “I found it very encouraging that there are signs that people are waking up from hibernation, buying new clothes and going out to restaurants,” said Beth Ann Bovino, U.S. chief economist at S&P Global. “I think people are feeling optimistic that the United States will win the war on the virus. And they have good reason to be hopeful.” Many economists said the strong retail sales were likely to continue through the spring, even after the new stimulus payments are used up. The gradual return to normal activities as business restrictions ease has in turn prompted employers to recall workers — and this time, to hold on to them. The Labor Department reported on Thursday that the number of first-time claims for state unemployment benefits fell sharply last week, to about 613,000, the lowest level since the start of the pandemic. That was a decline of 153,000, the largest week-over-week decrease since the summer. In addition, 132,000 new claims were filed for Pandemic Unemployment Assistance, a federal program that covers freelancers, part-timers and others who do not routinely qualify for state benefits. That was a decline of 20,000 from the previous week. “We’re gaining momentum here, which is just unquestionable,” said Diane Swonk, chief economist at the accounting firm Grant Thornton. There are also broader signs of a comeback. After a devastating year, airlines are growing increasingly hopeful as travelers return. Over the past month, more than one million people were screened each day at federal airport checkpoints, according to the Transportation Security Administration, a signal that a sustained travel recovery is underway. As a result, American Airlines said this week that it expected to sell more than 90 percent as many tickets within the United States this summer as it did in the summer of 2019. Delta Air Lines said Thursday that it had recovered about 85 percent of its domestic leisure sales. If trends hold, the airline said, it could be profitable again by the summer. “A year after the onset of the pandemic, travelers are gaining confidence and beginning to reclaim their lives,” Ed Bastian, the company’s chief executive, said in announcing the airline’s first-quarter financial results. “Delta is accelerating into the recovery.” Moreover, the nation’s ports are handling record cargo volumes as consumers stock up. March was the busiest month on record for the Port of Oakland, while the Port of Los Angeles, the main point of entry for goods from Asia, said the first three months of the year were the busiest first quarter in its 114-year history. “As more Americans get vaccinated, businesses reopen and the economy strengthens, consumers continue to purchase goods at a dizzying pace,” Gene Seroka, the port’s executive director, said in a statement. For months, the port, like others around the world, has been overwhelmed by an influx of cargo, forcing container ships to wait days offshore to unload their goods. In many cases, the containers are unloaded and immediately sent back so they can be filled for another eastbound trip. While the backlog remains, Mr. Seroka said, it is expected to be eliminated in the coming months. The improving signs on so many fronts are being reflected in brightening forecasts for the months ahead. Morgan Stanley said Thursday that it expected the economy to grow 7.5 percent in 2021, after shrinking 3.5 percent in 2020. That would be the strongest growth rate for a calendar year since the 1950s. But if the economy appears to be on the upswing, the recovery is still fragile. Weekly applications for unemployment claims have remained stubbornly high for months, causing frustration even as businesses reopen and vaccination rates increase. They have also been a volatile economic indicator, temporarily dipping to their lowest level of the pandemic in mid-March before rising again in recent weeks. “You’re still not popping champagne corks,” Ms. Swonk said. “I will breathe again — and breathe easy again — once we get these numbers back down in the 200,000 range.” What’s more, concerns about workplace safety persist, especially for younger workers who have just become eligible for vaccinations. Many children are still attending schools remotely, complicating the full-time work prospects for their caregivers. Jobless claims for the next few months could remain significantly elevated as the labor market adjusts to a new normal. “The job market conditions for job seekers have really improved extremely quickly between January and now,” said Julia Pollak, a labor economist at the job site ZipRecruiter. “But there are still huge barriers to returning to work.” The rebound in March sales also shows how consumer spending — and the economic rebound as a whole — remains highly dependent on government support. President Biden’s $1.9 trillion American Rescue Plan, which was signed into law last month, provides $1,400-a-person payments to most households. The payments began arriving around March 17, and by the end of the month, economists saw signs that spending was ramping up again, such as increased hotel occupancy and travel through airports. Economists at Morgan Stanley had predicted that core retail sales would jump 6.5 percent in March, driven by the payments. The investment bank said only 30 percent of consumers tended to spend their payments within 10 days, suggesting that many have money on hand that could strengthen April sales as well. Other factors are contributing to the brightening recovery prospects. Mr. Biden moved up the deadline for states to make all adults eligible for vaccination to April 19, and every state has complied, laying the groundwork for more people to rejoin the work force. Students who have been learning remotely are increasingly returning to the classroom, a shift that will especially benefit women, who have been disproportionately sidelined during the pandemic by caregiving duties. Echoing the general perception that post-pandemic life is beckoning, American consumers are feeling increasingly upbeat. One measure of sentiment, tabulated by the Conference Board, showed that consumer confidence in March recorded its biggest one-month gain in nearly a decade, fueled by increased income and stronger business and employment expectations. “This was the deepest, swiftest recession ever,” said Ms. Pollak, the ZipRecruiter economist. “But it’s also turning into the fastest recovery.” Ben Casselman contributed reporting. Sydney Ember is an economics reporter. Previously, she covered Bernie Sanders's presidential campaign and the 2020 election, including living in Iowa for three months during the run-up to the state's caucuses. More about Sydney Ember Michael Corkery is a business reporter who covers the retail industry and its impact on consumers, workers and the economy. He joined The Times in 2014 and was previously a reporter at the Wall Street Journal and the Providence Journal. More about Michael Corkery Niraj Chokshi covers the business of transportation, with a focus on autonomous vehicles, airlines and logistics. More about Niraj Chokshi "
nyt://article/befd30e4-4a31-51e9-a1c1-55e5214d4c71,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/28/business/amazon-revenue-slow-growth-rate.html,2022-07-28T20:41:21+0000,article,News,734,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Amazon.com Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Jassy, Andrew R', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Growth has slowed from its pandemic highs as people return to shopping in-person and pull back on spending in an uncertain economy. Amazon’s growth continued to come down from its pandemic highs, the company said on Thursday, signaling a new normal as online shopping resets amid a tumultuous economy. Amazon reported $121.2 billion in revenue in the three months that ended June 30, up 7.2 percent from a year earlier. It was the company’s slowest growth in more than two decades, down slightly from 7.3 percent the previous quarter. Amazon lost $2 billion, down from a $7.8 billion profit a year earlier. The loss included a $3.9 billion decline in the market value of an investment in Rivian Automotive, an electric truck maker whose shares have fallen since it went public last fall. Also, the strong U.S. dollar reduced sales by $3.6 billion, more than the company expected. Amazon’s growth looked particularly meager versus a strong second quarter last year, when growth surged 27 percent. At the time, vaccines were still in the early stages of distribution and federal stimulus checks buoyed consumer spending. The company’s annual Prime Day deal event, which Morgan Stanley estimated generated $4.6 billion in revenue this year, was held in the second quarter last year but moved to the third quarter this year. But the results were better than Amazon had predicted, and its shares rose more than 12 percent in after-hours trading. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “Despite continued inflationary pressures in fuel, energy and transportation costs, we’re making progress on the more controllable costs we referenced last quarter, particularly improving the productivity of our fulfillment network,” Andy Jassy, Amazon’s chief executive, said in a statement. Amazon said it expected sales to pick up in the current quarter, rising between 13 and 17 percent, with operating income remaining lower than the same period a year earlier. Some retail competitors have said they are experiencing changes as the pandemic arguably comes under control amid uncertain economic conditions. On Monday, Walmart told investors to expect lower profits, as consumers have responded to inflation by making fewer discretionary purchases and focusing more on groceries, which are less profitable. On Tuesday, Shopify, which provides online services to small and midsize retailers, announced that it was laying off 10 percent of its work force. It said that at the start of the pandemic, it thought e-commerce could “permanently leap ahead by five or even 10 years,” but instead online sales activity has reverted “to roughly where pre-Covid data would have suggested it should be at this point.” Brian Olsavsky, Amazon’s finance chief, said in a call with reporters that inflation had not appeared to affect customer behavior. “We have not seen anything yet,” he said. “We saw demand increase during the quarter and had a very strong June.” He indicated that consumers were responding favorably to the fact that Amazon had fewer products out of stock and more available for faster delivery. Mr. Jassy, who took over as chief executive a year ago, has called costs “a really big area of focus,” as he trims an overexpansion of vast networks of warehouse and other operational infrastructure that the company uses to fulfill and deliver customer orders. Amazon has closed, canceled or delayed openings for more than 35 warehouses across the country, according to MWPVL International, a consulting firm that closely tracks Amazon’s operations. The company employed 1.52 million people in the second quarter, almost 100,000 fewer than at the end of March. Mr. Olsavsky said Amazon expected to see more cost reductions show up in its financials later in the year, as the efficiencies scale up. Some of the more profitable parts of Amazon’s business performed better. Subscription revenue grew 14 percent, excluding currency changes, to $8.7 billion, as the price increases that Amazon announced earlier this year for its Prime membership program began rolling through customers accounts in the United States when annual subscriptions were renewed. The company said this week that Prime membership prices would increase substantially in Europe as well. While a downturn in advertising has hit other tech companies, Amazon’s advertising grew 21 percent, excluding currency fluctuations, to $8.8 billion. Because Amazon’s ads are very “transactional,” and shown to customers as they are actively buying, they tend to perform better in downturns, Mr. Olsavsky said. Amazon Web Services, the cloud computing division, grew 33 percent to $19.7 billion. It remained a disproportionate driver of profit. While it generated 16 percent of sales, it produced $5.7 billion in profit. In contrast, Amazon’s retail business lost $2.4 billion. Karen Weise writes about technology and is based in Seattle. Her coverage focuses on Amazon and Microsoft, two of the most powerful companies in America. More about Karen Weise "
nyt://article/a06901d8-08c2-5999-b135-1cd10a6572a9,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/05/31/business/stock-market-company-profits.html,2022-05-31T07:00:13+0000,article,News,1456,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Supply Chain', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Businesses face headwinds as demand weakens, the Federal Reserve raises rates and government stimulus programs end. The profits engine that drove stocks to their highs, making many Americans feel richer than they had in a generation, may now be working in reverse. Companies like Snap, Cisco Systems, Deere, Walmart and Target have cautioned investors about challenges that their businesses are facing, sending their stocks sharply lower and contributing to a plunge that has knocked the S&P 500 index down about 13 percent from its January peak. Big declines in the stock market occurred after investors began to fear that the Federal Reserve would slam the brakes on the economy to tame inflation by raising rates and ending its asset purchases. The central bank’s moves could crater corporate earnings, the thing that investors ultimately care about most. Investors hope that the Fed can achieve a soft landing, bringing down inflation without widespread economic damage. But the recent spate of lackluster corporate financial reports suggest that the economy has already made a turn for the worse — and that more companies will announce slowdowns in their business. “There’s a tremendous amount of uncertainty,” said Mike O’Rourke, chief market strategist at JonesTrading. “I think things are going to weaken.” Snap, known for its Snapchat app, warned investors last week about an abrupt souring in its business, which is almost completely dependent on selling ads. “Since we issued guidance on April 21, 2022, the macroeconomic environment has deteriorated further and faster than anticipated,” Derek Andersen, Snap’s chief financial officer, wrote in a financial filing. Its stock is down 31 percent since the news. Such warnings come after a year of record profits across corporate America. Loose monetary policy and high government spending helped many companies in the S&P 500 in 2021. And some businesses posted higher profits because prices for goods that were in high demand and short supply went up a lot, often more than making up for the fact that the companies sold fewer goods. Profits for companies in the S&P 500 were up 70 percent from 2020 — a rebound from the depressed earnings early in the pandemic — and 33 percent higher than in 2019, which was a pretty good year for corporate profits. But something else happened last year to create the bonanza — and that development could now be unwinding. A New York Times analysis of over 2,000 publicly traded companies outside the financial sector found that most of them increased sales faster than expenses, a remarkable feat when the cost of wages, raw materials and components was rising and supply chains were out of whack. As a result, profit margins, which measure how much money a business makes on each dollar of sales, rose well above the prepandemic average. On the whole, companies made an estimated $200 billion in additional operating profits last year because of that increase in margins. The windfall sent stocks surging in a wave of market exuberance but potentially beyond what business fundamentals merited. The price-to-earnings ratio — an indicator of how much investors are paying for each dollar of corporate profit — for all of the companies in the S&P 500 climbed to 23 at its peak, compared with an average of 18 for the decade before the pandemic. At such an elevated price-to-earnings ratio, stock prices were particularly vulnerable to a sell-off.  And now there are good reasons for investors to be concerned about profits. Many federal stimulus programs created during the pandemic have ended or are ending. The Fed is raising interest rates. And corporate executives are warning that the supply chain problems that may have helped them boost profits last year have become a burden. Deere, the maker of agricultural, construction, gardening and other equipment, said that materials costs were still rising, and that it lacked parts to complete certain products, delaying sales. Cisco, which makes computer networking equipment, also complained that it couldn’t get certain components. Particularly worrisome to investors are signs that demand for some goods and services is flattening or even falling. Walmart noted that higher food costs appeared to have reduced demand for other items. And while Target expected demand for things like apparel and home goods to fall as the government stimulus wore off, the company “didn’t anticipate the magnitude of that shift,” its chief executive, Brian Cornell, said. Shares for the clothing retailer Gap fell sharply last week after it announced disappointing earnings for the first three months of the year, as well as a more pessimistic outlook for its profits through the rest of 2022. The firm was greatly affected by a deep decline in sales for its Old Navy brand, which tends to appeal to lower-income consumers because it carries lower-priced merchandise than Gap stores. “We’re dealing with really volatile consumer signals — whether it was last year in Covid, or this year’s post-Covid behaviors,” Sonia Syngal, Gap’s chief executive, told CNBC in an interview. Many retailers are confronting a similar challenge: Larger inventories and lower sales are pushing them to discount goods, depressing profit margins. Effectively bad news for companies’ profits could be good news for the inflation outlook as prices for at least some goods fall back to earth. That said, many companies did well in the first three months of the year and have offered upbeat projections about the rest of it. Only 97 of the companies in the S&P 500 reported earnings that fell short of analysts’ expectations and 375 businesses exceeded them, according to S&P. The stocks of Macy’s and Dollar General jumped on Thursday after the companies’ executives gave optimistic outlooks. “While macroeconomic pressures on consumer spending increased during the quarter, our customers continued to shop,” Macy’s said in a statement. The retail chain increased its profits forecast for the year. Even Deere and Cisco — two companies that warned about supply chain problems — said there was no drop-off in demand for their products. Wall Street analysts, generally an optimistic lot, remain so now. They have chopped their profit projections for some sectors — companies selling bigger ticket items to consumers and industrial businesses — but increased them for others, energy in particular. Even as economic uncertainty has deepened, the analysts have steadily increased their forecasts for the yearly earnings of all the companies in the S&P 500 and expect earnings to rise 10 percent this year and next, according to data from FactSet. But Mr. O’Rourke said analysts typically didn’t cut estimates until companies issued public warnings that business was starting to sour. Such warnings might not come in earnest until second-quarter earnings are reported starting in July. “Analysts in general know the numbers have to come down,” Mr. O’Rourke said. “They just want something to base it on.” For now, many analysts and corporate executives say they are not worried about demand. They say individuals and businesses have plenty of money to buy goods and services — even with higher interest rates. A recently published survey that the Fed conducted in the fall underlined the dissonance between weak consumer sentiment as measured by the University of Michigan or the Conference Board and solid household bank accounts. The Fed found that the share of adults who said they had the cash to cover a $400 emergency expense had reached its highest level since the polling question began in 2013 — 68 percent. Fed officials declined to speculate on high inflation’s effects on this measure. Worries that spikes in food and fuel costs could force American families to pull drastically back on discretionary purchases have been partly alleviated by recent data. Retail sales climbed to a new high in April, while activity in industrial production also rose to a record level last month. Even as lower-income households have used up much of their pandemic-era savings, it’s possible that higher earners could help sustain heightened levels of consumer spending. Many people are eager to travel now that the coronavirus pandemic has generally faded as a life-altering concern for many families. United Airlines, Southwest Airlines and JetBlue said this month that their second-quarter revenue would be higher than they had expected. Morgan Stanley analysts noted that even though lower-income households would be dealt the biggest blow by inflation, they accounted for a relatively small share of consumption in the economy. Households in the bottom 60 percent of income distribution usually account for less than 40 percent of total expenditures, the analysts found, while the top 40 percent make up more than 60 percent of spending. Jim Paulsen, chief market strategist at the Leuthold Group, said that financial conditions had been tightening for a while and that inflation was likely to moderate soon. That, he said, would make consumers feel better about the economy and give them more purchasing power. In a market drenched with pessimism, any good news could send stocks higher, Mr. Paulsen said. “Our hope has been destroyed,” he said. “And that is a bull market feast. That’s where bears die.” The S&P 500 closed up 6.6 percent last week. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Peter Eavis is a New York-based reporter covering companies and markets. Before coming to The Times in 2012, he worked at The Wall Street Journal. More about Peter Eavis Talmon Joseph Smith is an economics reporter based in New York. More about Talmon Joseph Smith "
nyt://article/6af2118a-79f3-530a-83b0-a250e3117115,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/05/business/dealbook/bitcoin-crypto-crash-wall-street-archegos.html,2022-07-05T12:29:26+0000,article,News,1734,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Bitcoin (Currency)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Nonfungible Tokens (NFTs)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Archegos Capital Management LLC', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Hwang, Bill', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Wall Street (Manhattan, NY)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter Plus, a legal twist for collapsed investment firm and founder Bill Hwang. As Bitcoin prices have plunged and cryptocurrency start-ups have failed, Wall Street’s biggest banks and their wealthiest clients have barely taken a hit. Some have even managed to turn a profit on the collapse. In the great cryptocurrency blood bath of 2022, writes The Times’s Emily Flitter, Wall Street is winning. Unlike in the 2008 crisis, the fortunes of Wall Street and Main Street have diverged. Plunging digital asset prices have left some retail investors with large losses. Lured by the promise of quick returns and astronomical wealth, many individuals bought new digital currencies or stakes in funds that held these assets. That’s not the case for most banks, which generally don’t own crypto or run funds that invest in it. Nor have they lent much into the emerging market for new money. That’s not to say the big banks are without problems: Rising interest rates and falling stock prices have limited the number of companies that want to do deals, leaving bankers idle. But when it comes to crypto, few see a risk of contagion — the chance of losses from digital money markets undermining the banks. Wall Street banks did want to get into crypto, but international regulators wouldn’t let them. Last year, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision, which helps set capital requirements for big banks around the world, proposed giving Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies the highest possible risk weighting. If banks wanted to put those assets on their balance sheets, they had to offset the risk with at least the equivalent value in cash. U.S. regulators also warned banks off. That prevented Wall Street from participating in the bubble the ways it did in previous ones — by making loans so people could buy more houses or stocks, or by making it easier to buy and sell the rising asset. But the suffering of some individuals who bought crypto is still raising questions for regulators. Jacob Willette, a 40-year-old delivery driver in Mesa, Ariz., stored his entire life savings in an account with the crypto lender Celsius that promised high returns. When crypto prices started to slide, Willette looked for reassurance from Celsius executives that his money was safe, but got none, as the company froze more than $8 billion in deposits. “I just don’t see how what they did is not illegal,” Willette said. Black American investors have been hit especially hard because of higher exposure to digital assets, The Financial Times reports. A survey by Ariel Investments and Charles Schwab found that a quarter of Black investors owned crypto investments at the start of the year, compared with 15 percent of white investors. Police detain a “person of interest” after a deadly shooting at a Fourth of July parade. Gunshots rained down from a rooftop onto the parade in Highland Park, Ill., killing six and injuring dozens. Celebrations were called off across the region amid fears of more violence. Airlines cancel more than 1,400 U.S. flights during the holiday weekend. The airlines struggled to keep up with more than seven million weekend travelers in the U.S. Adding to the problems was a glitch in American Airlines’ scheduling system that allowed pilots to drop flights. Southwest, American Airlines and United delayed more than a fifth of their flights on Saturday. Germany posts its first monthly trade deficit in 30 years. Exports have suffered as German companies raise prices to cope with a steep rise in energy costs, caused by Russia’s moves to restrict natural gas deliveries, and interrupted supply chains. It’s the latest sign that Europe’s largest economy is stressed. What is an NFT? A nonfungible token, or NFT, is a digital asset that establishes authenticity and ownership and can be verified on a blockchain network. It is a way to claim ownership of a digital file and is comparable to a certificate of authenticity you might get if you buy a sculpture. How did NFTs become so popular? The technology for NFTs has been around since the mid-2010s but became mainstream in late 2017 with CryptoKitties, a site that allowed people to buy and “breed” limited-edition digital cats with cryptocurrency. Why do artists care about NFTs? NFTs make digital artworks unique and, therefore, sellable. Artists, musicians, influencers and sports franchises can use them to monetize digital goods that were previously cheap or free. The technology also responds to the art world’s need for authentication in an increasingly digital world, permanently linking a digital file to its creator. How lucrative can NFTs be? NFTs generated more than $25 billion in sales in 2021, but the benefits were not equally felt by people in the market. An NFT of a cat with a Pop-Tart body sold for nearly $600,000; an artwork by the Beeple, a digital artist, was bought as an NFT for $69.3 million. Even The Times turned one of its columns into an NFT, auctioning it off for $560,000. The Biden administration is reportedly considering cutting premiums for federal housing loans. Industry officials are asking the Federal Housing Administration for cuts that would save borrowers $50 to $70 a month, according to The Wall Street Journal. The move comes as home prices are at record levels, and inflation is exacerbating homelessness. Nuclear power gets a new push in the U.S. With challenges in meeting clean energy goals and new electricity demands, politicians in both parties are seeking to extend the lives of nuclear reactors and build new ones. But critics of the nuclear industry say waste disposal remains a challenge and fixes for aging facilities are expensive. A former employee of Archegos, the investment firm that caused a brief market panic when it lost more than $10 billion in a matter of days last year, is suing the firm and its founder, Bill Hwang, plus five former top executives for $550 million. The lawsuit was filed today in federal court in Manhattan. The case against Archegos: Brendan Sullivan, a tech stock analyst who joined the firm in 2014 and resigned shortly after it blew up, said he lost $50 million, which was part of a $500 million deferred employee compensation plan that evaporated along with Archegos’s other assets when its highly leveraged options strategy failed. The suit seeks to force Hwang and others to cover the employees’ losses. Hwang was charged with fraud by federal prosecutors this year on suspicion of misleading lenders and market manipulation, and has pleaded not guilty to the government suit; last week, lawyers for Archegos filed motions to dismiss other suits against the firm from the Commodity Futures Trading Commission and the S.E.C. Fund employees were told that the deferred pay plan was guaranteed, the suit says, and that it was invested in highly liquid stocks. Neither claim was true, according to the suit. What’s more, it says, employees were forced to contribute at least 25 percent of their annual bonus to the plan, and declare how much they would defer before they knew the details of the bonus. “The message was crystal clear,” the suit argues. “No contribution. No bonus.” “Hwang and these executives lied to their employees like they lied to the banks,” Sullivan’s lawyer, Michael Bowe of Brown Rudnick, told DealBook. DealBook contacted a lawyer for Hwang and a spokesman for Archegos, neither of whom immediately responded with a comment. The fund tried to dissuade employees from quitting, and cast doubts over deferred compensation payments if they did, the suit says. Sullivan, who left anyway, has not received any money from the plan, though as recently as January of this year the company continued to promise former employees they would do so, according to a letter seen by DealBook that Archegos sent to former employees. Archegos was run like a “cult,” the suit says. Job interviews “revolved around religion and an investigation into the candidate’s religious upbringing,” according to the suit. During performance reviews, it says, Hwang, who is a Christian, told employees to “devote more time to their faith.” At company retreats, employees received praise for publicly declaring gratitude for “God, Hwang and Archegos,” according to the suit. — Lewis A. Friedland, a professor who studies radio at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, on how heavily conservative radio is promoting claims of election fraud, fueling mistrust about the results of the coming midterms. If a recession is on the way, someone forgot to tell stock market analysts. Wall Street analysts, a normally optimistic bunch, appear far more upbeat than investors as a whole. Companies start reporting their second-quarter results next week. At least for now, analysts aren’t even expecting the start of an earnings recession, which is when corporate profits fall for at least two consecutive quarters, according to a recent report from FactSet Research. Analysts expect companies in the S&P 500 to report profits in the second quarter that are 4 percent higher on average than during the same period a year ago. For all of 2022, analysts believe average bottom lines at S&P 500 companies will rise just over 10 percent. Analysts lowered their earnings expectations during the quarter, but only slightly. Economists, on the other hand, have been racing to lower their expectations in the past few months. Last week, JPMorgan Chase’s top economists more than halved their estimate for U.S. G.D.P. growth in the second quarter, to just 1 percent, down from 2.5 percent. Combine that with labor shortages and inflation both driving up costs, and you would expect analysts to be a lot more pessimistic. For now, most of them appear to believe that companies will be able to absorb higher costs by raising prices. At some point, though, those expectations for continued double-digit earnings growth, at least for the year, could set investors up for disappointment. Amazon and Target have seen their expected earnings growth drop the most. In May, Target reported that many of the items on its shelves were not selling as quickly as expected. In general, retailers have seen the biggest drop in expectations of any sector. Profits for so-called consumer discretionary stocks are expected to fall by slightly more than 9 percent during the quarter. Consumers closing their wallets is not a good sign for the economy. But does it mean we are headed into a recession? At least for now, Wall Street analysts are still saying no. Deals IBT Media is asking a New York court to cancel its spinoff of Newsweek magazine. (Newsweek) The Middle East’s I.P.O. market is booming, and Wall Street wants in. (Bloomberg) Banks, forced to swallow losses on risky loans, may pull back funding for leveraged buyouts. (WSJ) Policy The euro has fallen to a 20-year low against the U.S. dollar. (Bloomberg) Biden may reportedly soon roll back tariffs on Chinese imports, including consumer goods. (WSJ) The European Central Bank will adjust its corporate bond portfolio to reflect climate risk. (Bloomberg) Best of the rest A new law in California aims to counter the sleep deprivation epidemic. (Vox) The C.E.O. of Kraken defended his crusade for “libertarian philosophical values” at the crypto exchange. (Protocol) Crosby, Stills & Nash music is back on Spotify. The band had followed Neil Young’s lead in asking for it to be removed to protest against the Joe Rogan podcast. (Billboard) A Chilean worker who was accidentally paid 300 times his normal salary took the money and ran. (Metro U.K.) Previously unheard recordings offer a chilling insight into Adolf Eichmann, the Nazi official executed in Israel for his role in planning the Holocaust. (NYT)  We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. An earlier version of today’s DealBook newsletter misstated what percentage of flights of SouthWest, American Airlines and United were canceled on Saturday. A fifth of all flights were delayed by those airlines, not canceled, which was a much smaller percentage. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Vivian Giang joined The Times as a senior staff editor in 2019. Prior to The Times, she was a freelance writer and editor covering the workplace. More about Vivian Giang Stephen Gandel is a news editor for DealBook. He was previously a senior reporter for CBS News, and a columnist at Bloomberg. He has covered Wall Street and financial firms for most of his career. More about Stephen Gandel Lauren Hirsch joined the New York Times from CNBC in 2020, covering business, policy and mergers and acquisitions.  Ms. Hirsch studied comparative literature at Cornell University and has an M.B.A. from the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni Jenny Gross is a general assignment reporter. Before joining The Times, she covered British politics for the The Wall Street Journal. More about Jenny Gross "
nyt://article/8e1f70e9-bb29-574c-a227-14035c719cbf,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/10/business/tech-meta-apple-tesla-stocks.html,2022-11-10T10:00:26+0000,article,News,1278,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Meta Platforms Inc', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Virtual Reality (Computers)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Layoffs and Job Reductions', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Strategies Stocks like Meta, Microsoft, Amazon and Apple have suffered staggering losses this year. But is this a good time to buy? Maybe, if you’re in it for the long term, our columnist says. Jeff Sommer is the author of Strategies, a weekly column on markets, finance and the economy. The stock market adores high-growth tech companies — until it suddenly doesn’t. And when the mood changes, as it has this year, the brutality of the stock market goes on spectacular display. Consider what has happened to Meta, the company formerly known as Facebook, the archetypal social network. Its earnings have shriveled, and it has begun laying off workers. Worth $1 trillion only a year ago, the company has lost nearly three-quarters of its stock market value. Meta’s problems are idiosyncratic, yet they are also a cautionary tale, one with application to investing in just about all tech companies in an era of raging inflation, rising interest rates and plunging asset prices. Investments that looked splendid when cash was cheap have lost much of their allure. The Federal Reserve isn’t merely raising interest rates. It now promises to hold them at high levels for a long while — making a recession more likely. As long as these austere conditions persist, the stock market is likely to have far less appetite than it did just a year ago for entrepreneurial visions with long incubation periods. Investors have turned against Meta, but a very broad range of tech companies, including Apple, Amazon, Alphabet (Google’s parent company), Microsoft, Netflix, Uber and Nvidia, has also been subjected to market punishment, of varying severity. Everybody with broad stock market holdings owns tech stocks, and those accounted for most of the market’s gains last year. But now, tech-stock declines have pulled down the overall market. The information technology sector alone — which includes Apple, Alphabet, Microsoft and Nvidia — accounted for 44 percent of the decline of the entire S&P 500 this year through October. But that understates tech’s negative impact on the market this year. Meta, Alphabet and Netflix are classified in the S&P 500 as communications services stocks; Amazon, Uber and Tesla are in the consumer discretionary category. Each is unique, but in common parlance, they are all tech stocks, and when you include everything that fits under this expansive rubric, you will have enumerated nearly all of the stock market’s losses. The market’s punitive mood won’t last forever. Companies with solid earnings and strong prospects for growth will be rewarded with higher stock prices down the road, so I wouldn’t abandon investments in tech companies just because they have been hammered lately. I own shares in all of them through low-cost index funds that mirror the entire stock market and intend to keep doing so. But because we don’t know when the tide will turn or which particular stocks will prosper, buying shares that have declined sharply in the expectation that they will soon rise isn’t prudent. You could easily be hurt. Just look at what’s been happening to Meta. In October 2021, when Facebook was still riding high, Mark Zuckerberg changed the company’s name to Meta, signaling his new focus on “the metaverse” — a nascent blend of virtual reality and social networking. In a letter to shareholders, he said achieving this vision would be expensive but worthwhile: “Our hope is that within the next decade, the metaverse will reach a billion people, host hundreds of billions of dollars of digital commerce and support jobs for millions of creators and developers.” I’m agnostic about this claim. It’s quite possible that the metaverse will pay off in a big way, though it may not. It’s a big risk. But that’s what tech growth-stock investing is all about: placing a risky bet in the hope that it leads to exponential, immensely rewarding growth. Sometimes, such bets pay off. But the market environment for most of this year hasn’t favored risky ventures like this. To the contrary, it has, for the most part, been a decidedly “risk off” year — with money flowing out of speculative bets like the metaverse and cryptocurrencies into safe niches like short-term Treasury bills and money market funds. Recall that as recently as September 2021, when tech stocks were still in vogue, the market valued Facebook at more than $1 trillion and ranked it as the sixth-most valuable publicly traded firm in the world. But as skeptical reviews of Meta’s version of immersive reality spread, and the enormous costs of the experiment became evident, the market turned against the company. Apple’s tighter privacy rules didn’t help. They limited Meta’s ability to sell targeted ads that run on iPhones, and constrained its revenue. In one single day in February, Meta’s shares lost $230 billion — more, by some accounts, than any company had ever shed in one day. The flogging has continued. After fresh revelations on Oct. 26 of disappointing earnings and ever-bigger expenditures on the metaverse, the stock plummeted again. It is now worth around $300 billion on the stock market — less than a third of its value last year. Meta announced large-scale layoffs on Wednesday, an act of fiscal discipline that may stem the rout of its stock but that leaves its future open to question. A great deal of damage has already been done, at Meta and other tech companies. Hiring has slowed, and many companies, including Lyft, Stripe, Redfin, Snap and Twitter, under its new owner, Elon Musk, have been laying off employees. This year through Friday, Meta stock declined 66 percent. Other tech companies with long histories of resilience and solid earnings have done better, but none have done well. The S&P 500 has fallen roughly 17 percent this year, thanks, in large part, to tech stocks. Here is a sampling, from FactSet: Apple, -15.8 percent. Microsoft, -26.6 percent. Alphabet, -33.5 percent. Tesla, -44.4 percent. Netflix, -51.8 percent. Amazon, -39.5 percent. If you have an appetite for risk and high regard for these companies, it may be tempting to plunge into these stocks now, simply because they’ve come down so far. That may be a good idea, if you have a strong long-term conviction and have just been waiting for a better price. I have friends who have owned Apple stock on and off for decades, buying and selling when the price has seemed right. If I were buying specific stocks, I would take a value approach — buying solid businesses that generate ample cash flow, as Warren Buffett has recommended, with the intention of owning compelling businesses for a lifetime. I’m strictly a fund investor, however, and use mainly broad low-cost index funds, which I’m still buying steadily, with the idea of holding them for a decade or more. They include tech stocks and a wide range of others, including fossil-fuel stocks like Exxon and Chevron, and health care companies like Cardinal Health and Cigna, that have prevented my portfolio returns from being even worse. I hold bonds in these broad funds, too. They haven’t helped much lately, though I expect bonds will soon perform better, with interest rates already having risen substantially. In short, I wouldn’t put money into tech stocks — or any other stocks, now or ever — with the hope of making a quick buck. The risks seem too high, and the odds of mismanaging the timing are too great. Especially in a fraught economy like this one, I would focus first on making sure I had enough money to pay the bills before putting any of it into stocks. But, for the long run, I’m still optimistic. If you have enough resources to withstand what may well be further market declines, I would try not to worry too much about the awful performance of tech stocks. Many of these tech companies are still generating reasonable profits, and others will make a lot of money one day, maybe even Meta. I wouldn’t place a big bet on any one of them, but I’d bet on the entire market over the next decade or two. Jeff Sommer writes Strategies, a column on markets, finance and the economy. He also edits business news. Previously, he was a national editor. At Newsday, he was the foreign editor and a correspondent in Asia and Eastern Europe. More about Jeff Sommer "
nyt://article/2d83561e-d8d8-5cf0-a247-82b4ef7086f1,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/03/31/business/tech-stocks-sp-500.html,2023-03-31T09:00:15+0000,article,News,1358,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'S & P Dow Jones Indices', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Apple Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Microsoft Corp', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Graphics by Eli Murray The fate of the S&P 500 index — used by investors as a barometer for the health of corporate America, and cited by presidents as a measure of their handling of the economy — often comes down to just two companies: Apple and Microsoft. The companies that make up the S&P 500, sized by share of market value. Apple Microsoft Tech companies 6.2% 7.1% Tesla 1.5% Netflix 0.44% Lockheed  Martin These 32 companies combined account for 6.3% of the index 0.32% Starbucks 0.34% Apple Microsoft Tech companies 6.2% 7.1% Tesla 1.5% Netflix 0.44% Lockheed  Martin These 32 companies combined account for 6.3% of the index 0.32% Starbucks 0.34% Source: S&P Dow Jones Indices This means it’s hard to invest in the U.S. stock market, such as through a 401(k) or pension plan, and not be highly dependent on the fate of the two tech giants. More than $15 trillion in assets, from pension funds and endowments to insurance companies, are linked to the performance of the S&P 500 index in some way, according to S&P Dow Jones Indices, with more than 10 cents of every dollar allocated to the broad index flowing through to Microsoft’s and Apple’s market valuation. It is a phenomenon explained by how the benchmark is constructed, and it is amplified by the way tech has come to dwarf other industries, in the markets and the economy. And it means that the two companies together can sway the direction of the broad market, sometimes masking turmoil that has taken place underneath. Trading in March offers a clear example. Even after the failures of two regional banks in the United States and the rescue of a global investment bank in Europe sent a jolt through the financial system and raised new fears about an already fragile global economy, the S&P 500 ended the month up 3.5 percent. Apple and Microsoft accounted for about half of that gain, according to data from S&P. Both were seemingly immune to the banking crisis and boosted by fervor over artificial intelligence, with Apple rising 11.4 percent during the month and Microsoft 15.6 percent. It can be jarring for investors to see the index perform so differently from what they may have predicted, said Fiona Cincotta, a stock market analyst at StoneX, a brokerage. “It’s phenomenal that two companies can direct so much power within the S&P 500,” she said. “These two companies seem to have been single-handedly directing the index.” It was true even at the height of the frenzy. On Monday, March 13, immediately after the government seized Silicon Valley Bank and Signature Bank, signs of panic were everywhere: Several regional banks suffered their worst day ever in the stock market, with First Republic Bank down more than 60 percent, in conditions so chaotic that trading in many individual stocks was halted as stock exchanges tried to limit the damage. Outside the stock market, government bond yields went haywire, oil prices slid and the dollar weakened, all showing that alarms about the economy were ringing on trading desks around the world. Yet the S&P 500 spent much of the day in positive territory, and it ended with a barely noticeable decline of 0.1 percent. Credit, again, goes to Microsoft and Apple, which both rose enough to counter a 15 percent slide in the entire regional banking sector that day. Much of this comes down to how the S&P 500 is designed. Its value is calculated by a measure that considers the overall market capitalization of a company. It means the stock moves of the largest companies carry the greatest weight, because even slight changes in their value create or destroy billions of dollars of shareholder value. As one of 11 sectors that make up the S&P 500, the tech industry accounts for more than a quarter of the stock index’s value. Real estate 100% Utilities Communications 14% of index 2001 Tech 29% of index 2021 Financials Health Consumer  staples Consumer  discretionary Industrial Materials Energy 0 1990 1995 2000 2005 2010 2015 2020 Real estate 100% Utilities Communications 14% of index 2001 Technology Financials 29% of index 2021 Health Consumer  staples Consumer  discretionary Industrial Materials Energy 0 1990 1995 2000 2005 2010 2015 2020 Source: S&P Dow Jones Indices Categories are sized by market value. Apple, at roughly $2.4 trillion, and Microsoft, at $2.1 trillion, are so large that, taken together, the two companies would be the third-largest sector of the index, behind tech and health care. They would be larger than the energy sector and roughly the size of the financials sector. This influence is a result of a decades-long shift in both the markets and the economy since the dot-com boom, a change that accelerated after the 2008 financial crisis. Low interest rates put in place to support the economy after the Great Recession made borrowing cheap and pushed investors to seek out higher returns from riskier companies, spurring financing and growth for tech companies. Apple and Microsoft excelled. Apple in 2018 became the first American company valued at more than $1 trillion on the stock market. As its value inflated, so did that of its rivals Facebook (now Meta), Amazon, Netflix, and Google (now Alphabet) — a group that came to be called the FANG stocks. They helped to lift the index to new highs over a more than decade-long bull market. Since then, Apple and Microsoft have become proportionally much larger, more than twice the size of the next largest company. This dynamic is not wholly unusual in the history of the S&P 500, though it is extreme, and it has been exacerbated by the rapid growth of some tech companies through the pandemic. (At the end of 2018, Microsoft’s and Apple’s combined index weight was less than Apple’s is today on its own.) The previous company to reach Microsoft’s 6.2 percent weight in the index was IBM in the mid-80s, based on data for the end of each calendar year. “I don’t think it’s a problem,” said Howard Silverblatt, senior index analyst at S&P Dow Jones Indices. “This is what the whole thing is worth, and if Apple or Microsoft go up or down, there is proportional impact because they are worth more. It’s market-driven.” The S&P also produces an “equal weight” index, where each stock has the same effect on the wider group. In March, that index fell 2.6 percent. Another commonly cited measure of Wall Street’s performance, the Dow Jones industrial average is a price-weighted index that has been criticized for how it emphasizes companies based on their share price alone. And then there are the underlying sectors, which are also tracked in separate indexes by S&P. These indexes, which tend to more directly show pain afflicting their subsets of stocks, show that the financial sector fell almost 10 percent in March, while energy stocks dropped 0.5 percent and real estate companies slid 2.1 percent. They also show that other parts of the market — like utilities — fared just fine. “There were so many sectors that underperformed and were in the red across the month, and that was completely pushed over and overshadowed by the gains in big tech,” Ms. Cincotta said. S&P Dow Jones Indices, which maintains the S&P 500 as well as the Dow, has tried to address the impact of these specific weightings, at least on different sectors. In 2018, it moved Alphabet and Meta out of the tech sector and into the communications category with Netflix, while leaving Amazon in the consumer discretionary category with other retailers. Since then, Meta, Amazon and Alphabet have slowly lost value, while Apple and Microsoft have grown. The technology sector in the S&P 500 has also been bolstered by the emergence of new behemoths like the chip maker Nvidia, which is valued around three quarters of a trillion dollars. This month, S&P sought to rebalance the index again, moving a handful of large tech-oriented companies — like Visa and PayPal — into the financials sector, but further entrenching Apple and Microsoft’s dominance as the two tech heavyweights. Of course, this cuts both ways. In 2022, the S&P 500 slumped close to 20 percent, a drop that would have been much smaller without the lousy performance of the tech sector. Apple and Microsoft together accounted for roughly one-fifth of the index’s total decline last year. But for now, analysts see reasons for tech to continue to rally. One reason is the excitement over artificial intelligence. Microsoft has a large stake in OpenAI, the creator of ChatGPT, and many investors foresee the nascent technology driving the next phase of growth for the companies developing the software as well as the chip makers whose processors power it. Tech stocks are also benefiting from the concern over the country’s banks, which has led investors to quickly cut back their expectation for interest rate increases from the Federal Reserve. The sector is particularly sensitive to interest rates, and absent an imminent recession, lower rates in the future would be a boost for the sector. And, analysts said, large technology companies have become havens where investors can wait out the current storm. “It’s been a big bull cycle for tech,” said George Catrambone, the head of Americas trading at DWS, a fund manager. “I don’t think people will give up that paradigm easily.” An earlier version of this article misstated the impact Apple and Microsoft had on the S&P 500 in 2022. The two companies accounted for about one-fifth of the index’s losses last year, not most of the losses. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more Joe Rennison covers financial markets and trading, a beat that ranges from chronicling the vagaries of the stock market to explaining the often-inscrutable trading decisions of Wall Street insiders. More about Joe Rennison "
nyt://article/e70aa1d3-f62b-511e-ae61-3055dd3e2c8b,https://www.nytimes.com/article/inflation-definition.html,2021-12-15T17:51:59+0000,article,News,1590,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Price Index', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Wages and Salaries', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income Inequality', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Interest Rates', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Savings', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shortages', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Real Estate and Housing (Residential)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Onion, The', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Hitler, Adolf', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Weimar (Germany)', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"What is inflation, why is it up and whom does it hurt? A run through common questions about the ongoing price burst. Inflation has become central to the American zeitgeist in 2021 in a way that it hadn’t been for decades. Google searches are up. Supply chain issues feature into popular Instagram posts. The satire website The Onion warned in a recent headline that “higher prices may force Americans to eat reasonable portions on Thanksgiving.” Even as inflation hits its highest level since 1982 and inserts itself as a topic of popular discussion, trying to understand it can be a mind-bending task. Some people who have studied markets and the economy for years often do not know the ins and outs of how inflation is calculated. Its aftereffects on society — from who wins and who loses to whether it is good or bad news — are nuanced. Here’s a guide to help explain what inflation is, including how it is measured and what it means for your economic security and savings. Inflation is a loss of purchasing power over time: It means your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. Inflation is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for a basket of goods and services. In the United States, there are two main inflation gauges. One, the Consumer Price Index or C.P.I., measures the cost of things urban consumers buy out of pocket. The other, the Personal Consumption Expenditures index, or P.C.E., is released at more of a lag and measures things people consume, including things they do not pay for directly — notably health care, which insurance and government benefits help to cover. The two indexes are also built slightly differently. The Federal Reserve, America’s central bank and the institution in charge of keeping prices from increasing too rapidly, targets 2 percent annual increases in the P.C.E. index on average over time. A little bit of consumer price inflation is generally viewed as desirable, in part because it gives companies room to adjust to a changing economy — one where labor and commodities might cost more — without being forced out of business. In the short term, high inflation can be the result of a hot economy — one in which people have a lot of surplus cash or are accessing a lot of credit and want to spend. If consumers are buying goods and services eagerly enough, businesses may need to raise prices because they lack adequate supply. Or companies may choose to charge more because they realize they can raise prices and improve their profits without losing customers. But inflation can — and often does — rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions. Limited oil production can make gas expensive. Supply chain problems can keep goods in short supply, pushing up prices. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. The inflationary burst America has experienced this year has been driven partly by quirks and partly by demand. On the quirk side, the coronavirus has caused factories to shut down and has clogged shipping routes, helping to limit the supply of cars and couches and pushing prices higher. Airfares and rates for hotel rooms have rebounded after dropping in the depths of the pandemic. Gas prices have also contributed to heady gains recently. But it is also the case that consumers, who collectively built up big savings thanks to months in lockdown and repeated government stimulus checks, are spending robustly and their demand is driving part of inflation. They are continuing to buy even as costs for exercise equipment or outdoor furniture rise, and they are shouldering increases in rent and home prices. The indefatigable shopping is helping to keep price increases brisk. Officials say they do not yet see evidence that rapid inflation is turning into a permanent feature of the economic landscape, even as prices rise very quickly: The C.P.I. measure rose by 6.8 percent and P.C.E. climbed 5.7 percent in November from a year earlier, the fastest pace since 1982 for both indexes. There are plenty of reasons to believe that the price burst will fade. Much of the increase this year owes to shortages of goods — from bicycles to cars and beds — that are likely to eventually ease as companies figure out how to produce and transport what people want to buy in a pandemic-altered economy. Many households also have built up savings, in part because of repeated stimulus payments, but they eventually could exhaust those. Plus, before the pandemic, aging demographics and high inequality in income and wealth had combined to drag inflation steadily lower for years as people preferred to save money instead of spending it, and those basic economic building blocks haven’t changed. But there are concerning signs that inflation is becoming stickier, meaning that it might last rather than fading with time. Rents have picked up sharply as home prices have risen and would-be buyers have found themselves locked out of ownership. Consumers are slowly starting to anticipate higher prices, though long-term inflation expectations have yet to jump drastically higher. In the longer term, the (sometimes contested) theory goes, high inflation can become entrenched if workers begin to expect it and can successfully negotiate wage increases to cover their climbing costs. Companies, facing higher labor bills, may manage to pass the costs onto consumers — and voilà, you have a situation where pay and prices push one another steadily upward. Whether inflation is “bad” depends on the circumstances. Most everyone agrees that super fast price increases — often called hyperinflation — spell trouble. They destabilize political systems, turn middle-class workers into paupers overnight, and make it impossible for businesses to plan. Weimar Germany, where hyperinflation helped to usher Adolf Hitler into power, is often cited as a case in point. Moderate price gains, even ones a bit above the Fed’s official goal, are a topic of more-serious debate. Slightly higher inflation can be good for people who owe money at fixed interest rates. If I sell coconuts for $1 and owe my bank $200 today, but next year I am suddenly able to charge $1.05 for my coconuts, my debt becomes easier for me to pay back: Now I only have to sell a little bit over 190 coconuts plus interest. But inflation can be tough for lenders. The bank to whom I owe my $200 is obviously not happy to get 190 coconuts worth of money instead of 200 coconuts worth. While politicians and the public rarely cry for bankers, the same is true for people with savings that bear low interest: Their holdings will not go as far. Inflation can be especially tough for people on fixed incomes, like students and many retirees. For workers taking home paychecks, whether inflation is a good or bad thing hinges on what happens with wages. If a worker’s pay goes up faster than prices increase, they can still find themselves better off in a high-inflation environment. Wages are growing quickly right now, especially for lower earners, but some measures suggest the growth is not keeping pace with inflation as it picks up steeply. Still, many households are also receiving transfers from the government — including an expanded Child Tax Credit — which could keep some families’ financial situations from deteriorating. High or unpredictable inflation that isn’t outmatched by wage gains can be especially hard to shoulder for poor people, simply because they have less wiggle room. Poor households spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities — food, housing and especially gas, which is often a contributor to bouts of high inflation — and less on discretionary expenditures. If rich households face high inflation and their wages do not keep up, they may have to cut back on vacations or dining out. A poor family may be forced to cut back on essentials, like food. “For lower income households, price increases eat up more of their budget,” said Laura Rosner-Warburton, a senior economist at MacroPolicy Perspectives, pointing out that some research suggests that poor people may even end up paying comparatively more for the same products. That may be partly because they lack the free cash to take advantage of temporary discounts. Around the world, poor people historically have reported greater concern around inflation, and that is also the case in the United States in the current episode. Really high inflation typically spells trouble for stocks, said Aswath Damodaran, who teaches corporate finance and valuation at New York University’s Stern School of Business. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, Mr. Damodaran said, while real assets like houses have better held their value. The reason is simple. “You need to make higher returns to break even,” he explained. While it might have been attractive to invest money for a 3 percent annual payback before an inflationary burst, once inflation has taken off to 4 percent, your investment would actually be declining in terms of real-world purchasing power. Plus, inflation can be tough on the underlying business. Companies that lack pricing power — meaning that they cannot easily pass costs on to customers — suffer the worst, because they are forced to absorb input cost increases by taking a hit to their profit margin. High inflation can also spur the Federal Reserve to increase interest rates as it tries to cool off the economy and slow demand. If the central bank does so drastically, it could even plunge the economy into a recession, which would also be bad for stocks — along with everyone else. “The worse inflation is, the more severe the economic shutdown has to be to break the back of inflation,” Mr. Damodaran said. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Jeanna Smialek writes about the Federal Reserve and the economy for The New York Times. She previously covered economics at Bloomberg News.  More about Jeanna Smialek "
nyt://article/91a93d03-b4e7-5d59-8681-bdc40c41e29c,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/25/business/economy/economy-holiday-season.html,2022-11-25T08:00:16+0000,article,News,1637,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income Inequality', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Interest Rates', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Thanksgiving Day', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Even if policymakers achieve a gentle economic slowdown, it won’t be smooth for everyone. Photographs by Tony Luong Reporting from Boston November has been busier than expected at the Langham Hotel in Boston as luxury travelers book rooms in plush suites and hold meetings in gilded conference rooms. The $135-per-adult Thanksgiving brunch at its in-house restaurant sold out weeks ago. Across town, in Dorchester, demand has been booming for a different kind of food service. Catholic Charities is seeing so many families at its free pantry that Beth Chambers, vice president of basic needs at Catholic Charities Boston, has had to close early some days and tell patrons to come back first thing in the morning. On the frigid Saturday morning before Thanksgiving, patrons waiting for free turkeys began to line the street at 4:30 a.m. — more than four hours before the pantry opened. The contrast illustrates a divide that is rippling through America’s topsy-turvy economy nearly three years into the pandemic. Many well-off consumers are still flush with savings and faring well financially, bolstering luxury brands and keeping some high-end retailers and travel companies optimistic about the holiday season. At the same time, America’s poor are running low on cash buffers, struggling to keep up with rising prices and facing climbing borrowing costs if they use credit cards or loans to make ends meet. The situation underlines a grim reality of the pandemic era. The Federal Reserve is raising interest rates to make borrowing more expensive and temper demand, hoping to cool the economy and bring the fastest inflation in decades back under control. Central bankers are trying to manage that without a recession that leaves families out of work. But the adjustment period is already a painful one for many Americans — evidence that even if the central bank can pull off a so-called “soft landing,” it won’t feel benign to everyone. “A lot of these households are moving toward the greater fragility that was the norm before the pandemic,” said Matthew Luzzetti, chief U.S. economist at Deutsche Bank. Many working-class households fared well in 2020 and 2021. Though they lost jobs rapidly at the outset of the pandemic, hiring rebounded swiftly, wage growth has been strong, and repeated government relief checks helped families amass savings. But after 18 months of rapid price inflation — some of which was driven by stimulus-fueled demand — the poor are depleting those cushions. American families were still sitting on about $1.7 trillion in excess savings — extra savings accumulated during the pandemic — by the middle of this year, based on Fed estimates, but about $1.35 trillion of it was held by the top half of earners and just $350 billion in the bottom half. At the same time, prices climbed 7.7 percent in the year through October, far faster than the roughly 2 percent pace that was normal before the pandemic. As savings have run down and necessities like car repair, food and housing become sharply more expensive, many people in lower-income neighborhoods have begun turning to credit cards to sustain their spending. Balances for that group are now above 2019 levels, New York Fed research shows. Some are struggling to keep up at all. “With the cost of food, the explosive cost of eggs, people are having to come to us more,” said Ms. Chambers of Catholic Charities, explaining that other rising prices, including rent, are intensifying the struggle. The location planned to give out 1,000 turkeys and 600 gift cards for turkeys, at its holiday distribution, along with bags of canned creamed corn, cranberry sauce and other Thanksgiving fare. Tina Obadiaru, 42, was among those who lined up to get a turkey on Saturday. A mother of seven, she works full time caring for residents at a group home, but it isn’t enough to make ends meet for her and her family, especially after her Dorchester rent jumped last month to $2,500 from $2,000. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “It is going to be really difficult,” she said. The disproportionate burden inflation places on the poor is one reason Fed officials are scrambling to quickly bring price increases back under control. Central bankers have lifted interest rates from near zero earlier this year to nearly 4 percent, and have signaled that there are more to come. But the process of lowering inflation is also likely to hurt for lower-income people. Fed policies work partly by making it expensive to borrow to sustain consumption, which causes demand to decline and eventually forces sellers to charge less. Rate increases also slow down the labor market, cooling wage growth and possibly even costing jobs. That means that the solid labor market that has buoyed the working class through this challenging time — one that has particularly pushed up wages in lower-paying jobs, including leisure and hospitality, and transportation — could soon crack. In fact, Fed officials are watching for a slowdown in spending and pay gains as a sign that their policies are working. “While higher interest rates, slower growth and softer labor market conditions will bring down inflation, they will also bring some pain to households and businesses,” Jerome H. Powell, the Fed chair, said at a key Fed conference in August. “These are the unfortunate costs of reducing inflation.” Central bankers believe that a measure of pain today is better than what would happen if inflation were allowed to continue unchecked. If people and businesses begin to expect rapid price increases and act accordingly — asking for big raises, instituting frequent and large price increases — inflation could become entrenched in the economy. It would then take a more punishing policy response to bring it to heel, one that could push unemployment even higher. But evidence accumulating across the economy underscores that the slowdown the Fed has been engineering, however necessary, is likely to feel different across different income groups. Consumer spending overall has so far been resilient to the Fed’s rate moves. Retail sales data moderated notably early in the year, but have recently picked back up. Personal consumption expenditures aren’t expanding at a breakneck pace, but they continue to grow. Yet underneath those aggregate numbers, a nascent shift appears to be underway — one that highlights the growing divide in economic comfort between the rich and the poor. Credit card data from Bank of America suggest that high- and middle-income households have replaced lower-income households in driving consumption growth in recent months. Poorer shoppers contributed one-fifth of the growth in discretionary spending in October, compared with around two-fifths a year earlier. “This is likely due to lower-income groups being the most negatively impacted by surging prices — they have also seen the biggest drawdown of bank savings,” economists at the Bank of America Institute wrote in a Nov. 10 note. Even if the poor feel the squeeze of elevated prices and higher interest rates and pull back, the economists noted that continued economic health among richer consumers could keep demand strong in areas where wealthier people tend to spend their money, including services like travel and hotels. At the Langham, a newly renovated hotel in a century-old building that originally served as the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston, there is little to suggest an impending slowdown in spending.  In “The Fed,” the hotel bar named in a nod to the building’s heritage, bartenders are busy every weeknight slinging cocktails with names like “Trust Fund Baby” and “Apple Butter Me Up” (both $16). When guests come back from shopping on nearby Newbury Street, the hotel’s managing director, Michele Grosso, said, their arms are full of bags. He sees the fact that the Thanksgiving brunch sold out so fast as emblematic of continued demand. “If people were pulling back, we’d still be promoting,” he said of the three-course, family-style meal. “Instead, we’ve got a waiting list.” The consumption divide playing out in Boston is also clear at a national level, echoing through corporate earnings calls. American Express added customers for platinum and gold cards at a record clip in the United States last quarter, for instance, as it reported “great demand” for premium, fee-based products. “As we sit here today, we see no changes in the spending behaviors of our customers,” Stephen J. Squeri, the company’s chief executive, told investors during an earnings call last month. Companies that serve more low-income consumers, however, are reporting a marked pullback. “Many consumers this year have relied on borrowing or dipping into their savings to manage their weekly budgets,” Brian Cornell, the chief executive of Target, said in an earnings call on Nov. 16. “But for many consumers, those options are starting to run out. As a result, our guests are exhibiting increasing price sensitivity, becoming more focused on and responsive to promotions and more hesitant to purchase at full price.” The split makes it hard to guess what will happen next with spending and inflation. Some economists think the return of price sensitivity among lower-income consumers will be enough to help overall costs moderate, paving the way for a notable slowdown in 2023. “You get more promotional activity, and companies starting to compete for market share,” said Julia Coronado, founder of MacroPolicy Perspectives. But others warn that, even if the very poor are struggling, it may not be sufficient to bring spending and prices down meaningfully. Many families paid off their credit card balances during the pandemic, and that is now reversing, despite high credit card rates. The borrowing could help some households sustain their consumption for a while, especially paired with strong employment gains and recently fallen gas prices, said Neil Dutta, head of U.S. economics at Renaissance Macro. As the world waits to see whether the Fed can slow down the economy enough to control inflation without forcing the country into an outright recession, those coming to Catholic Charities in Boston illustrate why the stakes are so high. Though many have jobs, they have been buffeted by months of rapid price increases and now face an uncertain future. “Before the pandemic, we thought in cases,” Ms. Chambers said, referencing how much food is needed to meet local need. “Now we think only in pallets.” Jeanna Smialek writes about the Federal Reserve and the economy for The Times. She previously covered economics at Bloomberg News.  More about Jeanna Smialek "
nyt://article/d126c17f-f91a-5f9a-929d-fd1e62fcfdb2,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/18/business/dealbook/corporate-bankruptcies-high-debt.html,2023-05-18T12:04:43+0000,article,News,1828,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-storyline-no', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Golf', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Private Equity', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Antitrust Laws and Competition Issues', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Bankruptcies', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'LIV Golf', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bain Capital', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'PGA Tour Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Silver Lake Partners', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': '4chan', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Amazon.com Inc', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Augusta National Golf Club', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bank of America Corporation', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bed Bath & Beyond Inc', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""David's Bridal Inc"", 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Deutsche Bank AG', 'rank': 16, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Deposit Insurance Corp', 'rank': 17, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Google Inc', 'rank': 18, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Group of Seven', 'rank': 19, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Justice Department', 'rank': 20, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Microsoft Corp', 'rank': 21, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'OpenAI Labs', 'rank': 22, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Professional Golfers Assn', 'rank': 23, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Theranos Inc', 'rank': 24, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Silicon Valley Bank', 'rank': 25, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Software AG', 'rank': 26, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'TikTok (ByteDance)', 'rank': 27, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'World Meteorological Organization', 'rank': 28, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Vice Media Inc', 'rank': 29, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Balwani, Ramesh', 'rank': 30, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Epstein, Jeffrey E (1953- )', 'rank': 31, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Garcia, Sergio', 'rank': 32, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Holmes, Elizabeth (1984- )', 'rank': 33, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'LeCun, Yann', 'rank': 34, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Murdoch, Rupert', 'rank': 35, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Mickelson, Phil', 'rank': 36, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter New data shows that 2023 is shaping up to be the biggest year for Chapter 11 filings in more than a decade. First, corporate America was hit hard by a wave of layoffs. Now come the bankruptcies. New data shows that 2023 is shaping up to be the biggest year for Chapter 11 filings in over a decade, as a potent brew of economic troubles hit financially weakened companies. Though many companies survive bankruptcy, the uptick in cases is a stark reflection of the greater stress that businesses now face. More than 230 American companies have filed for bankruptcy through April, according to S&P Global, the highest level over the first four months of any year since 2010. That number — which counts public companies with at least $2 million in assets or liabilities and private companies with $10 million in publicly traded debt — doesn’t include more recent cases, like Vice Media, Cox Operating and the K.K.R.-backed Envision Healthcare. (On a slightly rosier note: Researchers at Jefferies, the investment bank, have tracked 1,440 bankruptcies of all sizes during the same period, which is below its trend line dating back to 2013.) Blame a slowing economy, fast-rising interest rates and persistent inflation, all of which have whacked companies struggling under heavy debt burdens and challenged business strategies. (Among the more vulnerable? Companies taken over by private equity firms and loaded up with debt.) Lifelines like rock-bottom interest rates and pandemic-related government aid have also largely disappeared. Struggling companies began laying off workers a year ago in an effort to reduce costs. But they are now “running out of time,” S&P analysts wrote in a research note on Wednesday. “Firms that were struggling well before the pandemic and the end of ultralow interest rates have now gone to their breaking point.” Consumer discretionary companies have been the busiest filers, according to S&P. That sector includes retailers and restaurants, typically among the most sensitive businesses to challenging economic conditions. Among the most notable Chapter 11 cases in that area: Bed Bath & Beyond and David’s Bridal. Close behind are financial institutions — which saw an uptick in cases amid the regional banking crisis set off by Silicon Valley Bank’s collapse — health care companies and industrial producers. Expect more filings later this year as banks cut back on lending, Joe Davis, the chief global economist at Vanguard, warned investors this week. Tighter financial conditions — driven in part by the Fed’s extended campaign of rate increases — are expected to persist, potentially forcing companies to pursue more cost cuts, layoffs and, failing that, Chapter 11. Analysts also warn that failure to reach a swift compromise on the debt ceiling could push even more companies to the brink. In perhaps the worst-case economic scenario, credit strategists at Bank of America predicted last week, the corporate debt default rate could zoom up to around 15 percent. However, they predicted that a lower peak of 8 percent was more likely — which would still translate into nearly $1 trillion worth of debt defaulting. Montana bans TikTok. The state became the first to issue such an extreme prohibition of the Chinese-owned video app, saying it aimed “to protect Montanans’ private data and sensitive personal information” from China. Montana’s move, which is likely to be challenged in court and which experts say would be difficult to enforce, comes as state and federal officials weigh how to handle TikTok. Deutsche Bank will pay $75 million to victims of Jeffrey Epstein. If approved by a federal judge, the payout would settle a proposed class-action lawsuit accusing the German lender of facilitating the disgraced financier’s sex trafficking of young women. Victims have also sued JPMorgan Chase, claiming that the bank also ignored warning signs about Mr. Epstein’s wrongdoing. Elizabeth Holmes must report to prison by May 30. A federal appeals court denied the Theranos founder’s efforts to stay out pending her appeal of her fraud convictions. Meanwhile, a lower court ordered Ms. Holmes and her former second-in-command, Sunny Balwani, to pay back $452 million to Theranos investors, including $125 million to the media mogul Rupert Murdoch. Global temperatures will probably set a record in the next five years, forecasters say. Human-caused warming and the El Niño weather phenomenon could push worldwide temperatures to 1.5 degrees Celsius above the 19th-century average, according to the World Meteorological Organization. Scientists say that will have repercussions for health, food security and more, as governments repeatedly delay efforts to slow global warming. Meta reportedly faces a record fine over mishandling European consumer data. Ireland’s data regulator is expected to announce the penalty next week over how the company transferred customer information to the United States. The fine will most likely exceed the 746 million euros Amazon paid in 2021. Google and OpenAI, the Microsoft-backed creator of ChatGPT, have received almost all of the attention in the race to dominate artificial intelligence. But don’t overlook the A.I. ecosystem that Meta is building. The social media giant, which has been investing in the technology for nearly a decade, is taking a starkly different — and more contentious — approach, write The Times’s Cade Metz and Mike Isaac. Meta is doubling down on open source. The tech company wants third parties to use its technology to develop their own A.I.-powered platforms, betting that wider access will accelerate development and spread its influence. “The platform that will win will be the open one,” said Yann LeCun, Meta’s chief A.I. scientist. Critics, including Google and OpenAI, say the approach is dangerous. The rapid rise of A.I. has raised worries about the economic and political consequences of giving the public access to a powerful technology still in its infancy. Within days of Meta’s A.I. release, the system leaked onto 4chan, the online message board known for spreading false and misleading information. Consumers and governments will not adopt A.I. unless it is disseminated more widely, Mr. LeCun contends. Disinformation, he added, can be managed.  In other A.I. news: More than a dozen tech companies see a potential booming market in developing A.I. tools that can spot A.I.-generated fakes — and plagiarism. The Group of 7 summit that begins in Hiroshima, Japan on Saturday is expected to include discussions on how to regulate A.I. In most years, the $2.7 billion takeover of a German software company wouldn’t attract much attention. But an effort by Software AG, which makes business analytics software, to sell itself has led to an unusual battle between two investment giants and an uproar among some shareholders. Silver Lake on Wednesday kicked off a tender offer for Software AG shares, at 32 euros ($34.60) a share. The tech-focused private equity firm has the backing of Software AG’s executive leadership and its largest shareholder, which agreed to sell a 25 percent stake in the company to Silver Lake. Together with a 5 percent stake that the firm acquired in the open market, Silver Lake owns about 30 percent of the German company. For its offer to succeed, the firm needs to acquire at least 50 percent plus one share of Software AG’s outstanding stock. Bain Capital is challenging the deal. The private equity giant — through the portfolio company Rocket Software that it hopes to combine with Software AG — has made a series of unsolicited takeover bids that it says are better for the German firm’s shareholders. (That campaign led Silver Lake to increase its takeover bid from €30 a share.) Bain is offering €34 a share, with the possibility of going higher. It is rare to see private equity firms, which generally seek friendly deals, pursuing an unsolicited takeover offer that management has opposed. A representative for Rocket told DealBook: “We believe that this proposal is a very good proposal for both companies, and we look forward to engaging with management.” Other investors are pushing back against Silver Lake’s offer, which they say undervalues Software AG. At the German company’s annual investor meeting on Wednesday, some spoke out against the bid. “Cooperation with Silver Lake must not lead to competing takeover bids being nipped in the bud to the detriment of all other shareholders,” said a representative for investors who collectively own about 5 percent of Software AG. Still, Bain faces its own challenges: Its offer is nonbinding, subject to due diligence that management opposes, and it’s unclear whether Rocket could secure the necessary financing. Bain has also said that the minimum acceptance rate for any offer it makes would be 40 percent, a potentially difficult level to achieve given Silver Lake’s stake. But pressure from shareholders for a better offer — Software AG’s stock was trading above €34 on Thursday — may yet lead to a shake-up in the contest, ahead of a June 14 deadline for Silver Lake’s offer. The scope of the American authorities’ investigation into the PGA Tour for potential antitrust violations is becoming clearer. Major tournament winners — including Phil Mickelson, Bryson DeChambeau and Sergio García — have been interviewed as the officials look into possible collusion and labor market manipulation in America’s top golfing tournaments. The relationships between organizers of top golf competitions are a big focus. While the PGA Tour runs competitions that make up a majority of golfers’ schedules, it doesn’t run the most prestigious ones: the U.S. Open, overseen by the United States Golf Association; the Masters, administered by Augusta National Golf Club; and the P.G.A. Championships, run by the P.G.A. of America. Executives of those organizers have seats on the governing board behind golf’s ranking system, as does the PGA Tour. Prosecutors may argue that setup hurts consumers. The Justice Department would have to prove that the PGA Tour competes with the tournament organizers, something golf officials privately scoff at. (They do jockey for television rights and sponsorships.) Prosecutors could also argue that the ranking system can be used to exclude certain players, meaning that fans miss out on action.  The PGA Tour declined to comment to The Times but has previously denied wrongdoing. The inquiry comes as pro golf grapples with the rise of LIV Golf, the Saudi-backed league that has offered huge prize money to lure top players like Mickelson and García. The PGA Tour has taken a hard line, suspending defectors to the rival competition. Deals A top Pfizer executive warned that a growing U.S. crackdown on mergers could be a “disaster” for the pharmaceutical industry’s efforts to develop new drugs. (FT) Shein, the fast-fashion giant, has reportedly raised $2 billion in new financing, but cut its valuation by about a third, to $66 billion. (WSJ) Policy Banks are reportedly weighing a plan to refill the government’s federal deposit insurance fund using Treasuries instead of cash, shifting paper losses on those securities to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. (WSJ) The publisher Penguin Random House sued a Florida school district for banning several of its books, the latest instance of a company pushing back against measures described by supporters as “anti-woke.” (FT) Best of the rest Congressional lawmakers want to save AM radio in cars from extinction. (Axios) “Meet the Writers Strike’s Secret Weapon: Hollywood Teamster Boss Lindsay Dougherty.” (Vanity Fair) We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Ravi Mattu is the managing editor of DealBook, based in London. He joined The New York Times in 2022 from the Financial Times, where he held a number of senior roles in Hong Kong and London. More about Ravi Mattu Bernhard Warner joined the The Times in 2022 as a senior editor for DealBook. Previously he was a senior writer and editor at Fortune focusing on business, the economy and the markets. More about Bernhard Warner Sarah Kessler is a senior staff editor for DealBook and the author of “Gigged,” a book about workers in the gig economy. More about Sarah Kessler Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced Lauren Hirsch joined The Times from CNBC in 2020, covering deals and the biggest stories on Wall Street. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni "
nyt://article/77faff48-fb11-5e5a-a8f1-688aabcf19a2,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/04/07/business/economy/wages-prices.html,2023-04-07T07:00:10+0000,article,News,1355,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Wages and Salaries', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Powell, Jerome H', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Interest Rates', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"While fear of a “wage-price spiral” has eased, the Federal Reserve’s course presumes job losses and risks a recession. Some see less painful remedies. As Covid-19 eased its debilitating grip on the U.S. economy two years ago, businesses scrambled to hire. That lifted the pay of the average worker. But as one economic challenge ended, another potential problem emerged. Many economic analysts feared that a wage-price spiral was forming, with employers trying to recover the higher labor costs by increasing prices, and workers in turn continually ratcheting up their pay to make up for inflation’s erosion of their buying power. As wages and prices have risen at the fastest pace in decades, however, it has not been an evenly matched back and forth. Inflation has outstripped wage growth for 22 consecutive months, as calculated by economists at J.P. Morgan. That has prompted economists to debate how much, if at all, pay has driven the current bout of inflation. As recently as November, the Federal Reserve chair, Jerome H. Powell, said at a news conference, “I don’t think wages are the principal story for why prices are going up.” At the same time, influential voices on Wall Street and in Washington are arguing over whether workers’ earnings growth — which, on average, has already slowed — will need to let up further if inflation is to ease to a rate that policymakers find tolerable. Year-over-year percentage change in earnings vs. inflation +8% CONSUMER PRICE INDEX +6.0% in Feb. +6 AVG. HOURLY EARNINGS +4.2% in March +4 +2 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 +8% CONSUMER PRICE INDEX +6.0% in Feb. +6 AVG. HOURLY EARNINGS +4.2% in March +4 +2 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 Note: Data is seasonally adjusted. Source: Bureau of Labor Statistics “We aren’t saying that we’re going to get a wage-price spiral,” said Sonal Desai, a former economics professor at the University of Pittsburgh who is the chief investment officer for Franklin Templeton Fixed Income. “However, wages are high enough that inflation is potentially unstable.” The annual rate of inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index, which exceeded 8 percent for a time last year, is lingering near 6 percent. A separate inflation gauge preferred by the Federal Reserve has steadily cooled since last year — but it’s hovering around 5 percent, far above the Fed’s goal of roughly 2 percent. The labor market is at least indirectly responsible for some share of inflation, since higher income helps people afford necessities and spend on desires. But Omair Sharif, the president of Inflation Insights, a private firm providing research, analysis and forecasts of the Consumer Price Index, said he was “quite skeptical” that wage gains were a primary cause of inflation even in labor-intensive service industries. Mr. Powell has publicly made the case that the pandemic, the discombobulation of supply chains, war in Ukraine and volatile shifts in consumer spending trends are primarily responsible for price instability. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Yet the arc of employee costs is still central to what economists call the “underlying inflation” rate: the level of upward price pressures that would presumably exist even without destabilizing shocks. On that score, Mr. Powell told a congressional committee in March that “some part of the high inflation that we’re experiencing is very likely related to an extremely tight labor market” — building upon his assessment in the fall that “strong wage growth is a good thing, but for wage growth to be sustainable, it needs to be consistent with 2 percent inflation.” Jason Furman, a Harvard economist who headed the Council of Economic Advisers under President Barack Obama, noted recently that wage growth had still been running around 5 percent, an annual rate that he said was “usually consistent with about 4 percent inflation.” The Fed has followed up on that mainstream consensus by continuing to raise interest rates — taking the cost of borrowing for people and businesses even higher in hopes of discouraging their spending and, in turn, reducing employers’ inclination to hire or give raises, cutting off the threat of a wage-price feedback loop. In 2022, Fed data showed median annual pay gains hit a peak still within the range — 3 to 7 percent — that prevailed from the 1980s until the 2007-9 recession, a period that included both low and high inflation. But “the world is a lot different” than it was during past inflation fights, said José Torres, a senior economist at Interactive Brokers — including the Fed’s official policy target of roughly 2 percent inflation, which was set in 2012. “Getting from 5 down to 2 is a lot harder than getting from 8 down to 5,” Mr. Torres said, referring to the percentage rate of inflation. According to the Fed’s projections, inflation will be between 3 and 4 percent by the end of this year, accompanied by a jump in unemployment to 4.5 percent from the 3.6 percent in February — a loss of one million to two million jobs, depending on the estimate. The Fed is also projecting economic contraction over the remaining three quarters of this year. A group of staff economists at the Cleveland Fed — whose work is independent of Fed policy decisions — foresee an even more painful trade-off between inflation and the strength of the labor market. In a January paper, they said that approaching 2 percent inflation by late 2025 would require “a deep recession,” with a doubling of the unemployment rate. Those were the kinds of effects seen in the early 1980s, as the Fed moved to purge double-digit inflation from the economy. A broad-based rise in layoffs that extends to the middle class and the well-off — as happened in the 2008 downturn — would likely dampen inflation for more discretionary goods and services. But critics of the Fed’s somber calculations and its continued tightening of credit say that such pain isn’t necessary. With time, they argue, inflation can ease without millions losing their livelihoods or a better chance at a pay raise. Bespoke Investment Group, a research and money-management firm, believes there is a firm chance that inflation is on a path to fall below 4 percent by June, possibly near 3 percent. Josh Bivens, the chief economist at the Economic Policy Institute, a liberal think tank, said that while higher unemployment generally curbs wage growth and price pressures, wages “are no guide at all” right now with “the unexpected and weird shocks we’ve had over the past couple of years.” Many have argued that in place of an anti-inflation strategy that anticipates higher unemployment, businesses could find other efficiencies or productivity improvements — or profit margins could retreat from current levels, which are the highest since the 1950s. According to Mr. Bivens’s research, profit markups have “relented a bit” — accounting for about a one-third share of price increases in the fourth quarter of last year, down from more than half in the comparable period in 2021 — but are “still quite high relative to a baseline,” which has been closer to 13 percent in previous business cycles. Skanda Amarnath, a former staff member at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York and the executive director of Employ America, a nonprofit that pushes for maximizing employment, said he understood why people were aggrieved. Those who see reliance on curtailing the growth of employment and wages as a “failure of imagination” in the fight against inflation are “so spot on,” Mr. Amarnath said. He and his colleagues have been involved in the lively, ideologically diverse public debates that have emerged about ways that government reforms or regulatory adjustments — in health care, energy, housing, immigration, competition, tax policy and more — could ease prices. But some ideas are, for now, only thought experiments: a result, many say, of political gridlock and policy inertia. “Are there ways out of this that are a kinder, gentler form? Absolutely,” said Diane Swonk, chief economist at the accounting firm KPMG. But “the bottom line,” Ms. Swonk said, is that the Fed has a statutory duty to pursue mild, stable prices in a timely manner. Late last year, Mr. Powell acknowledged that longer-term structural changes to the economy and labor market could ease inflation pressures. “Such policies would take time to implement and have their effects, however,” he cautioned. “For the near term, a moderation of labor demand growth will be required.” Talmon Joseph Smith is an economics reporter based in New York. More about Talmon Joseph Smith "
nyt://article/d5f059a7-c2e2-5cf7-bad7-d5a5d5bb5640,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/21/fashion/jewelry-signet-jared-bucherer.html,2022-11-21T10:03:08+0000,article,News,541,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Jewels and Jewelry', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Diamonds', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Luxury Goods and Services', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Signet Jewelers Ltd', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Birks Group Inc.', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bucherer, Carl F, AG', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'your-feed-fashion', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"From Jared to Birks, regional multibrand groups are elevating their offerings. Over the past decade, retail jewelers, long considered the power brokers of the industry because of their close relationships with consumers, have increasingly found themselves competing with brands like Bulgari, Cartier and Tiffany & Company to capture the attention, and discretionary income, of globe-trotting high-end jewelry buyers. But two can play at that game, and lately, a number of regional multibrand retailers have been trying. Take Jared Atelier, a limited-edition, high-jewelry collection from Jared, the American jewelry chain owned by Signet Jewelers. Signet, based in Akron, Ohio, is the largest jewelry operation in the United States and one of the largest in Britain, with about 2,800 stores in the two countries operating as Kay Jewelers, Zales and other retail jewelry names. Introduced online and in five select Jared locations in October, the collection features 21 diamond-decked styles in limited quantities of one to three pieces each, at up to $125,000. The Atelier pieces reflect “an intentional move to push up and attract a higher-end customer with products not normally seen in Jared,” Bill Brace, president of Jared and Jewelry Services at Signet, said on a recent video call. In mid-November, Bucherer, the high-end Swiss watch and jewelry retailer, held an event in New York to introduce a high jewelry collection composed of 12 elaborate pieces, set with diamonds and colored stones, to celebrate the opening in late October of its first store exclusively dedicated to selling Bucherer high jewelry, on the luxury shopping street Göthestrasse in Frankfurt. “The collection further establishes Bucherer fine jewelry’s worldwide presence,” Carina Ertl, chief marketing officer of Bucherer USA, wrote in an email. “We’ve always had a rich history of craftsmanship, design and unique stones and this collection embodies our atelier’s expertise.” The high jewelry pieces arrived in the midst of a growth spurt for Bucherer. In October, the company announced that it had acquired Leeds & Son, a fine jewelry and watch retailer in Palm Desert, Calif. Founded in Lucerne, Switzerland, in 1888, Bucherer embarked on a high-profile expansion in 2018, when it acquired Tourneau, the American watch retailer with 36 U.S. retail locations, including its TimeMachine flagship at 57th Street and Madison Avenue in New York City, now known as the Bucherer 1888 TimeMachine. Birks, one of Canada’s leading jewelry retailers since its founding in 1879, has a similar story. Earlier this month the company, based in Montreal, introduced a snowflake-inspired high jewelry collection of five pieces — earrings, necklaces and a ring — ranging from $15,800 to $50,000. (The brand scored a rash of free publicity in June, when Meghan, the Duchess of Sussex, wore an earlier version of the snowflake-inspired earrings to Queen Elizabeth II’s Platinum Jubilee celebration.) “We wanted to take a signature Canadian symbol, something ephemeral, and immortalize it in the finest materials (18-karat white gold and diamonds) with a unique and intricate design,” Jean-Christophe Bédos, the company’s chief executive, wrote in an email. The high jewelry push coincides with a plan to expand Birks’s digital footprint in the United States with the debut of an e-commerce website in April. And the growth opportunities extend well beyond the Canadian brand’s southerly neighbor. “Our goal is to continue growing in the U.S. and Europe with our retail partners,” Mr. Bédos wrote. “We also see great growth opportunities in the Middle East and Asia.” nyregion opinion fashion fashion nyregion opinion business opinion magazine "
nyt://article/ae0ea4ee-0611-53b1-8284-36554172c7ed,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/06/15/business/instant-brands-bankruptcy.html,2023-06-15T13:50:23+0000,article,News,775,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Instant Brands Inc', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Bankruptcies', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Instant Pot Co', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Cooking and Cookbooks', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Home Appliances', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Since sales surged during the pandemic, Instant Brands has struggled to find new fans for its beloved Instant Pot and other products. Drop in some ground beef, onions, bell peppers, tomatoes and spices. Press a button, head out for work and return hours later to a perfectly prepared chili. For a while, the Instant Pot, an electronically controlled device that could pressure-cook and slow-cook food, was the kitchen tool everyone wanted. The product hit the market in 2010, quickly became a top seller, and spawned a legion of fans who called themselves “Potheads” and used their Instant Pots to create dozens of recipes. Those Potheads are still around, making soups, stews and puddings. But over the past few years, the Instant Pot has failed to attract new fans, and its parent company is struggling. Instant Brands, the maker of the Instant Pot and other household brands such as Pyrex, Snapware and CorningWare, announced on Monday that it had filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy. The move, according to the company, will secure $132.5 million in funding to allow it to stay afloat and restructure rather than liquidate its business. The company did not respond to a request for comment on Wednesday about its sales. Ben Gadbois, president and chief executive of Instant Brands, said in a statement on Monday that “after successfully navigating the Covid-19 pandemic and the global supply chain crisis, we continue to face additional global macroeconomic and geopolitical challenges that have affected our business.” “In particular, tightening of credit terms and higher interest rates impacted our liquidity levels and made our capital structure unsustainable,” Mr. Gadbois said. Instant Brands said in a statement on Wednesday that the new financing would allow the company to continue paying workers, vendors and suppliers. Its entities outside of the United States and Canada are not part of the bankruptcy filing. The company did not say whether any specific products were selling poorly. But, according to the market research company Circana, dollar and unit sales for multicookers — appliances that can cook food several ways — declined 20 percent from April 2022 to April 2023. Sales data for other Instant Brands products was not available. The drop in sales followed a boom during the coronavirus pandemic: Multicookers and air fryers posted “double-digit dollar sales” in 2020, according to a report by the NPD Group, a market research company that later merged with another firm to form Circana. As a result, the report said, “many households now have these appliances on hand.” Barbara Kahn, a marketing professor at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania, said that “the official excuse” that Instant Brands “is giving is the debt burden.” “That’s a common refrain from these retail companies that go into bankruptcy, that they’re carrying too much debt,” Ms. Kahn said. Instant Brands is one of many companies dealing with a lull in sales after a pandemic-fueled spike. Many people stuck at home during the height of the pandemic took up indoor activities, such as cooking and exercising, and bought the products they needed for them, such as kitchen appliances and Peloton bikes, said Barbara E. Kahn, a marketing professor at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. But after lockdowns ended, people found “they don’t need another Instapot,” Dr. Kahn said, using the gadget’s popular nickname. “They don’t need another Peloton. They don’t need these things that they already bought.” After Peloton bike sales surged early in the pandemic, the home exercise equipment company lost $439 million last year and laid off 20 percent of its work force as people returned to the gym. S&P Global, the credit rating and analytics corporation, downgraded Instant Brands’ rating last week because of lower consumer spending in discretionary categories; it did so again on Tuesday after the company filed for bankruptcy. S&P analysts wrote on June 8 that Instant Brands’ net sales dropped 21.9 percent in the first quarter of 2023 relative to the same period last year, for a seventh straight quarter of declining sales. There is still hope for Instant Brands, said Smrity P. Randhawa, a clinical accounting professor at the University of Southern California Marshall School of Business, because Chapter 11 bankruptcy gives the company the chance to reorganize its business. However, part of the problem for companies like Instant Brands and Peloton is that they produce durable products that do not need to be replaced regularly, Dr. Randhawa said. Dr. Kahn noted that companies that make what are known in economics as “durables” need to give consumers a reason to replace their products. Dr. Randhawa, who bought an Instant Pot during the pandemic, said she still uses it a couple of times a week to make meals. “Social media sold it to me,” she said. “It works. It’s going to probably last for a long time, so there’s no need to rush out to buy another one.” nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Jesus Jiménez is a general assignment reporter. More about Jesus Jiménez "
nyt://article/db07a189-58da-5b13-9e90-a9f7631b25d5,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/10/04/technology/amazon-freezes-corporate-hiring.html,2022-10-04T16:40:23+0000,article,News,937,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Hiring and Promotion', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Amazon.com Inc', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Jassy, Andrew R', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"It is the latest tech company to pump the brakes on hiring amid growing economic concerns. Karen Weise covers Amazon and other technology companies in Seattle. Amazon is freezing corporate hiring in its retail business for the rest of the year, according to an internal announcement obtained by The New York Times, making it the latest company to pull back amid the economic uncertainty. The announcement, in an email to recruiters, said the company was halting global hiring for all corporate roles, including technology positions, in its stores business, which covers Amazon’s physical and online retail business and its logistics operations. More than 10,000 openings were posted in that division, which accounts for the bulk of Amazon’s sales, as of Monday evening. The broad freeze won’t affect the company’s more profitable cloud computing division. Some roles, such as student hiring and field positions, were exempt from the pause, the email said. “Amazon continues to have a significant number of open roles available across the company,” Brad Glasser, an Amazon spokesman, said in a statement. He said some parts of the business were more mature than others, “and we expect to keep adjusting our hiring strategies in each of these businesses at various junctures.” The freeze at the nation’s second-largest private employer is part of a wider cooling in the job market, or at least another sign that it is no longer at a raging boil. On Tuesday, the Labor Department released data showing that while many parts of the job market remained strong, employers were slowing the numbers of roles they were looking to fill. About 10.1 million positions were open in August, down from 11.2 million in July. Federal Reserve officials have hoped that rising interest rates could lower inflation by reducing hiring — and with it the pressure on wages — without requiring widespread layoffs. After a frenzied era of hiring bonuses, raises and shortages, employers are finding it somewhat less competitive to attract and retain workers. Layoffs rose slightly to 1.5 million in August, the new Labor Department data reported, but they remained below their historical average. Layoffs and hiring slowdowns have hit a wide swath of the tech industry in recent months. That includes start-ups as well as publicly traded companies like Peloton and Shopify, which announced in late July that it would lay off 10 percent of its work force after incorrectly predicting how much e-commerce would boom as the pandemic receded. Large companies have not been immune, either. Meta, the parent company of Facebook, told employees last week that it was freezing hiring for most positions. For retailers, the economy is shifting at a critical time as they march toward the all-important holiday shopping season. Many, including Amazon, are hoping to get the season started early as customers hunt for deals and have announced October sales days. Amazon’s new Prime Early Access Sale is next week. Many have signaled a painful period ahead, with rising costs and inventory as consumers cut back on discretionary spending amid high inflation. Walmart, the country’s largest private employer, has said it will hire fewer hourly workers for the holiday shopping season this year. FedEx, which competes with Amazon for delivering packages to customers, said last month that it was freezing hiring, closing stores and parking planes as demand fell short of its forecasts. Amazon told recruiters to tell job candidates that it was not in a hiring freeze, though it went on to say all open job requisitions should be closed in the coming days. It said new openings will be available early next year. Candidates with interviews scheduled before Oct. 15 could still receive offers, but they would not start at Amazon until next year. The email recommended that phone calls to screen candidates and other early recruiting activities should be canceled. Amazon’s listings show it is still hiring warehouse workers, whom it regularly needs because of high turnover. It recently said it was raising wages at its warehouses by an average of about $1 per hour and has not yet announced whether it will hire seasonal associates for the holiday peak season. Under Andy Jassy, who took over as chief executive a little over a year ago, Amazon has been pulling back on spending as it looks to trim costs amid its weakest growth in two decades. Mr. Jassy recently told investors that the company had focused on controlling costs and efficiency in its warehouse and logistics operations. Amazon’s footprint grew fast in recent years, and during the pandemic the company went on a hiring spree unrivaled in the history of corporate America. This year it has slowed its once-rapid warehouse expansion, closing facilities, backing out of leases and mothballing some new buildings. The company employed 1.52 million people in the second quarter, almost 100,000 fewer than at the end of March primarily because of reductions in its hourly work force. The corporate hiring freeze is the latest sign that cost-controlling measures are hitting Amazon’s core retail and technology teams as well. After announcing plans to acquire One Medical, a chain of primary care clinics, it shuttered its own primary care business, telling officials in Washington State, where Amazon is based, that the move could result in 159 layoffs. In recent years, Amazon hosted a Career Day in September, when it recruited for tens of thousands of salaried positions. Last year, it received more than a million job applications. But it did not host the event this year. And last month, on the company’s annual devices day, when it debuts consumer products, the offerings were notably more restrained than in the past. The event focused largely on updates to existing product lines, such as the Fire TV and Kindle. In the past, the event included a number of oddball products with limited obvious consumer potential, like a printer for Post-it notes, an Alexa-enabled ring and an indoor home-security camera drone. nyregion opinion technology technology nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Karen Weise is a technology correspondent based in Seattle, covering Amazon and Microsoft. Her work aims to help readers better understand two of the most powerful companies in America and their growing influence on society. More about Karen Weise "
nyt://article/b8c31df8-0b82-5bb8-81c7-259334d92487,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/29/dining/buy-now-pay-later-loans-groceries.html,2022-08-29T17:00:01+0000,article,News,1816,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Food', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Restaurants', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Afterpay Touch Group Ltd', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Klarna AB', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," Americans are increasingly turning to pay-later services for groceries and other everyday essentials. And there are signs that the practice is putting some in deep debt. “Buy now, pay later” services, which allow consumers to pay for goods in installments, often without interest, have become increasingly common for food purchases. Credit...Chona Kasinger for The New York Times Josh Roberts didn’t think twice about taking out a loan to pay for groceries. It was early in the pandemic, and he was making $16.50 an hour working for a technology company in Cincinnati while supporting his sister and her girlfriend. “We were just not making enough to live,” he said. So he started buying groceries online using a virtual credit card from Klarna, a “buy now, pay later” service that allowed him to break payments into smaller installments that could be made over several weeks, with no interest. Soon Mr. Roberts, 30, was regularly spending beyond his means on food — chicken breasts, bananas, chips, cereal. He fell behind on payments, and ended up owing more than $1,000 to Klarna, an estimated $100 of it in late fees. He already had about $11,000 in student debt, and another $2,000 in unpaid medical bills. “I don’t want to be in debt for a carrot,” he said. “But you have got to do what you’ve got to do.” When pay-later services like Klarna, which was founded in Sweden, arrived in the United States about a decade ago, they were largely used for one-time, discretionary purchases like concert tickets and high-end clothing. But as inflation mounts, Americans are increasingly turning to them to finance something much more mundane and essential: what they eat. And there are signs that the use of these services for repeated, everyday expenses like groceries and restaurant meals is pushing some users, particularly younger people who are already overextended, deeper into debt. “If you are not financially literate, it is easy to abuse it and say, ‘I will just keep using it, it is free money,’” said Mr. Roberts, who has paid off his debt to Klarna and no longer uses the app. Pay-later companies say their products are a convenient tool — like layaway plans or credit cards — to help consumers manage their finances in tough times. The services, with breezy names like Zip, Zilch and Affirm, are easy to use, with well-designed apps, websites, virtual credit cards and widgets. Shoppers can apply for them in a checkout line and be approved in minutes. Unlike credit cards, most of the services don’t charge interest or require applicants to undergo extensive credit checks. There is usually a processing fee for each purchase, typically paid by the merchant. Pay-later companies are already commonplace in countries like South Korea and Australia. Buoyed by inflation and the rise in e-commerce, they have quickly gained a foothold in the United States, where $45.9 billion in pay-later transactions were made online in 2021, up from $15.3 billion the year before, according to GlobalData, a data analytics company. Food, which accounted for about 6 percent of those purchases, appears to be an important part of the growth. In the last year, Zip, a company based in Sydney, Australia, says it has seen 95 percent growth in U.S. grocery purchases, and 64 percent in restaurant transactions. Klarna reports that more than half of the top 100 items its app users are currently buying from national retailers are grocery or household items. Zilch, says groceries and dining out account for 38 percent of its transactions. Philip Belamant, the founder of Zilch, said consumers don’t balk at swiping a credit card to buy lunch or coffee. So why shouldn’t they use a pay-later plan, with no interest, for those purchases? “Why would you take a line of credit out to buy a sandwich?” by using a credit card, he said. “You are doing it today and paying 20 percent interest on it.” But critics of services like Zilch say their ease of use can lull shoppers into thinking they can take on more debt with no consequences. “Buy-now-pay-later companies have really insidiously and ingeniously kind of like marketed themselves and advertised themselves as, ‘I am just your friend, I am just here to help you out,’” said Jathan Sadowski, the author of “Too Smart: How Digital Capitalism Is Extracting Data, Controlling Our Lives and Taking Over the World.” A pay-later purchase is essentially a loan, he said, with its own pitfalls. Some services charge late fees that can exceed the interest charges on credit cards, according to a March report by Consumer Reports. Companies aren’t always transparent about the terms of using the service, and missed payments can hurt users’ credit scores. Pay-later users tend to be economically vulnerable. A July report by the financial services company Fitch Ratings found that they carry more debt than the general population, and that more than 41 percent of applicants have a poor credit history. The report showed that delinquency rates for some pay-later services more than doubled from June 2021 to last March — from 1.7 percent to 4.1 percent at Afterpay, for example — while delinquency rates for major credit cards remained unchanged, at roughly 1.4 percent.  Pay-later services are less regulated than other forms of credit, and it is unclear exactly how many Americans are using them. The federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau monitors firms that offer the loans, and in December opened an inquiry into the business practices of five companies. But Consumer Reports says many pay-later arrangements are designed to circumvent the Truth in Lending Act, which means they aren’t subject to the same disclosure protections as credit cards. Some credit agencies include pay-later data in their reports, and others are working toward that goal. So a seemingly trivial decision like paying for chips using a pay-later service can end up seriously harming one’s financial health, Mr. Sadowski said. “Because I used one of these loan services to buy groceries, that might in the future impact my ability to buy a car, get a job, rent an apartment — all the things that use our credit score to assess and judge our worth in society.” Some of the companies pointed out that most payments are made on time. At Afterpay, 98 percent of its payments in the first quarter of 2022 didn’t incur a late fee, said Alex Fisher, the company’s head of North American sales. And the service doesn’t allow new purchases by anyone who has missed a payment. For consumers who keep up with payments, the services can be a boon as food prices soar. “My husband and I have good jobs, we are able to pay for the things we want to pay for,” said Ambar Valdez, who works for Medicare in San Antonio. But her grocery bills have almost doubled. Thanks to services like Klarna and Afterpay, “I don’t have to worry about groceries, and that is great,” said Ms. Valdez, 30. “I can focus on my light bill, my phone bill, my internet.” Jessie Blum, 39, an instructional designer in Rutherford, N.J., didn’t need convincing to use a pay-later system for her everyday food purchases. “If I wanted to pick up a coffee on the way home from somewhere and I didn’t have any money in my coffee or eat-out budget, I would push it to next month’s budget,” she said. Others said it takes some effort to juggle multiple payment plans. Noelle Platt, 27, a stay-at-home mother of one in Kerry, N.C., uses Zip and Sezzle to buy groceries. The number of payments can pile up, she said. “We had a whole bunch going at once for some reason. It was stressful planning them out.” But she has been able to manage for now. She first used the services at the start of the pandemic, when her husband lost his job at a coffee and tea warehouse. As the price of groceries has risen, she still relies on them. Hannah Brown, a hair stylist in Phoenix, said her paycheck varies from week to week, so she finds it easier to pay for food in installments. But because she pays less up front, she’ll spend double what she normally would on takeout meals. “It doesn’t feel like I just spent $80,” said Ms. Brown, 32, adding, “I can’t say it is a healthy habit.” Many of her co-workers use pay-later services, she said; several have defaulted on payments, and they aren’t the ones who use the loans for clothing. They use them to buy food. Chris Browning a financial analyst who hosts the podcast “Popcorn Finance,” said the growing use of the loans for something as basic as food, he said, signals a weak social safety net. Some states have recently ended or scaled back food-stamp benefits, even though more than 23 million Americans reported being sometimes or often food insecure in June, according to census data. Without programs to meet people’s essential needs, “something needs to come in to fill the gap,” Mr. Browning said. “And when it is based on consumerism and capitalism, this is what fills the gap: companies coming in to make these purchases more attainable, even if there are downsides.” Mike Taiano, a senior banking analyst for Fitch Ratings, said that what especially concerns him about pay-later loans is that consumers are often encouraged to link their credit cards to the service. “It potentially creates a cycle-of-debt issue, where consumers are paying off one type of debt with another type of debt,” and end up paying high interest rates on their credit cards, he said. Many of the pay-later food purchases have been groceries. But restaurants are edging into that territory. The San Francisco-based payments company Block, Inc. completed its acquisition of Afterpay in January. Restaurants are one of the largest clienteles for Square, Block’s retail technology company, and Afterpay has been added to those businesses’ point-of-sale systems. Broad Street Oyster Company, a restaurant in Malibu, Calif., has offered Afterpay for a year, and the owner, Christopher Tompkins said 5 percent of online customers use it. That may not sound like much, he said, but the average pay-later transaction is 40 percent higher than the average online order, and twice as much as an average in-person order. Afterpay currently gives Mr. Tompkins a temporary discount on its processing fee. When that discount expires, he said, he might reconsider using the service. Dennis Cantwell and Monica Wong discovered that their San Francisco restaurant, Palm City Wines, offered a pay-later option when they saw a viral tweet in late June by a customer who joked about paying for a $19 hoagie in installments. The option had come with Palm City’s point-of-sale system; Mr. Cantwell said he missed an email telling him how to opt out. The restaurant no longer offers Afterpay. If it did, Mr. Cantwell said, he would have to raise the price of small menu items by $2 to pay the processing fees. A hoagie, he said, is “an old-school working-class item,” he added. Financing one? “It seems so bizarre.” Or maybe it’s not so far-fetched. Mr. Roberts, the grocery customer who got caught up in late fees, said he would rather shop for food at a dollar store than use a pay-later service. Would he use one to eat out? “Maybe,” he said. “For a really nice meal.” Follow New York Times Cooking on Instagram, Facebook, YouTube, TikTok and Pinterest. Get regular updates from New York Times Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice. Priya Krishna is a Times Food staff reporter. She is the author of multiple cookbooks, including the best-selling ""Indian-ish."" More about Priya Krishna "
nyt://article/12abed4e-0889-5778-8366-f20a5da8786b,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/05/18/business/macys-first-quarter-earnings.html,2021-05-18T13:44:15+0000,article,News,907,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Bloomingdale's"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gennette, Jeffrey', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The retailer expressed optimism after sales soared 56 percent in the first quarter, raising its forecast for the year as consumers begin to buy apparel for get-togethers. A combination of government stimulus and faster-than-expected vaccinations drove a sales rebound at Macy’s over the past three months, in what could signal the start of a post-pandemic shopping boom. Macy’s said on Tuesday that sales jumped 56 percent in its first quarter, which ended May 1, from the same period last year, when the start of the pandemic pulverized the retailer’s revenue. It raised its sales and profit forecast for the year. The company, which also owns Bloomingdale’s, reported $4.7 billion in sales and a profit of $103 million. That compares with about $3 billion in sales and a loss of $3.6 billion in the same period last year. “Vaccinations were faster than expected,” Jeff Gennette, the chief executive of Macy’s, said in an interview on Tuesday. “As the vaccination rates climbed and customers became more and more comfortable, kind of emerging from their pandemic behavior, we definitely saw it in a real pickup in store traffic — and then once they were in stores, how they responded with their purchases.” He added, “We don’t think this is a small-term bump or pop. We think this is momentum that has not peaked yet and is going to continue to play out through our business in 2021 and then to 2022 and beyond.” The retailer said it anticipated sales of $21.7 billion to $22.2 billion this year, up from a previous forecast of $19.8 billion to $20.8 billion. Macy’s is part of a larger group of retailers that have reported higher sales in the first few months of 2021, though its results stand apart because of its focus on apparel and other discretionary items. On Tuesday, Walmart said its sales in the United States in its first quarter, which ended April 30, increased 6 percent to $93.2 billion, while operating profit grew about 27 percent to $5.5 billion. Walmart’s earnings were strengthened by its e-commerce sales, which increased 37 percent in the first quarter. On an earnings call, the company also pointed to strong “reopening categories, such as travel, celebration and personal care.” Retail sales were flat last month after a buoyant March, the Commerce Department said on Friday, suggesting an uneven recovery for the overall industry. Macy’s said on Tuesday that customers were starting to attend events again after a year of isolation and were snapping up dresses for proms, casual get-togethers and weddings. Men’s tailored clothing, travel and swimwear have also seen increases. Traffic is improving at Macy’s flagship stores, which lost visitors in the past year, though the company said it did not expect international tourism, which can account for 3 to 4 percent of business at Macy’s and Bloomingdale’s, to recover until 2022. “Dresses, luggage or men’s clothing — those are all areas that have really been kind of dormant categories for us in 2020,” Mr. Gennette said. “They’ve really kicked in during the first quarter of 2021, and they were just getting stronger as the quarter progressed.” Macy’s, which is based in New York, said it was still seeing strong sales in pandemic-friendly categories like home goods. Macy’s has hundreds of stores around the country, and its results often help paint a picture of American consumer habits and the health of malls. Department stores, which have already been under intense pressure in recent years, were battered by the pandemic as consumers postponed gatherings, worked from home and avoided enclosed spaces. Neiman Marcus and J.C. Penney filed for bankruptcy and restructured their operations during the crisis, closing numerous stores and culling their staff. Online shopping, which has grown significantly at Macy’s, could not fully replace the typical productivity of its more than 500 locations, where people are, in normal times, encouraged to browse, touch products and visit fitting rooms. The company said it expected store traffic to increase as customers, particularly older ones, continue to get comfortable with in-person shopping again. Macy’s, which has been closing stores in certain markets for years now, still believes that the divide between America’s best malls and those that are teetering will continue to grow in coming years. “I don’t think that dynamic that we walked into the pandemic with has changed fundamentally,” Mr. Gennette said. Still, he added, “coming out of it, I do think that there is a real role for stores in our business.” The strong results from Macy’s was a positive sign for the retail sector, which has been hammered by plunging sales and store closures in the last year. But the company’s first-quarter sales were still down about 15 percent from $5.5 billion in the same period of 2019. Macy’s was under strain even before the pandemic, and its declining share price last year led to its removal from the S&P 500. Mr. Gennette said that he believed that Macy’s could return to its 2019 sales levels but did not share a timeline for when that might occur. In an interview earlier this year, Mr. Gennette had been hesitant about calling a return of wedding dates and restaurant reservations in the summer. Macy’s recently proposed the construction of a commercial office tower on top of its flagship Herald Square store in New York. The company said on the call on Tuesday that it expected the project would produce a “significant” amount of cash to support its future plans. Mr. Gennette declined to comment on whether Macy’s would make money by leasing the proposed office space or selling the building, though he noted that the company had been working on the project for about four years and had “a vision for it.” Michael Corkery contributed reporting. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Sapna Maheshwari covers retail. She has won reporting awards from the Society of American Business Editors and Writers and the Newswomen’s Club of New York and was on Time’s list of “140 Best Twitter Feeds of 2014.” More about Sapna Maheshwari "
nyt://article/4f38386a-aacb-5568-a12e-5d2a2cfe208a,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/10/14/business/mutual-funds/investing-environmental-social-governance-funds.html,2022-10-14T09:00:17+0000,article,News,1461,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporate Social Responsibility', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Asset Allocation (Personal Finances)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Exchange Traded Funds', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': ""Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index"", 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Mutual Funds', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Socially conscious funds often hold lots of growth stocks, especially tech shares. That’s been painful this year, as the stock market has favored value stocks like energy and industrial companies. One of the pitches for socially conscious stock funds has been that their performance won’t differ that much from the stock market’s. In theory, that lets you invest according to your values while approximating the market’s return. This year’s stock market swoon has shown that to be painfully true — and then some. Socially responsible stock funds haven’t just fallen in step with the S&P 500. They’ve sunk a bit more. The stock funds tracked by Morningstar dropped about 26.4 percent this year through Sept. 30, while the S&P 500 was down about 23.9 percent. The offerings are better known as environmental, social and governance, or E.S.G., funds. That name stems from the fact that their managers, in making investment decisions, weigh environmental, social and corporate governance factors alongside financial ones. Whatever you call them, something these stock offerings share with many large-capitalization stock funds and exchange-traded funds is that they often own a lot of technology companies. Tech stocks account for about one-quarter of the assets of the average large-cap E.S.G. fund, compared with only one-fifth of the assets of the average traditional large-cap fund, according to Morningstar. And technology has been one of the sorriest stock-market sectors this year, down 31.4 percent through the end of the third quarter. Many of the funds favor what investment professionals call growth stocks, which include technology names. This year’s market has battered growth stocks, while their antitheses, value stocks, have fared better. “There are probably a lot of E.S.G. investors who didn’t know they were overweight growth,” said Jennifer Ellison, a financial adviser with Cerity Partners who is based in San Francisco. “But they’re waking up now and asking, ‘Why is my E.S.G. fund underperforming?’ We’re having a lot of those discussions with clients.” What’s the difference between growth and value stocks, and why does it matter to E.S.G investing? You could say growth stocks are favored by seers — people who years ago imagined that Google’s ability to vacuum up data from online searches could yield more than just a better search engine. (Google’s parent company is now called Alphabet.) Value stocks are favored by bargain hunters — people who today may envision General Electric not as an aging industrial conglomerate but as a sturdy collection of assets trading at a discount. Sometimes — as was the case for much of the last decade — the stock market favors growth stocks. Other times — like this year — it favors value stocks. The S&P 500 Growth Index fell 30.4 percent through Sept. 30, while the S&P 500 Value Index dropped 16.6 percent. In theory, investors with diversified portfolios should own both growth- and value-oriented funds — or a single fund with roughly balanced allocations of growth and value stocks. An example of an actively managed socially conscious, or sustainable, fund with such a portfolio is the Vanguard Global E.S.G. Select Stock Fund. It has an expense ratio of 0.56 percent and has returned an annual average of 7.7 percent since its 2019 inception, though it is down 23 percent for the year through the third quarter. It owns a mix of U.S. and foreign stocks, and tech stocks account for only about 15 percent of its holdings. The recent woes of many socially responsible stock funds and E.T.F.s raise the question why they have tilted toward growth stocks. Part of the reason is that early E.S.G. clients tended to be driven mainly by their values, said Michelle Dunstan, chief responsibility officer for AllianceBernstein. Funds catered to those clients by excluding environmentally damaging businesses, like nuclear power producers, and holding the best-of-the-best E.S.G. performers, she said. That led them toward growth ones like technology and consumer discretionary stocks. Ms. Dunstan said sustainable strategies are now seeking out companies trying to improve their E.S.G. performance. She said AllianceBernstein, in its research, hasn’t been able to connect good E.S.G. ratings with stocks outperforming their peers. “But we have made a link with improvement in E.S.G. ratings and outperformance. These companies aren’t just improving their E.S.G. ratings — they’re trying to become better companies overall.” E.S.G. ratings from data providers like MSCI and Morningstar Sustainalytics can also influence stocks’ inclusion in sustainable funds, said Jon Hale, head of sustainability research for Morningstar. These ratings address risks like companies’ greenhouse gas emissions or workplace safety violations. “Generally speaking, if you took the entire universe of stocks and evaluated them based on E.S.G. metrics, growth stocks would score higher than value stocks,” he said. Many of the funds also bar companies that own fossil fuel reserves or depend heavily on fossil fuels in their operations. That knocks out not only much of the energy companies but also some manufacturers and utilities, other common value plays. Energy has been by far the best-performing sector this year, returning nearly 35 percent through Sept. 30. “If you exclude hydrocarbons or heavy industry, you’re going to tend to skew more growthy,” said Aaron S. Dunn, co-manager of the Calvert Focused Value Fund. Mr. Dunn’s fund, an E.S.G. offering, owns two energy companies — NextEra and Constellation Energy — among its 30 holdings. The fund started earlier this year. Only a few other sustainable value funds and E.T.F.s exist. The biggest actively managed offering in the niche is the Parnassus Endeavor Fund, headed by Billy Hwan. Over the five years that ended Sept. 30, the fund, with a net expense ratio of 0.88 percent, returned an annual average of 9 percent; it lost 24.2 percent this year through Sept. 30. Its largest holding is Merck, a pharmaceutical company that Mr. Hwan said he bought when its future looked uncertain. “They had an overreliance on one drug” — a cancer treatment called Keytruda — “but were investing hugely in R.&D.,” he said. “New management came in and diversified their revenues. A year and a half later, it’s one of our better performers.” Among the indexed options for sustainable value investing are the Nuveen E.S.G. Large-Cap Value E.T.F. and the Calvert U.S. Large-Cap Value Responsible Index Fund. Jordan Farris, head of E.T.F. product for Nuveen, said his company’s E.T.F. aims to give investors risk and return similar to a typical value fund but with sustainability considerations factored in. The E.T.F.’s holdings — it has about 100 — have “higher E.S.G. scores and low carbon-emissions intensity,” he said. “Investors often assume E.S.G. funds are low carbon, but that’s not necessarily the case,” he said. “We remove companies that own coal, oil or natural gas that’s still in the ground. This makes our product align with investors’ perceptions of what E.S.G. means.” The fund, with an expense ratio of 0.25 percent, has returned an annual average of 5 percent over the last five years. Why does a nonprofessional need to care about subtleties like growth versus value stocks and how much a fund holds of each? Some socially conscious funds, like Vanguard’s E.S.G. offering, save you from that worry. These are often referred to as core or blend funds. The Northern U.S. Quality E.S.G. Fund is similar in its investments. Its managers pair E.S.G. evaluations with assessments of financial quality and end up with a blended portfolio intended to be less risky than the typical sustainable stock fund. “There are many stocks that rank highly from an E.S.G. perspective that don’t necessarily rank highly from a financial perspective,” said Michael Hunstad, chief investment officer for global equities at Northern Trust.  “You really need to control the unintended risk of E.S.G. investing,” he said. “If you’re naïve, you’ll be underexposed to energy and utilities and underweight the U.S., and that’s a lot of extraneous risk.” The Northern Trust fund’s sector allocations look much like those of its non-E.S.G. benchmark, the Russell 1000. Since the fund’s inception in October 2017, it has outperformed the benchmark, returning an annual average of 9.5 percent versus the index’s 8.9 percent. It lost 24.6 percent this year through Sept. 30. The fund has a net expense ratio of 0.49 percent. The reason to aim for a balance of growth and value stocks, whether in one fund or across your portfolio, isn’t just to achieve a finance professor’s vision of an ideal asset allocation. A portfolio with more balanced risks is one that an investor is more likely to stick with in turbulent times, like the current market, said Wendy Cromwell, head of sustainable investment for Wellington Management. The trouble with owning sustainable funds — or any funds — that load up on growth stocks is you’ll be tempted to bail out when growth stocks sink, she said. (The same would be true if you owned value-oriented funds when value sagged.) Research shows that retail investors trade too often and buy and sell at the wrong time. “It can be really hard for retail investors to hold the line when the opposite style is outperforming,” she said. “But the trick is to stick with your long-term plan. You want to invest in funds that help you overcome your own bad tendencies.” nyregion opinion technology technology nyregion opinion business opinion magazine An earlier version of this article misstated the return for the Russell 1000 Index since the inception of the Northern Trust U.S. Quality E.S.G. Fund in October 2017. It was 8.9 percent, not 11.7 percent. The earlier version also misstated how the performance of Northern Trust compared with the index’s over that time. Northern Trust outperformed the index; it did not nearly match the index. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://article/d9c45d49-e387-51a9-9993-60be8ecac152,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/13/business/the-week-in-business-layoffs-meta.html,2022-11-13T12:00:05+0000,article,News,923,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Science and Technology', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"with interest What began as a pause in hiring at Meta escalated into mass layoffs last week, with the company’s founder, Mark Zuckerberg, culling more than 11,000 employees, or roughly 13 percent of the work force. He said the company, the parent of Facebook, Instagram and WhatsApp, had grown too quickly during the pandemic, when a boom in online commerce lifted many tech companies. The layoffs were the latest in a string of cuts and hiring freezes across the industry. In the last few weeks alone, Twitter, Stripe and Lyft together have cut thousands of workers, and Amazon said it was pausing hiring for its corporate work force. The layoffs may tell a larger story about the outlook for the economy. But in some cases, unique factors contributed to the cuts: Twitter’s upheaval, for example, largely owes to Elon Musk’s takeover, while at Meta, billions have been invested in Mr. Zuckerberg’s vision for the metaverse, at a time when the company is already struggling financially. After months of stubbornly high inflation, consumer prices have at last showed some signs of easing. The Consumer Price Index rose 7.7 percent in the year through October, slower than the 7.9 percent economists had been expecting before the new data was released on Thursday. The report is likely to be encouraging to Federal Reserve officials, who have been rapidly raising interest rates this year to tame inflation and cool the economy. Past inflation reports and other indicators had shown that many parts of the economy remained relatively resilient in the face of the Fed’s persistent efforts, leading to worries that the central bank’s aggressive path would lead to a recession. But stocks rose on Thursday, with investors taking the latest inflation numbers as an indication that the Fed might soften its approach. The S&P 500 soared 5.5 percent, its best one-day performance in more than two years. A painful week for the crypto world ended with FTX, one of the largest cryptocurrency exchanges, filing for bankruptcy and changing its leadership. The saga started with a potential deal that promised to save FTX. The exchange had fallen on hard times after Changpeng Zhao, the chief executive of a larger rival called Binance, questioned the stability of the business, leading people to withdraw the equivalent of billions of dollars from the platform. That appeared to create a liquidity problem for FTX, formerly run by Sam Bankman-Fried. Mr. Zhao then said he would acquire FTX, a proposition that would have effectively bailed out the company, but he called it off just one day later, citing regulatory investigations and reports of mishandled funds. Ahead of Black Friday, one of the country’s largest shopping days, a spate of retailers including Target, Macy’s and Walmart will release their quarterly earnings. Their most recent reports painted a grim picture: Target has seen its profits plunge this year, struggling in recent quarters with excess inventory as inflation-conscious customers stopped spending as much on electronics and apparel. Macy’s was similarly challenged by a glut of inventory the last time it reported results. Walmart has not been immune to the effects of high inflation either, reporting that customers were spending more on essential, lower-cost items but were pulling back on goods they deemed more discretionary. Investors and analysts will pay close attention to whether these retailers resolved their inventory problems and the extent to which discounts on that inventory may have eaten into profits. Jeremy Hunt, the British finance minister, is expected to outline Britain’s new budget on Thursday, as he tries to steer the country out of the fleeting but turbulent Liz Truss era. The budget had been delayed from October as the new prime minister, Rishi Sunak, sought more time to make the “right decisions.” Mr. Hunt has already scrapped most of Ms. Truss’s plans, but the Sunak government will need to make further policy decisions, some of which Mr. Hunt has described as of “eye-watering difficulty.” He is looking for places to make cuts at a time when there are large demands on spending. There is also record inflation to contend with, as well as an overburdened national health care system and looming strikes in the public sector. And like Ms. Truss, Mr. Sunak will need to answer to the markets at the same time as he tries to avoid inflicting economic pain. After being denied a new trial, Elizabeth Holmes, the founder of the failed blood testing start-up Theranos, is poised for sentencing on Friday. Convicted in January on four counts of wire fraud and conspiracy, Ms. Holmes faces a maximum sentence of 20 years in prison. She had tried many times to avoid facing this potential sentence, filing three requests for a new trial based on new evidence, including a surprise visit to her home by a key witness for the prosecution. According to Ms. Holmes, the witness made statements that called his testimony into question. But a judge said Ms. Holmes’s arguments were “not likely to result in acquittal if they were included in a new trial,” and last Monday her requests were formally rejected. Apple warned that customers may experience a shortage of some of its phones this holiday season because of factory disruptions in China. Forbes is nearing a deal to sell itself to a group of investors for $800 million. The Justice Department said it appealed a decision by a Texas federal judge who rejected President Biden’s executive action on student debt cancellation. "
nyt://article/516def64-355d-506c-8cbe-dd5176299ca2,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/15/business/walmart-inflation-sales-profit.html,2022-11-15T13:16:38+0000,article,News,898,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Walmart Stores Inc', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McMillon, C Douglas', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black Friday and Cyber Monday (Shopping)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Ahead of the critical holiday shopping season, the nation’s largest retailer reported stronger-than-expected earnings and signaled confidence with a $20 billion share buyback. Walmart on Tuesday reported a rise in sales in its latest quarter, signaling that consumers continued to spend despite high inflation and that the retail behemoth had moved past the missteps that plagued it earlier this year. It also increased its full-year forecast for revenue and profit, and projected confidence by announcing a $20 billion share buyback. The retailer’s sales in the United States increased 8.2 percent in the third quarter versus the same period last year, comfortably beating analysts’ estimates. Revenue for the quarter rose to nearly $153 billion, also more than expected. Walmart’s stock jumped 6.5 percent on Tuesday, its biggest one-day increase since 2020. Shares of other major retailers, like Amazon and Target, also rose. Walmart said in August that its customers were feeling the effects of inflation and changing their shopping habits accordingly. Doug McMillon, the company’s chief executive, said the retailer was adjusting to that reality. As the prices of food and gas increased, shoppers pulled back on discretionary spending for items like clothes and knickknacks for the home. That left Walmart with excess inventory that it had to get rid of at a loss. “We’re being thoughtful and balanced about inventory levels by category and expenses as we work through the fourth quarter and position ourselves for next year,” Mr. McMillon said on Tuesday on a call with analysts. At its stores in the United States, Walmart said, the overall number of transactions and the average amount a shopper spent per trip increased in the third quarter, suggesting that high inflation did not deter consumers as much as some had feared. Walmart’s profit for the quarter was hit by a $3.1 billion settlement to resolve lawsuits over its pharmacies’ roles in the opioids crisis, an agreement that followed deals announced this month by CVS and Walgreens, which are still being negotiated. Once a beneficiary of the pandemic spending boom, Walmart has more recently looked to reset Wall Street expectations, initially slashing its forecast for annual earnings, only to upgrade it in recent earnings reports. The relatively robust results in its latest quarter led Walmart’s executives to raise the company’s full-year profit outlook, saying they now expect profit to fall less sharply and revenue to rise more strongly than before. Executives said they had also improved their outlook because the retailer gained market share during the quarter as Americans looked for ways to save money. Analysts are examining the earnings results closely because they signal how Walmart, the nation’s largest retailer, may fare in the crucial fourth quarter, when holiday shopping kicks into high gear. Analysts are expecting that retailers, which enjoyed bumper profits over the course of the pandemic, will see their margins shrink over the next couple of months, as the cost of labor, transportation and materials continues to rise. Walmart is also a bellwether for the retail industry, providing a hint at what earnings might look like for Target, Macy’s and others that report this week. Home Depot also reported on Tuesday that sales and profits last quarter were stronger than analysts expected, with higher prices offsetting a decline in transactions. It stuck with its forecast for modest earnings growth in the fourth quarter, and it expected comparable sales for the quarter to be the lowest it would have all year. Analysts focused on how trends in the U.S. home market were affecting Home Depot’s business, much of which is tied to home improvement projects. The Federal Reserve’s actions to address inflation by raising interest rates have made it more expensive for Americans to borrow to buy homes. “We have remained incredibly bullish. There are certainly factors outside of our control,” Ted Decker, Home Depot’s chief executive, said on Tuesday in a call with analysts. He added that he, like many others, was wrestling with the possibility that the Fed’s actions might take the United States into a recession and, if so, how deep it might be. Americans are feeling more uncertain about the economy this holiday season than they did a year ago. In turn, Walmart, like other retailers, has been testing out ways to capture shoppers’ dollars earlier in the season, by pushing deals ahead of the usual timeline. It has also sweetened the perks for members of its subscription program, including the option to have returns picked up at their doorsteps. And it has lengthened the window for when all shoppers can return a purchase. Strong food sales are a promising sign for how Walmart will perform during the fourth quarter, according to Neil Saunders, a retail analyst who is managing director of GlobalData. Despite rapid food inflation, Walmart did not raise prices on traditional Thanksgiving items; a turkey will be less than a dollar a pound, Mr. McMillon said. “We expect this to be a major draw over the period,” Mr. Saunders said in an emailed statement. “Nonfood sales may struggle a bit, but our sense is the early start to discounting and promotion will help.” Walmart is not immune to the shaky economic outlook, which led the retail giant to be more conservative in its approach to the holiday season. It said it would hire fewer seasonal workers this year. The uncertainty also factored into how executives were thinking about 2023. “We know some of the unanticipated costs experienced this year shouldn’t repeat next year,” John David Rainey, Walmart’s chief financial officer, said on a call with analysts. “That said, we’re planning our business with the assumption that inflation continues somewhat elevated.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/309282eb-b502-5ac8-b93b-f00358d8f415,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/03/04/business/retail-inflation-sales.html,2023-03-04T08:00:08+0000,article,News,831,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Best BUY Company Inc', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Big Lots Inc', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Circuit City Stores Inc', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Dollar Tree Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Family Dollar Stores Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Ross Stores Inc', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Despite better-than-expected earnings, retail executives predict that any sales growth will be much smaller than in years past. As many of America’s best-known retailers reported better-than-expected quarterly earnings this week, buoyed by shoppers who continued to spend through stubbornly high inflation, they all seemed to arrive at the same conclusion: Conditions are about to get much, much worse. Consumer spending, which accounts for about two-thirds of the U.S. economy, is a closely watched measure, and the performance of retailers is critical to that equation. This week, retail executives presented investors and analysts with downbeat outlooks for the first quarter and the year ahead, forecasting that sales growth, if any, will be much smaller than in years past. When describing their forecasts, several retail executives said on calls with analysts that they expected “softness” and “headwinds” and were planning “prudently” and “conservatively.” Many of their assessments are being shaped by the spending patterns they’re seeing from low-income shoppers, who, squeezed by inflation, are being judicious about what they’re spending money on, and where they’re doing it. Ross Stores, a discount retailer, expects sales to be flat for its fiscal year, which will end in late January, after posting a 1 percent increase in same-store sales for the fourth quarter. During that period in 2021, it recorded a 9 percent increase. “Elevated inflation continues to impact our low- to moderate-income customer,” Adam M. Orvos, chief financial officer at Ross Stores, said Wednesday on a call with analysts. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. Kohl’s expects net sales to decline 2 to 4 percent for its full year ahead. On Wednesday, the company’s new chief executive, Tom Kingsbury, told analysts that he wanted to be realistic in setting expectations. Macy’s said its comparable sales would be down 2 to 4 percent in the coming year, with its chief executive, Jeff Gennette, noting that “discretionary spending will be under pressure across income tiers.” Best Buy expects same-store sales to fall 3 to 6 percent in its full year, which ends in late January. Its chief financial officer, Matt Bilunas, said first-quarter sales would be most affected by pullback in consumer spending. “What’s spooking investors and what is causing concern is that all of the outlooks are very, very soft, and people are really talking down the prospects for the coming year,” said Neil Saunders, managing director at the retail consultancy GlobalData. “They’re talking about sales declines, further crunch in profits, and that really sets the tone that 2023 is going to be a very muted year for retail.” That sentiment was echoed by retailers that cater to lower-income shoppers. Dollar Tree, which also owns Family Dollar, expects its gross and operating margins will narrow in the first half of this year but bounce back in the second half. It still expects comparable sales to increase, just in the low- to mid-single digits. The furniture retailer Big Lots had same-store sales fall 13 percent in the fourth quarter and said it expected them to be down by the low- to mid-teens in the first quarter. “The lower-household-income customers are pinched,” the company’s chief executive, Bruce K. Thorn, said. “They’re going through a tough time right now.” In a push for profitability in 2023, retailers are trying to narrow their focus. Nordstrom, which reported a drop in margins and sales volume during the holiday season, said it would shut down its operation in Canada, which counts 13 stores and about 2,500 employees. When it started opening stores there about a decade ago, the department-store chain saw Canada as a first step to expanding internationally. On Thursday, its chief executive, Erik Nordstrom, said that “despite our best efforts, we do not see a realistic path to profitability for the Canadian business.” To be sure, while there are worries about the outlook, the data so far don’t necessarily suggest that the economy is in or hurtling toward a downturn. And a conservative outlook isn’t an unusual tactic for retailers, said Simeon Siegel, a managing director at BMO Capital Markets. “Generally speaking, if a management team wants to under-promise and over-deliver, they need to set a low bar at the beginning,” Mr. Siegel said. “And that’s what we’re dealing with.” And some of the obstacles that retailers have faced over the past few years are finally clearing up. Freight costs are coming down and supply chains are easing, which would help lower operating costs. Despite inflation pressuring its core customers’ wallets, Burlington, an off-price retailer, told investors that it expected sales for its fiscal year, which will end in February, to increase 12 to 14 percent, above Wall Street’s expectations. Other retailers’ financial woes are a boon for Burlington, according to its chief executive, Michael B. O’Sullivan. “For us, the biggest source of new store locations comes from other retailers closing stores,” Mr. O’Sullivan said on a call with analysts. “So many of our most productive locations were formerly Circuit City or Toys ‘R’ Us or Sports Authority or Linens & Things. In other words, if there’s an increase in retail bankruptcies, then that’s going to drive real estate opportunities and new store opening opportunities for us.” Burlington, which has about 840 stores, is planning to open up to 80 more this year. Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/a5edf353-e945-51d4-8443-69b02d503460,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/12/15/opinion/car-ownership-inequality.html,2022-12-15T10:00:21+0000,article,Op-Ed,1451,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Automobiles', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Traffic Accidents and Safety', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discrimination', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Black People', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Blacks', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Traffic and Parking Violations', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Automobile Financing', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income Inequality', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation Reduction Act of 2022', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Police Brutality, Misconduct and Shootings', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit and Debt', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Electric and Hybrid Vehicles', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Credit Scores', 'rank': 15, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Transit Systems', 'rank': 16, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 17, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Roads and Traffic', 'rank': 18, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prisons and Prisoners', 'rank': 19, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Racial Profiling', 'rank': 20, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Race and Ethnicity', 'rank': 21, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Driverless and Semiautonomous Vehicles', 'rank': 22, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Debt Collection', 'rank': 23, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United States Chamber of Commerce', 'rank': 24, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 25, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-sub-only', 'rank': 26, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Greenhouse Gas Emissions', 'rank': 27, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Guest Essay Mr. Ross and Ms. Livingston are professors at New York University, members of its Prison Education Program Research Lab and authors of the book “Cars and Jails: Freedom Dreams, Debt, and Carcerality.” In American consumer lore, the automobile has always been a “freedom machine” and liberty lies on the open road. “Americans are a race of independent people” whose “ancestors came to this country for the sake of freedom and adventure,” the National Automobile Chamber of Commerce’s soon-to-be-president, Roy Chapin, declared in 1924. “The automobile satisfies these instincts.” During the Cold War, vehicles with baroque tail fins and oodles of surplus chrome rolled off the assembly line, with Native American names like Pontiac, Apache, Dakota, Cherokee, Thunderbird and Winnebago — the ultimate expressions of capitalist triumph and Manifest Destiny. But for many low-income and minority Americans, automobiles have been turbo-boosted engines of inequality, immobilizing their owners with debt, increasing their exposure to hostile law enforcement, and in general accelerating the forces that drive apart haves and have-nots. Though progressive in intent, the Biden administration’s signature legislative achievements on infrastructure and climate change will further entrench the nation’s staunch commitment to car production, ownership and use. The recent Inflation Reduction Act offers subsidies for many kinds of vehicles using alternative fuel, and should result in real reductions in emissions, but it includes essentially no direct incentives for public transit — by far the most effective means of decarbonizing transport. And without comprehensive policy efforts to eliminate discriminatory policing and predatory lending, merely shifting to electric from combustion will do nothing to reduce car owners’ ever-growing risk of falling into legal and financial jeopardy, especially those who are poor or Black. In the consumer arena, cars have become tightly sprung debt traps. The average monthly auto loan payment crossed $700 for the first time this year, which does not include insurance or maintenance costs. Subprime lending and longer loan terms of up to 84 months have resulted in a doubling of auto loan debt over the last decade and a notable surge in the number of drivers who are “upside down”— owing more money than their cars are worth. But, again, the pain is not evenly distributed. Auto financing companies often charge nonwhite consumers higher interest rates than white consumers, as do insurers. Formerly incarcerated buyers whose credit scores are depressed from inactivity are especially red meat to dealers and predatory lenders. In our research, we spoke to many such buyers who found it easier, upon release from prison, to acquire expensive cars than to secure an affordable apartment. Some, like LeMarcus, a Black Brooklynite (whose name has been changed to protect his privacy under ethical research guidelines), discovered that loans were readily available for a luxury vehicle but not for the more practical car he wanted. Even with friends and family willing to help him with a down payment, after he spent roughly five years in prison, his credit score made it impossible to get a Honda or “a regular car.” Instead, relying on a friend to co-sign a loan, he was offered a high-interest loan on a pre-owned Mercedes E350. LeMarcus knew it was a bad deal, but the dealer told him the bank that would have financed a Honda “wanted a more solid foundation, good credit, income was showing more,” but that to finance the Mercedes, it “was actually willing to work with the people with lower credit and lower down payments.” We interviewed many other formerly incarcerated people who followed a similar path, only to see their cars repossessed. LeMarcus was “car rich, cash poor,” a common and precarious condition that can have serious legal consequences for low-income drivers, as can something as simple as a speeding ticket. A $200 ticket is a meaningless deterrent to a hedge fund manager from Greenwich, Conn., who is pulled over on the way to the golf club, but it could be a devastating blow to those who mow the fairways at the same club. If they cannot pay promptly, they will face cascading penalties. If they cannot take a day off work to appear in court, they risk a bench warrant or loss of their license for debt delinquency. Judges in local courts routinely skirt the law of the land (in Supreme Court decisions like Bearden v. Georgia and Timbs v. Indiana) by disregarding the offender’s ability to pay traffic debt. At the request of collection agencies, they also issue arrest or contempt warrants for failure to appear in court on unpaid auto loan debts. With few other options to travel to work, millions of Americans make the choice to continue driving even without a license, which means their next traffic stop may land them in jail. The pathway that leads from a simple traffic fine to financial insolvency or detention is increasingly crowded because of the spread of revenue policing intended to generate income from traffic tickets, court fees and asset forfeiture. Fiscally squeezed by austerity policies, officials extract the funds from those least able to pay. This is not only an awful way to fund governments; it is also a form of backdoor, regressive taxation that circumvents voters’ input. Deadly traffic stops, racially biased predatory lending and revenue policing have all come under public scrutiny of late, but typically they are viewed as distinct realms of injustice, rather than as the interlocking systems that they are. Once you see it, you can’t unsee it: A traffic stop can result in fines or arrest; time behind bars can result in repossession or a low credit score; a low score results in more debt and less ability to pay fines, fees and surcharges. Championed as a kind of liberation, car ownership — all but mandatory in most parts of the country — has for many become a vehicle of capture and control. Industry boosters promise us that technological advances like on-demand transport, self-driving electric vehicles and artificial intelligence-powered traffic cameras will smooth out the human errors that lead to discrimination, and that car-sharing will reduce the runaway costs of ownership. But no combination of apps and cloud-based solutions can ensure that the dealerships, local municipalities, courts and prison industries will be willing to give up the steady income they derive from shaking down motorists. Aside from the profound need for accessible public transportation, what could help? Withdraw armed police officers from traffic duties, just as they have been from parking and tollbooth enforcement in many jurisdictions. Introduce income-graduated traffic fines. Regulate auto lending with strict interest caps and steep penalties for concealing fees and add-ons and for other well-known dealership scams. Crack down hard on the widespread use of revenue policing. And close the back door to debtors’ prisons by ending the use of arrest warrants in debt collection cases. Without determined public action along these lines, technological advances often end up reproducing deeply rooted prejudices. As Malcolm X wisely said, “Racism is like a Cadillac; they bring out a new model every year.” Andrew Ross and Julie Livingston are professors at New York University, members of its Prison Education Program Research Lab and authors of the book “Cars and Jails: Freedom Dreams, Debt, and Carcerality.” The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. "
nyt://article/792e5d51-4138-595e-85ac-9b5ca0b3727d,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/08/14/business/women-chief-executives-retail-companies.html,2023-08-14T15:18:32+0000,article,News,1155,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Hiring and Promotion', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Women and Girls', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Executives and Management (Theory)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporations', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Gap Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bed Bath & Beyond Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Several prominent companies, like the Gap and Kohl’s, have recently replaced female leaders with men. Industry observers see a loss in gender representation. At the start of this year, a slew of major retailers were searching for the right person to fill their chief executive roles. Most of those companies have now found that person — and in almost every case it was a man. In recent months, major retailers like Gap, Stitch Fix, Victoria’s Secret, Kohl’s, the Vitamin Shoppe and the RealReal have appointed men to chief executive positions previously held by women. Others like Macy’s, VF Corp (which owns the North Face and Timberland) and the Italian denim brand Diesel replaced men with men at the top. And then there’s Bed Bath & Beyond. Sue Gove was chief executive of the home-goods retailer before it filed for bankruptcy in April. The company has since been revived by Overstock.com, which bought the bankrupt retailer’s intellectual property and assumed its name. This month, Overstock’s top executive, Jonathan Johnson, became chief executive of Bed Bath & Beyond. In general, it is rare for a female chief executive to be succeeded by another woman regardless of the industry, according to an analysis by Catalyst, which works with hundreds of companies to advance the careers of women. “It reminds me of the Barbie movie,” said Kimberly Lee Minor, who is the chief executive of the consulting firm Bumbershoot and has been working in the retail industry for 30 years. “We live in this society where women control the majority of consumer spending. They make the decisions and yet we still haven’t moved forward and we have to go into this cycle.” What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. While the number of female chief executives had been trending upward in recent years, nearly 90 percent of Fortune 500 companies are run by men. Of the 86 retail companies in the Fortune 1000, 13 had a woman as chief executive as of July 2023, down slightly from the year before, according to the executive recruiting firm Heidrick & Struggles. Retail executives have long been quick to note that purchases are largely driven by women, who make most of the spending decisions for their households. The majority of the industry’s entry-level work force is also female. Seventy-two percent of cashiers are women, and about half of retail salespersons are women, according to data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics. The underrepresentation of women in retail C-suite roles “is more pronounced because it’s building off of a female base, which should generate theoretically through the ranks more executive leadership,” said Kathy Gersch, the chief commercial officer at Kotter International, which helps large companies train potential leaders. “But we’re not seeing some of that happen.” One of the reasons many companies are turning to men may be explained by the economic tension retailers are feeling in 2023. In times of uncertainty, companies become more risk averse and seek executives who have the financial expertise and proven track records at previous companies, according to academics and people who work at executive search firms. That tends to perpetuate previous hiring decisions and lead to companies seeking those with experience leading a turnaround. While the U.S. economy has avoided a recession that many feared could come in the first half of 2023, there are still a lot of difficulties for retailers to navigate. Companies are adjusting to a base of consumers who are not readily spending as they were in the early stages of the pandemic, when people collectively had more savings. Clothing retailers and their shareholders are feeling the squeeze as shoppers respond to stubborn inflation by pulling back on purchases of discretionary items. Despite progress made during the pandemic, the industry is still contending with the reality of e-commerce, the changing role of stores and the challenges and opportunities presented by artificial intelligence. “Gender representation and just overall diversity representation is here to stay, certainly at any consumer company and definitely at any retailer,” said Catherine Lepard, who leads executive searches for retail firms at Heidrick & Struggles. “However, what we have seen in 2023 — because so many retailers have found this to be a very difficult year — is that the first priority is just to make sure they’ve got the right athlete in the job, regardless of any other factors, to get the job done, to make sure that there is still going to be a company going in 2024 and a sustainable future for all of the employees and stakeholders.” Christy Glass, a professor of sociology at Utah State University who has been studying gender and racial representation within corporate America for 16 years, said she was not surprised by the current hiring trend. Her research has shown that women are often appointed to chief executive roles when a company is looking to show a bold strategy in the face of a precarious financial situation, a concept often referred to as the glass cliff. This tracks with Ms. Gove’s appointment at Bed Bath & Beyond and the hiring of Sonia Syngal as the chief executive of Gap Inc. in March 2020, just as the coronavirus pandemic was coming into full view. (Ms. Syngal left the company in July 2022, and Gap recently hired Richard Dickson as chief executive.) The more hiring of men to chief executive roles could be seen as the “savior effect,” said Ms. Glass, who is working on a forthcoming study about executive dismissals. “I think during a crisis, the glass cliff would claim that the logic there is, ‘let’s show shareholders, let’s show the public, let’s show stakeholders, we’re going to go in a bold new direction,’ and part of signaling that bold new direction is appointing a woman C.E.O.,” Ms. Glass said. “Whereas then the savior effect is a way of saying, ‘OK, we tried that. We’re going to kind of go back to the status quo: safe and steady to navigate through this crisis.’” There are reasons for optimism, however. Lorraine Hariton, chief executive of Catalyst, noted that the percentage of women running Fortune 500 companies had doubled in the past five years (rising to 10.4 percent from 4.8 percent). Rosalind Brewer took over the top spot at Walgreens and Stephanie Linnartz did the same at Under Armour in the last couple of years. Michelle Gass left her chief executive position at Kohl’s in November to become the president at Levi’s, and the company said she would assume the chief executive role within 18 months of starting, once Chip Bergh steps down. On Tuesday, Adrienne Lazarus became president of the clothing brand Madewell, reporting to Libby Wadle, the chief executive of J. Crew Group. And with the retail industry facing even more disruption, more companies may look outside the industry to poach top talent who can bring different skills. That could give female executives more paths to a C-suite job.  “The old formulas don’t work,” Ms. Hariton said. “In the situation where there’s a lot of turmoil in the organization, that’s when they look outside and that’s when you can open up to a broader set of talent, and more women have opportunities in that case, in my opinion.” Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/05579fb5-15d6-59e0-9c74-232c5926d091,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/12/17/your-money/holiday-tipping-guide.html,2021-12-17T14:00:07+0000,article,News,1061,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tips and Tipping', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Post, Emily', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"your money adviser Who should be on your list — from babysitters to deliverers to restaurant servers — and the typical size of the gift. Tipping during the holidays is a time-honored tradition, but because there are no hard and fast rules, it can end up being one more stressful holiday chore. Here are some suggestions from etiquette and tipping experts to reduce some of the worry. “There is no authority that sets the norms,” said Michael Lynn, a professor of consumer behavior and marketing at Cornell University’s School of Hotel Administration who has studied tipping. Tipping service workers has centuries-old roots, and may have emerged as a way for tavern patrons to “forestall envy” while they imbibed, Professor Lynn said. Customers didn’t want the workers to resent their carousing, “so they said, ‘Here’s some money to have a drink later.’” (In many countries, he said, the word for a tip incorporates drinking. For instance, the French term for a gratuity, he noted, is “pourboire,” or roughly translated, “for drink.”) Formal research on holiday tipping is scant, he said, but generally, seasonal tips are geared toward “people you don’t normally tip, but with whom you interact a lot.” Your decision is personal, though. Even if you tip someone periodically, you may choose to give an extra gratuity around the holidays to show your appreciation. “It really is discretionary,” said Daniel Post Senning, a great-great grandson of the manners maven Emily Post and a co-author of “Emily Post’s Etiquette,” 19th edition. Nearly half of American adults say they give higher than usual tips during the holidays to service providers who normally receive tips throughout the year, particularly restaurant servers, according to an online survey conducted for CreditCards.com in early November. Other providers who can expect larger-than-usual tips around the holidays, according to the survey, include hairstylists or barbers, food delivery workers, bartenders and coffee shop baristas. Think of a tip not as a way to avoid poor service in the future, Mr. Senning said, but rather as a way of honoring those who “take good care of us.” “Ultimately, what makes tipping successful is when it’s done with a spirit of generosity and graciousness,” he said. “It’s not a bribe for good service.” Yet, said Leonard Green, a professor of psychological and brain sciences and economics at Washington University in St. Louis, once workers know that tipping is the norm, it may act as an incentive to provide excellent service to clients. “You want to make sure they continue to tip in the future.” Workers eligible for holiday tips include those who help you in some way, whether at your home or elsewhere, Mr. Senning said. They can include a housekeeper, doorman, nanny, regular handyman (or woman), as well as your regular manicurist or (if you’re fortunate enough to have one) massage therapist. Elaine Swann, an etiquette adviser in San Diego, advised thinking about someone who went beyond expectations — perhaps, a babysitter who repeatedly filled in on short notice or a meal delivery person who was always on time. “Put some thought into individuals who really helped make your life easier throughout the year,” she said. Then, set a budget for tips that takes into account your own financial situation. If money is tight, you may need to rein in your generosity. “I encourage folks to not let it become a detriment to their own pocketbook,” Ms. Swann said. That said, the pandemic made for difficult times for many service workers, so if your budget supports it, be generous. “If you are able, I’d recommend going above and beyond this year,” Ms. Swann said. Vid Ponnapalli, a fee-only financial planner in Holmdel, N.J., said he had urged his clients to budget for tips and gifts as they would any other expense. “You have to determine your affordability and your budget,” he said. If your finances don’t allow for extra cash this year, try and show gratitude another way, Mr. Senning said, perhaps with a thoughtful handwritten note. “Never underestimate the power of your words.” Deciding how much to tip may require some informal research. “Ask your neighbors,” Professor Lynn said. Or, consider these guidelines from etiquette and financial experts: For a babysitter who cares for your child a few hours a week, consider the equivalent of a typical session’s pay. For a live-in nanny or a child care provider who comes to your home regularly, one week’s pay or more is suggested. For caregivers in a day care setting outside of your home, check the company’s policy. If cash tips aren’t allowed, you may consider a small gift from you and your child, Ms. Swann said. For house cleaners who come regularly, the equivalent of one session’s pay is common but by no means standard. Among people who tip, the median amount for a housekeeper is $50, according to the CreditCards.com survey. Some people like to thank their regular postal carrier or package courier, but most are restricted in what they may accept. United States Postal Service workers can’t accept cash or gift cards that may be used like cash, but may accept gifts worth $20 or less, including store, restaurant or mall gift cards, a spokeswoman said. FedEx policy bars employees from accepting cash or gift cards, a company spokeswoman said. But, she said, drivers “do enjoy snacks” that are left for them. UPS drivers are taught to “politely decline monetary offerings,” a company spokesman, Dan McMackin, said. They may, however, accept a tip if a customer is “insistent.” Drivers appreciate gestures of thanks, like snack bars or bottled water, and often receive homemade treats or gifts. Many educators went above and beyond during the pandemic, but giving cash to your child’s teacher is best avoided, etiquette experts say. It could look like you are trying to curry favor. A small gift card or a handmade gift from your child is a better idea, or maybe a group gift purchased with contributions from the entire class. Mr. Ponnapalli suggested attaching a note to the trash bag the day before, alerting the crew that a tip will be delivered the next day — or getting up early to deliver it in person so it doesn’t go astray. (A tip of $20 is most common, according to the CreditCards.com survey). Typically, news carriers (yes, some people still get an actual newspaper delivered) send a holiday card with their address to your home so you can mail them a tip. nyregion world your-money your-money nyregion world opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/718d41ed-f4d5-5e6f-b179-0af2a576a88a,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/17/business/target-earnings.html,2022-08-17T11:18:34+0000,article,News,678,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Target Corporation', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The retailer’s second-quarter profit fell 90 percent from the year before, far below what Wall Street analysts were expecting. Target posted quarterly earnings on Wednesday that were much weaker than Wall Street expected, as the retailer got rid of excess inventory that built up as shoppers shifted their buying habits. Company executives presented the actions as tough but necessary to position the retailer for a stronger performance in the rest of the year. Target’s net profit plunged to $183 million in the three months through July 30, down 90 percent from the year before. That was far below what Wall Street analysts expected, even after the company had warned in recent months that unwanted inventory would dent its earnings. Target’s comparable sales grew 2.6 percent in its latest quarter, versus the same period last year. That was slightly below analysts’ expectation of a 2.8 percent increase. The lower profit came from Target’s glut of inventory. It had $15.3 billion in inventory, a 36 percent increase from a year earlier. As shoppers have curtailed their spending on items deemed discretionary, squeezed by higher-than-usual prices in essential categories like grocery and gas, Target was left with electronics and apparel that people were not buying. Target said it was solving the problem by using discounts and canceling orders for the fall with vendors, which would result in lower profit. The retailer is still dealing with excess inventory in the current quarter, it said Wednesday, and also faces the industrywide problem of higher freight and transportation costs. The company’s operating profit margin was 1.2 percent in its latest quarter, below its forecast for about 2 percent, which it had lowered in June. That’s also a significant drop from a 9.8 percent margin in the same quarter last year. It maintained its forecast for its full-year revenue growth to be in the low- to mid-single-digit range, and for its second-half operating margin to be near 6 percent, suggesting that conditions would improve in the months to come. Target’s executives spent nearly an hour at the start of a call with analysts on Wednesday explaining their actions as necessary to ease the burden on its workers and distribution centers. Without them, shoppers would walk into cluttered stores and associates would have to work around the buildup, Brian Cornell, Target’s chief executive, said. The hit to profit that the retailer took to get rid of the merchandise would lead to longer-term growth, he said. “Consider the alternative,” Mr. Cornell said. “We could have held onto excess inventory and attempted to deal with it slowly over multiple quarters or even years. While that might have reduced the near-term financial impact, it would have held back our business over time.” John Mulligan, Target’s chief operating officer, pointed to how its distribution centers are now running more smoothly. In June, inventory at Target’s distribution centers peaked at over 90 percent of capacity, above the optimal level of 85 percent, he said. They now operate below 80 percent. Executives repeatedly pointed analysts’ attention to measures that the retailer said showed strength in its latest quarter, including rising foot traffic and gains in market share. Target’s results came a day after Walmart and Home Depot posted earnings that showed average transaction amounts increasing while overall transactions fell, meaning, broadly, that customers spent more on fewer purchases. Walmart’s relatively upbeat results led to a large rally in the stocks of retailers, including Target, on Tuesday. In the second quarter, Target’s transactions rose, but the average amount spent was flat. Its shares fell 2.6 percent in trading on Wednesday, to $175.49, erasing nearly all the previous day’s gains. Lowe’s, the home-improvement retailer, and TJX, the owner of the discount retail chains T.J. Maxx and Marshalls, also reported earnings on Wednesday. Lowe’s showed comparable sales declining slightly but operating income increasing slightly. The company said that sales growth came from professional shoppers like contractors, a group that makes up a smaller share of its typical consumers compared with Home Depot. TJX reported a 5 percent fall in comparable sales in the latest quarter. Still, Ernie Herrman, TJX’s chief executive, said in a statement that he sees a “marketplace flush with off-price buying opportunities.” Retailers like T.J. Maxx often buy the excess merchandise from other store chains. "
nyt://article/1db5eaf3-46ee-5938-97b4-b39eac974d71,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/03/29/business/macys-tony-spring-jeff-gennette.html,2023-03-29T11:00:09+0000,article,News,706,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Macy's Inc"", 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Bloomingdale's"", 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gennette, Jeffrey', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Tony Spring, who runs Bloomingdale’s, will replace Jeff Gennette as chief executive in February. Mr. Gennette has led the chain since 2017. Macy’s is shuffling its leadership team, announcing on Wednesday that Jeff Gennette, the chief executive since 2017, will retire in February after four decades with the department-store chain. He will be succeeded by Tony Spring, who runs the company’s luxury Bloomingdale’s chain. Adrian Mitchell, 49, who has been Macy’s chief financial officer since November 2020, will add the title of chief operating officer to his duties and oversee the company’s store operations, technology and supply chain teams. Macy’s does not currently have the position of chief operating officer. Macy’s, the largest department store chain in the United States, is still rebounding from the pandemic and dealing with inflation’s impact on how its core customers shop. Macy’s said last month that, while same-store sales slightly increased in 2022, active customers decreased. Digital sales were up compared with 2019 — a sign that its e-commerce offerings had improved — but sales at its brick-and-mortar locations had not returned to prepandemic levels. This year, Macy’s expects comparable sales to decline between about 2 percent and 4 percent. Like other retailers, it’s contending with consumers’ pulling back on discretionary items like clothing and furniture as the price of food remains high. Macy’s expects a more favorable shopping environment next year, in part because of changes it is making to its operations. Mr. Gennette’s marquee initiative, the so-called Polaris strategy, which was announced in early February 2020, seeks to modernize the Macy’s brand. The goal is fewer stores, with the remaining outlets in the highest-performing malls, and better competitiveness in the e-commerce marketplace. Macy’s must win over a younger set of customers who are not gravitating toward department stores as previous generations did. The plan, complicated by the pandemic, has not been fully realized. In an interview, Mr. Gennette, 61, said the progress was still in its “early innings.” During the pandemic, Macy’s has seen a younger and more diverse customer base. Mr. Spring, 58, will now be responsible for helping Macy’s reach its goals. He has worked at Bloomingdale’s for 36 years and has been its chief executive since 2014. Mr. Spring worked alongside Macy’s senior leaders as they began its turnaround strategy, and has a background in merchandising and marketing. “He has been influencing what’s been going on at Macy’s during that time frame — not been directly controlling it, but certainly is very well aware of certainly the connections between the brands like the loyalty programs and logistics strategies and technology strategies,” Mr. Gennette said of his successor. Mr. Gennette described Bloomingdale’s under Mr. Spring as a “scrappy incubator” for ideas that will eventually be brought over to Macy’s, such as using data analytics for assortments and ways to improve its wedding registry business. “He’s a very thoughtful guy,” Mr. Gennette said. “He’s very strategic. He takes his time in making decisions. But once he makes them, he goes quickly to implementation because he’s got a fully aligned team behind him.” Mr. Spring said in a statement that he saw “tremendous opportunity to build upon the storied reputation of each of our nameplates,” referring to Macy’s, Bloomingdale’s and the beauty chain Bluemercury. When Mr. Gennette officially steps down, he will end a career with the company that began in 1983 in San Francisco. Mr. Gennette started at Macy’s in its executive training program after graduating from Stanford. He rose through the ranks, working as a merchant in divisions like men’s and children’s and overseeing stores in the Atlanta area. He was briefly a store manager for the toy retailer F.A.O. Schwarz, from 1989 to 1990, and the director of stores for Broadway Stores before it was acquired, in the mid-90s, by the parent company of Macy’s at the time. Before taking over from Terry Lundgren, the longtime chief of Macy’s, six years ago, Mr. Gennette was the company’s chief merchant and then its president. As chief executive, he has been outspoken about diversity initiatives, such as selling merchandise that resonates with Black communities and improving representation in the retailer’s top ranks. He is also among the few openly gay chief executives running a major U.S. company. Mr. Gennette said that he had decided to retire because it was the right time for him and his family, and that he had nothing to announce about what he planned to do once he left Macy’s. nyregion world business business nyregion world opinion business magazine Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://interactive/0ee81a3c-d5bd-5cd9-b30a-59e14d9b7f8c,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2022/05/08/business/economy/inflation-calculator.html,2022-05-08T23:41:01+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Price Index', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"
	Inflation is at the highest level in four decades. But how you experience it can vary greatly depending on what you eat, how much you travel and your other spending habits. Answer seven questions to estimate your personal inflation rate.
 Select an answer to continue (none of your answers will be saved). 
	The numbers above are derived from the Consumer Price Index, the best-known measure of inflation. The C.P.I. is based on a “basket of goods”: The prices of hundreds of commonly purchased goods and services, from cookies to cars to college tuition, are blended together, with each product counted in proportion to its share of overall spending.
 
	Clothing, for example, accounts for about 2.5 percent of the average American’s monthly spending, so clothes prices make up that share of the index. But those are averages — if you spend more than 2.5 percent of your budget on clothes, your personal rate of inflation will look different.
 
	Prices are rising pretty much across the board now, but the increases are particularly rapid in some categories, like meat, cars and travel. People who spend a lot on those categories are experiencing much faster inflation as a result.
 
	The calculator above adjusts your rate of inflation based on how much more or less you spend on different products than the average American. It doesn’t account for other factors, like whether you live in a more expensive part of the country or are more likely to shop around for bargains. Even so, it reveals a wide range of different experiences: Based on how you answered the questions above, you might have a “personal inflation rate” as low as 5 percent or as high as 15 percent.
 
	Even a 5 percent inflation rate is high by the standards of recent history – before the pandemic, prices in the United States were rising about 2 percent a year. But when it comes to inflation, small differences have a big impact. At 5 percent, prices double in about 15 years. At 7 percent, prices double in just over 10 years. And at 15 percent, prices double in only five years.
 
	Perhaps the clearest case study in how people experience inflation differently is gasoline.
 
	Gas prices have shot up in recent months, partly because Russia’s invasion of Ukraine roiled global energy markets. Prices were up 48 percent in March from a year earlier, accounting for a fifth of the increase in the overall Consumer Price Index.
  +5 +10% 2020 2021 2022 All items: +11.1% Excluding gas: +9.3% 
	But if you don’t own a car, or drive infrequently, then gas prices may not matter much to you, at least not directly. (You won’t be immune from indirect effects, like higher prices of other goods because of increased transportation costs.) On the other hand, if you have a long commute, or you live in a rural area where even routine errands require driving long distances, gas may eat up a big chunk of your monthly budget.
 
	Another energy-related example: Heating oil gets hardly any weight in the overall index because most Americans don’t heat their homes with oil. But if you’re among the roughly 6 percent of families that do, then heating oil is a major expense for you – and with heating oil costs up 70 percent over the past year, your rate of inflation is almost certainly far higher than the overall average.
 
	New and used cars each account for about 4 percent of Americans’ total spending in a typical year — and prices for both have skyrocketed recently because of supply chain disruptions and other issues. New car prices are up 12.5 percent over the past year, and used cars are up an even crazier 35 percent.
 
	If you weren’t in the market for a car in the past year, then soaring vehicle prices didn’t matter to you — their weight in your own personal “basket of goods” was zero. And if you did buy a car recently, chances are it made up a lot more than 4 percent of your spending. In the calculations above, we assume that if you bought a car, it accounted for a large part of your annual budget.
 
	You might have noticed an interesting twist in the calculator: If you bought a new car (and didn’t also buy a used one), your rate of inflation went down. That’s because we’re dropping used cars from your personal basket — and used car prices have risen so much that they are a major factor in inflation overall.
 
	What the C.P.I. and similar inflation indexes measure is how much more it costs to buy a set of goods and services today than it did to buy that same set of goods and services a year ago. For many products, that makes sense. You probably eat roughly the same amount of food and wear through roughly the same number of socks from one year to the next.
 
	Most families don’t buy a car every year, though, which means this kind of year-to-year comparison doesn’t quite make sense at the individual level. The same is true for washing machines, refrigerators or other big-ticket items.
 
	For these products, it arguably makes more sense to think about inflation over a longer time: New car prices have risen about 13 percent over the past five years, for example, an average annual inflation rate of about 2.5 percent.
 
	You may have noticed a category missing from the calculator above: housing.
 
	For most of us, the cost of housing — whether in a rent check or a mortgage payment — is our biggest expense every month. And it’s the biggest component of C.P.I. as well, accounting for roughly a third of the total index.
 
	But calculating housing inflation is complicated, especially for homeowners. That’s because, for most people, a home serves two purposes at once: It is a source of shelter and an investment. Investments aren’t included in measures of consumer prices, though, because they aren’t consumer spending. (When you put cash in your retirement account, you aren’t “spending” money; you’re saving it for the future.)
 
	When determining inflation, economists care about the shelter aspect of homeownership: the “service” of providing a place to live. They can’t measure that directly — when you’re making your mortgage payment, you don’t distinguish between the “investment” part and the “shelter” part — so they measure it indirectly, by estimating what it would cost to rent out a similar home, a concept known as “owners’ equivalent rent.”
 
	“Owners’ equivalent rent” is a theoretical concept, though. If we’re trying to understand a family’s real-world cost of living, it makes more sense to look at its actual monthly costs. If you have a fixed-rate mortgage, your monthly mortgage payment doesn’t go up when home prices rise.
 
	In fact, if you refinanced your home in the past two years, as millions of people did, then your monthly expenses may have gone down — even when factoring in higher taxes or maintenance costs.
 
	For renters, the situation is a bit more straightforward. The rental component of C.P.I. is based on how much rents have gone up or down across the country. But rent is such a big chunk of most people’s budgets, and it varies so much from city to city and even building to building, that a nationwide average doesn’t do a very good job of capturing any individual’s experience. Someone in a rent-controlled apartment in New York City may have experienced only a modest rent increase this year, while someone signing a new lease in a market-rate apartment next door could have seen a huge jump.
 
	The chart below shows how much a household’s overall rate of inflation may have looked different based just on its housing situation. For homeowners, we’re assuming their monthly costs didn’t change at all. For renters, it makes a huge difference whether they have had to sign a new lease in the past year, and whether they live in New York, Las Vegas or another city where rents are rising rapidly — by 25 percent or more for new listings — or one where rent growth has been more modest, like Dallas or (perhaps surprisingly) San Francisco.
 Average  U.S. inflation 8.5% 6%  higher prices  than a year ago 8 10 12 14 Estimated inflation  rates for people with different housing  situations, assuming their spending is  otherwise average. Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are rising rapidly Homeowners with a fixed-rate mortgage 11.9% 15.4% 6.7% 8.2% Renters with a new  lease in a city where  rents are growing  modestly Renters with a modest rent increase Average U.S. inflation 8.5% 6% higher prices than a year ago 8 10 12 14 Estimated inflation rates for people with different housing situations, assuming their spending is otherwise average. 11.9% 15.4% 6.7% 8.2% Homeowners with a fixed-rate mortgage Renters with a  modest rent  increase Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are growing modestly Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are rising rapidly Average  U.S. inflation 8.5% 6%  higher prices  than a year ago 8 10 12 14 Estimated inflation  rates for people with  different housing  situations, assuming  their spending is  otherwise average. Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are rising rapidly Homeowners with a fixed-rate 15.4% 11.9% 6.7% Renters with a new  lease in a city where  rents are growing  modestly 8.2% Renters with a modest rent increase Average U.S. inflation 8.5% 6% higher prices  than a year ago 8 10 12 14 Estimated inflation rates for people with different housing situations, assuming their spending is otherwise average. 6.7% 8.2% 11.9% 15.4% Homeowners with a fixed-rate mortgage Renters with a  modest rent increase Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are growing modestly Renters with a new lease in a city where rents are rising rapidly 
	There’s a lot our calculator does not take into account. We are assuming that prices for food and clothes and cars are rising at the same rate for everyone, for example. But prices can vary a lot based on exactly what product you buy and where you buy it. The Labor Department collects data on the price of steak, but it doesn’t distinguish between organic, grass-fed prime rib and skirt steak bought on “manager’s special.”
 
	If you have children in day care or preschool, you might have been surprised to see your rate of inflation go down in the calculator. Child care prices are up 3.6 percent on average over the past year, according to the Labor Department. That’s a major hardship for many families given the already high cost of child care, but it’s lower than the overall pace of increases.
 
	But depending on where you live, and whether or not you qualify for government-subsidized programs like Head Start or other factors, your child care costs may have gone up much more than 3.6 percent over the past year. That won’t be captured in the calculator. Recent research has found that this kind of variation in price changes within product categories — between different cuts of steak or brands of detergent or types of child care — may matter even more for inflation inequality than differences in spending patterns across broad categories.
 
	Within the broad data from the Labor Department, there is evidence that poorer households were experiencing faster inflation than wealthier households in the years leading up to the pandemic. And research from the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco has found that inflation inequality — the gap between those experiencing the most inflation and those experiencing the least — tends to grow when prices are rising quickly. Inflation also tends to be harder on poorer households because they have less flexibility in their budgets, giving them less room to cut back on discretionary spending when prices rise.
 Methodology These estimates are calculated by adjusting the weights (“relative importance”) of various spending categories in the Consumer Price Index. The base weights are from the C.P.I. for all urban consumers. Adjusted weights are based on data from the 2019 Consumer Expenditure Survey. (We chose 2019 rather than 2020 to avoid the impact of temporary shifts in spending behavior during the pandemic.) New-car buyers, for example, spent about 17 percent of their annual spending on cars. Only the directly relevant categories are adjusted – we don’t try to infer other spending habits from your answers. Weights for all other products are adjusted up or down proportionally but are otherwise unchanged. Rental calculations are based on rent data from Apartment List. "
nyt://article/ba1e9455-5f1f-511b-bf00-6f4e3880c63b,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/20/business/the-week-in-business-ftxs-collapse.html,2022-11-20T12:00:06+0000,article,News,961,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stocks and Bonds', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Securities and Commodities Violations', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Frauds and Swindling', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'HK FTX Trading Ltd (Futures Exchange)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bankman-Fried, Sam', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"with interest In the course of days, the collapse of one of the largest cryptocurrency exchanges, FTX, has led to a series of revelations — about the corporate dysfunction inside FTX, the entangled personal lives of the people who ran it and what the exchange’s new leader said appeared to be efforts to “conceal the misuse of customer funds.” The company has filed for bankruptcy, and federal prosecutors are now investigating what happened to the lost funds of possibly more than one million creditors. The downfall of Sam Bankman-Fried, the founder and former chief executive of FTX, has called into question the future of the crypto industry as well as that of a closely affiliated movement in which he heavily invested. That movement was centered on a moral philosophy known as effective altruism, and it financed itself in large part with donations from FTX’s philanthropic arm. Elizabeth Holmes was sentenced to more than 11 years in prison on Friday, after being convicted on four counts of defrauding investors about the technology and business practices of Theranos, her failed blood-testing start-up. It was a lighter sentence than the maximum 20 years in prison she faced but still far tougher than the 18 months of house arrest her lawyers had sought. The decision was delivered by the same judge who oversaw Ms. Holmes’s trial last year, and in making it, he considered a cache of letters and documents filed by lawyers and prosecutors for the case. Included among them were family photos of Ms. Holmes, her partner, Billy Evans, and their son, as well as comments from figures like Senator Cory Booker, who praised Ms. Holmes’s “determination to make a difference.” Her critics viewed the case as an opportunity to send a message to other tech founders who may distort the truth in their quest for success in an industry where few executives are ever found guilty of fraud. Given the ultimatum to leave Elon Musk’s Twitter or to stay at the company and “build a breakthrough Twitter 2.0,” some 1,200 employees appeared to choose to go on Thursday. They tendered their resignations hours before the 5 p.m. Eastern deadline that Mr. Musk set the day before in an email with the subject line, “A Fork in the Road.” The remaining staff, Mr. Musk wrote, would have to be “extremely hard core” and work long hours at a high intensity. Because the departures came on the heels of mass layoffs of about half of the company’s employees, there are growing questions about how the site will hold up. Vast swaths of Twitter’s work force have been eliminated, like the communications department, which no longer exists, and the platform’s infrastructure teams, which are virtually nonexistent. On Friday, Mr. Musk asked “anyone who actually writes software” to report to the 10th floor of Twitter’s headquarters. There is much to suggest that despite the crushing inflation consumers experienced this year, many intend to shop enthusiastically this holiday season. Retail sales rose 1.3 percent last month, beating expectations, as retailers like Amazon, Target and Kohl’s offered earlier-than-usual holiday deals. The rise in sales coincided with the first signs of moderating inflation: In October, prices climbed 7.7 percent from a year earlier, still a quick pace but down from 8.2 percent in September. But shoppers’ zeal for holiday sales indicated that they were looking for discounts, adding to the pressure on retailers — who not that long ago wielded more power to price products as they pleased — to lower prices. At Target, for example, demand tapered off when those sales ended. What has changed from last season? Consumers had more money saved in 2021, and were spending on clothes and electronics as they emerged from pandemic lockdowns. This year, customers have been much more worried about rising prices and have cut down on discretionary spending. The Federal Reserve will release the minutes from its November meeting this week, providing potential clues about whether policymakers intend to slow the pace of interest rate increases. Earlier this month, the Fed raised rates by three-quarters of a percentage point, the fourth consecutive increase of that size, and sent some mixed messages about the path ahead as it explained the decision. While the central bank said in a policy statement that officials would soon slow down the rate increases, Jerome H. Powell, the Fed chair, later said at a news conference it was “very premature” to consider a pause, keeping the Fed’s options open for its next move. Two large rail unions are expected to vote this week on the tentative agreement that was struck in September to avert a strike that would have thrown already mangled supply chains into chaos, worsened inflation and disrupted travel. The possibility of that strike still looms: Rail workers and their employers have been at odds over unrelenting and unpredictable schedules, and strict attendance policies that make it difficult to attend to personal matters, like doctor appointments, or risk penalties. And some workers don’t see many gains on those fronts in the proposed agreement, which added only a single day of paid personal leave. A few unions have already rejected it. The votes this week will not decide whether a strike is likely in December, but they will offer a sense of whether opposition to the contract is beginning to crystallize. Amazon plans to lay off about 10,000 people in corporate and technology jobs, adding to the string of layoffs in the tech industry. Inflation in Britain reached 11.1 percent in October from a year earlier. Workers at dozens of Starbucks locations went on a one-day strike on Thursday, protesting what they said are anti-union tactics from the company. "
nyt://article/6b3a3523-4c55-5de2-8592-a3f8a40b0521,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/09/03/your-money/student-loans-personal-finance.html,2022-09-03T07:00:10+0000,article,News,1255,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Community Colleges', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tuition', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Your Money Instead of making higher education free, we subsidize it later through repayment plans and attempts at debt cancellation. The complexity is disrespectful. If we want higher education to cost less, we should make it cheaper when people enroll. But that’s not how we do things in the United States, where the first rule of personal finance is that it should never be simple. Instead, we befuddle people with a menu of a half-dozen retirement accounts. We fetishize the tax code and its deductions and credits and refunds. We name gold, silver and bronze health insurance plans after precious metals but award no medals for clearing the enrollment hurdles. And so it goes with President Biden’s executive action around student loan debt cancellation. The potential $20,000 in relief per person gets the headlines. But the sleeper element here is a new income-driven debt repayment plan that would help many people pay much less of their student loan debt over time, if they’re not big earners. Instead of helping people up front, when they’re hit with five- and six-figure tuition price tags, we’re taking a plan that used to serve as a safety net and turning it into a stealth subsidy. Patching the student loan system is just the latest chapter in our long, sorry history of making things hard. In doing so, we confuse the very people we’re trying to help: the young, the old, the sick, the people without much time because they’re working hard to make ends meet. In some ways, this is a feature of federalism. The U.S. government helps pay for or subsidize unemployment insurance, Medicaid and 529 college savings plans. States, however, have rights. And so the size of your unemployment check depends on where you live, your state can refuse federal Medicaid funds that could help you have more health care and there are dozens of 529 college savings plans with different tax breaks — or none at all. We also like markets and plenty of choice. Politicians, policy wonks and product managers spend decades creating or navigating laws and regulations, and marketplaces emerge accordingly. Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. But then we get a result like the one we have in retirement savings. Have yourself a 401(k) or a 403(b) or a 457 depending on where you work, or all three over your next three jobs. You can invest money in a T.D.F. or possibly a REIT but probably not an E.T.F., and don’t forget to check for the E.S.G. options. Or maybe you’d like one of the many flavors of I.R.A.s, like an S.E.P. or (you really can’t make this stuff up) a S.I.M.P.L.E. one. Then, it’s time to sign up for Medicare. Tempted by an “Advantage Plan,” where a company promises to help you comprehend and utilize selections from your menu of government benefits? You may be able to choose among H.M.O., P.P.O., P.F.F.S., S.N.P., H.M.O.-P.O.S. and M.S.A. plans. The Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services website has an acronym glossary with 4,420 entries, because personal finance is its own language. You learn as you go, or not at all. All of this muck has its own field of study now. Pamela Herd is a professor at Georgetown University’s McCourt School of Public Policy, with an expertise in these “administrative burdens.” With certain social welfare benefits, Professor Herd explained in an interview this week, the original program designers believed that obstacles were appropriate. Anyone desperate enough should find a way to muddle through and prove their poverty, or so the logic went. More recently, administrative burdens have resulted from the conviction that private sector actors — who are often seeking profits — would be the most efficient intermediaries between people and federal programs that involved money. You see it in those Medicare Advantage Plans, and it was a feature of federal P.P.P. loans during the early stages of the pandemic. Rather than give employers money up front to keep people on the payroll, there were forgivable loans that required frazzled small business owners to beg a banker to bum rush a balky government website on their behalf. And so it goes with the federal student loan system. Both the income-driven repayment plans that have existed for years and a special debt cancellation program for public servants are already poster children for administrative burdens. Tracking your progress is a part-time job, complete with self-help Facebook groups of frustrated debtors and companies to help people manage the process. And wouldn’t you know it? There are several third parties to which the federal government has outsourced the work of collecting student loan payments and enforcing the rules. These so-called servicers have underperformed for years, drawing harsh scrutiny from the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau and the Education Department. Two big ones have announced their intention to quit altogether, and you can’t really blame them. But we can’t fire the rest, because we would need them to administer this new student loan repayment plan. It would go like this: Monthly payments on undergraduate loans would go to 5 percent from 10 percent of discretionary income; the amount of a person’s income that doesn’t meet the definition of discretionary would rise; and there would be a new, more generous way of calculating how balances shrink or grow over time. There are plenty of reasons to be skeptical that something this complex would roll out smoothly or quickly. And it would not be cheap. Estimates from the Penn Wharton Budget Model put the 10-year cost of the new repayment plan at anywhere from $70.3 billion to over $450 billion, depending on the implementation details and how students and schools change their borrowing and tuition-setting behavior. Again, it’s complicated. Politics got in the way of free community college, and the Inflation Reduction Act that Mr. Biden signed last month did not include it. Instead, students who borrow would get a subsidy on the back end through the more generous repayment program, years later, if they know it exists, enroll without incident, clear every hurdle over a decade or two and their loan servicer doesn’t make a hash of it. There are bad words and associated acronyms that we could use to sum all of this up as we scream into the void. But our framing could just as easily center on a single word: Respect. Professor Herd surprised me this week when she said the word in passing. I asked her to elaborate. “Respect includes everything from respecting people’s time to not treating them as if they are trying to cheat or game a system,” she said. “It’s about treating them as if they are full-fledged citizens and human beings who have basic rights to access services and benefits for which they’re eligible.” It seems simple enough. But too much of our personal finance infrastructure becomes adversarial through its complexity. The “prove it” nature of Mr. Biden’s executive action, with its income measurements and repeated checking in with third-party servicers, does not help, as generous as it may turn out to be for people who would eventually pass muster. Disrespect is calling student debt cancellation “forgiveness” when it’s really an apology for a dysfunctional higher education financing system. Disrespect is doing little to make tuition cheaper on the front end of this process. Disrespect is letting many for-profit schools continue to put people of color deep into debt for certificates or degrees that don’t mean much in the labor market. Disrespect guarantees full-time employment for personal finance journalists, too. I’m lucky to have the work, but it shouldn’t be necessary in the first place.  Ron Lieber has been the Your Money columnist since 2008 and has written five books, most recently “The Price You Pay for College.” More about Ron Lieber "
nyt://article/5b75cc97-49e7-560c-a638-0b5a9de56628,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/04/23/business/bed-bath-beyond-bankruptcy.html,2023-04-23T10:56:43+0000,article,News,1529,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bed Bath & Beyond Inc', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'E-Commerce', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shopping and Retail', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Bankruptcies', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The company, which failed to fully reckon with the rise of online shopping, said that store closing sales would begin on Wednesday. Bed Bath & Beyond came out of the 2008 downturn a winner. While competitors like Sharper Image and Linens ’n Things filed for bankruptcy, Bed Bath & Beyond actually expanded its business by acquiring other retailers. Its home-goods emporiums full of towels and kitchen aids — all available at a reduced price with that Big Blue coupon — were beacons that kept shoppers coming back. Now, as the U.S. economy experiences another period of uncertainty, Bed Bath & Beyond is no longer on top, the result of an increasingly unwieldy corporate structure and its failure to fully reckon with the ascendance of online shopping. On Sunday, the 52-year-old retailer said it was filing for bankruptcy protection in United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of New Jersey. It said it would start the process of closing the company’s 360 Bed Bath & Beyond stores and 120 Buy Buy Baby locations on Wednesday and seek to sell parts of its business. In its Chapter 11 filing, the company said it expected all stores to close by June 30. It will stop accepting its coupons on Wednesday, when its store closing sales begin. Customers will have until May 8 to use Bed Bath & Beyond gift cards. The company did not specify when its store apps would shut down, saying only that customers could continue using them “at this time.” “Thank you to all of our loyal customers,” the company said on its website. “We have made the difficult decision to begin winding down our operations.” To help fund its operations in bankruptcy, Bed Bath & Beyond has raised $240 million from the investment firm Sixth Street Specialty Lending. The company’s decline offers a glimpse into the forces shaping the post-pandemic retail landscape. For companies like Bed Bath & Beyond, whose financial problems were masked as consumers rushed to spend their stimulus money, the economic concerns of the past few months are exposing those weaknesses. It will become even more crucial for retailers to adapt as shoppers cut back on discretionary spending. “We are going to see the Darwinism of retail” play out in 2023, said Michael Lasser, a retail analyst at UBS who has covered Bed Bath & Beyond for 16 years.  The past several years have been tumultuous for retailers. In 2020, J.C. Penney, Neiman Marcus and J. Crew all filed for bankruptcy. But in the past two years, retailers have benefited from U.S. consumers’ willingness to spend. Now, as shoppers are being more discerning about their purchases, more companies will be at risk. The retail landscape looked much different when Bed Bath & Beyond was started in 1971 as a way to compete with the home goods sections of department stores. The company’s founders, Warren Eisenberg and Leonard Feinstein, opened the chain’s first stores in New York and New Jersey. The venture was originally called Bed ’n Bath, a nod to their narrow line of merchandise. Compared with a store like Macy’s, the upstart retailer promised a larger selection of bedsheets, towels, shower curtains and other home necessities. As their merchandise assortment and store base expanded, the retailer was renamed Bed Bath & Beyond in 1987. It went public in 1992. It embraced innovation, former executives and employees said. Instead of TV ads, Bed Bath & Beyond relied on word-of-mouth advertising and the large coupons it delivered to millions of Americans mailboxes. Countless shoppers would keep those 20 percent off cards in their cars or junk drawers, a reminder to head to the retailer if they were considering, say, a new toaster. Bed Bath & Beyond also had a decentralized warehouse strategy that allowed store managers to be more flexible in ordering the merchandise that would appeal most to shoppers at their location. It was also early to use integrated digital technology within its stores. Instructional videos would play in front of displays for items like SodaStreams or juicers, so shoppers would get a sense of how they could be used at home. It started its website in 1999. In 2000, Bed Bath & Beyond had 311 stores. A decade later, it had 1,100. From 2002 until 2012, the company acquired Harmon Stores, Christmas Tree Shops, Buy Buy Baby and Cost Plus World Market. The brands helped diversify the company from a retail perspective, but the moves also diverted management’s focus away from other crucial investments, like its e-commerce business, according to Richard McMahon, who held various executive titles at the company, including chief strategy officer, over 17 years before leaving in 2015. “There wasn’t as much focus put on the organic business — Bed Bath & Beyond — and evolving that business to consumer behavior,” Mr. McMahon said. “The internet started to become real, and consumer behavior was changing through that process.” Competitors like Amazon, Target and Walmart were investing in making the online experience better for shoppers, and Bed Bath & Beyond saw its market share dip. Google searches also worked against it because the 20 percent discounts were not factored in online, leading shoppers to believe that retailers like Amazon offered better deals. “Looking back on it,” Mr. McMahon said, “we could have been investing better in evolving the core business than some of these other acquisitions.”  In 2014, Bed Bath & Beyond got into the debt market for the first time by selling $1.5 billion in bonds to buy back stock. Many retailers avoid taking on debt, well aware of the industry volatility that can quickly turn a reasonable debt load into a serious financial burden. Mr. Lasser, the UBS analyst, described the move as a “seminal event” and wondered if it was an attempt to raise the company’s stock price to fend off activist investors. If that was the intent, it wasn’t a long-term solution. In 2019, a trio of activist investors — Legion Partners, Macellum Advisors and Ancora Advisors — won a fight with the retailer that gave them the choice of four new board members and, eventually, a chief executive they supported: Mark Tritton of Target, the first top executive to come from outside the company. Much of the workplace culture at Bed Bath & Beyond soon changed. There were layoffs. Store managers had less say over which items would be stocked in their stores. Mr. Tritton, who left the company last year, declined to comment on his tenure. When the pandemic came, Bed Bath & Beyond joined other retailers in dealing with supply chain problems. But the company’s decentralized system complicated things further, and its e-commerce technology was less advanced than many of its biggest competitors. Revenue in 2020 fell to $2.6 billion, a 16 percent drop from 2019. What had once been a manageable debt load quickly became unsustainable.  As the company looked for places to cut costs, it started to undo the things that people loved about Bed Bath & Beyond. In 2020, the retailer said it would scale back on mailing its trademark coupons. It moved away from national, well-known brands in favor of making its own batch of private label brands, which usually have better margins. To make stores feel more open, it removed items and tore down its 14-foot-tall tower of towels.  Shoppers noticed. “Bed Bath & Beyond had almost become a manual for how to adult,” said Chris Dancy, 54, a once-loyal Bed Bath & Beyond shopper who was introduced to the brand in their early 20s. Mr. Dancy used to go into their stores weekly, but after the coupon was scaled back, so too were the visits. “The allure of having the Willy Wonka golden ticket — or blue ticket — was gone,” Mr. Dancy said. When reached on Sunday after the bankruptcy news, Mr. Dancy was preparing to go to the store that afternoon with their husband and plenty of coupons to purchase sheets, a Roomba, an air fryer and whatever else jumped out. “I just don’t want to go in there and drop two grand but I probably will,” Mr. Dancy said. In August, the company announced an aggressive restructuring plan, saying it would close 150 stores and lay off more workers. Just a few days later, the retailer was thrown into emotional tumult when its chief financial officer, Gustavo Arnal, died, a death that was ruled a suicide. Bed Bath & Beyond’s suppliers started to get spooked and began demanding payment upfront. That led to in-stock levels around 70 percent during the past holiday season, according to Sue Gove, who became the permanent chief executive in October. In early February, the company sidestepped bankruptcy after coming up with a plan to use a public stock offering to raise more than $1 billion. The plan, backed by Hudson Bay Capital Management, was good only so long as Bed Bath & Beyond’s stock stayed above $1 a share. This month, the retailer canceled that deal after its terms were breached. Its stock closed at 29 cents a share on Friday. All the while, sales continued to fall, starving the company of the cash — and confidence — necessary to keep suppliers shipping to its stores. “It’s a death spiral,” said Neil Saunders, the managing director at GlobalData’s retail division. “If you can’t get the stock, you can’t make the sales. If you can’t make the sales, your credit deteriorates. If your credit deteriorates, people are less willing to supply you. That cycle seems impossible to break.” nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion opinion arts magazine Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman Lauren Hirsch joined The Times from CNBC in 2020, covering deals and the biggest stories on Wall Street. More about Lauren Hirsch "
nyt://article/3847d733-5ea0-59c2-bed6-a1d0d27aec21,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/03/31/business/economy/inflation-rising-wages.html,2022-03-31T09:00:20+0000,article,News,1494,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Wages and Salaries', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Shortages', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labor and Jobs', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Price Gouging', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Renting and Leasing (Real Estate)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Economists hoped that as households shifted spending back to services, price gains would cool. That effect might be less pronounced now. Economists have been waiting for Americans to shift from buying goods, like furniture and appliances, and toward spending on vacations, restaurant meals and other services as the pandemic fades, betting the transition would take pressure off supply chains and help inflation to moderate. Rapid wage growth could make that story more complicated. Demand for services is rising just as many employers are struggling to find workers, which could force them to continue raising wages. While positive for workers, that could keep overall inflation brisk as companies try to cover their labor costs, speeding up price increases for services even as they begin to moderate for goods. Heavy spending on goods during the pandemic has been a driver of the recent inflation burst. Consumers began snapping up physical products a few months after pandemic lockdowns began and have kept on buying. Spending on services has also recovered, but much more slowly. That shift in what people are purchasing has roiled supply chains, which were not built to produce, ship and deliver so many cars, treadmills and washing machines. Policymakers spent months betting that as the coronavirus waned and consumers resumed more normal shopping patterns, prices of goods would slow their ascent or even fall. That would pull down inflation, which has been running at its fastest pace in 40 years. But that transition — assuming it happens — may do less to cool inflation than many had hoped. A big chunk of what the government defines as “services” inflation comes from rental housing costs, which often move up alongside wage growth, as households can afford more and bid up the cost of a limited supply of housing units. And when it comes to discretionary services, like salons and gyms, labor is a major cost of production. Rising pay is likely to mean higher prices. Jason Furman, a Harvard economist who served as a top adviser to President Barack Obama, said the shortage of workers in many service industries meant that if demand for services went up, prices would, too. That means a shift in spending back to services won’t necessarily result in an overall slowdown in price increases. “An awful lot of services are incredibly constrained,” he said. “As we shift back to services, we’ll get more services inflation and less goods inflation, and I don’t think it’s at all obvious that the result of that is less inflation.” Inflation is running at the fastest pace since 1982, data released Thursday confirmed. Prices climbed 6.4 percent in the year through February, more than three times the Federal Reserve’s goal of 2 percent annual increases on average. Rapid price changes have been spreading beyond goods and into services in recent months. While America has gotten used to thinking about shortages in products — couches are out of stock, shoes are back-ordered — labor shortfalls could mean that services will also end up oversubscribed, allowing providers to charge more. MaidPro, a home-cleaning firm, has seen a surge in demand from professionals who are spending more time at home. But it is having trouble finding workers to keep up, said Tom Manchester, the company’s president. What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. “Our demand right now outstrips our supply of being able to service that demand,” he said. “Demand has just continued to be strong — like double-digit strong. And if we could find qualified pros to meet the demand, we’d be even more ahead than we are today.” Mr. Manchester said hourly wages were up $1 to $3, adding to costs when cleaning products have gotten pricier and higher gas prices have made travel reimbursements more expensive. MaidPro franchisees have been able to pass those costs on to their customers, both via fuel surcharges and outright price increases that have more or less kept up with inflation. So far, they have lost few customers — in part because few competitors have capacity to take on new customers. “If someone has someone that they really like coming in to clean their home, they don’t want to lose them,” Mr. Manchester said. “They don’t want to risk saying, ‘I want to move away from MaidPro and try to find someone else,’ because in nine out of 10 instances, that someone else isn’t available.” Some economists argue that if goods inflation slows, that could still help price gains overall to moderate, even amid rising wages. Prices for products that last a long time rose 11.4 percent in the year through February — posting the first slight moderation in months, from 11.6 percent in January. Prices for shorter-lived products like cosmetics and clothing continued to accelerate on an annual basis, climbing 8.6 percent. Both are still much stronger than services inflation. “We have in mind a big decline in goods prices,” said Roberto Perli, the head of global policy research at the investment bank Piper Sandler. “It would take a lot of increase in service prices to actually offset that.” Outright declines in goods prices are not guaranteed. Take cars: Rapid price growth in new and used autos was a big driver of inflation last year, and many economists expect those prices to dip in 2022. But Jonathan Smoke, the chief economist at Cox Automotive, said that continued shortages meant prices for new cars were likely to continue rising, and that issues with new car supply could spill over to blunt the expected decline in used car costs. And services inflation is now also coming in fast. It ran at 4.6 percent in the year through February, the quickest pace since 1991. If sustained, that is enough to keep inflation above the Fed’s 2 percent goal even if product prices stop accelerating. While goods have taken up a bigger chunk of household budgets in recent months than they did before the pandemic, Americans still spend nearly twice as much on services as on goods overall. “You don’t need a lot of extra services inflation to make up for your lost goods inflation,” Mr. Furman said. Restaurants, hotels and other discretionary services aren’t the only places where persistent demand could run up against limited supply, Mr. Furman argued. Many nonurgent health care services saw a decline in demand during the pandemic and are now experiencing a rebound amid a shortage of nurses and other skilled workers. Rent — which is the biggest monthly expense for many families and plays a big role in determining inflation overall — has also been rising at a rapid clip. In cities such as Tampa, Fla., Spokane, Wash., and Knoxville, Tenn., listed rents were up 30 percent or more in the fall from a year earlier, according to data from Apartment List. Igor Popov, the chief economist at Apartment List, said the breakneck pace of new rent increases is unlikely to repeat itself this year. But many rents will be resetting at higher market rates this spring and summer, he said, adding that they are likely to continue rising as long as wages do. “Rents are partially a function of what people are able and willing to pay,” Mr. Popov said. The Fed’s recent move to raise interest rates — and its planned increases throughout the year — may cool off the housing market, which could eventually affect rents. But in the near term, higher interest rates might make purchasing homes expensive and out of reach for more people. That could temporarily increase rental demand. Much hinges on what happens next with wages, and that is anyone’s guess. Laura Rosner-Warburton, an economist at MacroPolicy Perspectives, said wages might be going through something of a “level reset,” where companies have been paying up in light of a newly tight labor market — in some cases, to get on a par with wages at Amazon or other big companies — but may not continue to lift pay so much month after month. That may be what happened in accommodation and restaurants, she said, noting that both saw a surge in wage pressures that has since cooled off. Nick Bunker, the director of economic research for North America at the Indeed Hiring Lab, said conditions remained tight — there are 1.8 job openings for every active job seeker today — but the data suggest that labor shortages are no longer actively worsening, which could at least keep wage growth from accelerating further. “The labor market is stronger, tighter, hotter than it was before the pandemic, but there are some signs that it is starting to level off,” he said. It is also possible that higher wages will lure workers back into the job market, helping to offset labor shortages and allowing conditions to settle into a more sustainable path. But the economy has repeatedly surprised economists and businesses over the past year — typically in ways that have stoked pay and inflation. Mr. Manchester said many maid service executives had expected the labor crunch to ease when enhanced unemployment benefits from the federal government ended in September. But while there was some increase in willing workers, there was no sudden flood. “Everyone is competing for hourly employees,” he said. “We’re competing with the Dunkin’ Donuts, the Home Depots, the Bed Bath & Beyonds — anyone that relies on hourly workers.” Jeanna Smialek writes about the Federal Reserve and the economy for The Times. She previously covered economics at Bloomberg News.  More about Jeanna Smialek Ben Casselman writes about economics, with a particular focus on stories involving data. He previously reported for FiveThirtyEight and The Wall Street Journal. More about Ben Casselman "
nyt://article/54ff4482-8fb4-5f5a-a46d-56d1a5eafcff,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/06/23/business/dealbook/summer-inflation-funflation-beyonce-taylor-swift.html,2023-06-23T12:23:33+0000,article,News,1819,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-storyline-no', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Bank of England', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bailey, Andrew (1959- )', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Powell, Jerome H', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Swift, Taylor', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Knowles, Beyonce', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'England', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Great Britain', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Sweden', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter Consumers are splurging on expensive but fun experiences, from nights out to concerts — and that may force central banks to keep raising rates. Uncomfortably high inflation appears set to linger, forcing central bankers to inflict further pain on consumers and businesses by raising borrowing costs again and again.  But economists have spotted an unusual trend heading into the summer: Consumers are still splashing out on expensive but fun experiences, from nights out to concerts, despite surging prices. Central bank chiefs on both sides of the Atlantic are sounding the alarm. The Bank of England raised interest rates by a higher-than-expected half-percentage point after failing to get a handle on the highest inflation of any Group of 7 country. The bank’s governor, Andrew Bailey, whose credibility is taking a pummeling, gave a cautionary explanation: “If we don’t raise rates now, it could be worse later.” Hours later, Jay Powell, the Fed chair, told a Senate committee that he saw a similar threat. “We are committed to getting inflation under control,” he said, warning that at least one more increase is on the table. Economists are seeing something weird in the inflation data. Consumers are splurging on pricey meals, through-the-roof airfare and expensive concert tickets. Some economists in Sweden even blamed Beyoncé fans for driving up prices of hotels and restaurants when they converged on the country last month to see the star kick off her world tour. In the U.S., others have seen a similar effect with hotel prices soaring in cities where Taylor Swift performs. “It’s fun-flation, if you’re looking for a word,” Holger Schmieding, chief economist at Berenberg, told DealBook. And the data suggests this brand of inflation isn’t receding. “We’re looking at the summer of fun,” he said. When inflation runs persistently high, consumers normally cut back. If they do spend, it is typically on so-called durable goods: a new washing machine, a car, a house. The thinking is that it’s prudent to bring forward such purchases if you believe you’ll spend more for them in the near future. Economists and central bankers are seeing a bit of that, but also higher spending on discretionary items, such as travel and nights out. Some call the phenomenon “revenge spending,” the zeal to indulge in experiences now that Covid lockdowns are far in the past. (It helps that many still have pandemic savings to draw on, or have seen their wages surge in the past year.) Grant Fitzner, the chief economist of Britain’s Office for National Statistics, has singled out airfare, concert tickets and computer games as big drivers behind the country’s stubbornly high inflation. A summer of fun could invite a tougher policy response this autumn. “The only way to get inflation down to 2 percent is to crush demand and slow down the economy in a more substantial way,” Torsten Slok, chief economist at Apollo Global Management, told The Financial Times. The five people on the Titan submersible are presumed dead. U.S. Coast Guard officials said that the vessel appeared to have suffered a “catastrophic implosion” near the site of the Titanic wreck. Deep-sea experts, including the director James Cameron, said the company had long been warned of flaws in the Titan’s design. Microsoft warns it may abandon its takeover bid for Activision Blizzard. Lawyers for the tech giant said at a court hearing that it would walk away from the $70 billion deal if a federal judge granted the F.T.C. an injunction that delayed the transaction’s closing. Microsoft’s team also accused Sony, a top video game rival, of being the “complainer in chief” about the deal. TikTok shakes up its leadership. V. Pappas, its chief operating officer, will leave the video app maker, and it named Zenia Mucha, the combative former head of media relations at Disney, as its communications chief. The moves come as TikTok faces pressure from Washington over its parent company ByteDance of China and questions about its data and privacy practices. Warren Buffett gives billions more to charity. The Oracle of Omaha donated $4.6 billion worth of his Berkshire Hathaway holdings to five groups, including the Gates Foundation and organizations run by his children. That brings Buffett’s total charitable giving to more than $51 billion — more than his entire net worth in 2006, when he first began his huge annual donations. During his state visit to Washington this week, Prime Minister Narendra Modi of India has secured a wealth of deals, and praise, from President Biden, including long-sought defense pacts and pledges on economic cooperation. Modi benefited from Biden’s effort to tighten ties with India, a bid to make it a counterweight to China and erode its alliance with Russia. But all the deals and pomp of the visit — including an address to Congress and a lavish state dinner — may not have accomplished what the White House had wanted. Among the deals that India got: a long-delayed purchase of $3 billion worth of Predator drones; a joint venture with General Electric to produce next-generation jet engines in India; pledges by chipmakers including Micron and Applied Materials to invest in plants there; and other initiatives on telecommunications, artificial intelligence and more. Unexpectedly, the U.S. and India also resolved six disputes before the World Trade Organization, with Modi agreeing to lift retaliatory tariffs on a range of American exports. U.S. leaders gave Modi a hearty welcome, as Washington seeks to nudge India further into the American sphere of influence. “The partnership is among the most consequential in the world,” Biden said at a news conference on Thursday. Corporate America was highly involved in the visit, as businesses seek to make further inroads into India as a key manufacturing hub and growing market. Consider who dined on stuffed portobello mushrooms and saffron-infused risotto with Modi at last night’s state dinner: Industrial chieftains like Dave Calhoun of Boeing, Larry Culp of G.E. and James Taiclet of Lockheed Martin; Tech giants including Sam Altman of OpenAI, Tim Cook of Apple, Sanjay Mehrotra of Micron, Sundar Pichai of Alphabet and Lisa Su of A.M.D.; Financial leaders like Ken Chenault, Jane Fraser of Citigroup, Adena Friedman of Nasdaq, Deven Parekh of Insight Venture Partners and Hemant Taneja of General Catalyst. “The U.S. and India need each other in technology,” Taneja told DealBook in an email. “The U.S. has to recognize the strength and needs of India’s economy and build a feedback cycle that avoids the digital cold war we currently find ourselves in with China. This is all the more pressing in the midst of the global debate over A.I. and the need to adopt basic guardrails worldwide so the future of the technology is not dictated by nefarious actors.” But hard questions about India went unanswered. Biden and Modi largely brushed off criticism of the Indian government’s crackdown on human rights and religious freedom. And Modi made no pledges to endorse U.S. efforts to restrain China, nor to cut ties to Russia. (Speaking of which, this investigation by The Times into how India profits from buying and refining Russian crude oil is a must-read.) That may be because the White House and business leaders are focused on India’s population of 1.4 billion, its growing appetite for consumer goods and its explosion as a manufacturing hub. “I’ve long believed that the relationship between the United States and India will be one of the defining relationships of the 21st century,” Biden said on Thursday. In other India-U.S. news: Federal prosecutors in Brooklyn and the S.E.C. are reportedly scrutinizing the Adani Group, the conglomerate run by the Modi ally Gautam Adani, after it was criticized by an American short-seller, according to Bloomberg. — Justin Welby, the archbishop of Canterbury (and a former oil industry executive), on the decision by the Church of England to sell its shares in major oil companies, including Shell, BP and Exxon, over frustration that they were not doing enough to combat climate change. Basketball fans on Thursday were transfixed by the San Antonio Spurs selecting Victor Wembanyama as the No. 1 pick in this year’s N.B.A. draft. Analysts have long pegged the French seven-footer, perhaps the most highly anticipated draft pick since LeBron James, as a game changer. But a lower-profile development also promises to reshape the league: Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund is in talks to buy a piece of the Washington Wizards’ parent company at a $4.05 billion valuation, as first reported by Sportico. Qatar is seeking a 5 percent stake in Monumental Sports and Entertainment, which owns the Wizards (and the Washington Capitals in the N.H.L.), in what would be the country’s first investment in a major American sports league. The oil-and-gas-rich country wouldn’t have any say in how the Wizards are run, but its money could help finance further expansion by Monumental. The talks represent the next step in the N.B.A.’s efforts to open up the universe of league ownership, which started with private equity firms and expanded to other institutional investors like family offices and, yes, sovereign wealth funds. (Also reported on Thursday were talks by Omers, a big Ontario public pension fund, to take a 20 percent stake in the parent company of the Toronto Raptors of the N.B.A.) It’s the latest move into sports by Middle Eastern funds, whose coffers are bulging with petrodollars and which have been eager to build up soft power by buying into global brands. Through a different entity, Qatar owns the Paris Saint-Germain soccer club, while a member of the country’s royal family has bid for Manchester United of England. And this month Saudi Arabia helped broker a potential deal between LIV Golf, the upstart competition it has backed, and the PGA Tour.  Critics have said that the flood of Middle Eastern wealth into sports is an effort by Persian Gulf states to whitewash accusations of human rights abuses against them. Still, sports leagues thus far have shown little inclination to turn down the money. Deals A group of lenders led by Fortress Investment Group agreed to buy Vice, the embattled digital media publisher, out of bankruptcy. (NYT) Virgin Galactic raised $300 million by selling new stock, as Richard Branson’s space tourism company seeks to expand its vehicle fleet. (CNBC) “An I.P.O. for a Painting? This $55 Million Masterpiece Is Going Public” (WSJ) Policy Ford and SK On will receive a $9.2 billion government loan to help build three battery-manufacturing plants in Kentucky and Tennessee. (NYT) Meta said it would shut off news access for the Canadian users of its Facebook and Instagram platforms after the country passed legislation that would force tech giants to pay domestic news publishers. (AP, NYT) Best of the rest A federal judge sanctioned two lawyers who cited fake legal citations generated by ChatGPT in court filings. (NYT) Representative George Santos’s bond guarantors are finally revealed: They’re his father and an aunt. (NYT) Citigroup warns that it will soon start cracking down on workers who don’t comply with in-office attendance policies. (Bloomberg)  We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Ravi Mattu is the managing editor of DealBook, based in London. He joined The New York Times in 2022 from the Financial Times, where he held a number of senior roles in Hong Kong and London. More about Ravi Mattu Bernhard Warner joined the The Times in 2022 as a senior editor for DealBook. Previously he was a senior writer and editor at Fortune focusing on business, the economy and the markets. More about Bernhard Warner Sarah Kessler is a senior staff editor for DealBook and the author of “Gigged,” a book about workers in the gig economy. More about Sarah Kessler Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced Lauren Hirsch joined The Times from CNBC in 2020, covering deals and the biggest stories on Wall Street. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni "
nyt://article/6d0c782a-6f08-5c6e-bbcc-494ed13e9464,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/11/20/business/high-gas-prices.html,2021-11-20T10:00:17+0000,article,News,1543,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Oil (Petroleum) and Gasoline', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Automobiles', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'California', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'New Jersey', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'United States', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," They hit their highest level since 2014 last month, forcing Americans to rejigger household budgets and forgo leisure activities. “Times are tough right now,” said Chris Gonzalez, an Uber Eats driver.Credit...Jason Henry for The New York Times A driver in Belleville, N.J., cut his cable and downsized his apartment to save money for gas. A retiree in Vallejo, Calif., said he had stopped driving to go fishing because the miles cost too much in fuel. An auto repairman in Toms River, N.J., doesn’t go to restaurants as often. And an Uber Eats deliveryman said he couldn’t afford frequent visits to his family and friends, some of whom live 60 miles away. “Times are tough right now,” Chris Gonzalez, 31, the Uber Eats driver, said as he filled up his tank at a Safeway gas station off Interstate 80 in California. Millions of American drivers have acutely felt the recent surge in gas prices, which last month hit their highest level since 2014. The national average for a gallon of gas is $3.41, which is $1.29 more than it was a year ago, according to AAA. Even after a recent price dip in crude oil, gasoline remains 7 cents more per gallon than it was a month ago. While consumers are seeing a steady rise in the prices of many goods and services, the cost of gas is especially visible. It is displayed along highways across the country, including in areas where a gallon has climbed as high as $7.59 — as regular gas did in Gorda, Calif., in October. Steeper gas prices are pushing people to rejigger household budgets, sometimes by forgoing leisure activities and in other cases by cutting back spending on essentials. Many are trying to save by spending less time on the road, a difficult proposition as the holiday season approaches, and with it the temptation to make up for the lost celebrations of last year. Just 32 percent of Americans plan to drive for Thanksgiving, down from 35 percent last year, at the height of the pandemic, and 65 percent in 2019, according to a survey from the fuel savings platform GasBuddy. Consumers glimpsed the prospect of some relief this month as oil prices fell, responding to a strengthening U.S. dollar along with concerns about impending Covid-19 lockdowns in Europe, and gas prices began to stabilize. Though there is normally a delay between a drop in oil prices and cheaper gas, President Biden instructed the Federal Trade Commission this week to investigate why prices at the pump haven’t declined as much as might be expected, citing the possibility of “illegal conduct” by oil and gas companies. The administration is also facing calls from Congress to tap the country’s Strategic Petroleum Reserve, which the Senate majority leader, Chuck Schumer, said would help struggling Americans. Gas prices have gone up in part because of fluctuations in supply and demand. Demand for oil fell precipitously in the early months of the pandemic, so the Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries and other oil-producing nations cut production. In the United States, reduced demand led to a substantial decline in drilling; the country’s oil rig count was down nearly 70 percent in summer 2020. But over the past year, demand for oil recovered far faster than OPEC restored its production, and crude oil prices doubled to as much as $84 a barrel. (Since Nov. 9, the price has declined to just over $76.) The shutdown of some large American refineries during the pandemic also tightened the oil supply. Since the beginning of 2020, some 5 percent of the country’s refining capacity has closed, responding to a decline in travel. “When you have demand recovering but you’ve eliminated permanently some source of the supply, then prices go up,” said Andy Lipow, president of Lipow Oil Associates, a consulting firm in Houston. “The consumer is feeling pain at the pump.” For drivers, the rising costs have added stress to commutes and weekly routines; suddenly, popping out for errands or dropping children at school has taken on new financial weight. Like breakdowns in the supply chain to labor shortages, gas prices have also contributed to a growing sense among consumers that the economy is not fully functioning for them. Aldo McCoy, who owns an auto repair shop in Toms River, watched the numbers on a gas pump flash higher Wednesday as he filled up the tank of his 1963 Chevrolet Impala. He recalled recently filling his 2003 Cadillac Escalade and seeing the price go above $100, where it used to be $45. Mr. McCoy said he and his staff were working more than 15 hours of overtime each week to compensate for the extra money they spent on gas. He has also cut back on his household spending. “You don’t go out to stores much, or out to dinner,” he said. “You can’t travel to enjoy yourself. It’s off the table now.” Louise Tomitz, 74, who is retired and lives on Social Security in Toms River, said the price of gas was making it difficult to cover the costs of visits to her daughter nearly an hour away in Middletown, N.J. “I don’t work now, and then you have to pay all this extra money for gas and it’s affecting my budget,” Ms. Tomitz said. “It’s getting rough.” Drivers shocked at gas prices are seeing more than just the effects of crude oil costs. Compliance with renewable-fuel standards can add more than 10 cents per gallon, the price of ethanol has increased, and labor shortages in the trucking industry have made it more expensive to get gas from terminals to stations. Energy analysts point out that gas prices have been higher in the past; in 2008, the national average rose above $4.10 per gallon. (Adjusted for inflation, that would be equivalent to $5.16 today.) They’re optimistic that the increase in travel and gas demand is a reflection of the economy’s rebound from the pandemic, though they worry that rising prices could make people cut back on other spending. “If gas prices rise so much that it affects consumers’ disposable incomes, this would weigh on discretionary spending,” said Fawad Razaqzada, a market analyst at ThinkMarkets. “It would be bad news for retailers.” In California, where the average price of a gallon is the highest in the nation, at more than $4.60, drivers said they were changing their behavior. Some sought out cheaper spots, like Costco and Safeway gas stations, to save a few dollars. At an Arco station in San Francisco’s NoPa neighborhood, a line of cars extended into the crowded street on Thursday. Some drivers searched for change. Others grumbled about the prices, which have shot up to as much as $4.49 at the Arco — known locally for its normally cheap rates — and up to $5.85 in the most expensive part of the city. Keith Crawford, 57, who was filling up his Kia Optima, said he had taken to getting smaller amounts of gas twice a week to soften the blow to his bank account. “You have to spread it out in order to stay afloat,” said Mr. Crawford, a concierge. “It’s part of the budget now.” Thirty miles northeast of San Francisco in Vallejo, drivers lined up at the Safeway gas station off I-80, where the price was $4.83 per gallon. Several put the blame for their bills on the Biden administration. “It’s Biden, Gavin Newsom — look at the gas taxes we pay,” said Kevin Altman, a 54-year-old retiree, referring to California’s governor. Mr. Altman paid $50 to fill up his Jeep and estimated the gas would last him just two days. He said he had stopped driving to go fishing in nearby Benicia to avoid using too much gas, and would do all his Christmas shopping online this year. The cost can be especially challenging for people who own businesses that depend on transit. Mahmut Sonmez, 33, who runs a car service, spends nearly $800 on gas out of the $2,500 he earns each week driving people around New Jersey. To save money, he moved in September into a Belleville apartment that is $400 cheaper than his previous home. He also cut his cable service and changed cellphone plans. If gas prices keep rising, Mr. Sonmez said, he will consider changing jobs after nine years in the industry. “Somehow we’ve got to pay the rent,” he said. In New Jersey, which bans self-service gas, some drivers are directing their ire toward station attendants. “Every day they’re cursing me out,” said Gaby Marmol, 25, the assistant manager of a BP station in Newark, adding that when she sees how much the customers spend on both gas and convenience store items — $1.19 for ring pops that used to be 50 cents — she feels sympathetic. “We’re just doing our jobs, but they think we set the prices.” Cheik Diakite, 62, an attendant at a Mobil station in Newark, doesn’t get as many tips as he did before the pandemic, he said, and grows frustrated listening to customers attribute the high prices to Mr. Biden. Mr. Diakite typically passes afternoons by looking out for his most loyal customers. Bebi Amzad, who works at a nearby school, always has the same request for him: “Fill it up.” But when she pulled in on Thursday, she asked him to give her just $30 worth of gas. “Today I’m not filling up all the way because I have other expenses,” said Ms. Amzad, 54, who commutes to Newark from Linden, N.J. “Everybody is hurting.” Because she spends so much on gas and groceries, Ms. Amzad continued, she can’t afford many indulgences. “I don’t go to Marshalls anymore.” Clifford Krauss contributed reporting. Coral Murphy Marcos is a business reporter. More about Coral Murphy Marcos Kellen Browning is a technology reporter in the Bay Area covering the video game industry and general tech news. He graduated from Pomona College. More about Kellen Browning "
nyt://article/f8954b8c-b635-5c56-80fd-767a5ffc9b59,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/11/08/business/kohls-chief-executive-departure.html,2022-11-08T14:55:28+0000,article,News,738,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': ""Kohl's Corporation"", 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Gass, Michelle', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Ms. Gass, who will be become president at the denim maker, is expected to take over the top post at the company within 18 months. Kohl’s chief executive, Michelle Gass, is leaving the department store chain next month to become president of Levi Strauss & Company and eventually succeed its longtime leader, Chip Bergh. Ms. Gass will depart Dec. 2, in the middle of the critical holiday season, after four years in Kohl’s top post. Levi’s said on Tuesday that she would replace Mr. Bergh, who has led the company since 2011, as chief executive within the next 18 months. Mr. Bergh said the choice of his successor would help define his legacy at Levi’s, and he expressed confidence that Ms. Gass was the right person for the role. “I expect that she’s going to bring a real innovation mind-set here,” Mr. Bergh said in an interview. “That will contribute to the continued transformation of the company.” He has been focused on making sure the Levi’s signature denim jeans still hold cultural resonance with the increasingly important Generation Z shopper. In recent years, Levi’s, a 169-year-old multinational brand, has experienced many changes. It became a publicly traded company for the second time in 2019, focused on expanding in international markets like China, and it has ramped up its messaging around sustainability and durability. The transition period that Levi’s board has built in for Ms. Gass “gives her an opportunity to formulate her agenda when she becomes C.E.O. before she’s sitting in the hot seat,” Mr. Bergh said. Mr. Bergh had groomed several candidates to be his successor, but said four of them had left to take top positions at other companies. That was when the company started looking for outside candidates. Levi’s recently had an executive exit that was more contentious. Its brand president, Jennifer Sey, who was considered a leading candidate to replace Mr. Bergh, left Levi’s this year after becoming increasingly outspoken about pandemic school closings. She said the company had forced her out because of her views. Levi’s disputed her claim. At Kohl’s, Ms. Gass started a number of initiatives to bolster sales and help transform the retailer’s image as a destination for millennial parents and Gen Z consumers. She oversaw the introduction of the Amazon returns program, which allows shoppers to walk into a Kohl’s store and drop off goods purchased through the online retailer. Kohl’s has said customers tend to stay around to shop at its stores after making an Amazon return. It is also testing a smaller footprint for its stores, and opened a 35,000-square-foot store in Tacoma, Wash., last month. A typical Kohl’s is around 80,000 square feet. Kohl’s has put a huge emphasis on its partnership with Sephora, which will have 600 shop-in-shops in Kohl’s stores by the end of the year and plans to open 250 more in 2023. Kohl’s sees the partnership generating $2 billion in annual sales by 2025. Still, Ms. Gass is leaving at a challenging time for the chain. Its core shoppers — middle-income Americans — have faced intense pressure from inflation on a range of items and have pulled back on buying discretionary items like apparel. The holiday shopping season is likely going to be weak, said Craig Johnson, president of Customer Growth Partners, a retail advisory firm. Kohl’s announced preliminary third-quarter results on Tuesday, reporting that same-store sales fell 6.9 percent and its operating margin was 4.7 percent. It said it would release full quarterly earnings on Nov. 17. “Clearly she has tried a number of things, but the success in them has been a mixed bag,” Mr. Johnson said. Her successor will have to contend with some structural decisions, he said, including the number of stores that Kohl’s should have. The chain has 1,100 across the United States. Ms. Gass joined Kohl’s in 2013, after a long tenure at Starbucks, where she was credited with creating the Frappuccino and its caramel drizzle. On Tuesday, Kohl’s praised her efforts to reshape the company for a younger generation. “Under her leadership, the company has driven a strategic transformation, expanded its partnerships and brand portfolio, and supported an inclusive and collaborative culture,” Peter Boneparth, Kohl’s chairman, said in a statement. Thomas Kingsbury, a Kohl’s board member and former chief executive of Burlington, will be interim chief executive while Kohl’s looks for a permanent leader. Kohl’s stock price has dropped 42 percent since the beginning of the year, and the retailer has been under pressure to improve its financial fortunes. In January, it was pushed by a handful of activist investors to sell itself. Levi’s has seen its stock price fall 40 percent since the start of the year. Jordyn Holman is a business reporter covering retail for The Times. She previously worked at Bloomberg News, where she covered retail and diversity in corporate America. More about Jordyn Holman "
nyt://article/d544a16d-f31a-5313-8d3d-e47a84fa0128,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/13/well/move/exercise-diet-disease.html,2022-07-13T16:56:36+0000,article,News,720,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Exercise', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Diet and Nutrition', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Longevity', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Research', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'British Journal of Sports Medicine', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Sprawling new research showed that healthy eating and regular workouts do not, in isolation, stave off later health issues. They need to be done together. Health food or exercise alone isn’t enough to prevent chronic disease, new research shows. Contrary to popular belief, you can’t outrun the toll of a poor diet — and healthy eating, on its own, won’t ward off disease. Most people know that working out and eating well are critical components of overall health. But a sweeping study published this week in the British Journal of Sports Medicine suggests that hitting the gym won’t counteract the consequences of consuming fat-laden foods, and mainlining kale can’t cancel out sedentary habits. “Sensationalized headlines and misleading advertisement for exercise regimens to lure consumers into the idea of ‘working out to eat whatever they want’ have fueled circulation of the myth about ‘exercise outrunning a bad diet,’” the study authors wrote. Previous animal studies as well as a few human ones have backed this up, suggesting that, at least in the short term, strenuous exercise can counteract the effects of overeating. So an international team of researchers examined data from nearly 350,000 participants collected from the U.K. Biobank, an enormous medical database with health information from people across Britain, and followed up over a decade-long period. The study participants, median age 57, were healthy at the outset of the study, meaning they were not diagnosed with conditions like cardiovascular disease, cancer or chronic pain. Analyzing self-reported questionnaires, the experts broke people’s diets down by quality. For instance, high-quality diets had at least 4.5 cups of fruit and vegetables per day, two or more servings of fish per week, less than two servings of processed meats per week and no more than five servings of red meat per week. The study did not measure discretionary foods like soft drinks or desserts, said Melody Ding, the lead author of the study and an associate professor at the University of Sydney. The researchers also measured activity levels using responses from another questionnaire that asked about the total minutes participants spent walking and engaging in moderate physical activity, like carrying light loads or biking at a steady pace, and vigorous physical activity that lasted more than 10 minutes at a time. The authors wrote that it was the first study to examine diet and exercise alongside both general mortality and specific lethal diseases, like cancer. Not surprisingly, people with both higher levels of physical activity and better quality diets had the lowest mortality risk. Overall physical activity levels were associated with a lower mortality risk, but those who regularly engaged in vigorous exercise — the kind that makes you break a sweat — had a particularly lower risk of cardiovascular disease mortality. And even just 10 to 75 minutes per week made a difference. Regardless of your diet, Dr. Ding said, “physical activity is important. And whatever your physical activity is, diet is important.” “Any amount of exercise is protective,” said Salvador Portugal, a sports health expert and assistant professor in the Department of Rehabilitation Medicine at NYU Langone Health who was not involved in the study. But you can’t rely solely on your workout to maintain good health, he added. These findings underscore what many doctors have seen in practice, said Dr. Tamanna Singh, co-director of the Sports Cardiology Center at Cleveland Clinic who was not involved with the study. For instance, she said, there are many components of heart health, and “optimizing one thing is not going to necessarily improve your cardiovascular risk.” She sees patients who classify themselves as amateur or professional athletes and are shocked when they suffer cardiovascular events, she said, without considering their diet. “Often they’ll come to me after an event and say, ‘I work out so much. Why did I have a heart attack?’” On the flip side, even those with the most nutritious diets in the study saw considerably worse outcomes without some form of regular fitness regimen. That doesn’t mean people can’t treat themselves after a workout, Dr. Singh said. (She’s a marathon runner herself, and she looks forward to nachos after a long run.) “If you are, for the most part, intentional about what you put into your body and intentional with how you move your body, you’re doing enough.” The study highlights the importance of viewing food and exercise as components of holistic health, Dr. Ding said, instead of calculating how many miles can “cancel out” a cookie. “It’s not just about burning calories,” she said. “We need to shift that thinking.” nyregion world well well nyregion world business opinion magazine Dani Blum is a news assistant on the Well desk at The New York Times. More about Dani Blum "
nyt://article/6d3beb9c-134d-5560-bedc-c3cd9f5cd98e,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/10/10/business/dealbook/ye-kanye-west-elon-musk-twitter-instagram-ban.html,2022-10-10T11:33:55+0000,article,News,1827,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Social Media', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Anti-Semitism', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Company Reports', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Combs, Sean', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Bernanke, Ben S', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Musk, Elon', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'ADIDAS AG', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Delta Air Lines Inc', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Meta Platforms Inc', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'PayPal', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Twitter', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter The rapper and designer’s suspension for antisemitic posts raises questions of how the social network will treat speech if it is sold to Elon Musk. Ye, the designer and musician formerly known as Kanye West, showed this weekend why Elon Musk’s acquisition of Twitter and his vision of free speech could become problematic for the platform. The scandal began offline last week, when Ye wore a T-shirt bearing the words “White Lives Matter” — a phrase that the Anti-Defamation League has labeled “white supremacist” — at his Paris fashion show. He sent models down the runway in the same shirts. The response was swift. Adidas said on Thursday that it was reviewing its relationship with Ye, and the musician Sean Combs, the rapper known as Diddy, criticized him publicly for the shirts. Ye responded by declaring “war,” and said Combs had acted under the control of Jewish people. For that comment, Instagram, owned by Meta, restricted Ye’s access to his account. Mayhem then ensued on Twitter. Ye returned to the social network on Saturday after a two-year absence. Yesterday he posted an antisemitic rant, including a menacing-sounding threat that he would soon be going “death con 3 On JEWISH PEOPLE.” He also accused Mark Zuckerberg, the C.E.O of Meta, which owns Instagram, of getting him removed from the platform. All that earned him another trip to the penalty box. Twitter ultimately hit Ye with a temporary suspension from the platform. What would Musk do in this situation? Musk has promised to take a different approach to content moderation if he ends up owning Twitter. It’s unclear what he has in mind, but his comments about wanting to build the “de facto public town square” to uphold democracy and free speech suggest he’ll support a more free-flowing exchange of ideas, even if that turns off some advertisers. Others aren’t so sure Musk would ever allow Twitter to turn into a toxic sewer. Where does Musk stand on the Ye controversy? Hard to know. Musk extended the mercurial artist a hearty “Welcome back to Twitter, my friend!” greeting on Saturday, but has said nothing about him since. Ben Bernanke is awarded the Nobel economics prize. The former Fed chair and two other academics were recognized for their research into banks and financial crises. Their insights “have improved our ability to avoid both serious crises and expensive bailouts,” the chair of the prize committee said. Russia launches missile strikes across Ukraine. The attacks on several cities, including the capital, killed at least five people and knocked out power. They were an apparent retaliation for a blast that damaged a key bridge connecting Russia and the Crimean peninsula. South Carolina pulls money from BlackRock over E.S.G. The state’s treasurer plans to withdraw $200 million from the firm by year end, joining states like Louisiana and Utah. Red states have committed to pulling investments to punish the firm over its commitment to environmental investing policies. Harvey Weinstein’s second sex crimes trial begins today. The disgraced movie mogul faces 11 charges in a trial in Los Angeles. He faces life imprisonment if convicted, regardless of whether his conviction in New York is overturned on appeal. All manner of questions still swirl around Elon Musk’s off-again-on-again $44 billion takeover bid for Twitter. One big puzzler: What was Musk thinking in returning to the $54.20-per-share offer after negotiations for a cut-price deal fell apart? That he really didn’t want to do his deposition is one theory. DealBook has another one. What we know about renegotiation talks: Possibly at the suggestion of the super-agent Ari Emanuel (who was friendly with both Musk and the Twitter board member Egon Durban), the two sides had talks last month about renegotiating the deal. Conversations ultimately settled around a deal that reportedly would have shaved about $4 billion from the asking price. We know a little bit about why those talks fell apart: Twitter was focused on certainty around closing the deal, and wouldn’t let up on litigation. Could that be a reason Musk walked away? What if a $4 billion cut was actually more expensive for Musk? The banks that are on the hook to lend Musk $12.5 billion to finance the deal may have viewed any reopening of negotiations as a possible out — to either walk away or revise the terms of their loans to Musk. That’s what happened in 2007 during the leveraged buyout of HD Supply after the loan market imploded. Similarly, the financing environment has worsened since Musk first struck the deal, and the banks are now staring down a potential $500 million in losses. Had Musk pushed Twitter to redo the deal, the banks could have tried to reprice their loans at higher interest rates, pushing financing costs up for the billionaire. Or they could have pushed to reduce the total amount of debt they funded, making Musk — who is on the hook for all of the remaining equity — personally responsible for a larger portion of the deal. (Most likely it would have been some combination of the two.) Was there a situation where shaving $4 billion off the total deal price was not actually worth it to Musk? The banks’ debt commitments appear to prevent him from altering the deal in “material” ways. That could give banks a “decent argument” to push for revised debt arrangements, since judges often view price as material, said Eric Talley, a professor at Columbia Law School. Regardless of what happened in recent weeks, a price cut may now be even less likely. Twitter is asking Musk for interest on every extra day the deal drags on past last month’s shareholder vote endorsing the transaction. That means it is costing Musk more than $54.20 with each passing day. It’s earnings season, with the S&P 500 heavyweights PepsiCo and Delta Air Lines and the big banks set to report third-quarter results this week. Investors’ big fear: Companies will reveal that the combination of inflation and slowing economic growth has eaten into profits. It’s a mixed picture. Just 65 companies in the S&P 500 have warned that third-quarter results are likely to disappoint, according to the market data firm FactSet, while 41 companies have delivered earnings upgrades. And S&P 500 companies are expected to report that on average, revenue jumped by nearly 9 percent last quarter. But profits are only expected to grow by 2.4 percent, the most lackluster increase since the worst days of the Covid pandemic in 2020. Almost all of the earnings growth is coming from the energy sector. Of the 11 sectors in the S&P 500, only four — energy, airlines, real estate and consumer discretionary industries like restaurants and hotels — are expected to show overall growth. The bottom lines of energy companies are expected to jump an average of 117 percent versus a year ago, which is the biggest increase of any sector. Without the 21 energy companies in the S&P 500, the bottom lines of the remaining companies would actually drop, by 4.2 percent on average, according to Bank of America. The strong dollar is bad news for multinational companies. Although the recent rise in the dollar is a boon to U.S. travelers, it’s bad news for exports, which make up about 40 percent of sales for S&P 500 companies. A strong dollar means American goods are more expensive to overseas buyers, and less profitable back home when foreign revenues are converted into dollars. John Butters, a senior earnings analyst at FactSet, says that of companies fessing up to earnings problems, about half have pointed to the dollar as a contributing factor. — Matthew Ball, a Silicon Valley investor who has advised Mark Zuckerberg, warning that Meta faces a big timing risk as it bets billions on constructing a virtual world where users can play, work and socialize. PayPal stumbled into the culture wars late last week when an apparently errant policy update set off an uproar over whether the company was seeking to police users over misinformation. The trouble began on Friday, when The Daily Wire, a conservative news site, reported that a pending update to PayPal’s acceptable use policy would include a fine of up to $2,500 for users who “promote misinformation.” The report gained traction in right-wing circles, where some critics accused PayPal of censoring conservatives. PayPal has been outspoken on political and social issues, including discrimination and hate speech, drawing the ire of conservatives. Right-wing critics say the company has gone too far in banning some accounts, including the Free Speech Union, a group that says it stands against “cancel culture.” (That decision was reversed.) There was blowback from some surprising quarters. Conservative activists said they would stop using PayPal amid the uproar. But the critics were joined by David Marcus, a former president of the company, who tweeted on Saturday: “@PayPal’s new AUP goes against everything I believe in. A private company now gets to decide to take your money if you say something they disagree with. Insanity.” To which Elon Musk, a PayPal co-founder, replied, “Agreed.” That said, PayPal’s existing acceptable use policy already bars users from using the service for activities that involve promoting hate, violence or “racial or other forms of intolerance that is discriminatory.” PayPal said the document was published in error. “PayPal is not fining people for misinformation and this language was never intended to be part of our policy,” a spokeswoman for PayPal said in a statement. “We’re sorry for the confusion this has caused.” The spokeswoman declined to comment on the origins of the wording or why it was withdrawn. Deals The vaping company Juul added two corporate restructuring experts to its board as it weighs a potential bankruptcy filing. (Bloomberg) The F.T.C. narrowed its claims against Meta in its lawsuit opposing the company’s takeover of the virtual reality start-up Within Unlimited. (WSJ) Policy The U.S. and Germany are publicly pushing the World Bank to do more to address climate change. (FT) New York City declared a state of emergency over a migrant crisis it said could cost at least $1 billion to deal with. (NYT) Britain’s government will unveil its fiscal plan and economic forecasts on Oct. 31, nearly a month ahead of schedule, amid pressure from investors and lawmakers. (Bloomberg) California’s bullet-train project has become a multibillion-dollar nightmare. (NYT) Best of the rest Why Elon Musk’s dream of a WeChat-like super-app in the U.S. may not fly. (TechCrunch) Whistle-blowers accused EY of whitewashing suspicious trades on behalf of a client. (FT) The electric carmaker Rivian recalled 13,000 vehicles — nearly all of those it has delivered thus far — over an issue that could affect steering. (NYT) Nikki Finke, the Hollywood journalist who founded Deadline and often acerbically called out movie executives, died yesterday. She was 68. (Deadline) Your new iPhone might think you’ve been in a car crash — when you’ve really just ridden a roller coaster. (WSJ)  We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Bernhard Warner joined the The Times in 2022 as a senior editor for DealBook. Previously he was a senior writer and editor at Fortune focusing on business, the economy and the markets. More about Bernhard Warner Vivian Giang joined The Times as a senior staff editor in 2019. Prior to The Times, she was a freelance writer and editor covering the workplace. More about Vivian Giang Sarah Kessler is a senior staff editor for DealBook and the author of “Gigged,” a book about workers in the gig economy. More about Sarah Kessler Stephen Gandel is a news editor for DealBook. He was previously a senior reporter for CBS News, and a columnist at Bloomberg. He has covered Wall Street and financial firms for most of his career. More about Stephen Gandel Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced Lauren Hirsch joined the New York Times from CNBC in 2020, covering business, policy and mergers and acquisitions.  Ms. Hirsch studied comparative literature at Cornell University and has an M.B.A. from the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni "
nyt://article/b45f8107-10c8-539b-888a-ee3ad7ad22fe,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/09/15/opinion/inflation-economy-polls.html,2023-09-15T18:21:36+0000,article,Op-Ed,1179,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economics (Theory and Philosophy)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-sub-only-nl', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Polls and Public Opinion', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Subscriber-only Newsletter Opinion Columnist Almost all the available evidence suggests that the U.S. economy is achieving what many economists had thought impossible — a soft landing in which inflation returns to acceptable levels without a recession. Yet polls suggest that the public remains very down on the state of the economy. Why? I and others have been arguing that there’s a big gap between people’s personal experience and what they say about what’s happening to “the economy,” that is, other people. Surveys aside, consumer spending on discretionary items like travel remains strong, suggesting that people are feeling pretty good about their own situation even as they say that the economy is in the dumps. Some commentators, however, are strenuously — I might even say weirdly — opposed to considering this possibility, which I find hard to understand. After all, we know that views about the state of the economy are marked by huge partisan differences. This in itself tells us that what people say about the economy is to an important extent driven by what they see on TV and what they think they should say. However, when it comes to one important issue, inflation, I think there’s a way to look at the situation that makes sense of the divergence between economists — who are almost giddy over the speed with which inflation has come down — and the broader public, which still says that inflation is getting worse. If I’m right, a lot of it has to do with time — specifically, how far back people look when thinking about inflation. News reports often lead with inflation over the past year. There are reasons to focus on one-year rates of change: They help smooth out noisy monthly data, and you don’t have to worry about seasonal effects. And in the past the one-year inflation rate was probably, as my father used to say, good enough for government work. At this point, however, I’m pretty sure that most working economists consider a year to be too long a lag. The inflation situation is changing rapidly, probably because we are finally working out the supply kinks caused by the pandemic. If we look at core inflation, which excludes volatile food and energy prices, the one-year inflation rate is still unacceptably high, but over the past three months inflation has run at only 2.4 percent, and even this number partly reflects delayed effects of a shelter-price surge that ended many months ago: It might be a few months before we’re willing to declare victory in the war on inflation, but we won’t need a run of improving data — if the next few months look like the past few, we’ll basically be there. Yet 74 percent of voters say that inflation is getting worse, not better. Partisanship colors these numbers: 92 percent of Republican primary voters say that inflation is going up. But it probably isn’t all partisanship and misinformation. Instead, I’d suggest, it’s largely about how everyday people think about inflation. Some commentators have argued that when you say “inflation,” ordinary people think about the level of prices, not the rate of change. That would be very bad news, if true. We haven’t had actual deflation — falling prices — since the 1930s, so if people won’t be happy unless prices go back to where they were a long time ago, it would take a depression to satisfy them. But I’d argue that it’s not really about levels as opposed to rates of change. How many people are upset that you can’t get McDonald’s hamburgers for $0.15, which is what they cost in the chain’s early days? Also, consider the last time we saw a big drop in inflation, during the Reagan years. Overall prices continued to rise — in fact, inflation stabilized at around 4 percent, much higher than what we have now. Yet as this 1984 poll suggests, voters nonetheless gave Reagan credit for reducing inflation (credit that actually belonged to Paul Volcker, but that’s another story): So here’s an alternative hypothesis: Voters assess inflation by comparing current prices with what they remember paying in the past, where the relevant past may be several years ago. Put it this way: When we try to assess macroeconomic trends, we look at inflation over a relatively short period, say three months, but to predict consumer perceptions, we want to look at a much longer period, say three years. Now, I don’t know whether three years is the right number. But let’s run with it for a minute. Here’s the three-year rate of inflation going back to the 1980s: What you can see is that at the time of that 1984 poll, three-year inflation had indeed declined substantially. Right now, by contrast, despite a rapid decline in one-year inflation, three-year inflation is barely off its peak. Why the difference? The Reagan-era disinflation came after years of high inflation, so when inflation finally began coming down, it did so at all time horizons. This time, however, we had years of low inflation, then a sudden surge in short-term inflation in 2021-22, which is still filtering into longer-term averages even though short-term inflation has come back down. Or to be less formalistic, arguably right now Americans’ notion of what things “should” cost largely reflects prices before the big 2021-22 run-up, so they don’t perceive any improvement in inflation — yet. But I’d argue that there are good reasons to expect those perceptions to improve. Over time, memories of prices from, say, 2020 will fade or come to seem less salient, while the relatively low inflation we’re experiencing now will loom larger in public perceptions. Suppose, to be excessively specific, we assume that future inflation proceeds at 2.4 percent — the core rate over the past three months. What would that mean for the three-year rate of inflation? The answer is that it would gradually decline over the months ahead: If some people have a shorter time horizon, say two years, perceived inflation will decline even faster. All of this has obvious political implications. Current polling says that Americans give Donald Trump an edge over Joe Biden in handling the economy, which is unfair but understandable. After all, Biden presided over a big bulge in inflation, while Trump didn’t, and the huge improvement in the inflation picture is too recent to have filtered into public perceptions. If anything, I’m surprised that the gap in perceived economic competence isn’t bigger. But the election is more than a year away, so there’s still time for memories of lower prices to fade and for the reality of sharply lower inflation to sink in with the public. I doubt that the economy will be a source of political strength for Democrats, but it may well be much less of a drag than many people imagine. Thank you for being a subscriber Read past editions of the newsletter here. If you’re enjoying what you’re reading, please consider recommending it to others. They can sign up here. Browse all of our subscriber-only newsletters here. Have feedback? Send me a note at krugman-newsletter@nytimes.com. Paul Krugman has been an Opinion columnist since 2000 and is also a distinguished professor at the City University of New York Graduate Center. He won the 2008 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences for his work on international trade and economic geography.  @PaulKrugman  "
nyt://article/cf63fd54-e9f5-511f-ae41-2064d32af5b3,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/03/15/business/airlines-travel.html,2022-03-15T12:00:08+0000,article,News,1135,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'AIRLINES AND AIRPLANES', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Travel and Vacations', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Russian Invasion of Ukraine (2022)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Oil (Petroleum) and Gasoline', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Business Travel', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'ADOBE SYSTEMS INC', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'AMERICAN AIRLINES', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Delta Air Lines Inc', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'JetBlue Airways Corporation', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Southwest Airlines Company', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'United Airlines', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"February bookings for U.S. travel beat those preceding the pandemic, a data analysis found. Summer looks promising for the industry, if fuel costs cooperate. Rising fuel prices may present an obstacle, but the airline recovery in the United States appears to be on track for now. With the Omicron coronavirus variant receding and pandemic restrictions being eased, the airline industry turned a corner last month, according to an analysis by the Adobe Digital Economy Index, which draws on online sales from six of the top 10 U.S. airlines. According to the analysis, ticket sales for domestic flights in February exceeded those for the same month in 2019, a first since the pandemic began two years ago. “We’re seeing things open up in terms of people’s thinking about travel,” said Vivek Pandya, who led the analysis. “The question now becomes: How much can that momentum continue to push forward?” Travelers spent an estimated $6.6 billion on domestic flights in February, about 6 percent more than three years earlier, according to the analysis. The number of tickets sold was up 4 percent, while fares were up about 5 percent, lagging overall inflation. Early data indicate that the trends are holding up this month, too. The data bodes well for airlines, which have been preparing for months for what the industry expects to be a robust summer travel season. It also matches the optimism that several carriers expressed at an investor conference held by J.P. Morgan on Tuesday. At the conference, executives of American Airlines and Delta Air Lines said they saw record daily sales last week. In investor updates, Delta said it expected revenue for the quarter to slightly exceed its previous estimates, while United Airlines said corporate travel was improving faster than expected, reaching the highest level since the pandemic began. American said improvement in revenues would “more than offset” the increase in fuel prices, which have spiked since Russia went to war in Ukraine. Southwest Airlines also improved its forecast, saying it expects operating revenue in the first quarter of this year to be down 8 to 10 percent from the same quarter of 2019. The airline previously forecast that operating revenues would be off 10 to 15 percent. Consumers appear to be optimistic, too: The number of tickets sold last month for domestic travel between June and August was down just 3 percent from the number sold in February 2019, according to the Adobe analysis. Most travelers, though, book summer travel closer to the date of departure. But while hopes are high for the months ahead, there is concern that rising fuel prices and persistent inflation could pressure airlines to raise fares and discourage potential customers from flying. “Between the fuel impact and the discretionary income impact on leisure travelers, it’s going to slow whatever would have been happening,” said Samuel Engel, a senior vice president and airline industry analyst at ICF, an advisory firm. JetBlue, for example, said in an investor update on Tuesday that it had “moderated” its flight plans for the first quarter of this year because of the rise in fuel costs. Still, it joined other airlines in upgrading its forecast: The airline expects revenue in the first three months of the year to be down 6 to 9 percent from the same period in 2019; its previous forecast was a decline of 11 to 16 percent. Russia’s invasion of Ukraine sent oil prices soaring, raising the cost of jet fuel, which is one of the biggest line-item expenses for airlines. And while the global price of jet fuel has declined from its post-invasion peak, it ended last week up 19.5 percent from a month earlier and up about 82 percent over the last year, according to the Platts Jet Fuel Price Index. American and United are particularly exposed to ballooning fuel costs, while Delta is somewhat insulated thanks to its refinery in Trainer, Pa. Southwest employs a financial strategy known as “hedging” to offset spikes in the price of fuel, which it estimated will cover as much as 64 percent of the fuel it could consume this year. U.S. airlines will try to cover fuel-price increases by raising fares, a process that can take months to play out. Carriers are typically limited in how much they can pass on to customers, industry analysts said, but airline executives are more optimistic. At the J.P. Morgan conference on Tuesday, Glen Hauenstein, the president of Delta, said the airline could “easily” increase fares in the second quarter to make up for rising fuel costs, faster than normal because customers are booking flights closer to the date of travel. On an average one-way ticket price of about $200, the airline will need to recover $15 to $20, he said. A United executive was similarly optimistic that the airline would be able to pass on fuel costs to customers in higher fares. But with the rebound being led by leisure travelers, who are far more sensitive to ticket prices than corporate travelers, airlines will have to tread carefully when raising prices. Other options include cutting flights that are barely profitable or reining in plans to restore flights, as some airlines have already started to do. “In general, growth may slow, or, as is the current case, capacity that airlines would have brought back if the pandemic continued to recede won’t return,” Helane Becker, an airline analyst at the investment bank Cowen, wrote in a recent research note. At the same time, some consumers facing higher prices for goods and services may not have much left to spend on vacations, experts said. And while some budget carriers may target those travelers, there’s no guarantee that airlines will be willing to cut fares, especially when facing steep debt accrued during the pandemic and pressure from shareholders eager to see profits, said Henry Harteveldt, a travel industry analyst and the president of Atmosphere Research Group. “Airline C.E.O.s are not in a generous state of mind these days, nor are their C.F.O.s, so I’m not expecting airlines to discount seats to the same extent that we may have otherwise seen,” he said. “I think that there’s a lot of pressure on airlines to keep their airfares as high they can.” Depending on how Russia’s war on Ukraine plays out, airlines may also not see the rebound in lucrative trans-Atlantic travel that they had expected, either, experts said. But domestic and short-distance international travel has and will continue to lead the recovery. And despite the hurdles in the industry’s way, analysts and airlines are preparing for a strong summer season. “What we’ll end up with is a domestic summer that looks very good as opposed to great,” Mr. Engel said. As of Monday, airlines had more than 2.1 million domestic flights scheduled from June to August, according to Cirium, an aviation data provider. That figure could change substantially in the intervening months, but is currently just 8 percent lower than the number of flights scheduled over the same months in 2019. Last summer’s scheduled flights were down 16 percent from the summer of 2019. Niraj Chokshi covers the business of transportation, with a focus on autonomous vehicles, airlines and logistics. More about Niraj Chokshi "
nyt://article/11848870-5936-5f84-a54e-74be234fcc1f,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/04/19/dining/tipping-gratuity-restaurants.html,2022-04-19T09:00:17+0000,article,News,1414,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tips and Tipping', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Quarantine (Life and Culture)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Restaurants', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Delivery Services', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Automated payment and the spread of tipping to every corner of the food-service business have helped workers weather the pandemic. But some consumers feel overwhelmed. Last year, Anna Johnson found herself using an electronic screen to pay for a pickup order at a bakery in Phoenix, a normal enough experience at many food businesses she frequents. But this time, she was bewildered when the machine recommended that she tip as much as 35 percent — on cookies. “It just surprised me that they’re asking everyone for that,” said Ms. Johnson, 66. “People can’t afford to keep on paying more, more and more.” Tipping fatigue like Ms. Johnson’s is real, and it is widespread. In the thick of the pandemic, Americans like her dug deeper into their pockets to recognize the hard labor and health risks taken on by workers in every corner of the food business — servers, cooks, cashiers, delivery workers. For many customers, adding 15 percent or more for a takeout meal or grocery delivery felt like the least they could do to help essential workers. Covid cases are on the rise again, and the risk to restaurant workers is still elevated. But as business has returned to something more like normal, many customers and experts in the hospitality industry say that deciding how much money to leave, or whether to leave a tip at all, has become a tougher decision — complicated by new technology, and requests for tips at food business of all types, from bakeries and yogurt shops to food trucks and juice bars. In interviews, customers, including some who have worked in the food-service business, said they felt uncomfortable with the many requests to tip, and pressured into giving more. Higher menu prices, a result of inflation, have raised the amount of a traditional 15 or 20 percent tip. In some cases, restaurants are adding service charges and gratuities to the bill that some diners may not notice right away. The mechanics of tipping have also changed in many smaller businesses, where the tip jar on the counter has been replaced by touch screens, which have become even more widespread during the pandemic. Leaving an amount that doesn’t fit the suggested percentages takes extra time and effort. And as the customer decides, the food-service worker is often standing there, looking on. On social media, there are complaints that “tipping culture has gotten out of control,” with consumers venting about being asked to leave a little extra in places they never did before. “It’s becoming more and more prevalent, and that’s where it’s becoming too demanding to tip in every single order,” Katherine Cabrera, of Hialeah, Fla., said in an interview. Ms. Cabrera, 23, a former life coach at a nonprofit, said she always tips on delivery and sit-down meals, but only sometimes in fast-casual or quick-service restaurants. Brian Wacik, 59, a dog trainer in Tucson, Ariz., said he never tips on to-go food that he picks up himself. “Nobody’s serving me, the food is being prepared, those people are being paid,” he said. “I don’t tip for pickup, ever.” Some diners said that tips allow business owners to deflect the responsibility for paying a living wage. Gabriel Ramirez, who works in a Los Angeles smoke shop, said he would prefer that labor costs were reflected in menu prices rather than leaving it up to customers to tip. “It is our social duty to make sure that the person that is feeding us feeds themselves,” said Mr. Ramirez, 24. “Employers shouldn’t be looking at the tip jar and saying, ‘This is how my employee is going to make it this month.’” For many workers, particularly those in places where businesses are permitted to pay a lower wage to employees eligible for tips, the extra money is a lifeline. And there’s evidence that the pandemic has made customers more acutely aware of that need, as staff shortages and impatient diners make food-service jobs even more difficult. Bryan Solar, who manages restaurant products at Square, one of the leading point-of-sale tablet systems in the food-service industry, said people were more generous in tipping early in the pandemic at its client businesses in the United States. In April 2020, the average tip at a quick-service food business was 23.5 percent, up from 19.6 percent the previous month. But that figure has steadily fallen since then, to 19.8 percent last month. (At full-service restaurants with Square systems, the decline has been less sharp, to 20.7 percent last month from 21.3 percent in April 2020.) Mr. Solar said that in general, the new touch-screen technology encourages tipping. He recently helped El Arroyo, a decades-old Tex-Mex restaurant that he frequents in Austin, Texas, acquire the Square system. The restaurant owner reported that tips increased by 50 percent, he said. Anxiety and social pressure play into the tipping decision, Mr. Solar said. “The act of being in front of someone while they have that screen — they know if you tip, don’t tip or go into custom screens,” he said. “People in that moment are much more likely to be generous and to tip.” The new technology also eliminates an easy excuse for not tipping: that the customer doesn’t have cash on hand. Still, Mr. Solar said a customer’s generosity wanes when a business becomes too aggressive in soliciting tips, as when some touch-screen systems start the tipping options at a minimum of 25 percent. “People will be generous to a certain point,” he said. The tipping moment can be awkward for employees as well. Until February, Madison Hudson, of Houston, worked as a barista at a Dunn Brothers Coffee shop, serving drinks and food at the drive-through. Earlier in the pandemic, Hudson said, management removed the PIN pad that customers had used to pay. In order to get tips, Hudson and other baristas felt they had to ask customers at the drive-through if they wanted to add one. “I always felt bad asking,” said Hudson, 19. “But tips were the only way we could get a living wage there.” Many customers feel stressed in encounters like these because “you don’t want to look like a cheapskate,” said Andrew Moreo, a hospitality and tourism management professor at Florida International University. He predicted that tipping in cafes and quick-service restaurants would become more common because customers are more aware of what workers endure, even when “you didn’t receive much service.” Some restaurants have tried to solve the inequities and unpredictability of tipping by adding an automatic gratuity to each bill. Others, like Danny Meyer, the influential New York restaurateur who founded Union Square Hospitality Group and Shake Shack, have tried to replace tipping by raising menu prices, and paying all workers a consistent hourly wage.  Mr. Meyer made that move in 2015, but reversed the policy in 2020, saying that in the pandemic, he didn’t want to deny workers the extra money that tips could offer. Many servers have come to rely on the current tipping system. Valerie Campodall’Orto, of Tucson, Ariz., said that during a bad shift she can average as little as $20 an hour in tips, but on good nights, that amount can increase to $50 an hour. “It’s probably a very selfish outlook, but I do enjoy the tipping system,” said Ms. Campodall’Orto, 36, who added that she tips generously, even at a coffee shop. “For any restaurant, whether it’s a mom-and-pop, or a corporate chain, being able to pay a server $50 an hour, that’s just not feasible. That would end up coming back on the consumer, and they wouldn’t be eating out as much to make up for the wage an employer would have to pay.” The Emily Post Institute, which offers guidelines on etiquette, advises that tipping in a sit-down restaurant is expected. But faced with a tip jar, or the technology that replaces that, customers should consider tipping to be discretionary. “I see that situation as no different as to whether you’re going to pocket your change or put it in the tip jar,” said Lizzie Post, the great-great-granddaughter of Emily Post, and the institute’s co-president. Even so, in day-to-day life, it does not always feel quite so optional. Janhavi Bodkhe, a 21-year-old college student in Iowa City, Iowa, said she feels social pressure to leave tips, even in situations where they might not seem warranted. A few months ago, while buying movie tickets at a local theater, she found herself looking down at a touch screen that offered tipping options. She left 15 percent. “It speaks on your character how much you tip or not,” she said, adding, “I want to be perceived as a good customer.” Follow NYT Food on Twitter and NYT Cooking on Instagram, Facebook, YouTube and Pinterest. Get regular updates from NYT Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice. Christina Morales is a reporter covering news on food and culture. She joined The Times in 2020 as a member of the newsroom's second fellowship class. More about Christina Morales "
nyt://article/10fc8a09-b690-505d-af99-ba7126e5d2fb,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/01/06/world/australia/australia-recession.html,2023-01-06T08:05:05+0000,article,News,906,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'International Relations', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Economic Conditions and Trends', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Newsletter “Whether it’s a technical recession or not, we certainly are going to be in for difficult times,” one economist said. The Australia Letter is a weekly newsletter from our Australia bureau. Sign up to get it by email. This week’s issue is written by Natasha Frost, a reporter with the Australia bureau. In September 2020, as the effects of the coronavirus pandemic hit all over the world, Australia dipped briefly into a recession — then bounced straight back out again the following year. The nation sometimes referred to as “The Lucky Country” is known for its rock star economy: a gold-plated combination of rich natural resources, easy trade, a talented, well-educated work force and historically healthy immigration rates. That economic wobble in late 2020 was as rare as it was brief: Australia had not been in recession since 1991, even skirting neatly by the 2008 global financial crisis. The rest of the world faces a grim outlook, with recession likely for Britain, the United States and many of the member states of the European Union, among other nations. Kristalina Georgieva, the head of the International Monetary Fund, has said she expected a third of the global economy to enter a recession in 2023. So where does Australia stand? For now, very few economists in Australia are forecasting a recession — two back-to-back quarters of negative economic growth — as their central case, said Nicki Hutley, an independent economist based in Sydney. “I wouldn’t be in there yet, but I would certainly rate it as at least a 50 percent chance,” she said. In many respects, Australia is doing better than its international peers. Wages remain fairly restrained, the economy is growing, and the unemployment rate is at a record low 3.4 percent. The country is also less affected by the shock of high energy prices already bedeviling Britain and Europe. Consumer spending also remains strong, even as Australians have dipped into their savings for discretionary goods and services. The Australian Reserve Bank is forecasting an annual rate of inflation of close to 8 percent for the year ending December, falling to 4.7 percent by the end of 2023, before easing further to just over its targeted 2 to 3 percent by the end of the next year. Speaking last year, Jim Chalmers, the Australian treasurer, said the economy was “performing solidly in the face of steep headwinds from overseas as well as considerable and compounding pressures on Australian families and businesses.” But there are storm clouds on the horizon. “Whether it’s a technical recession or not, we certainly are going to be in for difficult times, the economy will slow, people will notice this,” Hutley said. “A lot of households will do it tough, and a small number of households will do it particularly tough.” The cost of living crisis is yet to abate, and dismal prospects for other major world economies may also make conditions harder domestically. Harsh monetary conditions imposed to tackle inflation will hit mortgage-holders hard, especially from the middle of the year. Australia has far more floating rate mortgages than many other countries, putting pressure on household budgets as rates are adjusted. A major fall in property prices would also be bad news for many Australians: Housing comprises almost 60 percent of household wealth. Already, prices in state capital cities fell 5.3 percent last year, in the largest decline since 2008. China is perhaps the biggest question mark in Australia’s economic forecast. The country has long been the country’s largest trading partner and is, as of this week, reportedly considering lifting a more than two-year-old unofficial ban on Australian coal imports, amid a thawing relationship. Yet its choppy reopening, after it abruptly abandoned its “Covid zero” approach, carries with it tremendous uncertainty. “We’re less concerned about the nuances of trade with some of that trade with China, and more concerned about the overall strength of the Chinese economy,” Hutley said. “If everything starts to go down, then it doesn’t matter whether they’re buying our coal or not, they’re not going to be buying a lot of anything.” Here are the week’s stories. ‘Biofoul’ on Hull Strands Cruise Ship at Sea for 6 Days. An unidentified organism prompted Australia to block the vessel from docking, forcing passengers to skip a series of port stops. 4 Dead in Helicopter Collision in Australia. The two craft crashed in midair in a tourist area on the Gold Coast, near a theme park. An investigation is underway, with a report expected to take weeks. Her Escape From Kabul Was Supposed to Be the Hardest Part. About 16 months into her new life in Australia, Fati, who was the Afghanistan women’s soccer team’s goalkeeper, can still be overwhelmed by “all the things I’ve lost.” Is New York Turning Into Los Angeles? Quintessentially Californian institutions are popping up all over Manhattan as New Yorkers embrace sound baths, mocktails and legal marijuana. The Nuclear Dump That Created a Generation of Indigenous Activists. For members of a Taiwanese tribe, a waste site on their island serves as a painful reminder of the government’s broken promises, and a symbol of their long struggle for greater autonomy. The ‘Golden Gays’ Return to the Stage in the Philippines. They formed a community meant to support and shelter gay people who had been cast aside by society. Decades later, they are still living together, hosting pageants to help make ends meet. Are you enjoying our Australia bureau dispatches?Tell us what you think at NYTAustralia@nytimes.com. Like this email?Forward it to your friends (they could use a little fresh perspective, right?) and let them know they can sign up here. nyregion world world world nyregion world opinion business magazine Natasha Frost writes the Europe Morning Briefing and reports on Australia, New Zealand and the Pacific from Melbourne, Australia. More about Natasha Frost "
nyt://article/e448de48-2762-54d8-bbb6-802eff1204f7,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/24/us/politics/student-loan-forgiveness-biden.html,2022-08-24T15:00:12+0000,article,News,1779,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Pell Grants', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Education Department (US)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The debt forgiveness comes after months of deliberations in the White House over fairness and fears that the plan could make inflation worse ahead of the midterm elections.   Biden Announces Up to $20,000 in Student Loan Debt Relief   WASHINGTON — President Biden announced a plan on Wednesday to wipe out significant amounts of student loan debt for tens of millions of Americans, saying he would cancel $10,000 in debt for those earning less than $125,000 per year and $20,000 for those who had received Pell grants for low-income families. The debt forgiveness, although less than what some Democrats had been pushing for, comes after months of deliberations in the White House over fairness and fears that it could exacerbate inflation before the midterm elections.  “All of this means people can start finally to climb out from under that mountain of debt,” Mr. Biden said in remarks from the White House. “To finally think about buying a home or starting a family or starting a business. And by the way, when this happens, the whole economy is better off.” Mr. Biden also announced that a pandemic-era pause on student loan payments, which has been in effect since March 2020, would expire at the end of the year. The timing for the debt relief is uncertain; the Department of Education said it would set up an application process by the end of the year.  Across the United States, 45 million people owe $1.6 trillion for federal loans taken out for college — more than they owe on car loans, credit cards or any consumer debt other than mortgages.  Susan Rice, the White House domestic policy adviser, said the administration had not yet determined how much the student debt relief will cost because it will depend on the number of people who apply for it. By some estimates, however, it could cost $300 billion or more.  Mr. Biden has been agonizing over how to address the student debt issue for months, under pressure from progressive Democrats who say debt forgiveness is necessary to address racial disparities in the economy. But critics say widespread debt forgiveness is unfair to those who tightened their belts to pay for college. And some economists have raised concerns that debt relief will add to inflation by giving consumers more money to spend. The White House sought to address the economic concerns by targeting the relief.  Students who received Pell grants will be eligible for $20,000 in debt forgiveness on their loans. About 60 percent of borrowers have received Pell grants, and the majority come from families making less than $30,000 a year. The Education Department estimates that 27 million borrowers will qualify for up to $20,000 in relief. Millions of other borrowers will be eligible for $10,000 in debt relief, as long as they earn less than $125,000 a year or are in households earning less than $250,000. Borrowers will be assessed based on the income they reported in 2021 or 2020. “I was standing in my dorm room when I heard this, and I just let out a scream,” said Marlene Ramirez, 25, who relied on Pell grants and other aid to pay for her undergraduate studies.  Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. Ms. Ramirez, the first in her family to go to college, used the grants to cover two years of study at a community college, then transferred to the University of California, Los Angeles. After graduating in 2020 with a bachelor’s degree in anthropology, she still has $25,000 in federal loans that she had used to cover her housing and living expenses.  “This will almost wipe that out,” said Ms. Ramirez, who is finishing a master’s degree at the London School of Economics. “I’m shaking right now. This is life changing.” But critics — including some members of Mr. Biden’s own party — said the move was deeply unfair.  Jason Furman, a Harvard economist and former top economist for President Barack Obama, said the plan “would unnecessarily provide tens of thousands of dollars to many high-income households in a way that goes well beyond even what he promised in the heat of a Democratic primary when the problem facing the country was low inflation — not high inflation.” The Republican National Committee released a statement slamming the program as “Biden’s bailout for the wealthy.” Senator Ben Sasse, Republican of Nebraska, said the plan “forces blue-collar workers to subsidize white-collar graduate students. Instead of demanding accountability from an underperforming higher-education sector that pushes so many young Americans into massive debt, the administration’s unilateral plan baptizes a broken system.” Because Mr. Biden used executive action, rather than legislation, to forgive the loans, legal challenges are expected. It is unclear, however, who would have the standing to press their case in court. A recent Virginia Law Review article argued that the answer might be no one: States, for example, have little say in the operation of a federal loan system. On its face, the move could cost taxpayers about $300 billion or more in money they effectively lent out that will never be repaid. But the true cost is harder to calculate, and could be smaller, because much of that debt was unlikely ever to be repaid. More than eight million people — one in five borrowers with a payment due — had defaulted on their loans before the coronavirus pandemic. Many of those people carried fairly small balances and will now be eligible for loan cancellation. Mr. Biden also proposed various changes to the repayment system — which would need to be enacted through rule-making by the Education Department — that would slash many borrowers’ monthly bills. He is seeking to let those with undergraduate loans cap their payments at 5 percent of their discretionary monthly income, down from the 10 percent ceiling now in place on most income-based payment plans. He is also seeking to have the government cover the monthly interest for those making payments — even if their payment is zero, because their income is low — so that balances will not balloon. Under the current system, interest still accrues, and many borrowers find themselves falling deeper into debt even as they make their monthly payments. Many Democratic lawmakers and progressive groups have argued that addressing economic racial disparities would require forgiving $50,000 of debt, citing reports showing that Black and other nonwhite borrowers end up with higher average loan balances than their white peers. “Targeting twice as much relief to Pell recipients helps close the racial wealth gap,” said Senator Elizabeth Warren, Democrat of Massachusetts, who has pressed for widespread student debt cancellation.  Ms. Warren said she would keep up the pressure for more debt relief, but she praised Mr. Biden’s announcement as “historic.” “No president in history has reached so directly into the lives of so many millions of working people and said, ‘You invested in yourself to get an education, and the rest of the country wants to help you with that,’” she said.  Representative Tony Cárdenas, a California Democrat who met with the White House to advocate debt cancellation, said even the limited relief could be the galvanizing factor Mr. Biden’s party needs before the midterms in November. “That’s a lot of young people that are going to be able to have a sigh of relief,” Mr. Cárdenas said. He and other members of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus helped ramp up pressure on Mr. Biden this spring, when they said he had indicated in a private meeting that he intended to provide some form of debt relief for Americans. Shortly afterward, the president publicly said he was considering the move and would announce details in the coming weeks. But inside the White House, Mr. Biden’s top aides were debating the political and economic ramifications of the decision. According to people familiar with his thinking, the president was concerned that loan cancellation would be seen as a giveaway that would be an affront to those who had paid their or their relative’s tuition. Some top aides also argued that Mr. Biden lacked the legal authority to move forward with the sweeping loan forgiveness and that he should work with Congress instead of using executive action. Soaring inflation also complicated the process.  Mr. Biden’s economic advisers, however, made the case that by resuming loan payments and pairing the loan forgiveness with income caps, the cancellation would have a negligible effect on rising consumer prices. Arindrajit Dube, an economist at the University of Massachusetts, Amherst who consulted with administration officials on student loans, said in an interview that the additional consumer spending spurred by the bill would be a “drop in the bucket” in the U.S. economy and unlikely to add to inflation. “There are principled reasons to be both supportive and opposing” of the plan, Mr. Dube said, including questions of economic fairness and who benefits from loan forgiveness. But, he said, “I just don’t see inflation being the issue here.” Senate Democrats continued to make direct appeals to the White House for loan forgiveness in the days leading up the decision. Senator Chuck Schumer of New York, the majority leader, as well as Ms. Warren and Raphael Warnock of Georgia, met with the president’s chief of staff, Ron Klain, and Brian Deese, one of Mr. Biden’s top economic advisers, on Friday. Many economists warned the move could have damaging consequences for students and taxpayers in the future, by encouraging colleges and universities to raise prices with the federal government footing the bill.  Mr. Biden’s plan, including its limits on future loan repayment by borrowers, “would be a massive subsidy to the exact sector that created this mess with ever-rising tuition and fees,” said Melissa Kearney, a University of Maryland economist who directs the Aspen Economic Strategy Group. “We should be taking steps to rein in higher-ed pricing, not further subsidize higher-ed tuition and living expenses.” Mary-Pat Hector, a graduate student at Georgia State University, said Mr. Biden’s plan was an important first step to support those disappointed by the administration’s failure to accomplish other policy goals, such as providing two free years of community college. “They were told: Vote because your life depends on it,” said Ms. Hector, 23, who has $50,000 in loans from Spelman College. “And then we’re here on the ground, months away from midterm elections, and people in these communities are wondering, ‘Well, does my vote really matter?’” Ms. Hector said that in addition to her own college debt, her mother also borrowed to pay for her education. She criticized the administration’s decision to impose limits on who would receive loan forgiveness based on salary, noting that while some of her peers earned a healthy income, they would also be responsible for supporting younger siblings who might borrow to attend college. “You’re still in inescapable debt from school, and you’re still taking care of your family and community,” said Ms. Hector, an activist with the organization Rise, which has pushed for loan forgiveness. “My parents are probably in lifetime debt to get me in that position, and I’m going to have to repay them by ensuring my little brother is going to school. That’s the pressure you have.” nyregion opinion us us nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Zolan Kanno-Youngs is a White House correspondent covering a range of domestic and international issues in the Biden White House, including homeland security and extremism. He joined The Times in 2019 as the homeland security correspondent. More about Zolan Kanno-Youngs Stacy Cowley is a finance reporter with a focus on consumer issues and data security. She previously reported on a variety of business topics, including technology and economics, at CNN Money, Fortune Small Business, and other magazines and websites. More about Stacy Cowley Jim Tankersley is a White House correspondent with a focus on economic policy. He has written for more than a decade in Washington about the decline of opportunity for American workers, and is the author of ""The Riches of This Land: The Untold, True Story of America's Middle Class."" More about Jim Tankersley "
nyt://article/84aecc07-ad0c-51a9-a4e8-c0d6cd8daa5b,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/08/03/business/dealbook/fitch-credit-rating-markets.html,2023-08-03T11:54:19+0000,article,News,1622,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-storyline-no', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Fitch Ratings', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Treasury Department', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter Stocks were down and Treasury yields were up after Fitch Ratings’ downgrade. But the biggest effects of the move may play out over time. Stocks appear set to open lower today, after falling yesterday in the wake of Fitch Ratings downgrading the United States’s AAA credit rating. (Treasury yields rose as well.) White House officials, economists and some prominent Wall Street leaders said the move, which took the U.S. rating to AA+ because of concerns about growing federal deficits and political polarization, was puzzling and wouldn’t have much impact. But others have said Fitch’s move, while largely symbolic, still points to long-term troubles for the nation and its fiscal health. The U.S. is unlikely to regain its pristine rating any time soon. Richard Francis, Fitch’s primary U.S. analyst, told The Times that a key factor behind the downgrade was America’s intense partisanship, which had led to standoffs on the debt ceiling and forestalls any efforts to reach agreement on taxes or on increasing federal spending. “There is no willingness on any side to really tackle the underlying challenges,” Mr. Francis said. But “it doesn’t really matter much,” Jamie Dimon, JPMorgan Chase’s C.E.O., told CNBC yesterday, echoing a common refrain to Fitch’s move. Critics of the move noted that according to criteria laid out last year by Fitch itself, including debt-to-G.D.P. ratio and macroeconomic performance, the U.S. was improving. Indeed, investors aren’t considered likely to dump their Treasury holdings, given how central U.S. government debt is to global markets. (That’s especially helpful because the Treasury Department plans to issue more debt in the coming months.) White House officials were surprised by Fitch’s move, believing that they had persuaded the agency’s analysts not to downgrade, according to The Washington Post. The administration scrambled to coordinate a response to Fitch’s move, including noting that the Fitch report dinged the U.S. for governance failures under Donald Trump that, it said, had actually improved under President Biden. Among Biden administration officials’ worries is that the downgrade could become a political weapon, amid Republican criticisms about federal spending. Indeed, Representative Jason Smith of Missouri, the Republican chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, said that Biden had “pushed America’s credit rating off the ledge” — even though Fitch said that both parties had contributed to the problems outlined in its report. Still, some think the points raised by Fitch are valid. Two former Treasury secretaries, Hank Paulson and Tim Geithner, urged Washington to tame growing federal deficits: “Our fiscal trajectory is concerning,” Mr. Paulson told Bloomberg Television, while Mr. Geithner warned that “you want to move the system to act before it’s late and hard.” And Quincy Krosby, the chief global strategist for LPL Financial, told Bloomberg: “Ultimately, if the deficit isn’t contained, taxes will be raised to the point that the engine of the US economy — the all-important consumer — will have considerably less discretionary income.” In other Washington news, the hedge fund mogul Bill Ackman said he’s betting against 30-year Treasury notes, a bearish move, believing U.S. inflation will hover around an elevated 3 percent. Donald Trump is set to appear in court today. The former president is scheduled to be arraigned in federal court in Washington to face charges that he attempted to subvert the 2020 election; the fates of unindicted co-conspirators, including Rudy Giuliani, remain unclear. Meanwhile, shortly after being indicted, Mr. Trump dined with Fox News executives, who urged him to participate in the first Republican presidential debate, which the network is hosting. Bud Light’s owner discloses the damage from a conservative backlash. Anheuser-Busch InBev said that its U.S. revenue fell more than 10 percent in the second quarter, largely because of a plunge in sales of Bud Light. Conservatives moved to boycott the brand, long one of the country’s best-selling beers, after it collaborated with a transgender influencer on a marketing campaign. Investors’ eyes are on Amazon and Apple today. The two will report their latest quarterly earnings after markets close, potentially giving insight into broad swaths of consumer and corporate spending. Among the key things to watch: how iPhone sales have held up and whether companies have cut spending on Amazon’s AWS cloud computing services. Meryl Streep and George Clooney help raise millions for striking actors. The A-list stars — joined by the likes of Matt Damon, Leonardo DiCaprio and Oprah Winfrey — each gave $1 million to the SAG-AFTRA Foundation, which gives aid to workaday actors. Negotiators for Hollywood studios are seeking to resume talks with striking writers in part because of the hard-line stance of the actors’ union. Federal investigators served Vince McMahon, the executive chairman of WWE, with a grand jury subpoena and a search warrant last month. It was a reminder of ongoing questions about the pro-wrestling impresario, one of the biggest names associated with the company, as he sought to close a multibillion-dollar merger of WWE and Endeavor’s Ultimate Fighting Championship. WWE has also received legal demands for documents, including from federal law enforcement and regulators, in the government’s inquiry into Mr. McMahon, the company disclosed in a regulatory filing yesterday. It added that no charges had been brought in the investigations. The company said Mr. McMahon went on medical leave on July 21 following spinal surgery, days after being served the subpoena, though he remained executive chair. A WWE representative said it “has cooperated throughout and fully understands and respects the government’s need for a complete process.” In a statement, McMahon denied intentional wrongdoing and added that he was “confident that the government’s investigation will be resolved without any findings of wrongdoing.” It’s a reminder of the legal cloud over McMahon, who stepped down from WWE last year after The Wall Street Journal reported that he had agreed to pay $3 million to a departing employee with whom he was said to have had an affair, in exchange for a nondisclosure agreement. A board committee later unearthed other NDAs, though it ultimately said that those expenses, paid from Mr. McMahon’s pocket, should have been marked as WWE expenses. Mr. McMahon returned to WWE’s board in January and repaid the company $17.4 million to cover expenses tied to its own inquiry. As part of the U.F.C. deal, he is set to become executive chair of the combined company; that transaction is still expected to close later this year. The news didn’t appear to faze WWE investors: The company’s share price rose in after-hours trading. — Representative Richard Neal, Democrat of Massachusetts, on Republicans’ squabbling over limits on federal deductions for state and local taxes (known in Washington as SALT). Companies have come up with a new way to fight back against the war on E.S.G.: Stop talking about E.S.G. Almost half of the businesses polled in a new survey by the Conference Board said they were changing how they talk publicly about environmental, social and governance issues, known as E.S.G., in the face of a fierce political backlash, and turning to terms like “sustainability.” Did Larry Fink start the shift? The BlackRock chief executive has been a longtime champion of E.S.G., proselytizing about using the approach in the firm’s investment decisions and urging companies to do the same. But he has dropped the term, saying it has been “weaponized” by politicians after conservative politicians who say it is part of a broader liberal agenda. (Mr. Fink has also been accused of hypocrisy for appointing Amin Nasser, the C.E.O. of the Saudi oil giant Aramco, to his board.) The financial services and insurance industries are feeling the biggest backlash. Republican-led state governments and officials have targeted large asset managers and banks, some of which have pulled investments, government pension funds, and contracting work from firms that are publicly committed to E.S.G. principles. Companies are also watching for increasing skepticism from consumers, business customers and institutional investors. The number of anti-E.S.G. shareholder proposals has increased significantly since 2020. Most of these have fallen into the governance category. This has included separating the C.E.O. and chair positions of executives believed to be overly focused on E.S.G. Things could become tougher for E.S.G. proponents, with 43 percent of the survey respondents saying the backlash will worsen over the next two years. The debate will probably also feature heavily in the 2024 presidential race — some Republican candidates have already made attacking it central to their campaigns. And the Supreme Court’s recent invalidation of affirmative action in college admissions makes discussion of corporate diversity and inclusion initiatives — which would fall under “S” — even more difficult. Deals KKR and News Corp were among those that bid for the book publisher Simon & Schuster this week; a sale is expected within weeks. (NYT) The e-cigarette maker Juul is reported to be seeking to raise around $1 billion, after almost going bankrupt last year. (Bloomberg) The TCW Group agreed to buy the exchange-traded funds business of Engine No. 1, the activist investment firm. (FT) Apple and Goldman Sachs said their high-yield savings account had reached $10 billion in deposits, following a report that the Wall Street bank was weighing ending the partnership. (Bloomberg) Policy Meta has started blocking access to news on Facebook and Instagram in Canada, weeks before a new law takes effect requiring online platforms to pay for news content. (NYT) U.S. prosecutors are reportedly worried that charging Binance with fraud could spark a run on the crypto exchange. (Semafor) Best of the rest Sorry, Twitter really should be called X now. Separately, the social network is letting subscribers to its Blue service hide their verification badges, which have become targets of online ridicule. (NYT, Insider) “Business Meals Are Back With a Vengeance, and Everyone Feels Awkward” (WSJ) Our colleagues want to know: How has your commute changed since the pandemic began? (NYT) We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. nyregion opinion technology technology nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Ravi Mattu is the managing editor of DealBook, based in London. He joined The New York Times in 2022 from the Financial Times, where he held a number of senior roles in Hong Kong and London. More about Ravi Mattu Sarah Kessler is a senior staff editor for DealBook and the author of “Gigged,” a book about workers in the gig economy. More about Sarah Kessler Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced Lauren Hirsch joined The Times from CNBC in 2020, covering deals and the biggest stories on Wall Street. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni "
nyt://article/fa5b83cf-74a0-54c3-aa1f-175d67eacba7,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/02/08/us/politics/fact-check-biden-state-of-the-union.html,2023-02-08T05:55:13+0000,article,News,2038,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Elections', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Congressional Budget Office', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House Select Committee to Investigate the January 6th Attack', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'North Atlantic Treaty Organization', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'State of the Union Message (US)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The president’s speech contained no outright falsehoods, but at times omitted crucial context or exaggerated the facts. WASHINGTON — President Biden praised the economy as well as his legislative accomplishments and record on the world stage in his State of the Union address on Tuesday night. Mr. Biden’s speech contained no outright falsehoods, but at times omitted crucial context or exaggerated the facts. Here’s a fact check. What WAS Said “I stand here tonight, after we’ve created, with the help of many people in this room, 12 million new jobs — more jobs created in two years than any president has created in four years.” This needs context. The economy added 12.1 million jobs‌ ‌between January 2021, the month‌ when‌ Mr. Biden took office, and this January. By raw numbers, that is indeed a larger increase in new jobs over two years than the number added over other presidents’ full four-year terms since at least 1945. But by percentage, the job growth in Mr. Biden’s first two years still lags behind that of his predecessors’ full terms. Under Mr. Biden, jobs have increased by 8.5 percent since his term began. That jump is less than that in President Barack Obama’s first term (8.6 percent), President Bill Clinton’s first term (10.5 percent), President Ronald Reagan’s second term (11.2 percent) and President Jimmy Carter’s four years in office (12.8 percent). Mr. Biden is, of course, comparing his first two years in office with the entire term or presidencies of his predecessors, so the comparison is not equivalent. Moreover, Mr. Biden’s first two years in office followed historic job losses wrought by the coronavirus pandemic. Most important, presidents are not singularly responsible for the state of the economy. — Linda Qiu What WAS Said “For too many decades, we imported products and exported jobs. Now, thanks to what you’ve all done, we’re exporting American products and creating American jobs.” This is misleading. Mr. Biden’s statement gives the impression that a decades-old trend has reversed, but the data tells a different story. American exports reached a new high in 2022, with exports of goods alone topping $2 trillion. But the United States also imported a record high last year, $3.3 trillion in goods — countering the notion that imports have slowed. As a result, the United States also recorded the highest ever trade deficit since 1970 of $950 billion, and a trade deficit in goods of $1.1 trillion. — Linda Qiu What WAS Said “Inflation has been a global problem because the pandemic disrupted our supply chains and Putin’s unfair and brutal war in Ukraine disrupted energy supplies as well as food supplies.” This needs context. It is accurate that inflation has been global, and that supply chain issues tied to the pandemic have been a major driver of price increases. It is also true that food and energy disruptions tied to Russia’s invasion of Ukraine exacerbated it. But those factors did not spur inflation on their own: Supply chains became clogged in the first place partly because American demand for goods was abnormally strong during the pandemic. Four charges for the former president. Former President Donald Trump was charged with four counts in connection with his widespread efforts to overturn the 2020 election. The indictment was filed by the special counsel Jack Smith in Federal District Court in Washington. Here are some key takeaways: The indictment portrayed an attack on American democracy. Smith framed his case against Trump as one that cuts to a key function of democracy: the peaceful transfer of power. By underscoring this theme, Smith cast his effort as an effort not just to hold Trump accountable but also to defend the very core of democracy. Trump was placed at the center of the conspiracy charges. Smith put Trump at the heart of three conspiracies that culminated on Jan. 6, 2021, in an attempt to obstruct Congress’s role in ratifying the Electoral College outcome. The special counsel argued that Trump knew that his claims about a stolen election were false, a point that, if proved, could be important to convincing a jury to convict him. Trump didn’t do it alone. The indictment lists six co-conspirators without naming or indicting them. Based on the descriptions provided, they match the profiles of Trump lawyers and advisers who were willing to argue increasingly outlandish conspiracy and legal theories to keep him in power. It’s unclear whether these co-conspirators will be indicted. Trump’s political power remains strong. Trump may be on trial in 2024 in three or four separate criminal cases, but so far the indictments appear not to have affected his standing with Republican voters. By a large margin, he remains his party’s front-runner in the presidential primaries. That surge in demand came as stuck-at-home consumers shifted their spending away from services and toward things like new furniture. Their spending was also fueled partly by stimulus checks and other pandemic aid. Several studies by economists at the Federal Reserve have found that government spending contributed to some, but far from all, of the inflation. — Jeanna Smialek What WAS Said “Food inflation is coming down.” True. Food inflation is beginning to slow, though it remains very rapid. Compared with a year ago, food prices are 10.4 percent higher. But monthly food price increases have been slowing steadily in recent months, coming down from a very swift rate in May 2022. Of course, the current situation does not feel great to many consumers: Food prices are still climbing from already-high levels. And some specific food products are much more expensive than last year. Eggs, in particular, have been a pain point for consumers in recent months. — Jeanna Smialek What WAS Said “Inflation has fallen every month for the last six months, while take-home pay has gone up.” This needs context. It is true that inflation has slowed for the past six months: That means that prices are still increasing, but they are doing so more gradually. The Consumer Price Index ticked up by 6.5 percent in the year through December, which is notably slower than the 9 percent peak in June. That pace is still much more rapid than the roughly 2 percent that was typical before the pandemic. It is also true that wages are climbing sharply compared with the pace that would be normal. But for much of 2021 and 2022, wage gains struggled to keep up with rapid price increases. That has recently begun to change: Average hourly earnings increases exceeded consumer price increases on a monthly basis in both November and December 2022. — Jeanna Smialek What WAS Said “We’re finally giving Medicare the power to negotiate drug prices.” This needs context. The Inflation Reduction Act, which Mr. Biden signed into law in August, does fulfill Democrats’ long-held goal of empowering Medicare to negotiate the price of prescription drugs directly with pharmaceutical makers. But the law has limits. The negotiation provisions do not kick in until 2026, when the federal government may begin negotiating the price of up to 10 medicines. The number of drugs subject to negotiation will rise over time. — Sheryl Gay Stolberg What WAS Said “In the last two years, my administration has cut the deficit by more than $1.7 trillion — the largest deficit reduction in American history.” This needs context. The federal deficit did decrease by $1.7 trillion, from $3.1 trillion in the 2020 fiscal year to $1.4 trillion in the 2022 fiscal year, though Mr. Biden’s fiscal policies are not the sole factor. In fact, much of that decline can be attributed to the expiration of pandemic-era spending, according to the Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget, which advocates lower levels of spending. In February 2021, before the Biden administration enacted any fiscal legislation, the Congressional Budget Office estimated that the deficit would have reached $1.1 trillion in the 2022 fiscal year, less than what ended up happening. Coronavirus stimulus funding from 2021 added nearly $1.9 trillion to the deficit over 10 years, the budget office estimated. The budget agency also estimated that the infrastructure package added $256 billion to the deficit, though supporters disagreed with the analysis. The Inflation Reduction Act, which was the only significant piece of legislation to reduce the deficit, trimmed it by $238 billion over the next 10 years. — Linda Qiu What WAS Said “Nearly 25 percent of the entire national debt that took over 200 years to accumulate was added by just one administration alone, the last one.” This needs context. Mr. Biden is correct that a quarter of the national debt was accumulated over the four years Mr. Trump was in office. But the former president did not unilaterally add to that amount. In fact, two major factors driving that increase were mandatory spending levels set long before Mr. Trump took office and bipartisan spending bills that were passed to address the pandemic. From the 2018 to 2021 fiscal years, the government collected $14.3 trillion in revenue, and spent $21.9 trillion, according to data compiled by the Congressional Budget Office. In that time, mandatory spending on programs such as Social Security and Medicare totaled $14.7 trillion alone. Discretionary spending totaled about $5.8 trillion. The budget estimated that Mr. Trump’s tax cuts — which passed in December 2017 with no Democrats in support — added roughly another $1 trillion to the federal deficit from 2018 to 2021, even after factoring in economic growth spurred by the tax cuts. But other drivers of the deficit include several sweeping measures that had bipartisan approval. The first coronavirus stimulus package, which received near unanimous support in Congress, added $2 trillion to the deficit over the next two fiscal years. Three additional spending measures contending with Covid-19 and its economic ramifications added another $1.4 trillion. — Linda Qiu What WAS Said “Some Republicans want Medicare and Social Security to sunset. I’m not saying it’s a majority.” This needs context. President Biden implied that the Republicans who wanted to allow Social Security and Medicare to sunset were tying those demands to the fight over raising the nation’s debt limit. It is true that a couple of Republicans have suggested allowing those entitlement programs to sunset as mandatory spending, instead bringing them up for regular renewal. But Republicans have recently distanced themselves from such efforts. Speaker Kevin McCarthy, Republican of California, has said that cuts to Social Security and Medicare are “off the table” in talks over raising the debt ceiling, which Congress must vote to do in the coming month or risk a default on the government’s bills. Likewise, President Donald J. Trump has warned Republicans to leave the programs alone in the negotiations. Mr. Biden, nodding to lawmakers responding to his speech, acknowledged that it seemed that cuts to the programs were “off the books now.” — Jeanna Smialek What WAS Said “While the virus is not gone, thanks to the resilience of the American people and the ingenuity of medicine, we have broken the Covid grip on us. Covid deaths are down by 90 percent.” This needs context. On average, about 450 people in the United States are dying each day of Covid-19, according to a New York Times database. That number is way down from the roughly 3,200 Americans who were dying each day in early 2021. But the current daily average of Covid-19 deaths is higher than it was in December 2022, when roughly 250 Americans were losing their lives each day to the virus. — Sheryl Gay Stolberg What WAS Said “We united NATO. We built a global coalition.” True. In response to Russia’s invasion of Ukraine in February 2022, President Biden led a huge political, economic and military response that has involved dozens of countries. Surprising many experts who predicted that the United States’ European allies would argue over strategy and lose their resolve, the 30-member North Atlantic Treaty Organization has shown a unity unseen since the aftermath of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks and, a year after the Russian invasion, continues to supply vast amounts of weapons to Ukraine. That unity has not been perfect: NATO leaders have argued at times, including their recent tussle over whether and how to supply modern tanks to Ukraine. But many analysts believe it has surprised President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia, who did not anticipate such a strong degree of Western resolve. President Biden also successfully rallied dozens of nations beyond NATO to join in economic sanctions against Moscow, including Asian countries like South Korea and Japan. That coalition excludes major nations like India and China, which are supporting the Kremlin’s war machine through major purchases of Russian oil. But it remains among the broadest coalitions the United States has led against an adversary. — Michael Crowley What WAS Said “But in the past two years, democracies have become stronger, not weaker. Autocracy has grown weaker, not stronger.” This lacks evidence. Experts say that President Biden took office after years of global gains for autocracy and deep problems for democracies — as illustrated by the Capitol riot on Jan. 6, 2021. According to the nonprofit group Freedom House, in every region of the world “democracy is under attack by populist leaders and groups that reject pluralism and demand unchecked power.” It is hard to say whether Mr. Biden has changed the situation. He has made the defense of democracies a core theme of his presidency and held a White House democracy summit in December 2021. He has worked to contain two major autocratic powers, building a coalition against Russia in defense of Ukraine — which has weakened its economy and isolated it diplomatically — and rallied allies to contest China’s political influence and technological gains. American voters rejected many election conspiracy theorists in the midterm elections last year. But Russia and, especially, China retain considerable foreign political influence. Brazil, the largest country in Latin America, had a far-right riot in the heart of its government last month. Italy elected a prime minister whose party has fascist roots. Huge crowds in Israel are protesting new right-wing government policies that opponents call an assault on democracy itself. Last February, The Economist magazine’s annual democracy index found that “global democracy continued its precipitous decline in 2021.” Mr. Biden’s rosier view is difficult to substantiate. — Michael Crowley An earlier version of this article referred incorrectly to the state of the pandemic in early 2021. Roughly 3,200 Americans were dying each day then, but not because of the Omicron variant, which was peaking in the United States in early 2022. When we learn of a mistake, we acknowledge it with a correction. If you spot an error, please let us know at nytnews@nytimes.com.Learn more "
nyt://article/f0403abe-9e6b-5223-87b7-2dac5a7abd86,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/04/05/opinion/banking-reforms-deposit-insurance-guarantee.html,2023-04-05T09:00:30+0000,article,Op-Ed,1044,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Regulation and Deregulation of Industry', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Deposit Insurance', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (2010)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Guest Essay Mr. Conti-Brown is working on a book on the history of bank supervision in America. In the wake of the failures of Silicon Valley Bank and Signature Bank — the second- and third-largest bank failures in American history — members of Congress are debating what should be done to prevent future failures. Some have zeroed in on a new proposal to provide a governmental guarantee to bank deposits of any size. This is a mistake. The current limit, $250,000 per person, is more than adequate for any banking needs an individual might have. An unlimited guarantee to banks that their debts to depositors will always be 100 percent backed by the government is an invitation for the banks to print money with Uncle Sam’s credibility but for their private profit. It is a government benefit that would aid the wealthiest among us, at a price to be borne by the rest of us. Some have linked any such expansion to a corresponding increase in the rigor of bank supervision and regulation. The failures of Silicon Valley Bank certainly illustrate how much more rigorous bank supervision should become. But a quick look at banking history shows that linking expansions of public guarantees to tighter supervision is doomed to fail. When Congress increases insurance guarantees, as it has done many times in the past, it is often with a commitment to greater regulatory scrutiny. And then banks, better organized and able to navigate the halls of politics with more acumen and dexterity than perhaps any other interest group, work to erode the rigor of those policies. Bank supervision and regulation — largely discretionary functions that are highly dependent on the presidential appointments that set the tone on how that discretion is used — inevitably fall victim to these pressures. Bank guarantees, on the other hand, are forever. From the first days of federal deposit insurance in 1933 to the present, the government has never, not once, lowered its official guarantees to banks. The guarantees move in only one direction, always up, even as supervision and regulation regularly fall by the wayside. We don’t need to look far to see this dynamic play out. After extensive guarantees of not only the entire banking system — all depositors, rich or poor, plus money market funds, insurance companies and all the rest that made the 2008 financial crisis so extraordinary and so politically toxic — Congress extended deposit insurance per depositor to $250,000 from $100,000. In 1934, the limit was $2,500; correcting for inflation, the limit in 2008 would have been roughly $40,000. According to the Federal Reserve, the average American bank balance held in transaction accounts is around $42,000, as of 2019. The current deposit limit is so much higher that we cannot say it is intended to protect anyone like the average saver. After raising the limit, Congress deliberated at length before passing Dodd-Frank to ensure, in the words of Barack Obama upon signing the law, that “there will be no more taxpayer-funded bailouts — period.” To help make good on that commitment, Dodd-Frank instituted a number of different regulatory and supervisory tools that were meant to keep banks safe, sound and fair to their customers. But within just a few years, Congress pulled back on supervisory discretion for some of the very banks that are now at the center of the current crisis. A system of public guarantees for bank debts as far as the eye can see will mean only pain for our economy, our financial system and, perhaps most important, our politics. If banks really paid the full value of insurance for the $18 trillion of deposits in the country, as some who promote this idea propose, in good times that would represent a gigantic pile of cash that bankers and their lobbyists would almost certainly insist should be given back to them for their own purposes. They would most likely succeed in this effort; they always have. What would emerge from that success is an unfunded mandate to offer protections to the wealthiest citizens, paid for by all of us together. Economically, that’s a deeply regressive policy. Politically, it is toxic too. Headlines that remind us all that multimillionaires receive taxpayer bailouts while the average citizen struggles to scrape by would only increase in frequency. The critics of the current regime have one important point: It has never made sense to treat wealthy individuals and small businesses identically. Multimillionaires and billionaires don’t need the same federal guarantees as a small company trying to make a monthly payroll. Some have sensibly suggested that we therefore focus exclusively on those kinds of accounts, which would receive full government support. For those small businesses that are struggling to meet payroll and do not want or know how to develop the cash-management expertise of large corporations, we should extend protection. But that same umbrella should not extend to the wealthy. In fact, Congress should drop the level of protection for wealthy individuals to $200,000 per depositor per bank and expand it to $2 million for small businesses, an easy-to-remember order of magnitude of difference between the two groups. These amounts are more than enough to cover any needful banking relationships and put depositors in the driver’s seat to practice good risk management, practices that the depositors of Silicon Valley Bank failed spectacularly to do. Lowering the protection for individual depositors would also send the strong signal that our historic practice of moving the public goal posts for bank guarantees can be reversed. These changes are not meant to solve the problem of bailouts, a problem that is only as good as the regulators and supervisors who carry out our laws. They are meant instead to sound an alarm. Our present deposit insurance system isn’t working. Rather than admit defeat on the entire enterprise and provide underpriced insurance for underregulated banks without limit, let us instead reinforce a system that worked well, within limits, through most of its history. Peter Conti-Brown is a professor of financial regulation at The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. He is working on a book on the history of bank supervision in America. The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. "
nyt://article/f7ab5d7e-c0c9-58d9-bd93-d2ad65b8dbd8,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/05/12/technology/twitter-elon-musk.html,2022-05-12T16:45:54+0000,article,News,935,"[{'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Twitter', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Musk, Elon', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Social Media', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Agrawal, Parag', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Beykpour, Kayvon', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Falck, Bruce', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Appointments and Executive Changes', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"An internal memo shared with employees said the platform’s general manager and general manager for revenue would be departing. SAN FRANCISCO — Twitter’s chief executive fired two top executives, froze most new hiring and said he was slashing spending on Thursday, as the social media company tries to change its business trajectory while grappling with a takeover from Elon Musk, the world’s richest man. In a memo shared with employees and obtained by The New York Times, Parag Agrawal, Twitter’s chief executive, said the company was pausing most hiring and pulling back on discretionary spending, though it was not planning layoffs. The moves stemmed partly from Twitter not hitting goals in audience and revenue growth, Mr. Agrawal wrote. Kayvon Beykpour, Twitter’s general manager, and Bruce Falck, the general manager for revenue, are leaving, the memo said. Mr. Beykpour is being replaced by Jay Sullivan, the interim general manager of consumer product, the memo said. “It’s critical to have the right leaders at the right time,” Mr. Agrawal said in the memo. He added that Twitter had decided at the beginning of the pandemic in 2020 to invest aggressively in growth, but “as a company we did not hit intermediate milestones that enable confidence in these goals.” Mr. Beykpour and Mr. Falck said on Twitter that they had been fired by Mr. Agrawal. Mr. Falck later appeared to delete his tweet. Brian Poliakoff, a Twitter spokesman, confirmed the memo and Mr. Agrawal’s changes. He declined to comment further. The changes raise questions for Mr. Musk about his $44 billion deal to buy Twitter. The billionaire, who has said he does not care about the economics of the company, is paying $54.20 a share for the firm. In a pitch to investors, he has also said he wants to quintuple Twitter’s revenue by 2028 and grow its users to 931 million by then, up from 217 million at the end of last year. But Twitter’s shares have been sinking, part of a broader pullback in technology stocks, and hovered at $45.22 on Thursday. Mr. Agrawal’s moves also signal that the company’s business, which relies mainly on digital advertising, is troubled. Last month, Twitter reported quarterly revenue growth and profits that fell short of what Wall Street had been anticipating. “Looking into a crystal ball two weeks ago, the board made a great decision,” said Brian Quinn, an associate professor at Boston College Law School focusing on corporate mergers, referring to Twitter’s board. “The idea the board could reasonably get to a $54 price on their own by their own making was debatable before they took the offer — but clearly now, it’s not going to happen anytime near term.” Mr. Musk, who also runs the electric carmaker Tesla and the rocket company SpaceX, did not immediately respond to a request for comment. He has said he will take Twitter private and wants to improve the product. He has also criticized some of Twitter’s top executives publicly, especially for the way that they have moderated speech on the service. The billionaire, who is still lining up some financing for the purchase, is expected to close the deal for Twitter in the next few months. Mr. Musk could walk away from the deal, but would have to pay a $1 billion breakup fee. And as long as his debt financing for the acquisition remains intact, Twitter could bring Mr. Musk to court to force him to pay for the deal. Mr. Agrawal, who was appointed Twitter’s chief executive last November, has made a series of changes at the company and terminated some longtime executives. That same month, for instance, the company’s head of communications departed and its head of people said she would leave by the end of the year. In December, Twitter’s head of engineering and head of design and research left. While Mr. Agrawal attempts to overhaul the company, Twitter has been in an uproar over Mr. Musk’s takeover. At a company meeting on the day the deal was announced, Mr. Agrawal answered questions about how the deal came to be, what would happen to employees’ compensation and jobs, and how Mr. Musk might change Twitter. “Some of you are concerned, some of you are excited, and some of you are waiting to see how this goes. I know this affects all of you personally,” he said at the time. He later added, “Once the deal closes, we don’t know what direction this company will go in.” In his memo on Thursday, Mr. Agrawal did not mention Mr. Musk by name but acknowledged the company was in the middle of an acquisition and was unclear when it would close. It’s unclear how long Mr. Agrawal will be in charge of Twitter. Mr. Musk has floated the idea of becoming the company’s temporary chief executive once the deal is completed. Last week at another company meeting, Mr. Sullivan, the newly elevated general manager, told Twitter employees to stay motivated and continue working, despite the uncertainty caused by Mr. Musk, according to audio of the meeting that was obtained by The Times. “We may be private, we may be public, we may have an owner who wants to do something different,” Mr. Sullivan said. “We don’t know what the future is going to hold, but what we’ll know is we left it all on the field for the people who rely on us everyday.” Mr. Sullivan also gave a frank assessment of Twitter’s weaknesses, saying that the company had failed to hang on to new users and employees had passed the buck on fixing tough problems. He said machine learning, which is a kind of artificial intelligence, was important to Twitter’s growth. He also warned that Twitter’s content moderation policies might become more flexible. “Social media is in a crisis of confidence right now,” Mr. Sullivan said. Kate Conger and Lauren Hirsch contributed reporting. Mike Isaac is a technology correspondent and the author of “Super Pumped: The Battle for Uber,” a best-selling book on the dramatic rise and fall of the ride-hailing company. He regularly covers Facebook and Silicon Valley, and is based in San Francisco. More about Mike Isaac "
nyt://article/4db81fd7-5e26-56f6-814a-5d577447596c,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/10/29/us/politics/bidens-agenda-midterms-congress.html,2022-10-29T09:00:24+0000,article,News,2431,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Midterm Elections (2022)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House of Representatives', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Senate', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation Reduction Act of 2022', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Abortion', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Taxes (US)', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Global Warming', 'rank': 11, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Internal Revenue Service', 'rank': 12, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Race and Ethnicity', 'rank': 13, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Protection', 'rank': 14, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"On a wide array of issues like abortion, taxes, race and judges, President Biden’s opportunities would shrink as Republicans vow to dismantle much of his legislative accomplishments. WASHINGTON — For President Biden, the Dreaming-of-F.D.R. phase of his presidency may end in little more than a week. If Republicans capture one or both houses of Congress in midterm elections, as polling suggests, Mr. Biden’s domestic agenda will suddenly transform from a quest for a New Deal 2.0 to trench warfare defending the accomplishments of his first two years in office. On a wide array of issues like abortion, taxes, race and judges, Mr. Biden’s opportunities would invariably shrink as he focuses less on advancing the expansive policy goals that have animated his administration and more on preserving the newly constructed economic and social welfare architecture that Republicans have vowed to dismantle. While the president and Democratic leaders have not publicly given up on the possibility of hanging onto Congress in the balloting that concludes on Nov. 8, privately they are pessimistic and bracing for two years of grinding partisan conflict. In addition to efforts to block or reverse Mr. Biden’s domestic initiatives, Republican control of either house would result in a flurry of subpoenas and investigations of the administration that would define the relationship between the White House and Congress. Mr. Biden’s aspirations to codify abortion rights, expand access to child care and college, address racial discrimination in policing, install more like-minded judges and guarantee voting rights would all become more difficult, if not impossible, to achieve. For their part, Republicans aim to roll back Mr. Biden’s corporate tax increases, climate change spending, student loan forgiveness and I.R.S. expansion targeting wealthy tax cheats. Beyond simply reversing the president’s policies, Republicans promise to advance their own initiatives to further cut taxes and spending, ban transgender women from playing in women’s sports, restrict access to abortion, protect gun rights, crack down on immigration, add more police to the streets and promote energy production, much of which would be hard to pass over a Senate filibuster, much less Mr. Biden’s veto. A change of management on Capitol Hill would represent a marked shift for Mr. Biden, who spent 36 years as a senator and eight years as vice president mastering the arts of legislative maneuvering. Despite razor-thin margins, he has pushed through a raft of far-reaching bills since taking office last year. They include a $1.9 trillion pandemic stimulus package, a $1 trillion plan to upgrade the nation’s roads, bridges and other infrastructure, a $739 billion package to fight climate change and curb prescription drug prices and a $250 billion program to boost the semiconductor industry. A significant number of Republicans supported some of the spending, including for infrastructure and semiconductors, but party leaders have argued that the open checkbook represents the worst of Democratic free-spending proclivities and helped push inflation to its highest rate in 40 years. In past eras, divided government in Washington has at times led to uncomfortable but meaningful compromises, including major tax and Social Security deals under President Ronald Reagan; landmark deficit reduction, clean air and civil rights legislation under President George H.W. Bush; and welfare overhaul and balanced budget measures under President Bill Clinton. No doubt Mr. Biden, who regularly boasts of the bipartisan deals he has forged, would seek areas of common ground. But today’s political atmosphere is radically more polarized than it was in the 1980s and 1990s, making it harder to imagine a Democratic president and Republican legislature coming together on areas of major disagreement except in a national crisis. The prospects of accord may be even more distant in case of a comeback campaign by former President Donald J. Trump, who would pressure his party to resist Mr. Biden at every turn. — Peter Baker Here are some major areas where the two sides would clash: Mr. Biden imposed new taxes on corporations, including a new minimum tax on large multinationals like Amazon and a tax on stock buybacks, to help fund the climate and health priorities in the Inflation Reduction Act, which he signed this summer. He also increased spending on the Internal Revenue Service, to raise revenues by cracking down on companies and high earners that cheat on their taxes. Republicans want to repeal all those measures while passing further tax cuts, including extending some of the reductions for businesses and individuals passed in 2017 under Mr. Trump that are set to expire over the next few years. They have promised to reduce federal spending. Some prominent House conservatives want to reduce expenditures on safety-net programs like Medicaid and supplemental nutritional assistance, and to reduce future spending on Medicare and Social Security for some beneficiaries, which Mr. Biden opposes. — Jim Tankersley To curb global warming, Mr. Biden has set an ambitious goal of cutting America’s greenhouse gas emissions roughly in half by 2030. The measure he signed this summer included $370 billion in incentives for electric utilities to increase their reliance on low-emission energy sources like solar and nuclear, for consumers to buy electric vehicles and for businesses to invest in energy efficiency. His Environmental Protection Agency has moved to limit emissions of methane, a potent greenhouse gas, and is preparing more regulations of the energy sector. Republicans opposed those climate efforts, and are set to mount congressional investigations into many of them. They could also seek to unwind some of the spending from the newly signed climate law and will likely challenge future regulations. They will also push legislation to speed up fossil fuel development by reducing federal regulation of new drilling projects. — Jim Tankersley After a decade of elections with health care near the top of voter priorities, the big federal health programs are less central in this election. Republicans are not focused on repealing the Affordable Care Act, sometimes called Obamacare, or making major changes to Medicare and Medicaid in the short term. If Republicans retake majorities, they plan extensive oversight of Mr. Biden’s response to the Covid-19 pandemic, however, and much of the spending that accompanied it. They also hope to consider smaller initiatives, such as expanding access to telemedicine in Medicare and improving price transparency in health care, building on Trump administration initiatives that many Democrats also embrace. Without a president who can sign their more conservative-leaning bills or large enough majorities to overcome a veto, Republicans are likely to focus on legislative efforts that at least some Democrats can support. If Democrats retain control, they are likely to pursue a similar set of less polarized issues. Mr. Biden already tried and failed to pass major structural changes to Medicare and Medicaid as part of the Inflation Reduction Act, the new law meant in part to bring down prescription drug prices. — Margot Sanger-Katz After a record-breaking start at filling vacancies on the federal bench, the Biden administration’s aggressive push to remake the courts would be slowed considerably — if not entirely stalled — by a Republican takeover of the Senate. Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the current and likely future Republican leader, has demonstrated his skill at thwarting judicial nominations. “If it did happen, Senator McConnell has made it pretty clear that he would not be very eager to confirm President Biden’s nominees and would do anything he could to delay filling seats until he could get a different president,” said Russ Feingold, a former Democratic senator from Wisconsin and head of the American Constitution Society. “He usually follows through on those statements and threats.” To date, the Senate has confirmed 84 judges nominated by Mr. Biden, including a Supreme Court justice, 25 appeals court judges and 58 district court judges — the most in decades in the first two years of a president’s term. The White House has advanced a diverse set of candidates, focusing on underrepresented ethnicities as well as those with less typical professional backgrounds like public defenders and civil rights lawyers. Even if Republicans make package deals to advance judicial nominees as has been done in the past, nominees who are considered more progressive would encounter extreme difficulties in a Republican-controlled Senate. Bracing for a slowdown, Mr. Feingold’s organization is urging Senate Democrats to confirm at least 30 more judges before the newly elected Congress takes office. — Carl Hulse Mr. Biden has promised to enshrine into law the national abortion protections that were repealed when the Supreme Court overturned Roe v. Wade if voters increase the Democratic margin in the Senate. “The only way it’s going to happen is if the American people make it happen,” he has said in his appeals to the public. Republicans, who once saw abortion restrictions as a galvanizing issue within the party, are now in open disagreement about how far those should go. Strict or near-total bans on abortions have become unpopular with Republican voters. Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina is pushing for a national ban on abortions after 15 weeks of pregnancy, but his proposal is unpopular even with senior Republicans, including Mr. McConnell, who consider it politically risky and a contradiction to the let-the-states-decide position the party had long articulated. Mr. Biden would certainly veto any stand-alone bill with such a limit even if it did land on his desk. — Katie Rogers Mr. Biden’s order canceling up to $20,000 of student-loan debt for as many as 40 million borrowers has already been targeted in a lawsuit filed by six Republican-led states, which claim the president overstepped his executive authority in issuing the policy on his own. A Republican-controlled Congress could try to halt the policy by including language in a potential spending package declaring that Mr. Biden lacks authority to move forward with the debt relief. But Mike Pierce, the executive director of the student borrower protection center, said other parts of Mr. Biden’s student loan agenda are at greater risk, including a plan to reduce payments on undergraduate loans to 5 percent of discretionary income, down from 10 percent to 15 percent in many existing plans. Implementing the new system would draw money from an appropriated budget that could be targeted by congressional Republicans. “There’s money that goes to the Education Department to administer the student loan programs and you can see that budget being a part of negotiations with Republicans,” Mr. Pierce said. — Zolan Kanno-Youngs Mr. Biden has worked to put racial equity at the center of his agenda, ensuring that billions of dollars in government spending are focused on minorities and poor women. Some efforts, including a plan to forgive the debts of Black and other minority farmers, have run into lawsuits filed by white farmers who questioned whether the government could offer debt relief based on race. Republican lawmakers have echoed the criticism. The president directed federal agencies to ensure that 40 percent of investments for clean energy, transit, housing and work force development reach disadvantaged or marginalized communities. Republican lawmakers have signaled they would try to stall the equity agenda through congressional investigations. The policies are also likely to be the focus of legislative battles and political attacks against the administration. Top Republicans on the House Transportation and Infrastructure Committee sent a letter to the administration last month accusing Mr. Biden of misusing his authority “in a broad, crosscutting fashion” by requiring that a portion of federal funding go to minority communities. Republicans on the House Financial Services Committee launched an investigation this month into a Treasury Department committee tasked with reviewing aspects of the economy that have harmed communities of color. The lawmakers said the council “would distract it from its core responsibilities which include ensuring a level playing field for all Americans.” — Zolan Kanno-Youngs The Biden administration is in the midst of an $80 billion bulk-up of the Internal Revenue Service, the tax collection agency that Republicans love to hate. Although the overhaul of the I.R.S. is in its early stages, the Treasury Department, which oversees the agency, has set ambitious goals for improving customer service and responsiveness to taxpayers. They have been trying to ramp up hiring and clear a backlog of millions of unprocessed tax returns. For years, Republicans have made it their mission to neuter the I.R.S. They are expected to use any leverage that they gain in the elections to scale back the agency’s funding. They have suggested that the 87,000 new hires that the I.R.S. plans to make will become a “shadow army” intended to target conservatives, and with Republicans controlling oversight committees there will be an intense spotlight on how the money is being spent. If Republicans retake the Senate, they will also have an opportunity to block Mr. Biden’s eventual nominee to be the next I.R.S. commissioner. (Treasury recently announced that the deputy commissioner would become acting commissioner in November.) — Alan Rappeport Eager to find an issue that will resonate with voters, Mr. Biden has revived a traditional Democratic campaign attack, arguing that keeping his party in power would protect Social Security and Medicare from Republican cutbacks. In a speech at the White House last month, the president warned that Republicans will put the social safety net programs on the “chopping block” if they take power. Any efforts from Republicans to enact changes to the entitlement programs over the next two years would be subject to Mr. Biden’s veto power. The long-term solvency of the programs is in doubt as the trust funds that support them are facing shortfalls in the next two decades. Republicans have not outlined a unified plan for how to deal with entitlements lately, but some have called for restructuring them or scaling them back. This, they say, would preserve them for the future. The most prominent proposal has come from Senator Rick Scott, Republican of Florida, that would allow Social Security and Medicare to “sunset” if Congress did not pass new legislation to extend them. Mr. McConnell has disavowed aspects of Mr. Scott’s agenda. — Alan Rappeport With legislative options limited, Mr. Biden has been looking to executive branch agencies to help ease the pain that Americans are feeling from inflation. On Thursday, he touted a move by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau to crack down on so-called “junk fees” that banks charge to consumers for overdrafting their accounts or depositing checks that bounce. Joined by Rohit Chopra, the director of the C.F.P.B., Mr. Biden said that the agency would be going after a wide range of unnecessary costs that are imposed on Americans by banks. But if Republicans have their way, the agency could see its powers dramatically diminished. A federal appeals court ruling this month said that the bureau’s funding that comes through the Federal Reserve is unconstitutional, calling into question its power to regulate the finance industry. The lawsuit could take years to play out, but House Republicans have already said that they want to bring the independent agency under the congressional appropriations process. The Trump administration tried to zero out the bureau’s budget, so Republican control could eventually mean that it lacks the resources to be a rigorous regulator. — Alan Rappeport Peter Baker is the chief White House correspondent and has covered the last five presidents for The Times and The Washington Post. He is the author of seven books, most recently “The Divider: Trump in the White House, 2017-2021,” with Susan Glasser. More about Peter Baker "
nyt://article/ffddb0fa-7f4d-556d-9c5d-e79a8e353bfd,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/26/business/yellen-treasury-x-date-us-debt.html,2023-05-26T20:24:44+0000,article,News,1055,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Treasury Department', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Yellen, Janet L', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The latest estimate comes as Republicans and the White House are trying to reach an agreement to raise the debt ceiling and avoid a crippling default. Reporting from Washington Treasury Secretary Janet L. Yellen said on Friday that the United States will run out of money to pay its bills on time by June 5, moving the goal post back slightly while maintaining the urgency for congressional leaders to reach a deal to raise or suspend the debt limit. The letter provided the most precise date yet for when the United States is expected to run out of cash. Ms. Yellen had previously said the nation could hit the so-called X-date — the moment when it does not have enough money to pay all of its bills on time — as soon as June 1. Ms. Yellen’s letter comes as the White House and House Republicans have been racing to reach a deal that would lift the nation’s $31.4 trillion borrowing cap and prevent the United States from defaulting on its debt. The Treasury Department hit its statutory debt limit on Jan. 19 and has been employing accounting maneuvers — known as “extraordinary measures” — to ensure the United States can continue paying its bills on time. On Friday evening, President Biden expressed hope that an agreement could soon be clinched. “Things are looking good. I’m very optimistic,” Mr. Biden said as he departed the White House for Camp David, adding, “I’m hopeful we’ll know by tonight whether we are going to be able to have a deal.” While Ms. Yellen’s letter to lawmakers provides a tiny bit of wiggle room, it also makes clear the dire financial situation that Treasury is facing. The federal government is required to make more than $130 billion in scheduled payments during the first two days of June — including money to veterans and Social Security and Medicare recipients. Those payments will leave the Treasury Department with “an extremely low level of resources.” Ms. Yellen went on to detail billions of dollars of required cash transfers, expenditures and investments in programs such as the Social Security and Medicare trust funds that will further deplete its cash reserves. “Our projected resources would be inadequate to satisfy all of these obligations,” Ms. Yellen wrote. Representative Patrick T. McHenry, a North Carolina Republican who is a key player in the talks, said the Treasury Department’s more precise date “puts additional pressure on us.” Even before the letter was sent, Mr. McHenry said he was cognizant of how little time remained to prevent a default. “We’ve got to be in the closing hours because of the timeline,” he said. “I don’t know if it’s in the next day or two or three, but it’s got to come together.” For months, Ms. Yellen has been warning lawmakers that the United States could run out of cash to pay all of its bills on time in early June. The Treasury secretary said earlier this week that she would try to include more precision in her future updates about when a default might occur. Some House Republicans have expressed doubt that a default could be approaching so quickly, and they have called on the Treasury secretary to appear before Congress and present her full analysis. Earlier this week, members of the House Freedom Caucus, a group of conservative Republicans, wrote a letter to Speaker Kevin McCarthy, Republican of California, urging party leaders to demand that Ms. Yellen “furnish a complete justification” of her projection that the United States could run out of cash as soon as June 1. They accused Ms. Yellen of “manipulative timing” and suggested that her forecasts should not be trusted because she was wrong about how hot inflation would get. Other independent analyses have also pegged early June as the most likely moment when the United States will hit the X-date. The Bipartisan Policy Center said earlier this week that the U.S. faced an “elevated risk” of running out of cash to pay its bills between June 2 and 13 if Congress does not raise or suspend the nation’s debt limit. While negotiators have been in round-the-clock talks, no deal has yet been announced. Still, the contours of an agreement between the White House and Republicans are taking shape. That deal would raise the debt limit for two years while imposing strict caps on discretionary spending not related to the military or veterans for the same period. As officials have been negotiating, the federal government has been running on fumes. The Treasury Department’s cash balance fell to $38.8 billion on Thursday, as the United States inched toward running out of cash to meet its financial obligations. Biden administration officials continued to downplay the possibility that the Treasury Department could avoid a default beyond the X-date by prioritizing payments to bondholders. They also dismissed provocative steps such as invoking the 14th Amendment as a way to continue borrowing and instead reiterated calls on Congress to lift the debt limit. “Congress has the ability to do that, and the president is calling on them to act on that as quickly as possible,” Wally Adeyemo, the deputy Treasury secretary, told CNN on Friday. Lael Brainard, director of the White House’s National Economic Council, pressed the negotiators to redouble their efforts to get a deal finalized. “Negotiators have made progress toward a reasonable, bipartisan budget agreement in recent days, and the Secretary’s letter underscores the urgent need for Congress to act swiftly to prevent default,” Ms. Brainard said. In her letter, Ms. Yellen also laid out the additional accounting maneuvers known as “extraordinary measures” that she was taking to delay a potential default until June 5. The actions involved moving $2 billion of Treasury securities between the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund and the Federal Financing Bank. “The extremely low level of remaining resources demands that I exhaust all available extraordinary measures to avoid being unable to meet all of the government’s commitments,” Ms. Yellen wrote. Financial markets have become more jittery as the United States moves closer to the deadline for avoiding a potential default. This week, Fitch Ratings said it was placing the nation’s top AAA credit rating on review for a possible downgrade. DBRS Morningstar, another rating firm, did the same on Thursday. Ms. Yellen pointed out in her letter that the standoff is already straining financial markets. “We have learned from past debt limit impasses that waiting until the last minute to suspend or increase the debt limit can cause serious harm to business and consumer confidence, raise short-term borrowing costs for taxpayers, and negatively impact the credit rating of the United States,” she wrote. Luke Broadwater contributed reporting. nyregion opinion business business nyregion opinion arts opinion magazine Alan Rappeport is an economic policy reporter, based in Washington. He covers the Treasury Department and writes about taxes, trade and fiscal matters. He previously worked for The Financial Times and The Economist. More about Alan Rappeport "
nyt://article/50e12668-68c6-5a56-868b-c02965231f15,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/22/business/dealbook/jpmorgan-dimon-succession.html,2023-05-22T12:01:25+0000,article,News,1709,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-storyline-no', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Banking and Financial Institutions', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'JPMorgan Chase & Company', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Dimon, James', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"DealBook Newsletter Revelations about rivals’ plans may prompt the bank’s shareholders to ask about who will replace Jamie Dimon at an annual investor gathering on Monday. JPMorgan Chase will hold its investor day on Monday after one of the busiest starts to a year that the bank has had in some time. But while Jamie Dimon, the bank’s C.E.O. and one of Wall Street’s longest-serving current chiefs, is expected to outline his plans for JPMorgan for years to come, he’s also very likely to face renewed questions about who will succeed him — an issue that has come to the fore after rivals’ plans emerged in recent days. JPMorgan is riding high, having recently agreed to buy First Republic, the latest of its deals to bail out a struggling lender. That underscores just how dominant Mr. Dimon’s bank is now: It has nearly 4,800 branches in the continental U.S., a presence unmatched by any competitor, and its investment bank regularly outperforms its counterparts at Goldman Sachs and Morgan Stanley. Up 3 percent this year, JPMorgan’s stock has far outpaced its biggest competitors. In some ways, JPMorgan’s big challenge is figuring out where it goes from here. The bank most likely can’t buy any more lenders, amid anger in Washington over how it was allowed to purchase First Republic. Mr. Dimon and his team are expected to argue that there’s still plenty of room to grow, including by expanding its wealth-management business. Who will replace Mr. Dimon? He isn’t expected to step down anytime soon (and he is set to collect an extra $50 million payout if he’s still C.E.O. in 2026). But the succession plans at two JPMorgan rivals may re-raise the issue for shareholders: James Gorman of Morgan Stanley announced on Friday that he planned to depart within the next 12 months, with the firm having identified three “very strong” internal candidates to replace him. Ken Jacobs of Lazard is reportedly preparing to give up the C.E.O. role, with his top lieutenant, Peter Orszag, expected to succeed him. JPMorgan hasn’t laid out its succession plans, and the firm has seen potential Mr. Dimon successors leave the bank over the years. That said, analysts say that the top contenders are Marianne Lake and Jennifer Piepszak, who jointly run the bank’s vast consumer operations — and who are expected to speak at length on Monday about how they’re going to integrate First Republic. Whoever replaces Mr. Dimon has big shoes to fill: He has become the most powerful and influential banking chief, one whose say carries weight in Washington and who has helped the firm navigate multiple crises while building a durable business. Shareholders may ask questions about thornier issues as well, including the lawsuits JPMorgan faces over its ties to Jeffrey Epstein — Mr. Dimon is expected to testify under oath about the matter soon — and over its failed $175 million acquisition of the fintech start-up Frank. Europe hits Meta with a record $1.3 billion data privacy fine. Ireland’s Data Protection Commission announced the penalty on Monday and ordered the social media giant to stop collecting and transferring the personal data of its European Facebook users to the United States in violation of the E.U.’s strict data privacy laws. The ruling comes as the U.S. and E.U. negotiate a data-sharing pact that would give companies like Meta more legal protections when handling users’ data. The Group of 7 pushes back against China. A joint statement from the coalition defended members’ efforts to diversify their supply chains as an exercise in “de-risking.” It also pushed Beijing to pressure Russia to end its invasion of Ukraine and stop trying to intimidate Taiwan. G7 leaders also wrestled with how to live up to their climate-change commitments. China bans some sales from Micron. Authorities in Beijing said they had discovered “relatively serious cybersecurity problems” with the American chip maker’s products, which could “seriously endanger” Chinese national security. The move is the latest effort by China to shore up its own chip industry, while turning up the heat on Western companies operating in the country. Election results in Greece trigger a big rally in stocks and bonds. Prime Minister Kyriakos Mitsotakis of Greece is on the cusp of a new four-year term after his party did far better than opinion polls had predicted. In the run-up to the election, hedge funds had been shorting Greek bonds, betting on more political instability. Greece is close to seeing its sovereign debt return to investment grade, a dramatic turnaround from its disastrous 2010 default. The question of how the Biden administration will treat bank takeovers in the wake of Silicon Valley Bank’s collapse took on new urgency Friday, when Treasury Secretary Janet Yellen reportedly told bank chiefs that more deals may be necessary. Even after consolidation, the U.S. has thousands of banks. The number of commercial lenders fell from 9,613 in 2001 to 5,002 in 2020, according to a recent congressional report. By contrast, Canada has fewer than 100. The Biden administration has been largely tough on mergers. Michael Hsu, the acting leader at the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, warned last year that unless guidelines were stiffened, “there’s an increased risk of approving mergers that diminish competition, hurt communities or present systemic risks.” The Justice Department has expressed similar concerns about “the accumulation of market power” in just a few lenders. But smaller lenders are increasingly facing more scrutiny. After Silicon Valley Bank fell, regulators began weighing a plan to subject midsize banks — those with between $100 billion and $200 billion in assets — to capital requirements and controls similar to those for bigger rivals. “There are parts of the bank ecosystem that are crying out for consolidation and that is likely to intensify as we see a further tightening of the regulatory regime in the coming month,” Isaac Boltansky, an analyst at BTIG, told DealBook. Expect resistance to letting big banks get bigger. JPMorgan Chase’s deal to buy First Republic will give America’s largest lender more than 13 percent of the country’s deposits, a situation that critics say raises costs for consumers and harms competition. (That said, JPMorgan isn’t likely to buy more banks and mergers are expected among smaller institutions.) After the debt limit, could this be Washington’s next big fight? The doomsday scenario for default is mere days away, and that’s adding to investor anxiety. Futures trading on the S&P 500 index points to another weak open despite Round 3 of talks scheduled for Monday between President Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy. June 1 is the “hard deadline” to reach a debt-ceiling deal, Treasury Secretary Janet Yellen stressed on Sunday. She calculated that the best-case scenario on the so-called X-date — when the government will run out of funds if no agreement is reached — was roughly three weeks away: June 15. (Economists at Goldman Sachs are saying the date to watch is June 8 or 9.) Ms. Yellen is expected to provide another update to Congress on the government’s cash balance this week. Democrats and Republicans remain far apart on key issues. Republicans are demanding spending caps, new work requirements to qualify for federal assistance programs and cuts to funding meant to help the I.R.S. crack down on tax evaders. Progress has been made on clawing back unspent Covid relief funding and on capping discretionary federal spending for at least the next two years. Historically, debt limit showdowns go down to the wire. As always, the rhetoric on both sides has been heated. The wild card this time: Will members of Congress who hold extreme positions refuse to compromise, and sabotage negotiations? “I can’t guarantee that they will not force a default by doing something outrageous,” Mr. Biden said on Sunday, referring to congressional Republicans insisting on deep cuts. Expect more market uncertainty as signs of investor jitters are growing. According to a Bank of America report published on Friday, investors pulled $7.7 billion out of stocks last week, buying less-risky Treasury notes instead. — Jared Cohen, president of global affairs at Goldman Sachs, citing countries like India, Saudi Arabia and South Korea as important players on the world stage. For a second straight week, a parade of Fed officials will hit the speaker circuit. And, expect earnings news from big names in retail and tech. Here’s what to watch: Monday: Presidents of several regional Fed branches — Mary Daly of San Francisco, Raphael Bostic of Atlanta, Tom Barkin of Richmond and Jim Bullard of St. Louis — will speak at various events. Their views on interest rates will probably be a hot topic. Tuesday: Lowes, Autozone, Dick’s Sporting Goods and BJ’s Wholesale report earnings, giving snapshots on retailers’ health amid climbing inflation. Wednesday: Nvidia and Snowflake report, offering insight into the markets for computer chips and cloud computing. The Fed releases minutes from its latest rate-setting meeting. Thursday: Best Buy, Costco and Dollar Tree report. Friday: The Commerce Department releases data on personal consumption expenditure, a closely watched measure of inflation. The University of Michigan also publishes its latest consumer sentiment report. Deals The law firms Allen & Overy and Shearman & Sterling plan to combine, in the latest effort by global legal practices to merge in search of growth. (Reuters) Syngenta, the Chinese-owned agricultural giant, said it is seeking to raise $9.3 billion by going public on Shanghai’s stock exchange. (Bloomberg) Exxon Mobil reportedly paid over $100 million for the rights to mine lithium, a metal critical to the electric vehicle industry, in Arkansas. (WSJ) Policy A federal judge struck down an alliance between JetBlue and American Airlines, a victory for Biden administration antitrust officials pursuing cases against the industry. (NYT) A close look at Representative Mike Gallagher, the Wisconsin Republican pushing American companies to rethink their ties to China. (WSJ) “Air DeSantis: The Private Jets and Secret Donors Flying Him Around” (NYT) Best of the rest Uber suspended its diversity chief, Bo Young Lee, following complaints about an employee panel she hosted. (NYT) David Zaslav, the C.E.O. of Warner Bros. Discovery, faced pro-writers protests at Boston University, where he was delivering the commencement speech. (Hollywood Reporter) We’d like your feedback! Please email thoughts and suggestions to dealbook@nytimes.com. nyregion opinion technology technology nyregion opinion business opinion magazine Andrew Ross Sorkin is a columnist and the founder and editor at large of DealBook. He is a co-anchor of CNBC’s ""Squawk Box"" and the author of “Too Big to Fail.” He is also a co-creator of the Showtime drama series ""Billions."" More about Andrew Ross Sorkin Ravi Mattu is the managing editor of DealBook, based in London. He joined The New York Times in 2022 from the Financial Times, where he held a number of senior roles in Hong Kong and London. More about Ravi Mattu Bernhard Warner joined the The Times in 2022 as a senior editor for DealBook. Previously he was a senior writer and editor at Fortune focusing on business, the economy and the markets. More about Bernhard Warner Sarah Kessler is a senior staff editor for DealBook and the author of “Gigged,” a book about workers in the gig economy. More about Sarah Kessler Michael de la Merced joined The Times as a reporter in 2006, covering Wall Street and finance. Among his main coverage areas are mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcies and the private equity industry. More about Michael J. de la Merced Lauren Hirsch joined The Times from CNBC in 2020, covering deals and the biggest stories on Wall Street. More about Lauren Hirsch Ephrat Livni reports from Washington on the intersection of business and policy for DealBook. Previously, she was a senior reporter at Quartz, covering law and politics, and has practiced law in the public and private sectors.   More about Ephrat Livni "
nyt://article/abbb9ca3-36d5-5fb3-be05-67d41783d7a6,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/05/25/technology/ai-hiring-law-new-york.html,2023-05-25T09:00:26+0000,article,News,1110,"[{'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'New York City', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Artificial Intelligence', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Law and Legislation', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Regulation and Deregulation of Industry', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Computers and the Internet', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Hiring and Promotion', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Discrimination', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'City Council (NYC)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," New York City’s pioneering, focused approach sets rules on how companies use the technology in work force decisions. “Until you try to regulate, you won’t learn how,” said Julia Stoyanovich, director of the Center for Responsible A.I. at New York University.Credit...Mary Inhea Kang for The New York Times Steve Lohr, a technology reporter, has reported on artificial intelligence for more than two decades. European lawmakers are finishing work on an A.I. act. The Biden administration and leaders in Congress have their plans for reining in artificial intelligence. Sam Altman, the chief executive of OpenAI, maker of the A.I. sensation ChatGPT, recommended the creation of a federal agency with oversight and licensing authority in Senate testimony last week. And the topic came up at the Group of 7 summit in Japan. Amid the sweeping plans and pledges, New York City has emerged as a modest pioneer in A.I. regulation. The city government passed a law in 2021 and adopted specific rules last month for one high-stakes application of the technology: hiring and promotion decisions. Enforcement begins in July. The city’s law requires companies using A.I. software in hiring to notify candidates that an automated system is being used. It also requires companies to have independent auditors check the technology annually for bias. Candidates can request and be told what data is being collected and analyzed. Companies will be fined for violations. New York City’s focused approach represents an important front in A.I. regulation. At some point, the broad-stroke principles developed by governments and international organizations, experts say, must be translated into details and definitions. Who is being affected by the technology? What are the benefits and harms? Who can intervene, and how? “Without a concrete use case, you are not in a position to answer those questions,” said Julia Stoyanovich, an associate professor at New York University and director of its Center for Responsible A.I. But even before it takes effect, the New York City law has been a magnet for criticism. Public interest advocates say it doesn’t go far enough, while business groups say it is impractical. The complaints from both camps point to the challenge of regulating A.I., which is advancing at a torrid pace with unknown consequences, stirring enthusiasm and anxiety. Uneasy compromises are inevitable. Ms. Stoyanovich is concerned that the city law has loopholes that may weaken it. “But it’s much better than not having a law,” she said. “And until you try to regulate, you won’t learn how.” The law applies to companies with workers in New York City, but labor experts expect it to influence practices nationally. At least four states — California, New Jersey, New York and Vermont — and the District of Columbia are also working on laws to regulate A.I. in hiring. And Illinois and Maryland have enacted laws limiting the use of specific A.I. technologies, often for workplace surveillance and the screening of job candidates. The New York City law emerged from a clash of sharply conflicting viewpoints. The City Council passed it during the final days of the administration of Mayor Bill de Blasio. Rounds of hearings and public comments, more than 100,000 words, came later — overseen by the city’s Department of Consumer and Worker Protection, the rule-making agency. The result, some critics say, is overly sympathetic to business interests. “What could have been a landmark law was watered down to lose effectiveness,” said Alexandra Givens, president of the Center for Democracy & Technology, a policy and civil rights organization. That’s because the law defines an “automated employment decision tool” as technology used “to substantially assist or replace discretionary decision making,” she said. The rules adopted by the city appear to interpret that phrasing narrowly so that A.I. software will require an audit only if it is the lone or primary factor in a hiring decision or is used to overrule a human, Ms. Givens said. That leaves out the main way the automated software is used, she said, with a hiring manager invariably making the final choice. The potential for A.I.-driven discrimination, she said, typically comes in screening hundreds or thousands of candidates down to a handful or in targeted online recruiting to generate a pool of candidates. Ms. Givens also criticized the law for limiting the kinds of groups measured for unfair treatment. It covers bias by sex, race and ethnicity, but not discrimination against older workers or those with disabilities. “My biggest concern is that this becomes the template nationally when we should be asking much more of our policymakers,” Ms. Givens said. The law was narrowed to sharpen it and make sure it was focused and enforceable, city officials said. The Council and the worker protection agency heard from many voices, including public-interest activists and software companies. Its goal was to weigh trade-offs between innovation and potential harm, officials said. “This is a significant regulatory success toward ensuring that A.I. technology is used ethically and responsibly,” said Robert Holden, who was the chair of the Council committee on technology when the law was passed and remains a committee member. New York City is trying to address new technology in the context of federal workplace laws with guidelines on hiring that date to the 1970s. The main Equal Employment Opportunity Commission rule states that no practice or method of selection used by employers should have a “disparate impact” on a legally protected group like women or minorities. Businesses have criticized the law. In a filing this year, the Software Alliance, a trade group that includes Microsoft, SAP and Workday, said the requirement for independent audits of A.I. was “not feasible” because “the auditing landscape is nascent,” lacking standards and professional oversight bodies. But a nascent field is a market opportunity. The A.I. audit business, experts say, is only going to grow. It is already attracting law firms, consultants and start-ups. Companies that sell A.I. software to assist in hiring and promotion decisions have generally come to embrace regulation. Some have already undergone outside audits. They see the requirement as a potential competitive advantage, providing proof that their technology expands the pool of job candidates for companies and increases opportunity for workers. “We believe we can meet the law and show what good A.I. looks like,” said Roy Wang, general counsel of Eightfold AI, a Silicon Valley start-up that produces software used to assist hiring managers. The New York City law also takes an approach to regulating A.I. that may become the norm. The law’s key measurement is an “impact ratio,” or a calculation of the effect of using the software on a protected group of job candidates. It does not delve into how an algorithm makes decisions, a concept known as “explainability.” In life-affecting applications like hiring, critics say, people have a right to an explanation of how a decision was made. But A.I. like ChatGPT-style software is becoming more complex, perhaps putting the goal of explainable A.I. out of reach, some experts say. “The focus becomes the output of the algorithm, not the working of the algorithm,” said Ashley Casovan, executive director of the Responsible AI Institute, which is developing certifications for the safe use of A.I. applications in the workplace, health care and finance. Steve Lohr covers technology, economics and work force issues. He was part of the team awarded the Pulitzer Prize for explanatory reporting in 2013. More about Steve Lohr "
nyt://article/98036281-b191-5c1b-91e0-4e017816e140,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/09/29/opinion/government-shutdown-national-debt.html,2023-09-29T19:00:08+0000,article,Op-Ed,1773,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'internal-sub-only-nl', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'House Freedom Caucus', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'McCarthy, Kevin (1965- )', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Gross Domestic Product', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Social Security (US)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Subscriber-only Newsletter Opinion Writer The shutdown of the federal government that appears imminent is not just a political failure but also a failure of the imagination. Driving this particular stalemate is a small group of hard-right Republicans incensed over House Speaker Kevin McCarthy’s leadership, immigration issues and, of course, government spending. For years now, Washington has seemed at a loss — adrift at sea — over how to cope with the nation’s deepening budget problems. Cutting entitlements significantly is off the table in both parties. Ditto for military spending. Reductions in other parts of the budget couldn’t possibly be big enough to do the trick. And just letting the deficits run is looking increasingly irresponsible. There is really only one way out of this jam. Spoiler alert: It’s not reducing funding for the Corporation for Public Broadcasting. It’s also not increasing the economy’s growth rate. That’s a good goal, but as we can see, the red ink has poured out over the past year even though the economy has been at or near full employment. The solution is more tax revenue. Namely, more effective collection of taxes from people and companies that aren’t paying what they owe, coupled with higher tax rates on corporations and individuals. And not just on the very rich. The financing problem is big enough that taxes will have to go up on a sizable chunk of people in the top half of the income distribution. You don’t hear this from either Republicans or Democrats because calling for higher taxes is seen in Washington as politically fatal. As I said, it requires imagination. When you step back from the daily tit for tat, it’s hard to imagine any way to fix the nation’s finances in the long term that doesn’t involve more tax revenue. As Sherlock Holmes said, “When you have eliminated all which is impossible, then whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth.” Congress, alas, is more focused on assigning blame for a shutdown right now than employing Holmesian logic. “We are now firmly ensconced in a system where we are budgeting by crisis,” Shai Akabas, the executive director of the economic policy program at the Bipartisan Policy Center, told me. “There’s really no oxygen in the room to talk about the underlying problems and figure out constructive solutions. It’s all eaten up by ‘Are we going to default?’ or ‘Are we going to shut down the government?’” Akabas, by the way, is solidly in the more-taxes camp. “When you look at the magnitude of our fiscal challenge,” he said, “it’s inevitable that we’re going to bring in more tax revenue as part of the solution.” (Note that he said “we’re going to,” not “we should.”) I have never been a deficit hawk. I think balanced budget amendments are silly. It’s smart to run big deficits when the economy is weak; the government’s spending makes up for the shortfall in private consumption and investment, minimizing the loss of jobs. It’s good to run small deficits even when the economy is healthy to offset contractionary forces elsewhere. If the growth rate of the economy exceeds the growth rate of the debt, the ratio of debt to gross domestic product will shrink, making the debt more and more manageable. The problem now is that big deficits are structural, not just cyclical. They exist even when times are good. And the nonpartisan Congressional Budget Office projects that they will get much larger, as this chart shows. To be sure, this isn’t necessarily an impending crisis. Even if it reached 180 percent or so, America’s debt-to-G.D.P. ratio would be below where Japan’s is today. “It’s more of a problem that’s kind of insidious, that gets a bit worse every year,” Michael Strain, the director of economic policy studies at the American Enterprise Institute, told me. One key factor in the worsening financial picture is the graying of America, which is raising spending on Social Security and Medicare. The combined Social Security trust funds are on track to run out in 2034 unless something is done before then, after which they would be able to pay only 80 percent of scheduled benefits. This is the first place where higher taxes come in. The latest Social Security trustees’ report calculates that making the system solvent for the next 75 years would require an immediate and permanent increase in payroll taxes of 3.44 percentage points, to 15.84 percent; an immediate and permanent cut in benefits to all current and future beneficiaries of 21.3 percent; or some combination of those approaches. To cut benefits by more than 20 percent would be not just politically impossible but also disastrous for those retirees who rely on Social Security for most of their income. So tax increases are both inevitable and justified. I’ll skip past the Pentagon except to say that deep cuts in military spending seem unlikely, given rising threats from China and Russia. As for nonmilitary discretionary spending, it has already been shrinking as a percentage of G.D.P. Trying to get all the cuts there would devastate much of what we think of as government, from air traffic control and national parks to food safety inspection and the passport office. Then there are the growing interest payments on the national debt, which are off the table because if they aren’t paid, the government defaults. A strong nation has effective public services and takes care of its neediest. By that simple standard, the United States is being weakened by its failure to raise the revenue it needs. The expiration of the expanded child tax credit is an example. According to the Census Bureau, the credit’s expansion in 2021, to fight the economic effects of Covid, lifted 2.1 million children above the poverty line. To save money, Congress allowed the expansion to expire last year, and many of those children fell back below the poverty line. That’s unconscionable. The conventional wisdom is that Republicans like lower taxes and Democrats like higher taxes. That’s not quite right. “We have bipartisan agreement not to raise taxes on the bottom 98 percent of the population,” Strain told me. “One party” — the Democrats — “wants to raise taxes on the top 2 percent a little bit.” His view is that about three-quarters of deficit reduction should come from spending cuts, the rest from higher taxes. He would impose those increases on more households, down to around the middle of the income distribution. In 2017, Paul N. Van de Water, a senior fellow at the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities, wrote a report titled “Federal Spending and Revenues Will Need to Grow in Coming Years, Not Shrink.” In contrast to Strain, he told me he favors raising taxes on the rich first: “If we can’t raise as much money as we need on that route, then look at people in slightly less exalted income brackets.” I interviewed two economists, Kimberly Clausing and Natasha Sarin, who worked in the Treasury Department during the first two years of the Biden administration. They wrote a paper released this month by the Brookings Institution’s Hamilton Project on a blueprint for tax reform in 2025, the year many provisions of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 are scheduled to expire. They wrote: “Our message is to use the opportunity of T.C.J.A. sunsets to set ambitious revenue-raising targets, given the fiscal needs facing the U.S. today. And it is important to do so in a progressive way, given increased inequality and wealth concentration.” “It turns out you can get quite a lot” of deficit reduction by raising the corporate tax rate back to 28 percent, imposing a corporate carbon fee and other measures, Sarin said. She and Clausing estimated that if everything on their list was enacted, it would raise enough revenue for the primary budget deficit (i.e., the deficit excluding interest payments) to be cut in half over 10 years, which, according to estimates by the Congressional Budget Office, would be enough to keep the debt-to-G.D.P. ratio from continuing to rise. It’s easier and more equitable to raise money on capital income (profits) than on labor income (wages), Clausing told me. And it’s easier to raise money on capital income at its source, from the businesses that earn it, than after it’s paid out to shareholders in dividends and capital gains. “The corporate tax base is concentrated in a couple thousand companies, many of whom have a lot of market power,” Clausing said. “These measures would be a big down payment on deficit reduction.” I have one observation about your article on unhappiness among young adults, having been born in 1961. I think helicopter parenting was a mistake. Independence builds self-reliance, and that makes us trust ourselves more. These kids do not trust themselves because they do not know how. They never learned. Shannon TrimbleSan Francisco Speaking of why higher interest rates don’t count as inflation, here’s another riddle that has puzzled me for a while and may appear naïve or even silly at first, but I have to ask: Why are higher corporate profits not inflationary, yet higher employee wages are inflationary? Why is corporations’ having more money (profits) to spend better than consumers’ having more money (wages) to spend? I guess that’s why it’s called capitalism. Scott MartinRichmond, Va. Another point on interest rates and inflation is the one Alan Blinder made in his recent book “A Monetary and Fiscal History of the United States, 1961-2021.” He observed that when the mortgage rate was still in the Consumer Price Index, there was the potential for a vicious circle effect, especially after Paul Volcker was appointed Fed chairman and put the hammer down: Monetary tightening to control inflation pushed up interest rates, which entered the C.P.I., possibly justifying more tightening and extending the recession. David T. KingSarajevo, Bosnia and Herzegovina In your newsletter about Latin America, you left out one critical piece of the puzzle, which is endemic poverty and gross inequality, from economic to political and judicial. The problem traces back to the conquest and the rise of giant latifundias (estates). It was most recently exacerbated by the United States’ actions in the Cold War, which supported extreme right-wing governments in the region and stifled progressive change and income distribution. Ricardo GuarneroLas Cruces, N.M. “If we can have full employment and full production for the negative ends of war, then why can’t we have a job for every American in the pursuit of peace?” — Walter Reuther, president of the United Auto Workers union, speaking at the March on Washington for Jobs and Freedom (Aug. 28, 1963) Peter Coy has covered business for more than 40 years. Email him at coy-newsletter@nytimes.com or follow him on Twitter.  @petercoy  "
nyt://article/14b65f70-b6e8-54ab-b6a1-ea7301823c15,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/06/28/your-money/inflation-consumer-behavior.html,2022-06-28T09:00:34+0000,article,News,2263,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Prices (Fares, Fees and Rates)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary," From driving fewer miles to downgrading vacations, Americans are making meaningful changes to their spending. Here’s how five households are coping with the highest inflation in decades. Amber Dowdy with her husband, Mike. Before price increases began to eat into their budget, the couple didn’t think too hard about their spending.Credit...Alfield Reeves for The New York Times Americans are suffering from sticker shock. With inflation running at 8.6 percent, its fastest pace in 40 years, people are balking at the rising cost of everything from groceries to gas. In May 2021, the average price of a dozen large eggs was $1.60. A year later, it was $2.80 — an increase of 75 percent. Ground beef is up 13 percent per pound. A gallon of whole milk costs one-fifth more. Overall, grocery prices were 12 percent higher last month than they were a year earlier, according to the Bureau of Labor Statistics. That was the largest year-over-year increase since 1979. At the same time, the average driver was paying nearly $275 a month at the pump, up from $167 in June 2021, when a gallon of gas was $3.07, according to Kelley Blue Book’s calculations. Rents, too, are escalating. The median monthly rent was nearly $1,850 in May, according to Realtor.com, up 26 percent from 2019, before the pandemic. The Federal Reserve is trying to combat runaway price increases by raising interest rates. But that is stoking new fears: If the Fed overdoes it, high rates could cool demand so much that the economy tips into a recession. Many consumers are bracing for the worst. To cope, people around the country are changing their consumption habits. Some are starting budgets and shopping at discount stores. Others are skipping red meat and fish, walking dogs for extra cash, canceling subscription meal kits or, like Harold Topper of Stamford, Conn., resorting to psychological tricks to blunt the pain. These days, Mr. Topper fills up his gas tank when it dips by a quarter, because it costs just $25 to refill. In his mind, the price is more palatable than at the half-tank mark or worse. “After all, isn’t perception reality?” Mr. Topper, 66, said. In a recent poll conducted by the American Psychological Association, more adults ranked inflation as a top source of stress than any other issue asked about in the poll’s 15-year history. “You can’t turn the news off about money because you have to pay for food or pay for gas,” said Vaile Wright, a psychologist and senior director at the association. This month, The New York Times asked readers to describe how inflation has affected their lives. Nearly 450 people responded. Below is a glimpse into how five American households have been dealing with it all. …. Before price increases began to eat into their budget, Amber Dowdy and her husband, Mike, didn’t think too hard about their spending. The couple, who live with their two children in Muskegon, Mich., enjoyed one nice vacation each year — Universal Studios in Florida, for example — and dined at local restaurants several times a week. Their children, ages 13 and 7, participated in any extracurricular activity that sparked their interest. That changed around March when Ms. Dowdy, an online history teacher, started to wonder why her checking account was scraping closer to bottom — with little change to spending behavior. “We have lived comfortably for years,” said Ms. Dowdy, 32, whose husband is a manager at a company that makes machine tools. “But now we’re living paycheck to paycheck.” What is inflation? Inflation is a general increase in prices, which will cause a loss of purchasing power over time, meaning your dollar will not go as far tomorrow as it did today. It is typically expressed as the annual change in prices for everyday goods and services such as food, furniture, apparel, transportation and toys. What causes inflation? It can be the result of rising consumer demand. But inflation can also rise and fall based on developments that have little to do with economic conditions, such as limited oil production and supply chain problems. Is inflation bad? It depends on the circumstances. Fast price increases spell trouble, but moderate price gains can lead to higher wages and job growth. How does inflation affect the poor? Inflation can be especially hard to shoulder for poor households because they spend a bigger chunk of their budgets on necessities like food, housing and gas. Can inflation affect the stock market? Rapid inflation typically spells trouble for stocks. Financial assets in general have historically fared badly during inflation booms, while tangible assets like houses have held their value better. The family had planned to take a two-week cross-country trip over the summer, driving its camper to the Grand Canyon. But with gas surpassing $5 a gallon, the family has decided to camp locally instead. Ms. Dowdy also stopped using a house cleaning service, which cost $120 every two weeks. “For a long time, that was fine,” she said. “But it’s not a necessity.” The family dog, a Great Dane named Luna, no longer gets professionally groomed, which costs $60 a visit. Instead, Ms. Dowdy bought a self-service card for $25, allowing her to wash the dog at the groomer’s facility for just $5. She canceled Audible and Kindle Unlimited subscriptions, and started shopping at Aldi, the discount grocery retailer, “instead of my big, beautiful supermarket.” The tighter limits on spending are helping the family save about $400 a month. …. Tobias Pratt, a 31-year-old mortgage underwriter in Atlanta, decided to look for his first home in the spring of 2021. He had a well-paying job and a solid down payment, and his rent was ticking higher. Getting preapproved for a mortgage seemed like a wise move. “I finally felt like I was in a good space to do it,” Mr. Pratt said. But with housing prices so inflated, Mr. Pratt was quickly squeezed out of the market. He decided to try again in March because his lease was about to expire and the rent on his one-bedroom was about to rise by another $200, to $1,900. This time, high mortgage rates, which began climbing earlier this year, have narrowed his prospects even further. Instead of looking solely at single-family homes, he started considering condos — but those are expensive now as well. “I can afford maybe two-thirds of what I could afford last year,” Mr. Pratt said, adding that the monthly mortgage payment could be as much as $700 higher, depending on the size of the loan. “But with housing prices still soaring, the inventory is limited.” He also noticed that his grocery bill, which reliably cost about $225 for an online order placed every two weeks, had jumped to $300 in mid-March. “I was like, ‘Whoa, back up a minute,’” he said. “I looked at my last bill and I ordered pretty much the same groceries.” That was when he decided to start tracking his spending more closely, noting expenses in a journal, looking for places to trim. He eliminated several recurring subscriptions, including Spotify and Experian’s credit tracking service; negotiated a lower-priced plan with his cellphone company; and started ordering less takeout from Uber Eats. To reduce his grocery bill, he swapped name brands for generic products, eliminated bottled water and cut back on extras.  “It is a matter of me just going over the things I don’t need to spend money on right now,” Mr. Pratt said. “I’m just trying to prepare myself if something goes incredibly wrong.” …. Lisa Napp of Hillsborough, N.C., was in her local butcher’s shop last month when a fellow customer yelled: “You’ve got to be kidding me!” The customer wasn’t speaking to anyone in particular. Rather, he was reacting to the higher prices for just about every cut of meat. The butcher said that they weren’t marking up prices above costs any more than usual, but that supplier costs had increased. As the angry customer walked out, another said she was going to have to shop at Walmart. Ms. Napp said the whole scene had left her unsettled. Ms. Napp buys less meat these days. Instead of New York strip or rib eye, she chooses cheaper cuts, like skirt and flatiron steak, which she has learned to tenderize through brining and braising. “I have never done that before,” said Ms. Napp, 67, who lives with her husband, Jack, their 27-year-old daughter, Liliana, and her 89-year old mother, Marlene.  As a retired public school administrator who still consults part time for the district, Ms. Napp is accustomed to living on a relatively fixed income. She considers herself lucky because, unlike many of her friends, she and her husband have pensions. But their discretionary income is still tight, and became squeezed further at the beginning of the year as the cost of gas, milk, butter and eggs rose. Ms. Napp said she was surprised that it would cost $425 to replace a few planks of rotting wood on her porch, nearly double a 2020 estimate. “What I am experiencing is a slow build leading up to a huge wave,” she said. The latest ripple came in the form of higher payments on a personal loan she took out in 2018 so she could retire a year early and care for her father. Its interest rate is pegged to the Fed’s actions, and the central bank has raised rates by one and a half percentage points since March. At least the $85,000 in federal loans they took out for their daughter’s college are on hold — for now. The family is cutting back where it can. Ms. Napp said she had planted a vegetable garden — tomatoes, zucchini, summer squash, basil, red peppers — and planned to swap with neighbors who had done the same. She learned to make pizza, and has stopped buying the family’s favorite local ice cream, now $6.52 a pint. And while she used to do all her shopping at the co-op that sold locally sourced goods, she now buys cereal and other staples from Dollar Tree. “As frugal as we are, our grocery bill has almost doubled,” Ms. Napp said. “Avocados were once three for $5.00. They are now $3.00 apiece when available.” …. Jeremy Walker became aware of a gradual uptick in prices this year, but everything seemed to spike at once after Russia invaded Ukraine in February. What initially captured his attention was the price of bacon — which had nearly doubled at his local grocery chain. “That’s when I really took notice and started to count every penny,” said Mr. Walker, 54, who lives with his husband, Judd Stark, in Malibu, Calif. Mr. Stark, an administrator at a nonprofit rehabilitation facility, is the sole earner for their household for now; Mr. Walker was an independent film publicist, but that work mostly dried up during the pandemic. With a single income, the couple have felt the rise in prices more acutely, particularly the cost of Mr. Stark’s 39-mile commute on Route 101 to North Hollywood. It now costs $68 to fill up his 2013 Honda Civic, up from $44 in February. A nearby gas station’s prices recently reached $7 a gallon. To save on gas, Mr. Stark recently stayed at home for a week using vacation time. Even smaller expenses have his attention now, Mr. Walker said. A recent trip to the cardiologist cost him about $70, if you count the $10 in gas for the 30-minute drive, $20 for parking and a $40 co-pay. Although he has always been frugal, Mr. Walker has started buying a whole chicken every week after noticing that one close to the expiration date cost just 99 cents a pound. That led him to Ina Garten’s roast chicken recipe, which helps stretch their food budget and compensates for increased costs elsewhere. “It’s delicious and yields as many as eight meals,” Mr. Walker said. Leftover breast meat is used for a chicken salad, legs and thighs are used for enchiladas, and he makes stock from the carcass. Though they do most of their shopping at Walmart — where fresh salmon costs $9.99 a pound — Mr. Walker also makes early trips to Ralph’s, their local grocery chain, he said. At around 6:30 a.m., the workers put “Woohoo!” stickers on sale items like beef, so he gets a first look. Frozen puff pastries have become an indulgence. Mr. Walker said they would like to take a drive up to San Francisco, but for now, “that’s a moving target.”  Mai Fee began to notice last fall that her local Safeway store was often sparsely stocked, which she chalked up to supply chain problems. Then there was the shocking price of red meat earlier this year. Finally, she found an explanation in the news: Inflation was up more than 8 percent. “That really struck home for me,” said Ms. Fee, 54, who lives with her partner in Vancouver, Wash. “This was a real thing, it was going to be around for a while, and we’ve quantified it now.” Like millions of other Americans, Ms. Fee, a physical therapist, decided to incorporate more flexibility into her lifestyle last year. She quit her job in a clinic and started her own mobile practice, treating clients in their own homes. But that meant more driving. Now that gas prices are so high, she tries to group nearby appointments together to avoid zigzagging across town. She drives about 20 fewer miles per week, going to nearby Portland, Ore., only on certain days and never during rush hour.  Higher prices and fears of a recession have prompted Ms. Fee to pull back on spending elsewhere. In a typical year, she might spend $500 to $1,000 to refresh her work wardrobe, but she has refrained from buying anything new. “I am repairing the clothes that need minor mending instead of saying, ‘Ah, I don’t need that anymore,’” she said.  Ms. Fee has been trying to gussy up less expensive — but also less healthy — dishes like mac and cheese by tossing in tuna or vegetables. They also eat out “way less,” Ms. Fee said, drawing out the word “way” for emphasis. “I just don’t think it would fit in the budget right now.” The prospect of a 2008-style downturn is also concerning. Ms. Fee said she was grateful to work in health care, which is more recession-proof than other industries, but her partner’s job — his income is higher, providing them with a bit of a buffer — may be more at risk, she added. “We’d really be hurting,” she said.  They just returned from a “big trip of a lifetime” to Spain and Portugal, which they paid for before the pandemic and had to reschedule twice. Now, like some of their friends, they’re seriously considering Portugal as a retirement destination because the cost of health care and living is lower. “It was really hard to come back to the stress of ‘OK, we have to muscle through and make sure we find a way to meet our expenses,’” Ms. Fee said.  nyregion world your-money your-money nyregion world opinion business magazine Tara Siegel Bernard covers personal finance. Before joining The Times in 2008, she was deputy managing editor at FiLife, a personal finance website, and an editor at CNBC. She also worked at Dow Jones and contributed regularly to The Wall Street Journal. More about Tara Siegel Bernard "
nyt://article/7f1b6fd2-821c-573a-aead-4aacdc179e2e,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/08/25/us/politics/biden-student-loans-middle-class.html,2022-08-25T19:25:57+0000,article,News Analysis,1219,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Pell Grants', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"news analysis President Biden is offering what independent analysts suggest would be his most targeted assistance yet to middle-class workers — while trying to repair what he casts as a broken bridge to the middle class. WASHINGTON — The big winners from President Biden’s plan to forgive hundreds of billions of dollars in student loans are not rich graduates of Harvard and Yale, as many critics claim. In fact, the benefits of Mr. Biden’s proposals will largely go to the middle class. According to independent analyses, the people eligible for debt relief are disproportionately young and Black. And they are concentrated in the middle band of Americans by income, defined as households earning between $51,000 and $82,000 a year. The Education Department estimates that nearly 90 percent of affected borrowers earn $75,000 a year or less. Ivy League graduates make up less than 1 percent of federal student borrowers nationwide. Economists say the full scope of Mr. Biden’s plan, including significant changes meant to reduce the payments that millions of borrowers will make for years to come, will help middle-income earners from a wide range of schools and backgrounds. “You’ll have a lot more people who are making zero payments and will have significant loan forgiveness in the future,” said Constantine Yannelis, an economist at the University of Chicago’s Booth School of Business. “The relief to borrowers is going to be more targeted to the people who really need it.” Yet despite the appeal of such debt relief, the program still has set off a contentious debate as economists and political figures assess the full consequences of the plan. By some estimates, it will cost as much as a half-trillion dollars over the course of a decade, imposing a future burden on American taxpayers. The plan also could encourage colleges to raise tuition even faster than they already are. Schools could try to persuade borrowers to take on as much debt as possible to cover higher tuition, with the belief that the federal government would help pay it back. Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. Some conservative and Democratic economists also say the program could add significantly to what is already the highest inflation rate in four decades. Evidence suggests those claims are overstated, however, and American shoppers are not likely to see prices spike because of the program. The announcements Mr. Biden made, including both debt forgiveness and a restart next year of loan payments for all borrowers after a nearly three-year pause, will most likely be a wash for consumer prices, a wide range of economists say. “Debt forgiveness that lowers monthly payments is slightly inflationary in isolation,” analysts from Goldman Sachs wrote in a research note on Thursday, “but the resumption of payments is likely to more than offset this.” The real burden of the plan is likely to be carried by future taxpayers, who will shoulder what could be a half-trillion dollars in additional federal debt from the proposals. Economists generally agree that the distribution of that burden will depend on future tax and spending policies — who pays any increased taxes lawmakers might impose to reduce the federal budget deficit, or who suffers from spending cuts meant to do the same. Experts say at least some future college students could also end up paying higher costs as universities respond to some of Mr. Biden’s moves by raising tuition. The debt relief will only touch Americans who pursued higher education, not those who attempted to climb the income ladder with a high-school diploma alone. “The very poorest Americans aren’t going to benefit very much,” Mr. Yannelis said. “Many of that group don’t go to college, so they don’t have the opportunity to take out student loans.” But in choosing to extend more generous debt relief than even many of his allies had expected, Mr. Biden is offering what independent analysts suggest would be his most targeted assistance yet to middle-class workers, and one that could help more young people make it to the middle class. Although legal challenges to the plan are expected, the proposal has the potential to help tens of millions of borrowers crawl out from under debt. Mr. Biden said on Wednesday that the Education Department would forgive $10,000 in loan debt for borrowers with individual incomes of up to $125,000 or household incomes below $250,000. Students who received Pell grants in school, which are available to lower-income families, would be eligible for an additional $10,000 in debt relief. He also announced plans that would limit many borrowers’ loan payments to 5 percent of their discretionary income and ensure they were not buried in accumulated interest costs if they keep up with payments. The Pell grant component and the moves to limit lower-income borrowers’ future payments were seemingly late additions to Mr. Biden’s plans. Mr. Yannelis and other researchers say they likely added significantly to the cost, while also tipping a much larger share of the benefits toward middle-class borrowers. The Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget, a deficit-reduction advocacy group in Washington, estimates the total cost of the moves could now exceed $500 billion over the next decade. The University of Pennsylvania’s Penn Wharton Budget Model was set to release a similar estimate of the plan’s cost on Friday. That estimate will also show that the middle fifth of income earners — households earning between about $51,000 and $82,000 a year — will reap more than a third of the benefits from the president’s student loan moves, more than any other income group by far. In contrast, the Budget Model estimated that the nearly $2 trillion collection of tax cuts that Republicans passed in 2017 would spread more than two-thirds of its gains to the top fifth of earners. Mr. Biden has cast his plan as a victory for future members of the middle class as well, saying high student debt has effectively broken an economic promise America offered to young people in recent decades: Do what you can to pay for a college education, and you will be rewarded with a job that can afford the comforts of a home, health care and more. “An entire generation is now saddled with unsustainable debt in exchange for an attempt, at least, at a college degree,” Mr. Biden said on Wednesday, announcing the proposals. “The burden is so heavy that even if you graduate, you may not have access to the middle-class life that the college degree once provided.” Even supporters of the move acknowledge that debt cancellation will not reach anywhere close to a majority of American voters, a fact that Republicans have played up in making a case to voters that Mr. Biden has sought to help elites at the expense of everyone else. Supporters of the move say shaking free of a student debt burden has the potential to transform lives in a way few other policies — and perhaps none available to Mr. Biden through executive action — could. “Not every American says I’m for this, like, say, reducing prescription drug costs,” said Senator Chuck Schumer, Democrat of New York and the majority leader, in an interview. “But it has huge depth.” Critics from the left say that Mr. Biden should go further — and that he will not be providing full relief to the truly needy until he does so. “While the student debt forgiveness plan is a positive step forward that will bring some measure of relief to millions of Black borrowers, the reality is that it’s simply not enough,” said Rashad Robinson, president of Color of Change, a racial justice group. “The Biden administration must fully eliminate student loan debt to create a meaningful, lasting impact on people’s lives and close the racial wealth gap.” Jim Tankersley is a White House correspondent with a focus on economic policy. He has written for more than a decade in Washington about the decline of opportunity for American workers, and is the author of ""The Riches of This Land: The Untold, True Story of America's Middle Class."" More about Jim Tankersley "
nyt://article/db77354c-ce28-5cf2-aece-bb023aeb971e,https://www.nytimes.com/article/student-loan-payment-restart.html,2021-12-17T10:00:16+0000,article,News,2177,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Financial Aid (Education)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Coronavirus (2019-nCoV)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Education Department (US)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Payments are now on hold until Sept. 1, and borrowers who were delinquent or in default will get a fresh start. This is how you make the most of the extra time. Federal student loan borrowers received yet another extension on the payment pause put in place more than two years ago. President Biden has pushed the restart date to Sept. 1, which means nearly 27 million borrowers will no longer be expected to begin their payments next month. Those loans have essentially been frozen in time since March 2020 because of the pandemic. Most federal borrowers haven’t had to pay a bill, their loans stopped accruing interest, and another seven million in default received a break from collections. The administration’s latest announcement also included some good news for the most distressed loan holders: Borrowers in default will be considered current on their loans, though details on how that will work have not yet been released. (Delinquent borrowers were already going to receive that treatment.)  “During the pause, we will continue our preparations to give borrowers a fresh start and to ensure that all borrowers have access to repayment plans that meet their financial situations and needs,” Miguel Cardona, the education secretary, said in a statement. The restart date has been delayed seven times and payments are now scheduled to resume just before the midterm elections. What happens four months from now is anyone’s guess, but borrower advocates have long been calling for even more assistance, from the cancellation of debt to more affordable repayment plans. The most prudent course is to prepare for a restart, especially if the upheaval of the past two years means your personal circumstances and financial life look entirely different today. Here’s what you need to know: Make sure your student loan servicer — the entity hired by the government to collect and manage your payments — can find you. Go to your servicer’s website and verify that it has your latest contact details: email address, mailing address and phone number. Not sure who your servicer is? Go to StudentAid.gov and locate your account dashboard and scroll down to the “My Loan Servicers” section. You can also call the Federal Student Aid Information Center at 1-800-433-3243. You should receive a billing statement at least three weeks before your first payment is due, but you can contact your loan servicer before then (online is more efficient) for specifics on what you owe and when payment is due. If you haven’t changed repayment plans, your due date should be the same as before the pause. This is important: If you were on an automatic payment plan before the pandemic — that is, before March 13, 2020 — you must opt back in. Your servicer should reach out to you about this. If you don’t respond, your payments will not automatically restart. Key initiatives. Since he took office, President Biden has had a broad initiative aimed at alleviating the pressure on federal student loan borrowers. Here is where the plans stand: Student loan forgiveness. In 2022, the president announced that the federal government would cancel up to $20,000 worth of federal student loans per person. The Education Department subsequently began accepting applications, but court battles later halted the government from discharging any debt. On June 30, the Supreme Court rejected Biden’s plan, saying that the president had overstepped his authority. Pauses on repayments. A payment pause on federal loans has been extended eight times since March 2020 as part of a pandemic relief measure. But as part of an agreement between Biden and Speaker Kevin McCarthy to raise the debt ceiling, the pause was lifted and repayments started up again in October. Income-driven repayment. On August 22, the Biden administration opened for enrollment its new income-driven repayment plan, known as SAVE, in which borrowers’ monthly payments are tied to their income and family size. It will enable millions of borrowers to significantly cut their monthly federal payments, eventually by as much as half. Targeted relief. The Biden administration has wiped out debts for eligible public service workers, permanently disabled borrowers, defrauded students and people whose schools abruptly closed while they were enrolled. Fixing mistakes. The administration has also announced that more than 800,000 borrowers with federal loans owned directly by the Education Department and who enrolled in income-driven repayment plans would have $39 billion in debt eliminated under an effort to remedy years of mistakes by the loan servicers that collect payments on the government’s behalf. If you signed up after that date, automatic payments will indeed resume. Borrowers who have continued to make payments — there are about 500,000 of them — don’t have to do anything at all. If you miss the first payment, don’t panic. Just contact your servicer and make arrangements to become current. Once you are 90 days overdue, however, the servicer will report your delinquency to the major credit bureaus.  There are many, each with different eligibility rules, conditions and mind-numbing details. But you can think about them as coming in three varieties. Repayment plans calculated over set periods of time: These include standard (fixed payments), graduated (your payments rise), and extended (you pay over a longer time) repayment plans. Income-driven repayment plans: These plans depend on your income, yielding monthly payments as low as $0. And after a couple decades of payments, whatever balance you’re still carrying is forgiven by the government. These plans will probably be the preferred option for many borrowers who expect to struggle making their payments. Pause-button options: Borrowers can also request deferment or forbearance, which temporarily put payments on hold — though there can be significant added costs in the long run. With forbearance, payments stop but interest still accrues. If the interest is not paid, it’s added to the loan’s principal balance. Deferment is similar, but subsidized loans — which generally have slightly better terms — won’t accrue interest while they’re paused. “Forbearance should be a last resort,” said Betsy Mayotte, president and founder of The Institute of Student Loan Advisors, which provides free advice to student borrowers. She suggests reserving forbearance as a short-term solution when something throws your budget off track — a big car repair, for example, or a high medical bill. The rules are complicated, but the gist is simple: Payments are calculated based on your earnings and readjusted each year. After making monthly payments for a set number of years — usually 20, sometimes 25 — any remaining balance is forgiven. (The balance is taxable as income, though a temporary tax rule exempts balances forgiven through 2025 from federal income taxes.) There’s a confusing assortment of plans available, and there may even be a new one coming, though probably not for a while. For now, the alphabet soup includes PAYE, REPAYE, I.C.R., and I.B.R. (which comes in two flavors, with the latest version updated to have slightly better terms for newer borrowers). Monthly payments are often calculated as 10 or 15 percent of discretionary income, but one plan is 20 percent. Discretionary income is usually defined as the amount earned above 150 percent of the poverty level, which is adjusted for household size. “PAYE usually has the lowest payment, followed by either I.B.R. or REPAYE, depending on the specific circumstances of the borrower,” said Mark Kantrowitz, a student aid expert. There’s a dizzying variety of rules. Consider spousal income. “REPAYE has a marriage penalty, while I.B.R. and PAYE will use just the borrower’s income if they file a separate return, joint income if they file a joint return,” he said. REPAYE, he said, uses joint income regardless of tax filing status. Got all that? These plans aren’t a cure-all. Even though some borrowers may be eligible for a $0 payment, the plans aren’t always affordable for everyone. The formulas aren’t adjusted for local cost of living, private student loans or medical bills, among other things. And people who are eligible for small (or $0) payments will see their balances grow, sometimes dramatically. That can take a mental toll, even if the debt is forgiven years later. But they remain a more manageable solution for many borrowers. “Enrolling in I.D.R. now is a great next step, particularly if you lost your job during Covid, or your spouse lost their job and you are experiencing a drop in income,” said Mike Pierce, executive director of the Student Borrower Protection Center. Analyzing the plans is an agonizing exercise, which is why you should visit the loan simulator tool at StudentAid.gov. It will guide you through the options and help you decide which plan best fits your goals — finding the lowest-payment plan, for example, versus paying loans off as soon as possible. It is, fortunately, easy to use: When you sign in, it should automatically use your loans in its calculations. (You can manually add other federal loans if any are missing.) You can also compare plans side by side — how much they’ll cost over time, both monthly and in total, and if any debt would be forgiven. For most borrowers, income-driven or extended plans will yield the lowest monthly payment, experts said. You’ll still be enrolled in the same plan. And there’s some good news: All your months of paused payments are treated as if you’ve actually paid, which means that time counts toward the years you must accrue to have your loan forgiven. Participants in an income-driven plan must recertify their income and family size each year to remain enrolled, and you won’t be asked to do this before Feb. 28, which is six months after payments are scheduled to resume. But you may want to do it sooner, anyway: If your income dropped or your family grew, updating your information will most likely lower your payment. To update your information, visit the I.D.R. application online and select the button next to “Recalculate My Monthly Payment.” Until Feb. 28, you will be able to self-certify this information, either verbally or through the StudentAid.gov website. (You’ll need your Federal Student Aid I.D. and password.) Starting in March, your income must be verified — you’ll be given the option to document your income electronically, using a data retrieval tool that works with the Internal Revenue Service. Doing this is crucial. If you fail to recertify, you risk falling out of the plan altogether, which can have costly financial consequences. Your loan servicer should remind you ahead of time, but be proactive. Make sure you know your deadline and mark it on your calendar. There’s good news for delinquent borrowers, too: You get a fresh start. “You will be current,” said Scott Buchanan, executive director of the Student Loan Servicing Alliance, an industry trade group. “Their delinquency was removed.” That should remove the pressure for borrowers who were in danger of falling into default, which happens if you’re 270 days behind. If you had been delinquent, find out what your payment is expected to be, and if you cannot afford it, consider enrolling in a different repayment plan that will lower your bill. You will also receive a clean slate and your loans will be deemed in good standing, the Education Department said. (This applies to all borrowers affected by the pause, including holders of direct loans and privately held Family Federal Education Loans that are in default.) The Education Department has said that this will happen automatically, though the timing and details are still unclear. More information will be posted on StudentAid.gov as it becomes available. The goal is to make it easier for defaulted borrowers to enter a repayment plan based on their income, which, depending on their circumstances, may not require any payments at all. Otherwise, it will simply buy them more time before they fall into default again, after roughly nine months of nonpayment. It often takes a year or more for an account to move into collections. At that point, the federal government can take your tax refund, up to 15 percent of your paycheck or part of your Social Security benefits.   This clean-slate action restarts the clock. “It would be at least August 2023 before we see anyone experience the draconian collection tactics,” said Persis Yu, policy director and managing counsel at the Student Borrower Protection Center. Under normal circumstances, emerging from default can be cumbersome, but is a necessary step before borrowers can enter an income-driven repayment plan. Paying the loans off completely is an option, but usually not feasible. Loan consolidation is another option; alternatively, borrowers can “rehabilitate” their loans. That involves making nine out of 10 consecutive “reasonable” payments, which your loan holder determines using a formula. You’re more likely to be eligible now. The Biden administration recently made some major changes to the program, which allows a variety of government and nonprofit workers with federal student loan debt to have any remaining balances forgiven, tax-free, after making 120 payments. Now, hundreds of thousands more borrowers may qualify for relief. Curious if you’re one of them? Ron Lieber outlined it all in a recent column. The so-called borrower defense loan discharge program allows borrowers to file claims to have their debt forgiven if they believe they have been defrauded by their schools. If you have a pending application — or your application has been approved but is not yet discharged — you will not have to make payments when the pause ends. You will remain in forbearance if you find yourself in one of the following situations: You filed an application, but haven’t yet received a response. Your claim was approved, but the loans haven’t been discharged yet. You received a denial letter on, or after, Dec. 1, 2019. You submitted a reconsideration request and the department is reviewing it. Besides your servicer, groups like The Institute of Student Loan Advisors, known as TISLA, can provide free guidance on what options may best work for you. For New York state residents, EDCAP, a nonprofit focused on student loans, also offers help. And some employers and other organizations have hired companies like Summer, which helps borrowers sort through the options. Borrowers need to be on high alert because scam artists — offering debt relief and other services for a fee — are already on the prowl. If you’re unsure whether the help you’re being offered is legitimate, hang up, don’t respond to the email — and reach out to your servicer using the number printed on your bill or the government website. You can file complaints through the Federal Trade Commission and your state’s attorney general. “Consumers need to be very careful,” said Mr. Pierce of the Student Borrower Protection Center. “These people are very predatory and this is the kind of moment they leverage.” Tara Siegel Bernard covers personal finance. Before joining The Times in 2008, she was deputy managing editor at FiLife, a personal finance website, and an editor at CNBC. She also worked at Dow Jones and contributed regularly to The Wall Street Journal. More about Tara Siegel Bernard "
nyt://article/dafdd58a-224a-5e67-a3ac-78d5949d4cdb,https://www.nytimes.com/2023/10/06/business/retirement-social-security-cola-inflation.html,2023-10-06T09:02:47+0000,article,News,1767,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Retirement', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Social Security (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Personal Finances', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Longevity', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Content Type: Service', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"retiring Social Security’s cost of living adjustment, coming next week, helps retirees keep up with their bills, but there are other strategies for coping. The Social Security cost of living adjustment for 2024, expected to be announced Thursday, is forecast to be 3.2 percent, far below the 8.7 percent increase older Americans received this year. The smaller increase would reflect the cooling of consumer prices, but inflation is an ever-present risk that should be a consideration in your retirement plan. Although Social Security is adjusted annually for inflation, it will cover only part of your spending in retirement. Over a retirement that could last several decades, inflation can erode the buying power of your other assets, forcing a quicker spend-down and threatening your standard of living. For example, a retirement portfolio valued today at $250,000 would buy the same amount of goods as $137,000 in 2000. “Inflation really is another form of longevity risk,” said Joel Dickson, global head of advice methodology at Vanguard. “If your portfolio going into retirement is projected to be able to satisfy your spending needs for 30 years, an inflation shock might mean that it can only do that for 27 years, and those last three years aren’t being covered.” The risk you’ll face from inflation depends on your circumstances. Social Security replaces a higher share of pre-retirement income for middle- and lower-income retirees than it does for affluent people, and that means a greater share of their retirement income will be protected by COLAs. And benefits cover a much larger share of living expenses in low-cost parts of the country. Your exposure to major expenses also can make a difference. Older households spend more on health care than younger people do, and they spend slightly less on food and transportation, according to research by J.P. Morgan Asset Management. Housing is the largest category of expense for all households. And for older people, whether you own your home or rent is an important factor in financial security, notes Sharon Carson, retirement strategist at the company. “Homeowners might be dealing with rising property taxes and maintenance costs, but renters are so much more exposed — and rising rents have been a huge part of the inflation story lately,” she said. Portfolio strategies are available that can help mitigate inflation risk. The timing of your Social Security claim also matters — and you may want to consider other income products, such as annuities and inflation-adjusted bonds. Holding equities in your portfolio in retirement offers some protection, because they have proved to outpace inflation over the long haul. Vanguard advises clients to maintain a balanced portfolio (50 percent stocks, 50 percent bonds) in the early years of retirement. “It depends on the client’s risk tolerance, but having equities in the portfolio helps you maintain the ability to spend from your portfolio,” Mr. Dickson said. But stocks are not specifically a hedge against inflation. “There will be some years where stocks are down and inflation is high, so they are wildly imperfect as an inflation hedge,” said Bob French, director of investment analysis at Retirement Researcher, a retirement-planning education firm. The rate at which you expect to draw down your portfolio is equally critical when thinking about inflation risk. Researchers have been debating for years what constitutes a “safe withdrawal rate” — that is, the amount you can tap annually, with adjustments for inflation, without exhausting your savings before the end of life. The old rule of thumb was 4 percent, but some experts now think that number should be somewhat lower, with much depending on two crucial factors: real (after inflation) market return, and whether you encounter tough market conditions in the initial years of your retirement. The latter is known as “sequence-of-return risk” and will reduce the longevity of your portfolio. William Bernstein, an investment adviser and author of “The Four Pillars of Investing,” relies on a relatively conservative assumption that the market’s real return will be no more than 4.5 percent in the years ahead — and that many will encounter sequence-of-return risk. With that in mind, he concludes that a burn rate of 3 percent or less can succeed for portfolios that continue to hold some level of equities — perhaps 20 to 30 percent. “If your rates of return are lower during your first 10 years of retirement, you’ll run out of money a lot sooner than 30 years,” he said. “So that’s why I like to say that 3 percent is probably safe.” If your burn rate is lower than that, he adds, your asset allocation doesn’t matter much — especially if you can meet much of your living expenses with an optimized Social Security income stream or a defined benefit pension. Your portfolio will survive difficult markets and bouts of inflation with no difficulty — and the assets will be available for discretionary spending, charitable giving or your heirs. Social Security’s automatic COLA makes it the only true inflation hedge available to retirees — and one of the best ways to maximize that protection is to delay claiming your benefits to increase monthly income. You can claim retirement benefits as early as 62, but your annual benefit will be higher for every year you wait until 70. The monthly benefit you receive hinges on what the government defines as your full retirement age — the point when you qualify to receive 100 percent of the benefit you have earned. Currently, the full retirement age is 66 and a few months for most people. (For those born in 1960 or later, it’s 67.) If you claim after full retirement, you’ll receive credits for delayed filing; claim earlier and there will be reductions. Claiming at the full age is worth 33 percent more in monthly income than a claim at 62, and a claim at age 70 is worth 76 percent more. COLAs calculated against a higher benefit will translate into larger dollar increases — and those, too, will compound over time. “The very first, overriding move that you make is to delay Social Security until age 70,” Mr. Bernstein said. “Unless you and your spouse have short life expectancies, any other strategy is subservient to that.” Social Security offers the best route to boost real income, he argues — especially because the actuarial assumptions driving the current formula of delayed retirement credits and early claiming reductions have become outdated over the years in ways that favor delayed claiming. The formula was designed in the mid-1950s; since then, interest rates have fallen substantially and life expectancy has risen. A study by the Center for Retirement Research at Boston College found that the highest earners, who tend to outlive actuarial averages, reap the highest extra benefits; low-income filers, who tend to claim earlier, are hurt most by the outdated formula. Working longer, even part time, can help you meet living expenses while you delay claiming. One group of researchers found that delaying retirement for three to six months has an impact on your standard of living equivalent to bumping your annual retirement savings rate by 1 percent for 30 years. If working longer isn’t in the cards for you, Mr. Bernstein urges using savings to delay your claim. “The default should be to draw down everything you’ve got to make it to age 70 — your 401(k), your I.R.A. and your taxable savings.” Private-sector defined benefit plans, or pensions, generally do not come with built-in COLAs, so the real value of their income streams fall over time. Most state and local government pensions do have COLAs, although the formulas vary considerably. Commercial annuities can offer generous payout rates. For example, a fixed index annuity, which is a bond-like product with returns tied to market performance — currently offers a payout rate of about 9 percent, according to DPL Financial Partners, which operates a commission-free annuity marketplace. But no annuity products offer COLA riders tied to the Consumer Price Index. Fixed index annuities, and some others, can be bought with guarantees of annual income increases, said David Lau, DPL’s chief executive. “It might be a simple COLA of 2 or 3 percent that increases automatically over time,” he said. “It’s not a perfect hedge against inflation, but it does increase your income.” These riders come with a cost — they start with a considerably lower payout rate. Treasury inflation-protected securities, known as TIPS, offer a seductive-sounding promise: The bond’s principal value rises (or falls) to keep pace with inflation. TIPS are risk-free if you hold them to maturity, but the road to that end point can be bumpy and the price you’ll pay for the inflation guarantee varies. One solution is to put some portion of your portfolio into a TIPS “ladder” — that is, creating a staggered portfolio of bonds that mature at regular intervals; as the bonds mature, the proceeds can be spent or used to buy new TIPS with longer maturity dates. Mr. Bernstein notes that the current real yield on TIPS is attractive. “It’s about 2.5 percent over the entire yield curve — if you’re 70 years old, a 30-year ladder would be safe enough for most people.” Financial planners can construct these ladders, but building and maintaining them can be a complex chore, Mr. Bernstein acknowledged. “For the average person, it’s probably not appropriate,” he said. More practical options for do-it-yourselfers, he said, include low-cost short-term bond funds or a traditional open-end or ETF TIPS fund. (Examples include the Schwab US TIPS ETF and the Vanguard Inflation-Protected Securities Fund.) Another simple option is the I bond — a type of U.S. Treasury that pays both a fixed rate and another linked to inflation. One downside: There’s a purchase limit of $10,000 per year for an individual, or $15,000 if you buy one using a federal tax refund. Most older Americans are homeowners, and home equity is a source of wealth that can be tapped if inflation takes a substantial bite out of other assets. A Vanguard study found that among people who retire and relocate, about 60 percent sell their homes and move to a less expensive location — and typically unlock about $100,000 of equity. If moving isn’t in the cards for you, reverse mortgages offer another way to make use of home equity, although they have not been especially popular with retirees because of their complexity and high fees. “Housing equity might be an asset that you don’t normally want to tap, but it might be useful for something like a long-term care expense or if you’re finding that inflation is eating into your portfolio substantially,” Mr. Dickson said. "
nyt://article/d32732b8-356d-57bf-9415-06f9e55933e3,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/11/27/arts/design/alice-waters-hammer-museum.html,2021-11-27T20:00:09+0000,article,News,1475,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Museums', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Hammer Museum', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Restaurants', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Lulu (Los Angeles, Calif, Restaurant)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Waters, Alice', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'glocations', 'value': 'Los Angeles (Calif)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"A new restaurant at the Hammer Museum in Los Angeles is the latest effort to try to reach visitors’ hearts through their stomachs. LOS ANGELES — As the Hammer Museum emerges from last year’s pandemic shutdown, it has assembled a lineup of big names that it hopes will draw crowds back to its campus down the street from the University of California, Los Angeles: Cézanne, Manet, Monet, Toulouse-Lautrec. And Waters. That would be Alice Waters, the restaurateur who founded Chez Panisse in Berkeley 50 years ago and went on to help define modern California cuisine. She is lending her name and reputation to Lulu, a new restaurant she has helped open in the courtyard of the Hammer, the first time she has associated herself so closely with a restaurant since opening Chez Panisse. “It will bring people who wouldn’t be museumgoers to the museum,” said Ann Philbin, the executive director of the Hammer, who recruited Ms. Waters for this project. “It is about cross-pollination of audiences.” The Hammer, which is affiliated with U.C.L.A., is the latest in a long line of arts institutions collaborating with big-name chefs in the hopes of expanding their audiences. And Ms. Waters is the latest in a long line of celebrity restaurateurs (for the record, she hates the phrase, preferring the French “restauratrice”) to lend her name to a cultural institution. But as institutions like the Hammer confront the challenges of trying to emerge from the pandemic, these kinds of partnerships, which were once a fun fillip for patrons spending an afternoon at a museum or an evening at a concert hall, are taking on new urgency. These past 20 months have shown that an opera, play or art exhibition can be enjoyed from a living room. Fine dining, on the other hand, cannot be streamed, and museums are seeing the proof of that in the lines of people clamoring for a table at their high-end restaurants. “People have said to me they came because they heard about the restaurant, and when they went through the lobby of the museum, they were excited by what they saw and came back,” said Gary Tinterow, the director of the Museum of Fine Arts, Houston, which opened Le Jardinier, an ambitious, and acclaimed, French restaurant this year with a menu overseen by Alain Verzeroli, a Michelin-starred chef. Gone are the days when museums outsourced restaurants to anodyne food corporations that would serve up bland cafeteria fare — think tuna sandwiches on white, wrapped in plastic. In New York, the restaurateur Danny Meyer opened The Modern in the Museum of Modern Art more than 15 years ago, convinced that high culture and high dining shared some of the same clientele and could operate under the same roof. “At best we are playing a supporting actor role,” Mr. Meyer said in an interview. “But we hope to be a great version of a supporting actor.” Restaurants and entertainment have always been in unspoken competition for discretionary consumer spending. And if statistics are any guide, Americans like to eat well more than they like a trip to the museum, opera, theater or a concert. The average household spent $3,526 at restaurants in 2019, the year before the pandemic, according to the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, about $500 more than they spent on the broad category of entertainment. So it is that these days, one of the first calls for any new museum or concert hall is to a big name restaurateur. Rembrandt is fine; Michelin may be better. At the recently-opened Academy Museum of Motion Pictures in Los Angeles, one of the major draws has been Fanny’s, the ground-floor restaurant run by Bill Chait, one of the biggest food names in Los Angeles, who helped create such popular dining spots as République and Bestia. “It has been packed from the beginning,” said Bill Kramer, the museum’s director. Museum restaurants, once an afterthought tucked into basements or corners, now often have their own separate entrances, so they can operate even when the museum is closed. The Modern, in New York, was a pioneer in that respect, Mr. Meyer recalled. “Before that,’’ he said, “the restaurant was always viewed as an amenity for museum goers only.” Before the pandemic, the Asian Art Museum in San Francisco hired Deuki Hong, a chef with experience at Momofuku Noodle Bar and Jean-Georges in New York, to work with the Boba Guys, a popular San Francisco bubble milk tea purveyor, at the new restaurant Sunday at the Museum. “The Asian Art Museum could have chosen a cafeteria account,” said Andrew Chau, one of the founders of Boba Guys. “They wanted to try something different. Food is culture.” The lunch crowd doubled before the pandemic shutdown, and is now slowly coming back. “We began looking for a new chef for our café as part of our multiyear transformation project in 2017,” said Jay Xu, the executive director of the Asian Art Museum. “Part of that, of course, was to grow our audiences.” Similar collaborations are underway at the Philadelphia Museum of Art and the Music Center in Los Angeles, home of the Walt Disney Concert Hall and the Dorothy Chandler Pavilion. But few stirred as much interest as Alice Waters at the Hammer. For Ms. Waters, who is 77, the decision to venture out of Berkeley is a bit of a reinvention, and a bit of a risk. For all its acclaim, Chez Panisse came under withering criticism in 2019 from Soleil Ho, the food critic for the San Francisco Chronicle, who argued that its approach had become stale. “Chez Panisse has pushed the culinary conversation in this country forward, but then seems to have stood still since then,” she wrote. Ms. Waters seems aware that her reputation cuts both ways. “I don’t want people to have these great expectations,” she said recently over a glass pot of mint tea at Lulu, which is named after the late Lulu Peyraud, a Provençal wine matriarch and cook who had been her mentor. “I want them to know they can always eat something that’s simple and seasonal and delightful.” Ms. Waters conceived the restaurant and recruited David Tanis, a longtime collaborator at Chez Panisse, who writes a monthly column for the Food section of The New York Times, as its chef. She has personally overseen many details, right down to deciding what kind of wood (from a buna tree) should be used for the tables scattered around Lulu’s spacious terrace. Mr. Tanis said they expected most of their initial diners to be museumgoers. But he said that he and Waters were confident that the restaurant, given its aspirations and provenance, would appeal to people across Los Angeles, a city known for its vibrant and adventurous dining scene, as well as to faculty, staff and students from the university, a 10-minute walk away. “People who are coming here as a destination — and people visiting the museum and wanting to have lunch,” he said. “We are not aiming for fine dining. It’s not going to be fancy.” His menu features a $45, three-course fixed price lunch menu that began, in one recent example, with a fennel, radish and arugula salad, followed by a stew of rock cod, Dungeness crab and manila clams, and ended with olive oil walnut cake with pomegranate. Dinner service will begin next year. The restaurant is part of an ambitious renovation project underway at the Hammer, which announced a $180 million capital campaign in 2018 to expand gallery space and build its endowment. Ms. Philbin, who regularly ate at Chez Panisse, turned to Ms. Waters for advice. “I know you know chefs all over the country,” Ms. Philbin recalled telling her. “She came up with two names and said, ‘I’m going to reach out to them and talk to them.’ A couple of weeks later, I got an email from her saying, ‘I didn’t reach out to them yet because I have another idea: I’m thinking maybe me.’ I couldn’t believe it. I was like, are you kidding me?” Ms. Waters had always said no when other museums asked if she might open a restaurant. “It’s a question of my wanting to live a civilized life,” she said. “And that’s not on a plane flying to my restaurant in New York.” This seemed different. Los Angeles is not that far from Berkeley, and she has a daughter who lives here. These collaborations have not always succeeded. An attempt to open a high end restaurant at the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art was abandoned. A Meyer restaurant at the Whitney in New York, Untitled, did not survive the pandemic, and was turned into a café. But they have also become a source of hope for institutions. The Los Angeles Music Center turned to Ray Garcia, the chef at the now-closed Broken Spanish, to open a restaurant at Walt Disney Concert Hall. “A well-known chef will bring more people to the campus,” said Rachel Moore, the Music Center president. Mr. Garcia said the collaboration would be a boon for the center — and the restaurant. “A high tide raises all boats,” he said. “Everyone can win from the exposure.” Adam Nagourney covers West Coast cultural affairs for The Times. He was previously the Los Angeles bureau chief and served eight years as the chief national political correspondent. He is the co-author of “Out for Good,” a history of the modern gay rights movement. More about Adam Nagourney "
nyt://article/e1043d12-2db5-5603-877b-b47a9ab53710,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/12/31/business/economy/tiktok-economic-trends.html,2022-12-31T08:00:17+0000,article,News,1493,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Two Thousand Twenty Two', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Social Media', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'TikTok (ByteDance)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"From Barbiecore to revenge travel, social media trends gave us a clear picture of the forces reshaping the economy. The unemployment rate has hovered at 3.7 percent for months. But it is the TikTok-famous “quiet quitting” and live-tweeted resignations that really explained what was going on in America’s job market in 2022, a moment of renewed worker power and remarkable upheaval. While government data can tell us that the world is rapidly changing three years into the pandemic, internet trends — the ones that took off and the apps we’ve come to rely on — illustrate how people are responding to a new and evolving normal. Negroni sbagliatos catapulted into fame and onto cocktail menus, underlining the fact that people were ready to get back to spending on fancy happy hours. Instagram feeds filled with beach and mountain pictures as “revenge travel” took flight. We collectively learned what “vibe shift” means just as we realized that the economy was experiencing one. Below is a rundown of a few of the year’s more colorful memes and moments — and what they herald for 2023. Between high inflation and years of workplace flux — including pandemic firings, work-from-home burnout and most recently a plodding return to office — the economic status quo seemed like an increasingly bad deal to many Americans in 2022. Beyoncé imprinted the discontent on your favorite music app, releasing an instant hit titled “Break My Soul.” Its lyrics included “And I just quit my job, I’m gonna find new drive,” inspiring the internet to ask whether Queen B was encouraging everyone to join the Great Resignation. In fact, people felt so conflicted about work this year that they needed new words to describe it. The TikTok discourse gave us “quiet quitting,” a trend in which workers do the bare minimum. Then came “career cushioning,” discreetly lining up a backup plan while in your current job. At the same time, employers reported “worker hoarding,” in which they avoided firing people after getting burned by long months in which open jobs far outnumbered applicants. The jobs data made it clear that the labor market was out of balance, but it was social discussion that showed just how much. The Federal Reserve reversed two years of rock-bottom rates this year, raising borrowing costs at the fastest pace in decades in a bid to control rapid inflation. Actual prices have been slow to react, but Reddit wasn’t. Jerome H. Powell, the Fed chair, formerly featured in memes that sported the tagline “money printer go brrrr” and showed him cranking out cheap and easy cash. In 2022, the memes got an update — to Shrek. Today’s memes compare Mr. Powell to the 2001 movie character Lord Farquaad, who famously declared, “Some of you may die, but that is a sacrifice I’m willing to make.” The crankiness on the Reddit discussion boards came as the Fed’s actions cost many investors money. Prominent cryptocurrencies tanked, and asset prices in general swooned, with stocks down about 20 percent from the start of the year. Financial markets are likely to remain on edge into 2023: Inflation is slowing but remains high, and the Fed is poised to raise rates at least slightly more to control it. The memes, in short, are likely to remain grim. TikTok spent part of this year going crazy for butter boards: slabs of the spread covered in flowers, fancy salt, honey or other flavorings. Was this a delayed reaction to the low-fat, no-fat fads of decades past? Evidence that influencers can make us do anything? One thing we can say for sure: It was expensive. That’s because prices for food — and especially for dairy products — have jumped sharply this year. Butter and margarine costs were 34 percent higher in November than 12 months before. Food overall was up 10.6 percent. But as the butter board’s enduring popularity underscored, people buy food even when it is getting costlier. In fact, while retailers reported that some lower-income consumers began pulling back on discretionary purchases and giving priority to necessities, spending in general has been fairly resilient despite a year and a half of rapid price increases and months of Fed rate moves. So far, inflation also remains heady, and it extends well beyond the dairy aisle. A popular price index is still 7.1 percent above its level a year ago, far faster than the typical 2 percent annual pace. Americans continued to shop in 2022, but what they are buying has been undergoing a quiet change. Americans had been snapping up goods like couches and clothing early in the pandemic, but they are now slowly shifting their purchases back toward services. Social media popularized over-the-top fashions in 2022, including “Barbiecore” (very pink, named for the doll and upcoming movie) and “avant apocalypse,” which paid sartorial homage to the coming end days. But another big trend of the year — buying used clothes, #thrifted — may have more accurately captured the year’s changing economic energy. Clothing store sales are slowing down, official data show, and falling outright if you subtract out apparel inflation. As the world reopened and Americans returned to spending on experiences, restaurant tables, in particular, became a hot commodity. Walk-in tables were down 14 percent compared with 2019, while tables with online reservations increased by 24 percent, according to data from the table booking app OpenTable. The figures confirmed what denizens of New York and other cities could tell you (and did, in various media dissections): It was a battle to get a table in 2022 as waitstaff shortages collided with hot diner demand. OpenTable’s data show that happy hour especially surged in 2022. People are dining earlier, and, after years of missed work drinks, this is the overpriced cocktail’s comeback tour. It’s one added reason that Negronis made with Prosecco, popularized by a promotional video for the show “House of the Dragon” on HBO’s TikTok account, are having a moment. It turns out people missed the beach just as much as they missed that 5 o’clock martini. Cue the “revenge travel.” Vacationers made up for pandemic-delayed trips en masse in 2022, and as they splurged on big adventures, air traffic rebounded sharply, getting close to its 2019 levels. Hotel revenues fully recovered. At the same time, some travel-related sectors skated by on extremely thin staffing. Employment in accommodation stands at just 83 percent of its February 2020 level. Air transport employment overall is up, but industry groups have complained of worker shortages in key areas like air traffic control. As hotels, motels and airlines struggled to operate at full capacity, room rates and fares rocketed higher and major disruptions became commonplace. Air travel service complaints were more than 380 percent above their 2019 level as of September, according to the Department of Transportation. The mismatch underscored that key parts of the American economy are struggling to reach a new equilibrium after pandemic-induced tumult, even if people want to be in #vacationmode. In some instances, pandemic trends are colliding with demographic trends — and nothing showed that more clearly than the many wedding photos that filled up Instagram feeds this year. After years of historically few ceremonies leading up to the pandemic, this was probably the biggest year for weddings since 1997, based on data and forecasts compiled by the Wedding Report, a trade publication. You might have noticed a lot of wedding invitations in 2022. It was probably the biggest year for tying the knot since 1997.  Note: Future data represent forecasts Source: The Wedding Report The pop, the combined result of pandemic-delayed nuptials and a big group of marriage-age millennials, translated into booked-up venues and vendors. It has also raised questions about the economic ripple effects: Will those couples have children, sending up birth data, which already ticked up slightly in 2021? Will they buy houses? We could start to find out in 2023. America’s younger generations are doing more than getting married. They have been forming their own households and buying houses in greater numbers since the start of the pandemic. In the process, they have helped to fuel strong demand for houses and popularized interior decorating trends — including “grandmillennial,” also affectionately called “granny chic” on Pinterest, in which the young-ish repurpose floral wallpaper and old-style lamps for a cozy but updated look. But many millennials, who are roughly ages 26 to 41 and in their peak home-buying years, may be losing their shot at becoming real estate influencers. As the Fed lifted interest rates to stifle rapid inflation this year, a wave of would-be homeowners began to find that the combination of heftier mortgage costs and high home prices meant they could not afford to buy. New home sales have declined notably. Fed rates are expected to continue climbing in 2023, which could make for a tough road ahead for a generation struggling to make the leap in homeownership. And after a year of serious economic changes and major policy adjustments, it’s uncertain what is coming next: A recession? A benign inflation cool-down? On the bright side, we will have social trends to help us interpret the data, and occasionally to help us find its lighter side. To quote corn kid, a precocious vegetable lover who ascended to TikTok royalty in 2022: “I can’t imagine a more beautiful thing.” Reporting was contributed by Lora Kelley, Isabella Simonetti, Sapna Maheshwari, Emma Goldberg and Lydia DePillis. Jeanna Smialek writes about the Federal Reserve and the economy for The Times. She previously covered economics at Bloomberg News.  More about Jeanna Smialek "
nyt://article/a7d3e8ef-d104-51c8-a5b9-fd0c9480e76a,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/05/27/business/economy/biden-plan.html,2021-05-27T11:56:31+0000,article,News,1562,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'American Jobs Plan (2021)', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'American Families Plan (2021)', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Taxes (US)', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The president’s plans to invest in infrastructure, education, health care and more would push federal spending to its highest sustained levels since World War II. WASHINGTON — President Biden will propose a $6 trillion budget on Friday that would take the United States to its highest sustained levels of federal spending since World War II as he looks to fund a sweeping economic agenda that includes large new investments in education, transportation and fighting climate change. Documents obtained by The New York Times show that the budget request, the first of Mr. Biden’s presidency, calls for total spending to rise to $8.2 trillion by 2031, with deficits running above $1.3 trillion throughout the next decade. The growth is driven by Mr. Biden’s two-part agenda to upgrade the nation’s infrastructure and substantially expand the social safety net, contained in his American Jobs Plan and American Families Plan, along with other planned increases in discretionary spending. The proposal for the 2022 fiscal year and ensuing decade shows the sweep of Mr. Biden’s ambitions to wield government power to help more Americans attain the comforts of a middle-class life and to lift U.S. industry to better compete globally. The levels of taxation and spending in Mr. Biden’s plans would expand the federal fiscal footprint to levels rarely seen in the postwar era to fund investments that his administration says are crucial to keeping America competitive. That includes money for roads, water pipes, broadband internet, electric vehicle charging stations and advanced manufacturing research. But it also envisions funding for affordable child care, universal prekindergarten and a national paid leave program — initiatives that Republicans have balked at bankrolling. Military spending would also grow, though it would decline as a share of the economy. “Now is the time to build the foundation that we’ve laid, to make bold investments in our families, in our communities, in our nation,” Mr. Biden told a crowd in Cleveland on Thursday. “We know from history that these kinds of investments raise both the floor and the ceiling of an economy for everybody.” Mr. Biden plans to finance his agenda by raising taxes on corporations and high earners, and the documents show budget deficits shrinking in the 2030s. Administration officials have said the jobs and families plans would be fully offset by tax increases over the course of 15 years, which the budget request also anticipates. The documents forecast that Mr. Biden and Congress will allow tax cuts for low- and middle-income Americans, signed into law by President Donald J. Trump in 2017, to expire as scheduled in 2025. Mr. Biden has said he will not raise taxes on people earning less than $400,000 a year. It is possible that he could propose to extend the Trump tax cuts for those earners in a future budget, potentially coupled with additional tax increases on high earners or businesses. While his plan projects additional tax revenue down the line, the United States would run significant deficits as it borrows money to finance his plans. Under Mr. Biden’s proposal, the federal budget deficit would hit $1.8 trillion in 2022, even as the economy rebounds from the pandemic recession to grow at what the administration predicts would be its fastest annual pace since the early 1980s. The deficit would recede slightly in the following years before growing again to nearly $1.6 trillion by 2031. Total debt held by the public would more than exceed the annual value of economic output, rising to 117 percent of the size of the economy in 2031. By 2024, debt as a share of the economy would rise to its highest level in American history, eclipsing a World War II-era record. As a share of U.S. gross domestic product  5 10 15 20 25 30% of G.D.P. ’11  ’21  ’31  ACTUAL CURRENT PROJECTION BIDEN’S BUDGET  5 10 15 20 25 30% of G.D.P. ’11  ’21  ’31   5 10 15 20 25 30% of G.D.P. ’11  ’21  ’31   20 40 60 80 100 120% of G.D.P. ’11  ’21  ’31  Estimates from President Biden's budget proposal come from documents obtained by The New York Times. Historical data and current projections come from the Congressional Budget Office. Republicans warned on Thursday that Mr. Biden’s spending and tax plans would saddle the economy with dangerous levels of debt and accused him of abandoning his pledge not to raise taxes on the middle class. “President Biden’s budget blunder sets us up for an even worse economic recovery than the Obama-Biden record of the slowest in history,” said Representative Kevin Brady of Texas, the top Republican on the Ways and Means Committee. “Lower- and middle-income families are already suffering under the stealth tax of higher prices. Now the president wants their income taxes to go up as well.” Some fiscal hawks also sounded a cautious note, welcoming Mr. Biden’s commitment to paying for new spending but warning that the nation faces daunting fiscal challenges. “This proposal includes significant temporary spending within 10 years that’s paid for over 15 years with permanent revenues,” said Michael Peterson, the chief executive of the Peter G. Peterson Foundation, which supports curbing the national debt over time. “While this certainly projects out more favorably than pure deficit spending, in the end it will only be as fiscally responsible as our future fortitude to actually stop the spending and continue the revenues.” The budget is simply a request to Congress, which must approve federal spending. But with Democrats in control of the House and Senate, Mr. Biden faces some of the best odds of any president in recent history in getting much of his agenda approved. Still, he must find a way to appease moderate Democrats like Senator Joe Manchin III of West Virginia, who has said he would not back as high a corporate tax rate as Mr. Biden’s budget proposes, while not alienating House progressives who have pushed Mr. Biden to spend even more. With Republicans and the White House still far apart on the president’s infrastructure proposal, the president will most likely need to secure votes from every Democrat in the Senate to get his spending plans through. Mr. Biden’s budget, like those proposed by his predecessors, includes assumptions about how the economy will perform if his policies are enacted. But in a break from the recent past, the Biden team is conservative in its forecasts — predicting small gains in economic growth even if Congress approves trillions of dollars in new spending. Mr. Biden’s aides predict that even if his full agenda were enacted, the economy would grow at just under 2 percent per year for most of the decade, after accounting for inflation. That rate is similar to the historically sluggish pace of growth that the nation has averaged over the past 20 years. Unemployment would fall to 4.1 percent by next year — from 6.1 percent today — and remain below 4 percent in the years thereafter. The forecasts continue to show his administration has little fear of rapid inflation breaking out across the economy, despite recent data showing a quick jump in prices as the economy reopens after a year of suppressed activity amid the pandemic. The budget projects that consumer prices will never rise faster than 2.3 percent per year and that the Federal Reserve will only gradually raise interest rates from their rock-bottom levels in the coming years. Mr. Biden has pitched the idea that now is the time, with interest rates low and the nation rebuilding from recession, to make large upfront investments that will be paid for over a longer time horizon. His budget shows interest costs for the federal government remaining below historical averages for the course of the decade. Interest rates are controlled by the Federal Reserve, which is independent of the White House. Even if interest rates stay low, payments on the national debt would consume an increased share of the federal budget. Net interest payments would double, as a share of the economy, from 2022 to 2031. If Mr. Biden’s plans were enacted, the government would spend what amounts to nearly a quarter of the nation’s total economic output every year over the course of the next decade. It would collect tax revenue equal to just under one fifth of the total economy. In each year of Mr. Biden’s budget, the government would spend more as a share of the economy than all but two years since World War II: 2020 and 2021, which were marked by trillions of dollars in federal spending to help people and businesses endure the pandemic-induced recession. By 2028, when Mr. Biden could be finishing a second term in office, the government would be collecting more tax revenue as a share of the economy than at almost any point in the last century; the only other comparable period was the end of President Bill Clinton’s second term, when the economy was roaring and the budget was in surplus. The documents suggest Mr. Biden will not use his budget to propose major additional policies or flesh out plans that the administration has thus far declined to detail. For example, Mr. Biden pledged to overhaul and upgrade the nation’s unemployment insurance system as part of the American Families Plan, but such efforts are not included in his budget. Administration officials have said the budget reflects the policies Mr. Biden has pushed Congress to enact this year and does not rule out future initiatives that are not included in this plan. “What the budget will reflect is that he is going to continue to deliver on his priorities,” Jen Psaki, the White House press secretary, told reporters on Thursday. “And those proposals — the American Jobs Plan, the American Rescue Plan, the American Families Plan — will put us on better financial footing over time.” Mr. Biden’s spending requests also do not include money for a so-called public option for health care, which would allow Americans to choose to enroll in a public health insurance plan like Medicare instead of a private plan. But Mr. Biden will call on Congress to create such a public option as part of his budget proposal, a document obtained by The Times shows. Jim Tankersley is a White House correspondent with a focus on economic policy. He has written for more than a decade in Washington about the decline of opportunity for American workers, and is the author of ""The Riches of This Land: The Untold, True Story of America's Middle Class."" More about Jim Tankersley "
nyt://article/6ca600e0-24b0-5664-adf3-e44c03e14be2,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/07/02/opinion/recession-government-economy.html,2022-07-02T12:24:36+0000,article,Op-Ed,1894,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Recession and Depression', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Inflation (Economics)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Federal Reserve System', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Stimulus (Economic)', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Unemployment Insurance', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Labor and Jobs', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporate Taxes', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Guest Essay Ms. Covert is a journalist who focuses on the economy, with an emphasis on policies that affect workers and families. In the face of rising inflation, the Federal Reserve is trying to cool down the economy, raising interest rates by 0.75 percentage point in June, the biggest increase since 1994. Jerome Powell, the chair of the Federal Reserve, has vowed to try to engineer a “soft landing” — in which demand drops, bringing prices down, without tipping the economy into a recession and throwing hundreds of thousands of Americans out of their jobs. But the Federal Reserve doesn’t have a good track record on pulling off that particular magic trick. Almost every other attempt since the 1950s to reduce inflation by tightening monetary policy has ended in an economic downturn. In congressional testimony late last month, Mr. Powell admitted that a recession was “certainly a possibility.” “A slowing economy,” Wendy Edelberg, the director of the Hamilton Project at the Brookings Institution, told me, “is always, in my mind, at risk of going into a recession. It’s just hard for an economy to slow smoothly and without pain.” Even if the Fed pulls it off, there are plenty of other economic risks that threaten to send us into a recession. The surge in spending that fueled rapid economic growth after the initial pandemic lockdowns stems from pent-up demand created by the combination of Americans staying home and receiving financial assistance from the federal government. But both of those engines are slowing, and with them consumer spending is likely to slow, too — as discretionary spending already has in response to inflation. Not to mention the risks posed by the war in Ukraine and ongoing supply chain snarls. Given everything that is happening, it is quite probable, if not assured, that the country is headed for an economic downturn in the near future. That makes now the time to prepare so that as few Americans as possible suffer. And there are plenty of things lawmakers can do if they are able to find the political will to act. Perhaps the program most obviously in need of changes is unemployment insurance. Congress acted to shore up the program in the early days of the pandemic, expanding benefit eligibility to people typically left out, like tipped restaurant workers and gig workers, adding weeks of benefits and increasing them by $600 a week. Without those emergency actions, however, many Americans would most likely have gotten very little pay for a paltry number of weeks — or been unable to qualify at all. A big problem with unemployment is that it’s not truly one cohesive program, but 53 different ones that vary state to state and territory to territory. “Really, your economic security depends on where you live,” Rebecca Dixon, the executive director of the National Employment Law Project, said. States set their own rules for who qualifies, how big benefits are and how long they last. In Mississippi, for example, maximum benefits are $235 a week, compared with $974 in Massachusetts. Congress should set a robust floor for all of those rules. All states used to offer at least 26 weeks of compensation; that could be mandated and even increased. Benefits have to grow as wages do, or they will fail to offer enough of a stopgap to keep workers from slipping into destitution after losing their jobs. It is crucial to put changes like these in place before a recession so that the program can shield us from financial calamity. But people lose jobs all the time even in a dynamic economy, and they need a baseline of support to turn to until they get back on their feet. “We make temporary stints of unemployment personal financial crises for families in ways that other countries really don’t, and it hurts a lot of people for no real benefit,” said Sharon Parrott, president of the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities. The federal government also has to step in and fund the system better. Right now it’s up to states to raise taxes enough on employers in good times to ensure an adequate fund in bad times, but that’s often a hard sell. “It pits employers and their taxes against working people,” Ms. Dixon said. And, of course, as Ms. Parrott noted, “Employers like low taxes.” Lawmakers often respond by lowering taxes and failing to refresh unemployment funds ahead of the next downturn. “That makes them more reluctant to be more generous when the economy needs the unemployment insurance system to be more generous,” Dr. Edelberg said. The federal government backstops the program, but states have to pay the money back, often leading them to choose between raising taxes and cutting benefits, and many have gone with the latter. If the federal government took over more responsibility for the funding, the incentives would align toward a system adequate enough to support people under all conditions. More federal money could also help states upgrade their outdated technology systems, which kept crashing at the start of the pandemic. Even changes as small as ensuring that the application sites work on mobile phones or having ways for workers to reset their PINs without receiving a new one in the mail could make the system more accessible, especially when thousands of people need to call on it at once. “We really just need to sit down and take a look and fix it,” Ms. Dixon said of the unemployment system. “It’s not working.” Another emergency action Congress took early in the pandemic was expanding eligibility for tax credits to make the health insurance that is available on the Affordable Care Act exchanges more affordable. Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program also stopped kicking people off for fluctuations in income and personal circumstances, contributing to a 23 percent increase in enrollment in both after two years of declines. If those efforts were extended and the government ensured that people could get Medicaid in states that have refused to expand it, fewer people would be at risk of losing access to health care when economic disaster strikes. “You wouldn’t have to come in and try to do quite so much on an emergency basis,” Ms. Parrott said. “You would have an automatic way to shift people into different kinds of coverage during a recession.” And then there are income supports like the child tax credit, which was expanded last year to reach all families up to a certain income threshold and send monthly payments based on their children’s ages. The payments helped reduce poverty and financial instability. They expired at the end of last year, but if they were extended permanently, it would mean that “when a recession hits and many more people have no income, the full credit is available to them,” Ms. Parrott said, keeping their families from falling into poverty. Better still, if it’s an established program that has already enrolled those who are eligible, that makes it easier for Congress to send more money to them in a recession. “It provides a stable and predictable source of income in good times or bad,” said Hilary Hoynes, a professor of economics at the University of California, Berkeley. “It just provides a floor.” One important overarching change would be to mandate that some of these programs respond automatically to changing economic conditions. Turning them into so-called automatic stabilizers, or benefits that kick into higher gear when the economy flatlines without Congress taking any action, would ensure that a robust safety net is available to catch everyone no matter what the overarching political situation is. Food stamps already work this way, to some extent. The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program is an entitlement, which means that as more people experience financial hardship and become eligible, the federal government steps up its spending to make sure they can get benefits. “As your earnings drop down, you automatically gain eligibility, or your benefit increases,” Dr. Hoynes said. Unlike, say, the rigidly block-granted Temporary Assistance for Needy Families cash assistance program, SNAP increases quickly and robustly in a downturn. Still, in both the Great Recession and the pandemic, Congress had to act to increase food stamps to battle such extreme income losses. That could instead be mandated: As the unemployment rate rises, SNAP benefits could automatically increase by certain percentage points. Eligibility restrictions could also automatically loosen to keep families who have suddenly lost income fed while injecting quick stimulus into the economy. Unemployment insurance could automatically add weeks as unemployment shoots up, given that people will be more likely to be out of work longer in a weak economy. The program already has extended benefits that are meant to be triggered by unemployment reaching certain levels in each state, but those levels are set so high that they rarely, if ever, are met. Rental assistance similar to what Congress offered last year could receive an influx of funding when tenants face mass eviction. More federal funding for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families could automatically be sent to states so that they could help more people. Federal aid to state and local governments could flow based on decreases in taxable income that drain their coffers. The important thing is to do these things now, not in the middle of an epic economic meltdown. “It is very, very hard to stand up a program in the middle of a crisis,” Dr. Edelberg noted. During the pandemic, rental assistance took months to actually reach tenants as states scrambled to create portals and programs. The Paycheck Protection Program botched many parts of its rollout. “Putting this infrastructure in place ahead of time is critical,” she said. An adequate response to financial hardship shouldn’t depend on the political alignment of Congress and the White House, but right now it does. Republicans may have been motivated to back the initial rounds of Covid relief because they controlled the Senate and White House and risked shouldering the blame for a poor response. The nature of the crisis was also so widespread and so urgent that it prompted lawmakers to act quickly. Once Republicans were out of power in 2021, however, they refused to vote for any further stimulus. “My worry is that with Congress being so divided, in the next recession they may not be able to agree,” Ms. Dixon said. The barriers standing in the way of congressional action are not hard to see, however. Once a crisis passes, it’s difficult to get lawmakers to focus their limited attention on fixing systems to be ready for the next one. All of the early pandemic enhancements to unemployment insurance, for example, have expired, and reforming the system didn’t even make it into the ultimately doomed Build Back Better package. Lawmakers may enjoy the opportunity to swoop in during hard times and vote to make changes as a way to show they’re being responsive, an opportunity that would diminish if our systems were set up to respond on their own. “Congress wants to be seen as saving the day,” Ms. Dixon said. “But increasingly we run the risk of them not being able to agree on what that looks like, and working people are the ones who will suffer.” Bryce Covert (@brycecovert) is a journalist who focuses on the economy, with an emphasis on policies that affect workers and families. The Times is committed to publishing a diversity of letters to the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are some tips. And here’s our email: letters@nytimes.com. Follow The New York Times Opinion section on Facebook, Twitter (@NYTopinion) and Instagram. "
nyt://article/cf484762-0de7-5e8d-9aee-361428967c8a,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/05/28/business/biden-plan.html,2021-05-28T17:30:29+0000,article,News,1690,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Biden, Joseph R Jr', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Budget (US)', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'National Debt (US)', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Taxes (US)', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Income Tax', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Corporate Taxes', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Democratic Party', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Republican Party', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Economy', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'United States Politics and Government', 'rank': 10, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"The president’s budget envisions a redistribution of wealth that will allow more Americans to enjoy prosperity, buoyed by investments in education, infrastructure and climate-related initiatives. WASHINGTON — President Biden’s $6 trillion budget bets on the power of government to propel workers, families and businesses to new heights of prosperity in a rapidly changing economy, by redistributing income and wealth from high earners and corporations to grow the middle class. The inaugural budget request of Mr. Biden’s presidency reduces spending levels compared to last year, when lawmakers dispensed trillions of dollars to people, businesses and local governments to help them survive the pandemic recession. But it sets the nation on a new and higher spending path, with total federal outlays rising to $8.2 trillion by 2031 and deficits running above $1.3 trillion throughout the next decade. That spending represents an attempt to expand the size and scope of federal engagement in Americans’ daily lives, including guaranteeing two years of prekindergarten and two years of free community college, reducing the costs of child care, granting paid leave for workers, sending monthly government payments to parents and paving the way for electric cars and trucks to take over the nation’s highways and cul-de-sacs. Mr. Biden would borrow trillions over the next decade to fund those programs, swelling the national debt to a record size as a share of the economy, in hopes of putting the country on more solid fiscal footing for decades to come. “The budget is built around a fundamental understanding of how our economy works and why, for too long and for too many, it has not,” Mr. Biden wrote in an introductory message. “It is a budget that reflects the fact that trickle-down economics has never worked, and that the best way to grow our economy is not from the top down, but from the bottom up and the middle out.” To nudge that process along, Mr. Biden unveiled $3.6 trillion in tax increases on wealthy Americans and big corporations, a move Republicans warn would cripple American companies’ ability to compete globally and make it harder for them to tap into growing consumer markets abroad. Administration officials argue that the tax increases would help rebalance the economy to the benefit of businesses and their employees alike. They say workers would be more productive, earning and spending more money, and that government investments in infrastructure and research and development would better position American companies in a global competition with China and others to dominate emerging high-tech industries like advanced battery production. Democrats who have long pushed for higher spending on social programs financed by tax increases on the rich welcomed the budget as a sign of validation. Speaker Nancy Pelosi of California called it “an unequivocal declaration of the value that Democrats place on America’s workers and middle-class families.” Republicans slammed Mr. Biden for wanting to spend too much overall and not enough on national defense: The budget’s proposed increases in military spending of 1.6 percent per year over a decade are lower than its forecast rate of inflation. “President Biden submitted the details of a budget that promises higher taxes, higher prices, crushing debt and less security,” Representative Kevin McCarthy of California, the House Republican leader, said. “It is the most reckless and irresponsible budget proposal in my lifetime.” The White House disagrees and sees the budget as both a collection of Mr. Biden’s ambitious economic proposals from his first months in the White House and a repudiation of former President Donald J. Trump’s policies. The budgets put forth by the previous administration pushed tax cuts, future spending reductions and unfulfilled promises of sustained, accelerated economic growth, while Mr. Biden’s inaugural budget envisions an era of federal taxation and spending previously unseen in the United States outside of periods of war or pandemic. Mr. Trump sought to trim more than $1 trillion in federal spending on Medicaid and Obamacare, and rein in spending on Medicare. In contrast, Mr. Biden’s budget proposes an additional half-trillion in spending for home health workers and federal subsidies for low- and middle-income Americans to buy health insurance. Mr. Biden would spend more than $2 trillion more on domestic discretionary programs, like research and education, than Mr. Trump proposed in his final budget in office. And while Mr. Trump sought to pull back from government action on climate change, Mr. Biden proposes about $1 trillion on climate-related initiatives, including infrastructure improvements meant to accelerate the nation’s transition to an economy powered less by fossil fuels and more by lower-emission energy sources. Mr. Biden also seeks to expand the government safety net in an effort to help Americans — particularly women of all races and men of color — work and earn more, rather than relying on corporate America to funnel higher wages to workers. The budget reflects “the pathways to the middle class,” along with investments in those families already there, the acting director of the White House budget office, Shalanda Young, told reporters. Some of the spending increases Mr. Biden forecasts reflect the growing strains of an aging population on social welfare programs. As more baby boomers retire over the next decade, the budget projects Medicare spending to double and Social Security spending to rise by 75 percent. In other areas, Mr. Biden is pushing what amounts to a permanent increase in the size of the federal footprint on the U.S. economy. Since 1980, annual federal spending has been, on average, about one-fifth the size of the nation’s economic output; under Mr. Biden’s plans, that would grow to close to one-fourth. The federal work force would also grow: The American Federation of Government Employees thanked the president on Friday for proposing “substantial staffing increases to multiple agencies.” That growth would be funded by businesses, high earners and federal borrowing. The budget projects an additional $14.5 trillion would be added to the national debt over the course of the next decade. It also projects a doubling of the amount of tax revenue collected from corporations by 2025, compared with 2020, the year before Mr. Biden took office. But it would take more than a decade for tax revenues to fully cover the costs of Mr. Biden’s agenda. Corporate tax increases would raise $2 trillion over a decade, with nearly half of that revenue coming from higher taxes on money that multinational companies like Microsoft, Procter & Gamble and General Motors earn outside the United States. Tax increases on high earners — those making above $400,000 per year — would raise another $750 billion over the decade. That includes raising the top marginal income tax rate to 39.6 percent from 37 percent for married couples making just over $500,000 a year and individuals making just over $450,000. The proposal also estimates a near-doubling of capital gains tax rates for people earning more than $1 million a year. Revenue from those tax increases would begin reducing deficits by the end of the decade. Yet while Mr. Biden has pledged not to raise taxes on people earning less than $400,000 a year, the budget assumes that tax cuts passed by Republicans in 2017 would expire as scheduled at the end of 2025, which would raise taxes on most Americans. On Friday, administration officials said the president would work with Congress before 2025 to ensure people earning less than $400,000 would not face a tax increase. It was one of several areas in which Mr. Biden’s team chose not to apply traditional budget estimates to his administration’s policy initiatives. In its budget summary, the White House signaled a commitment to a range of major health care proposals, including the creation of a public option health insurance plan; an effort to reduce prescription drug costs; a plan to lower the age of eligibility for Medicare; and an expansion of Medicare benefits, to add vision, hearing and dental coverage. But the administration declined to calculate the costs of those policy changes. Officials also did not estimate costs for an overhaul of the unemployment insurance program that Mr. Biden asked Congress to undertake this year. Those omissions contributed to the mixed reviews Mr. Biden earned from Washington groups that push for fiscal balance and a reduction in the national debt. “We are encouraged that the president continues to offer concrete proposals to pay for his legislative agenda over time, and we strongly support the administration’s insistence on offsetting new spending,” said Maya MacGuineas, president of the Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget. “Yet the president’s budget takes too long to pay for his initiatives and does little to address our high and rising debt, lower health care costs or secure major trust funds headed toward insolvency.” Congress will decide how much, if any, of Mr. Biden’s proposals to write into law. The president has a narrow window of opportunity to push them through. Democrats control the House and the Senate by slim margins. Republicans have balked at Mr. Biden’s plans to raise taxes on high earners and corporations and at much of his spending agenda, though some Senate Republicans are negotiating with the president over a potential deal to invest in physical infrastructure, like roads and bridges. Republicans are incredibly unlikely to support Mr. Biden’s tax increases and the White House’s push will not be helped by the modest economic benefits that his budget estimates his policies will produce. Mr. Biden’s aides anticipate the economy will grow by 5.2 percent this year, slowing to less than 2 percent growth by the end of the decade. But they stressed on Friday that those forecasts, which were completed in February, did not account for all of the plans Mr. Biden has since proposed. They said they expected that the policies Mr. Biden had set forth in the budget would do even more to grow the economy. “When we did the forecast in early February,” said Cecilia Rouse, who leads the White House’s Council of Economic Advisers, “the world looked much different than it does today.” While Mr. Biden tries to court Republicans, Democratic leaders are simultaneously preparing for a possible effort to advance much of Mr. Biden’s agenda through Congress without any Republican support via the budget reconciliation process, which bypasses the 60-vote filibuster threshold in the Senate. Senator Bernie Sanders, independent of Vermont and the chairman of the budget committee, said he planned to hold a hearing on the budget and work “to write and to pass a reconciliation package that builds upon President Biden’s proposal as soon as possible.” Reporting was contributed by Emily Cochrane, Alan Rappeport, Margot Sanger-Katz, Lisa Friedman, Brad Plumer and Christopher Flavelle. Jim Tankersley is a White House correspondent with a focus on economic policy. He has written for more than a decade in Washington about the decline of opportunity for American workers, and is the author of ""The Riches of This Land: The Untold, True Story of America's Middle Class."" More about Jim Tankersley "
nyt://interactive/af44d5f3-9227-553e-8985-d9666ab6122a,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2023/09/26/us/trump-judges-ruling.html,2023-09-27T00:14:11+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,[],consumer discretionary,"A New York judge ruled on Tuesday that Donald J. Trump persistently committed fraud by inflating the value of his assets, and stripped the former president of control over some of his signature New York properties. A PDF version of this document with embedded text is available at the link below: NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

SUPREME COURT OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK NEW YORK COUNTY 

PRESENT: HON. ARTHUR F. ENGORON 

PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, 

- V

Plaintiff, 

Justice 

--X 

DONALD J. TRUMP, DONALD TRUMP JR, ERIC TRUMP, ALLEN WEISSELBERG, JEFFREY MCCONNEY, THE DONALD J. TRUMP REVOCABLE TRUST, THE TRUMP ORGANIZATION, INC., TRUMP ORGANIZATION LLC, DJT HOLDINGS LLC, DJT HOLDINGS MANAGING MEMBER, TRUMP ENDEAVOR 12 LLC, 401 NORTH WABASH VENTURE LLC, TRUMP OLD POST OFFICE LLC, 40 WALL STREET LLC, SEVEN SPRINGS LLC, 

Defendants. 

-X 

PART 

1 of 35 

INDEX NO. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

MOTION DATES 

MOTION SEQ. NO. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

452564/2022 

08/30/2023, 

08/30/2023, 09/05/2023 

DECISION + ORDER ON MOTIONS 

37 

026, 027, 028 

The following e-filed documents, listed by NYSCEF document number (Motion 026) 765, 766, 767, 768, 769, 770, 771, 772, 773, 774, 775, 776, 777, 778, 779, 780, 781, 782, 783, 784, 785, 786, 787, 788, 789, 790, 791, 792, 793, 794, 795, 796, 797, 798, 799, 800, 801, 802, 803, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809, 810, 811, 812, 813, 814, 815, 816, 817, 818, 819, 820, 821, 822, 823, 824, 825, 826, 827, 828, 829, 830, 831, 832, 833, 874, 875, 876, 877, 878, 879, 880, 881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 887, 888, 889, 890, 891, 892, 893, 894, 895, 896, 897, 898, 899, 900, 901, 902, 903, 904, 905, 906, 907, 908, 909, 910, 911, 912, 913, 914, 915, 916, 917, 918, 919, 920, 921, 922, 923, 924, 925, 926, 927, 928, 929, 930, 931, 932, 933, 934, 935, 936, 937, 938, 939, 940, 941, 942, 943, 944, 945, 946, 947, 948, 949, 950, 951, 952, 953, 954, 955, 956, 957, 958, 959, 960, 961, 962, 963, 964, 965, 966, 967, 968, 969, 970, 971, 972, 973, 974, 975, 976, 977, 978, 979, 980, 981, 982, 983, 984, 985, 986, 987, 988, 989, 990, 991, 992, 993, 994, 995, 996, 997, 998, 999, 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1394, 1395, 1396, 1397, 1398, 1399, 1400, 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404, 1405, 1406, 1407, 1408, 1409, 1410, 1411, 1412, 1413, 1414, 1415, 

Page 1 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

1416, 1417, 1418, 1419, 1420, 1421, 1422, 1423, 1424, 1425, 1426, 1427, 1428, 1429, 1430, 1431, 1432, 1433, 1434, 1435, 1436, 1437, 1438, 1439, 1442, 1443, 1444, 1445, 1446, 1447 

were read on this motion for 

PARTIAL SUMMARY JUDGMENT 

The following e-filed documents, listed by NYSCEF document number (Motion 027) 834, 835, 836, 837, 838, 839, 840, 841, 842, 843, 844, 845, 846, 847, 848, 849, 850, 851, 852, 853, 854, 855, 856, 857, 858, 859, 860, 861, 862, 863, 864, 865, 866, 867, 868, 869, 870, 871, 872, 873, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283, 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1295, 1296, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1341, 1474 

were read on this motion for 

SUMMARY JUDGMENT 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 

RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

The following e-filed documents, listed by NYSCEF document number (Motion 028) 1263, 1264, 1265, 1276, 1448, 1449, 1450, 1451, 1452, 1453, 1454, 1455, 1456, 1457, 1458, 1459, 1460, 1461, 1462, 1463, 1464, 1465, 1466, 1467, 1468, 1469, 1470, 1471, 1472, 1473 

were read on this motion for 

SANCTIONS 

Upon the foregoing documents, it is hereby ordered that defendants' motion for summary judgment is denied, plaintiff's motion for partial summary judgment is granted in part, and plaintiff's motion for sanctions is granted in part, all as detailed herein. 

This action arises out of a years-long investigation that plaintiff, the Office of the Attorney General of the State of New York (""OAG""), conducted into certain business practices that defendants engaged in from 2011 through 2021. OAG alleges that the individual and entity defendants committed repeated and persistent fraud by preparing, certifying, and submitting to lenders and insurers false and misleading financial statements, thus violating New York Executive Law § 63(12). 

Procedural Background 

In 2020, OAG commenced a special proceeding seeking to enforce a series of subpoenas against various named defendants and other persons and entities. This Court presided over that proceeding and issued several orders compelling compliance with OAG's subpoenas. See People v The Trump Org., Sup Ct, NY County, Index No. 541685/2020. During that proceeding, OAG and the Trump Organization entered into an agreement, which, broadly speaking, tolled the statute of limitations from November 5, 2020, through May 31, 2022. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1260. 

On November 3, 2022, this Court found preliminarily that defendants had a propensity to engage in persistent fraud by submitting false and misleading Statements of Financial Condition (""SFCS"") on behalf of defendant Donald J. Trump (""Donald Trump""). NYSCEF Doc. No. 183. Accordingly, the Court granted a preliminary injunction against any further fraud and appointed the Hon. Barbara S. Jones (ret.) as an independent monitor to oversee defendants' financial statements and significant asset transfers. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 193 and 194. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

2 of 35 

Page 2 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Defendants moved to dismiss the complaint. In a Decision and Order dated January 6, 2023, this Court denied the motion. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 453. Defendants appealed, resulting in a January 6, 2023 Order wherein the Appellate Division, First Department modified this Court's order to the extent of: (1) declaring that the ""continuing wrong doctrine does not delay or extend [the statute of limitations]""; (2) finding that claims are timely against defendants subject to the tolling agreement if they accrued after July 13, 2014, and timely against defendants not subject to the tolling agreement if they accrued after February 6, 2016; and (3) dismissing the complaint as against defendant Ivanka Trump on statute of limitations grounds, finding that she was not an employee of the Trump Organization at the time at which the parties entered into the tolling agreement. People v Trump, 217 AD3d 609 (1st Dept 2023). 

The Appellate Division declined to dismiss any other defendants or any causes of action. 

Discovery ended on July 28, 2023, and OAG filed a note of issue shortly thereafter. NYSCEF Doc. No. 644. OAG now moves for partial summary judgment on its first cause of action, for fraud under Executive Law § 63(12). NYSCEF Doc. No. 765. Separately, plaintiff now moves, pursuant to 22 NYCRR 130-1.1, to sanction defendants for frivolous motion practice. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1263. Defendants also move for summary judgment, seeking to dismiss the complaint in its entirety. NYSCEF Doc. No. 834. 

Executive Law § 63(12) 

Executive Law § 63(12) provides, as here pertinent, as follows: 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Whenever any person shall engage in repeated fraudulent or illegal acts or otherwise demonstrate persistent fraud or illegality in the carrying on, conducting or transaction of business, the attorney general may apply, in the name of the people of the state of New York, to the supreme court of the state of New York, on notice of five days, for an order enjoining the continuance of such business activity or of any fraudulent or illegal acts, directing restitution and damages and, in an appropriate case, cancelling any certificate filed under and by virtue of the provisions of section four hundred forty of the former penal law or section one hundred thirty of the general business law, and the court may award the relief applied for or so much thereof as it may deem proper. The word ""fraud"" or ""fraudulent"" as used herein shall include any device, scheme or artifice to defraud and any deception, misrepresentation, concealment, suppression, false pretense, false promise or unconscionable contractual provisions. The term ""persistent fraud"" or ""illegality"" as used herein shall include continuance or carrying on of any fraudulent or illegal act or conduct. The term ""repeated"" as used herein shall include repetition of any separate and distinct fraudulent or illegal act, or conduct which affects more than one person. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

3 of 35 

Page 3 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

DEFENDANTS' MOTION FOR SUMMARY JUDGMENT ON ALL CAUSES OF ACTION 

Arguments Defendants Raise Again 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Standing and Capacity to Sue 

Defendants' arguments that OAG has neither capacity nor standing to sue under Executive Law § 63(12), and that the disclaimers of non-party accountants Mazars insulate defendants, invoke the time-loop in the film ""Groundhog Day."" This Court emphatically rejected these arguments in its preliminary injunction decision and in its dismissal decision, and the First Department affirmed both. Defendants' contention that a different procedural posture mandates a reconsideration, or a fortiori, a reversal, is pure sophistry¹. 

As this Court and others have made abundantly clear, ""[i]t is not disputed that the Attorney General is empowered to sue for violations of [Executive Law § 63(12)]."" People v Greenberg, 21 NY3d 439, 446 (2013) (finding Executive Law § 63(12) to be broadly worded anti-fraud device); People v Ford Motor Co., 74 NY2d 495, 502 (1989) (""Executive Law § 63(12) is the procedural route by which the Attorney-General may apply to Supreme Court for an order enjoining repeated illegal or fraudulent acts""). 

Parens Patriae and Consumer Ambit 

Defendants repeat the erroneous argument that the complaint must be dismissed because OAG cannot demonstrate the requirements of a parens patriae action, which is one in the public interest. ""Parens patriae is a common-law standing doctrine that permits the state to commence an action to protect a public interest, like the safety, health or welfare of its citizens."" People v Grasso, 11 NY3d 64, 72 at n 4 (2008). Invocation of such doctrine, or its requirements, is not necessary where, as here, the New York legislature has specifically empowered the Attorney General to bring such an action pursuant to Executive Law § 63(12). People v Credit Suisse Sec. (USA) LLC, 31 NY3d 622, 633 (2018) (“it is undisputed that Executive Law § 63(12) gives the Attorney General standing to redress liabilities recognized elsewhere in the law, expanding the scope of available remedies""); People v Trump Entrepreneur Initiative LLC, 137 AD3d 409, 417 (1st Dept 2016) (""[E]ven apart from prevailing authority, the language of the statute itself appears to authorize a cause of action; like similar statutes that authorize causes of action, § 63(12) defines the fraudulent conduct that it prohibits, authorizes the Attorney General to commence an action or proceeding to foreclose that conduct, and specifies the relief, including equitable relief, that the Attorney General may seek""). 

In any event, even if compliance with the requirements of the parens patriae doctrine is necessary, which it is not, OAG has easily satisfied those requirements, as it is well-settled that ""[i]n varying contexts, courts have held that a state has a quasi-sovereign interest in protecting the integrity of the marketplace."" Grasso at 69 n 4; People v Coventry First LLC, 52 AD3d 345, 346 (1st Dept 2008) (""the claim pursuant to Executive Law § 63(12) constituted proper exercises 

1 

¹ Indeed, the Court made this crystal clear in its January 6, 2023 order when it found: ""Here, the issues of capacity and standing, are pure issues of law and do not depend on a trial of disputed issues of fact. Simply put, who the instant parties are and what the law says, which determine capacity and standing, are not disputed issues of fact that need to be tried."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 453 at 4. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY 

GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

4 of 35 

Page 4 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

of the State's regulation of businesses within its borders in the interest of securing an honest marketplace""); People v Amazon.com, Inc., 550 F Supp 3d 122, 130-131 (SD NY 2021) (""[T]he State's statutory interest under § 63(12) encompasses the prevention of either 'fraudulent or illegal' business activities. Misconduct that is illegal for reasons other than fraud still implicates the government's interests in guaranteeing a marketplace that adheres to standards of fairness...""). 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Defendants' rehashed argument that OAG's complaint must be dismissed because it is not designed to protect consumers is unavailing. New York v Feldman, 210 F Supp 2d 294, 299-300 (SD NY 2002) (""[D]efendants' claim that section 63(12) is limited to consumer protection actions is simply incorrect. The New York Attorney General has repeatedly used section 63(12) to secure relief for persons who are not consumers in cases that are not consumer protection actions""). 

Defendants cite to the trial court decision People v Domino's Pizza, Inc., NY Slip Op 30015(U) (Sup Ct, NY County 2021), which is not binding on this Court, as authority for the proposition that any relief sought here should come in the form of private contract litigation, not ""a law enforcement action under a statute designed to address public harm."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 39. However, Domino's is wholly distinguishable from the instant case. There, the Court found that ""OAG did not establish that Domino's representations to franchisees... were false, deceptive, or misleading. Accordingly, the Court concludes that OAG has not established that Domino's engaged in conduct that 'tends to deceive or creates an atmosphere conducive to fraud."""" Domino's at 26². Here, as discussed infra, OAG demonstrates that defendants repeatedly submitted fraudulent financial documents to obtain financial benefits which otherwise they would not have received. 

Defendants glaringly misrepresent the requirements of an Executive Law § 63(12) cause of action. Citing to People v Northern Leasing Sys., Inc., 70 Misc 3d 256, 267 (Sup Ct, NY County 2021), defendants assert that OAG must show ""the practice is one likely to mislead a reasonable consumer acting reasonably under the circumstances."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 42. However, the word ""consumer"" does not appear anywhere in the referenced decision, and defendants' characterization of its holding is inaccurate³. Northern Leasing confirms that the ""test for fraud under Executive Law § 63(12) is whether an act tends to deceive or creates an environment conducive to fraud."" Northern Leasing at 267 (further holding ""Executive Law § 63(12) expands fraud to encompass new liability, while including non-statutory fraud claims"" and finding that ""[a] claim under Executive Law § 63(12) is the exercise of 'the State's regulation of businesses within its borders in the interest of securing an honest marketplace""""). 

2 As the failure to demonstrate false misrepresentations foreclosed the possibility of liability on that issue in Domino's, any commentary about the statute's requirements was pure dicta. 

3 Although ""consumer"" does appear in the First Department's affirmance of Northern Leasing, it does not advance defendants' proposition that Executive Law § 63(12) actions be consumer oriented; it simply reaffirms that ""the test for fraud is whether the targeted act has the capacity or tendency to deceive, or creates an atmosphere conducive to fraud."" 193 AD3d 67 (1st Dept 2021). The fact that Northern Leasing challenged actions targeted at consumers does not mean that Executive Law § 63(12) is restricted to such actions. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

5 of 35 

Page 5 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Non-Party Disclaimers 

Defendants, yet again, argue that OAG's complaint must be dismissed because the SFCs contain language, provided by non-party accountants Mazars, that indicate that they have not audited or reviewed the accompanying financial statements and therefore cannot express an opinion as to whether the financial statements comply with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (""GAAP""). However, as this Court already ruled, these non-party disclaimers do not insulate defendants from liability, as they plainly state that ""Donald J. Trump is responsible for the preparation and fair presentation of the financial statement in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America and for designing, implementing, and maintaining internal control relevant to the preparation and fair presentation of the financial statement."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 183. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

As this Court explained in its November 3, 2022 Decision and Order: ""[t]he law is abundantly clear that"" using a disclaimer as a defense to a justifiable reliance claim requires proof that: ""(1) the disclaimer is made sufficiently specific to the particular type of fact misrepresented or undisclosed; and (2) the alleged misrepresentations or omissions did not concern facts peculiarly within the [defendant's] knowledge."" Basis Yield Alpha Fund (Master) v Goldman Sachs Grp., Inc., 115 AD3d 128, 137 (1st Dept 2014) (""a [plaintiff] may not be precluded from claiming reliance on misrepresentation of facts peculiarly within the [defendant's] knowledge""); People v Bull Inv. Grp., Inc., 46 AD2d 25, 29 (3d Dept 1974) (""It has been stated that '[t]he rule is clear that where one party to a transaction has superior knowledge, or means of knowledge not open to both parties alike, he is under a legal obligation to speak and his silence constitutes fraud""). As the SFCs did not particularize the type of fact misrepresented or undisclosed and were unquestionably based on information peculiarly within defendants' knowledge, defendants may not rely on such purported disclaimers as a defense. 

In sum, the Mazars disclaimers put the onus for accuracy squarely on defendants' shoulders. 

Scienter and ""Participation"" Requirements 

Defendants erroneously claim that Fletcher v Dakota, Inc, 99 AD3d 43, 49 (1st Dept 2012), stands for the proposition that the purported ""participation element [of a cause of action under Executive Law § 63(12)] is satisfied where the defendant 'directed, controlled, or ratified the decision that led to plaintiff's injury."""" However, Fletcher is not an Executive Law § 63(12) action, it was brought as a corporate tort; accordingly, is not relevant here.4 Executive Law § 63(12) is much more than a mere codification of common law fraud. 

Defendants also incorrectly rely on Abrahami v UPC Const. Co., 224 AD2d 231, 233 (1st Dept 1996), for the proposition that ""[m]erely providing copies of purportedly false financial statements is insufficient."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 55. However, as Abrahami was not brought pursuant to Executive Law § 63(12), its analysis regarding ""intent to deceive"" is irrelevant. Unlike the situation in Abrahami, where an action is brought pursuant to Executive 

4 In fact, had defendants not cut off the beginning of the sentence they cited, it would be evident on its face that such case is legally irrelevant, as the full sentence reads: ""A leading treatise on corporations states that a director may be held individually liable to third parties for a corporate tort if he either participated in the tort or else 'directed, controlled, approved or ratified the decision that led to the plaintiff's injury."""" Fletcher at 49. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY 

GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

6 of 35 

Page 6 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Law § 63(12), ""good faith or lack of fraudulent intent is not in issue."" People v Interstate Tractor Trailer Training, Inc., 66 Misc 2d 678, 682 (Sup Ct, NY County 1971) (holding liability under Executive Law § 63(12) does not require demonstrating an ""intent to defraud""); Trump Entrepreneur Initiative at 417 (""fraud under section 63(12) may be established without proof of scienter or reliance""); Bull Inv. Grp. at 27 (""[i]t is well-settled that the definition of fraud under subdivision 12 of section 63 of the Executive Law is extremely broad and proof of scienter is not necessary""). 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Disgorgement of Profits 

In flagrant disregard of prior orders of this Court and the First Department, defendants repeat the untenable notion that ""disgorgement is unavailable as a matter of law"" in Executive Law § 63(12) actions. NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 70. This is patently false, as defendants are, or certainly should be, aware that the Appellate Division, First Department made it clear in this very case that ""[w]e have already held that the failure to allege losses does not require dismissal of a claim for disgorgement under Executive Law § 63(12)."" Trump, 217 AD3d at 610. 

Defendants nonetheless rely on the trial court decision in People v Direct Revenue, LLC, 19 Misc 3d 1124(A) (Sup Ct, NY County 2008), for the proposition that Executive Law § 63(12) ""do[es] no[t] authorize the general disgorgement of profits received from sources other than the public."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 71-72. However, defendants' neglect to mention that Direct Revenue was superseded, and essentially overruled, in 2016 by the New York Court of Appeals in People v Greenberg, which unequivocally held that ""disgorgement is an available remedy under the Martin Act and the Executive Law."" People v Greenberg, 27 NY3d 490, 497 (2016). 

Also fatally flawed is defendants' reliance on People v Frink Am., Inc., 2 AD3d 1379, 1380 (4th Dept 2003), as it relies on the outdated proposition that Executive Law § 63(12) ""does not create any new causes of action"" and thus, the remedy of disgorgement is unavailable. NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 73-74. However, in Trump Entrepreneur Initiative, in which at least three of the instant defendants were parties, the First Department unambiguously declared that ""the Attorney General is, in fact, authorized to bring a cause of action for fraud under Executive Law § 63(12)."" Trump Entrepreneur Initiative at 418; see also People v Pharmacia Corp., 27 Misc 3d 368, 373 (Sup Ct, NY County 2010) (holding ""Executive Law § 63(12) applies to fraudulent conduct actionable at common law, as well as to conduct for which liability arises solely from the statute""). 

Defendants incorrectly posit that, under People v Ernst & Young, LLP, 114 AD3d 569 (1st Dept 2014), disgorgement is available under the Martin Act but not under Executive Law § 63(12). NYSCEF Doc. No. 836 at 73. This is simply untrue. In Ernst & Young, the First Department specifically held that disgorgement was an available and potentially ""crucial"" remedy in an Executive Law § 63(12) action. Ernst & Young at 570. 

Defendants correctly assert that ""the record is devoid of any evidence of default, breach, late payment, or any complaint of harm"" and argue that as none of the recipients of the subject SFCs ever lodged a complaint with OAG or otherwise claimed damages, disgorgement of profits would be inappropriate. NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 40. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

7 of 35 

Page 7 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

However, that is completely irrelevant. As the Ernst & Young Court noted: 

[W]here, as here, there is a claim based on fraudulent activity, disgorgement may be available as an equitable remedy, notwithstanding the absence of loss to individuals or independent claims for restitution. Disgorgement is distinct from the remedy of restitution because it focuses on the gain to the wrongdoer as opposed to the loss to the victim. Thus, disgorgement aims to deter wrongdoing by preventing the wrongdoer from retaining illgotten gains from fraudulent conduct. Accordingly, the remedy of disgorgement does not require a showing or allegation of direct losses to consumers or the public; the source of the ill-gotten gains is ""immaterial."" 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 

RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Id. (disgorgement is not impermissible penalty ""since the wrongdoer who is deprived of an illicit gain is ideally left in the position he would have been had there been no misconduct"") (internal citations omitted); see also Amazon.com at 130 (""Executive Law § 63(12) authorizes the Attorney General to seek injunctive and other relief"", and finding ""the Attorney General can seek disgorgement of profits on the State's behalf""). 

Sanctionable Conduct for Frivolous Motion Practice 

In response to both OAG's request for a preliminary injunction and to defendants' motions to dismiss, this Court rejected every one of the aforementioned arguments. In rejecting such arguments for the second time, this Court cautioned that ""sophisticated counsel should have known better."" 5 NYSCEF Doc. No. 453 at 5. However, the Court declined to impose sanctions, believing it had ""made its point.” Id. 

Apparently, the point was not received. 

One would not know from reading defendants' papers that this Court has already twice ruled against these arguments, called them frivolous, and twice been affirmed by the First Department. 

""In its discretion, a court may award costs and financial sanctions against an attorney or party resulting from frivolous conduct."" Kamen v Diaz-Kamen, 40 AD3d 937, 937 (2d Dept 2007). See Yan v Klein, 35 AD3d 729, 729-30 (2d Dept 2006) (""The plaintiff, following two prior actions, has continued to press the same patently meritless claims,' most of which are now barred by the doctrines of res judicata and collateral estoppel""). 

Defendants' conduct in reiterating these frivolous arguments is egregious. We are way beyond the point of ""sophisticated counsel should have known better""; we are at the point of intentional and blatant disregard of controlling authority and law of the case. This Court emphatically rejected these arguments, as did the First Department. Defendants' repetition of them here is indefensible. 

5 The Court even went so far as to caution that the ""arguments were borderline frivolous even the first time defendants made them."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 453 at 3. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

8 of 35 

Page 8 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Pursuant to New York Administrative Code § 130-1.1, ""[t]he Court, as appropriate, may make such an award of costs or impose such financial sanctions against either an attorney or a party to the litigation or against both."" The provision further states that: 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

For purposes of this Part, conduct is frivolous if: 

(1) it is completely without merit in law and cannot be supported by a reasonable argument for an extension, modification or reversal of existing law; 

(2) it is undertaken primarily to delay or prolong the resolution of the litigation, or to harass or maliciously injure another; or 

(3) it asserts material factual statements that are false. 

22 NYCRR 130-1.1(c). Defendants' inscrutable persistence in re-presenting these arguments clearly satisfies the first of these three possible criteria. 

When considering imposing sanctions ""[a]mong the factors [the court] is directed to consider is whether the conduct was continued when it became apparent, or should have become apparent, that the conduct was frivolous, or when such was brought to the attention of the parties or to counsel."" Levy v Carol Mgmt. Corp., 260 AD2d 27, 34 (1st Dept 1999) (further finding that sanctions both ""punish past conduct"" and ""they are goal oriented, in that they are useful in deterring future frivolous conduct""). 

In its January 6, 2023 Decision and Order, this Court warned defendants that their ""reiteration of [these previously rejected arguments] scattered across five different motions to dismis[s] was frivolous."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 453 at 3. 

In a last-ditch attempt to stave off sanctions, defendants have submitted an affirmation by the Hon. Leonard B. Austin (ret.), who had a supremely distinguished judicial career, culminating in 12 years on the Appellate Division, Second Department. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1449. Justice Austin presents what is essentially a primer on the interplay between motions to dismiss and motions for summary judgment, and every point of law is valid. 

However, it is wholly invalid as a reason for this Court to deny sanctions. First, legal arguments are for counsel to make, not for experts to submit. ""The rule prohibiting experts from providing their legal opinions or conclusions is 'so well-established that it is often deemed a basic premise or assumption of evidence law-a kind of axiomatic principle."""" In re Initial Pub. Offering Sec. Litig., 174 F Supp 2d 61, 64 (SD NY 2001) (citing Thomas Baker, The Impropriety of Expert Witness Testimony on the Law, 40 U Kan LRev 325, 352 (1992) (precluding ""expert affidavits"" on the law); accord, Note, Expert Legal Testimony, 97 Harv LRev 797, 797 (1984) (""it remains black-letter law that expert legal testimony is not permissible""). Neither defendants nor Justice Austin has sought permission to file an amicus brief. In their own submissions, defendants have expounded on the law of capacity, standing, disclaimers, motions to dismiss, motions for summary judgment, and sanctions. The heft and prestige of a legal lion adds nothing. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

9 of 35 

Page 9 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

More importantly, the subject affirmation utterly fails to fit the specific facts of this case into the general principles it enunciates. In many situations, discovery, and a complete record, and the reversal of the burden of proof, will turn the tide, requiring that a valid complaint be dismissed because there is no evidence to support it. But standing and capacity are legal questions, not factual issues. Crucially, while defendants have, by their own account, conducted extensive discovery and have created a complete record, they fail to point to a single fact that discovery has uncovered, let alone a single fact in the record, that changes the calculus of their denied and doomed capacity and standing arguments. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Capacity and standing are not esoteric concepts. Infants, legally declared incompetents, and persons under certain legal disabilities are not allowed to sue. The New York Attorney General is none of the above. If my sibling or neighbor is harmed, I do not have standing to sue for his or her injury. Citizens may not sue to prevent governmental actions unless they may suffer some personal harm. Executive Law § 63(12) was promulgated to give the Attorney General standing to sue on behalf of the people of New York to prevent or deter the precise type of fraud here at issue. Arguments to the contrary are risible. 

Defendants' arguments that the factual record developed in discovery changed the landscape under which standing should be viewed is legally preposterous. The best that defendants could muster at oral argument was to contend (incorrectly) that plaintiff cannot sue because the subject transactions were between private entities, and nobody lost money. However, that is purely an argument on the merits, not an argument on standing. Taken to its logical extreme, absolutely any time a defendant denies liability, it could move to dismiss on the ground of lack of standing. 

Exacerbating defendants' obstreperous conduct is their continued reliance on bogus arguments, in papers and oral argument. In defendants' world: rent regulated apartments are worth the same as unregulated apartments; restricted land is worth the same as unrestricted land; restrictions can evaporate into thin air; a disclaimer by one party casting responsibility on another party exonerates the other party's lies; the Attorney General of the State of New York does not have capacity to sue or standing to sue (never mind all those cases where the Attorney General has sued successfully) under a statute expressly designed to provide that right; all illegal acts are untimely if they stem from one untimely act; and square footage subjective. 

That is a fantasy world, not the real world. 

There is also a larger context to the sanctions issue. Several defendants are no strangers to sanctions and why courts are sometimes constrained to issue them. In the investigatory special proceeding this Court found Donald Trump in contempt of Court and sanctioned him $10,000 per day for failing to comply with his discovery obligations. This Court lifted the contempt after 11 days. The First Department affirmed the contempt and the fines. People v Trump, 213 AD3d 503, 504 (1st Dept 2023) (""[T]he financial sanction to compel compliance was a proper exercise of the court's discretionary power and was not excessive or otherwise improper, under the particular circumstances""). 

In Donald J. Trump v Hillary R. Clinton, 22-14102-CV-DMM, (""Order on Motion for Indicative Ruling"") (filed September 15, 2023) (SD FL), Judge Donald M. Middlebrooks denied what in 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

10 of 35 

Page 10 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

New York legal parlance would be called ""a motion to reargue,"" pursuant to which Donald Trump asked Judge Middlebrooks to vacate sanctions imposed on him and his legal team totaling close to one million dollars. Judge Middlebrooks wrote, on the first page thereof, that ""Movants acted in bad faith in bringing this lawsuit and that this case exemplifies Mr. Trump's history of 6 Id. abusing the judicial process. 

Unfortunately, sanctions are the only way to impress upon defendants' attorneys the consequences of engaging in repetitive, frivolous motion practice after this Court, affirmed by the Appellate Division, expressly warned them against doing so. Boye v Rubin & Bailin, LLP, 152 AD3d 1, 11 (1st Dept 2017) (""sanctions serve to deter future frivolous conduct"" and their ""goals include preventing the waste of judicial resources, and deterring vexatious litigation and dilatory or malicious litigation tactics""). 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 

RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

It is of no consequence whether the arguments were made at the direction of the clients or sua sponte by the attorneys; counsel are ""ethically obligated to withdraw any baseless and false claims, if not upon [their] own review of the record, certainly by the time [the] Supreme Court advised [them] of this fact."" Boye at 11 (upholding sanctions against attorneys because ""counsel continued to... pursue claims which were completely without merit in law or fact.""); see also Nachbaur v Am. Transit Ins. Co., 300 AD2d 74, 75 (1st Dept 2002) (motion court properly sanctioned attorneys for ""repetitive and meritless motions""); Leventritt v Eckstein, 206 AD2d 313, 314 (1st Dept 1994) (affirming sanctions imposed on attorney for ""repeated pattern of frivolous conduct""); William Stockler & Co. v Heller, 189 AD2d 601, 603 (1st Dept 1993) (affirming sanctions against attorney upon finding ""there was no factual or legal basis for defendant's original cross motion, or for the reargument motion, that both motions were 'totally frivolous' and were submitted 'just really to delay""). Counsel should be the first line of defense against frivolous litigation. 

Accordingly, this Court grants OAG's motion for sanctions, in part, to the extent of sanctioning each of defendants' attorneys who signed their names to the instant legal briefs', in the amount of $7,500 each, to be paid to the Lawyer's Fund for Client Protection of the State of New York no later than 30 days from the date of this Order. 

Arguments Defendants Raise for the First Time 

Summary Judgment Standard 

To prevail on its motion for summary judgment on all causes of action, defendants must first ""make a prima facie showing of entitlement to judgment as a matter of law, tendering sufficient 

6 One factor Judge Middlebrooks considered was Donald Trump's ""disregard for legal principles and precedent."" Id. at 14. In short, Donald Trump, and his lawyers, are not sanctions neophytes. This is not their first rodeo. 

7 The following attorneys signed their names to defendants' instant briefs and are, accordingly, sanctioned $7,500 each: Michael Madaio, Esq. (Habba Madaio & Associates, LLP); Clifford S. Robert, Esq. (Robert & Robert PLLC); Michael Farina Esq. (Robert & Robert PLLC); Christopher M. Kise, Esq., (admitted pro hac vice) (Continental PLLC); and Armen Morian (Morian Law PLLC). 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

11 of 35 

Page 11 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

evidence to eliminate any material issues of fact from the case."" Winegrad v New York Univ. Med. Ctr., 64 NY2d 851, 853 (1985). ""Failure [of the movant] to make such showing requires denial of the motion, regardless of the sufficiency of the opposing papers."" Id. If the defendants make out their prima facie showing, the burden then shifts to plaintiff to offer evidence sufficient to rebut that showing by identifying disputed issues of fact that should go before a trier of fact. 

Defendants strenuously argue throughout their briefs that OAG has not met her burden sufficient to defeat defendants' motion for summary judgment. However, defendants misstate the black letter law applicable to summary judgment, citing to City Dental Servs., P.C. v New York Cent. Mut., 34 Misc 3d 127(A) (App Term 2d, 11th, 13th Jud Dists 2011) for the flatly wrong proposition that ""in order to defeat summary judgment on these claims of predicate illegality, the NYAG must, with respect to each predicate illegality attached, 'establish[] each element of its cause with respect to those causes of action."""" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 62. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Not only does City Dental not stand for that proposition (it merely found that under the circumstances of that case, plaintiff's evidence failed to meet her burden on summary judgment), but the law is well-settled that ""to defeat a motion for summary judgment the opposing party must 'show facts sufficient to require a trial of any issue of fact,"" not make out its own case. Zuckerman v City of New York, 49 NY2d 557, 562 (1980). While OAG must establish each and every element of its cause(s) of action in order to prevail on its own motion for summary judgment, in order to defeat defendants' motion for summary judgment (provided defendants are able to demonstrate a prima facie case) ""an opposing party must 'show facts sufficient to require a trial of any issue of fact."""" Guzman v Strab Const. Corp., 228 AD2d 645, 646 (2d Dept 1996) (""evidentiary facts derived from the documents submitted [in opposition to summary judgment motion] are sufficient to present a triable issue of fact""). 

The ""Worthless Clause"" 

Defendants rely on what they call a ""worthless clause"" set forth in the SFCs under the section entitled ""Basis of Presentation"" that reads, as here pertinent, as follows: 

Assets are stated at their estimated current values and liabilities at their estimated current amounts using various valuation methods. Such valuation methods include, but are not limited to, the use of appraisals, capitalization of anticipated earnings, recent sales and offers, and estimates of current values as determined by Mr. Trump in conjunction with his associates and, in some instances, outside professionals. Considerable judgment is necessary to interpret market data and develop the related estimates of current value. Accordingly, the estimates presented herein are not necessarily indicative of the amount that could be realized upon the disposition of the assets or payment of the related liabilities. The use of different market assumptions and/or estimation methodologies may have a material effect on the estimated current value amounts. 

NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769 at 7; 770 at 7; 771 at 7; 772 at 7; 773 at 7. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

12 of 35 

Page 12 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

In his sworn deposition, Donald Trump spent a lot of time invoking this clause: ""Well, they call it a 'disclaimer.' They call it 'worthless clause' too, because it makes the statement 'worthless."""" NYSCEF Doc. No. 859 at 67. Donald Trump goes on to say that ""I have a clause in there that says, don't believe the statement, go out and do your own work. This statement is 'worthless.' It means nothing."" Id. at 68. Furthermore, Donald Trump implies that he did not consider it important to review the SFCs for accuracy because of the existence of this purported ""worthless clause"": 

OAG: Does this refresh your recollection of the process whereby you would get final review of the Statement of Financial Condition? 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

DJT: Yeah, I think generally. It's interesting. I would say as years went by, I got less and less and then once I became President, I would - if I saw it at all, I'd see it, you know, after it was already done. 

OAG: So in the period - 

DJT: Again, you know, I hate to be boring and tell you this. When you have the worthless clause on a piece of paper and the first - literally the first page you're reading about how this is a worthless statement from the standpoint of your using it as a bank or whatever-whoever may be using it, you tend not to get overly excited about it. I think it had very little impact, if any impact on the banks. 

.... 

OAG: So am I understanding that you didn't particularly care about what was in the Statement of Financial Condition? 

DJT: I didn't get involved in it very much. I felt it was a meaningless document, other than it was almost a list of my properties, with good faith effort of people trying to put some value down. It was a good faith effort. 

Id. at 107-108. Defendants further submit the affidavit and deposition transcript of Robert Unell, who purports to be an expert in commercial real estate, for the proposition that because of ""the worthless clause"" in the SFC, ""no lender relies on these for what it is."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 1030 at 183-184; 1031. 

However, defendants' reliance on these ""worthless"" disclaimers is worthless. The clause does not use the words ""worthless"" or ""useless"" or ""ignore"" or ""disregard"" or any similar words. It does not say, ""the values herein are what I think the properties will be worth in ten or more years."" Indeed, the quoted language uses the word ""current"" no less than five times, and the word ""future"" zero times. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

13 of 35 

Page 13 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Additionally, as discussed supra, a defendant may not rely on a disclaimer for misrepresentation of facts peculiarly within the defendant's knowledge. Basis Yield Alpha Fund at 136. Here, as the valuations of the subject properties are, obviously, peculiarly within defendants' knowledge, their reliance on them is to no avail. 

Furthermore, ""[t]his 'special facts doctrine' applies regardless of the level of sophistication of the parties."" TIAA Glob. Invs. LLC v One Astoria Square LLC, 127 AD3d 75, 87 (1st Dept 2015) (emphasis added) (holding disclaimer does not bar liability for fraud where facts were peculiarly within disclaiming party's knowledge). 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Thus, the ""worthless clause"" does not say what defendants say it says, does not rise to the level of an enforceable disclaimer, and cannot be used to insulate fraud as to facts peculiarly within defendants' knowledge, even vis-à-vis sophisticated recipients. 

The Tolling Agreement 

The First Department has declared that claims are timely against defendants subject to the tolling agreement if they accrued after July 13, 2014, and claims against defendants not subject to the tolling agreement are timely if they accrued after February 6, 2016. Trump, 217 AD3d at 611. Defendants concede that the tolling agreement binds each of the LLC-defendants and the Trump Organization. However, they argue that each of the individual defendants and the Donald J. Trump Revocable Trust (the ""DJT Revocable Trust"") are not bound by the agreement. 

Alan Garten, the Trump Organization's Chief Legal Officer, originally entered into the tolling agreement on behalf of ""the Trump Organization"" on August 27, 2021; the agreement was extended one time by an amendment dated May 3, 2022. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1260. It tolls the statute of limitations for the period from November 5, 2020, through May 31, 2022. Id. at 2. The agreement contains a footnote to the entity ""the Trump Organization"" that reads as follows: 

Id. at 4 n 1. 

As noted in the December 7, 2019 subpoena issued in this investigation to the Trump Organization, the ""Trump Organization"" as used herein includes The Trump Organization, Inc; DJT Holdings LLC; DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC; and any predecessors, successors, present or former parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates, whether direct or indirect; and all directors, officers, partners, employees, agents, contractors, consultants, representatives, and attorneys of the foregoing, and any other Persons associated with or acting on behalf of the foregoing, or acting on behalf of any predecessors, successors, or affiliates of the foregoing. 

Thus, the tolling agreement at issue here binds ""all directors [and] officers"" and ""present or former parents"" of the Trump Organization and its affiliates and subsidiaries. Id. It is undisputed that at the time the tolling agreement was executed, each individual defendant, Donald J. Trump, Donald Trump Jr., Eric Trump, Allen Weisselberg, and Jeffrey McConney, 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

14 of 35 

Page 14 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

were all directors and/or officers of the Trump Organization. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1293 at ¶¶ 673, 680, 696, 710, 736. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 

RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Defendants argue that the non-signatory defendants are not bound by the agreement, citing Highland Crusader Offshore Partners, L.P. v Targeted Delivery Techs. Holdings, Ltd., 184 AD3d 116, 121 (1st Dept 2020), for the ""general principal that only the parties to a contract are bound by its terms."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 27. However, defendants fail to quote the following sentence, which provides that “[a] non-signatory may be bound by a contract under certain limited circumstances."" Highland at 122. See also Oberon Sec., LLC v Titanic Ent. Holdings LLC, 198 AD3d 602, 603 (1st Dept 2021) (non-signatory companies bound by agreement with language defining signatory to include ""all subsidiaries, affiliates, [and] successors""). 

In People v JUUL Labs, Inc., 212 AD3d 414, 417 (1st Dept 2023), in a case involving nearly identical language in a corporate tolling agreement, the First Department recently held that nonsignatory corporate affiliates, officers, and directors were bound by the agreement. Similarly, here all the individual defendants are bound by the instant tolling agreement's terms and may be held liable for any claims that accrued after July 13, 2014. 

Defendants argue that OAG is judicially estopped from asserting that the agreement binds the individual defendants based on statements OAG's counsel made during oral argument in the investigatory special proceeding. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1292 at 26. Specifically, on April 25, 2022, while seeking to hold Donald Trump in contempt for failing to comply with court orders, OAG's counsel stated: ""[t]here is hard prejudice because Donald Trump is not a party to the tolling agreement, that tolling agreement only applies to the Trump Organization."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1041 at 59. 

For judicial estoppel to be applicable: ""First, the party against whom the estoppel is asserted must have argued an inconsistent position in a prior proceeding; and second, the prior inconsistent position must have been adopted by the court in some manner."" Bates v Long Island R. Co., 997 F2d 1028, 1038 (2d Cir 1993). 

Defendants are correct that the first prong is satisfied, in that the statements OAG's counsel made during oral argument are inconsistent with the position OAG is now taking. However, defendants cannot demonstrate that this Court adopted the prior position. Indeed, this Court did not need to, and did not, consider the tolling agreement when it issued its April 26, 2022 Decision and Order finding Donald Trump in contempt. See Ghatani v AGH Realty, LLC, 181 AD3d 909, 911 (2d Dept 2020) (""For the doctrine [of judicial estoppel] to apply, there must be a final determination endorsing the party's inconsistent position in the prior proceeding""). 

This Court has not addressed the tolling agreement until now. Accordingly, defendants cannot demonstrate that this Court adopted OAG's prior inconsistent position. 

8 The substantially similar tolling agreement at issue in Juul can be found under Index No. 452168/2019, NYSCEF Doc. No. 176. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

15 of 35 

Page 15 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Moreover, ""[t]he party asserting estoppel must show with respect to himself: '(1) lack of knowledge of the true facts; (2) reliance upon the conduct of the party estopped; and (3) a prejudicial change in his position."""" BWA Corp. v Alltrans Exp. U.S.A., Inc., 112 AD2d 850, 853 (1st Dept 1985). Here, none of the defendants claim that they changed their positions or courses of conduct in reliance upon the statement of OAG's counsel during oral argument. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Finally, while judicial estoppel may be applied to prohibit inconsistent changes in factual positions, courts have declined to extend the doctrine to changes in legal positions. Seneca Nation of Indians v New York, 26 F Supp 2d 555, 565 (WD NY 1998), affd, 178 F3d 95 (2d Cir 1999) (finding ""[t]here is no legal authority"" for ""broadening of the doctrine"" to ""include seemingly inconsistent legal positions""). Who physically signed the agreement is a question of fact; whom it binds is a question of law. 

Defendants' argument that the DJT Revocable Trust is not bound by the tolling agreement falls flat. In his deposition, Donald Trump affirmed under oath that the assets of the Trump Organization are held in the DJT Revocable Trust, for which he is the sole donor and beneficiary. NYSCEF Doc. No. 859 at 21. Donald Trump also affirmed that at the time the trust was formed, he was the sole trustee and remained the sole trustee until 2017, when defendants Allen Weisselberg and Donald Trump, Jr. became the sole trustees. Id. at 20-24. 

As every beneficiary, donor, and trustee of the DJT Revocable Trust is a defendant bound by the tolling agreement, and as the trust is unquestionably a ""parent"" of the Trump Organization, so too does the tolling agreement bind the DJT Revocable Trust. See People v Leasing Expenses Co. LLC, 199 AD3d 521, 522 (1st Dept 2021) (""It may likewise be inferred that the trustees had knowledge of the activities of the businesses they controlled through the trust mechanism. Hence, under Executive Law § 63(12), the family trusts and trustees may likewise be held liable for the fraud""); see e.g., Kurzman v Graham, 12 Misc 3d 586, 590 (Sup Ct, NY County 2006) (""courts will not allow the owner of assets to evade creditors by placing the property in a trust while retaining a right to revoke the trust""). 

Defendants cite to New York Estates, Powers and Trust Law § 11-1.1(b)(17) for the proposition that only a trustee may bind a trust to an agreement. However, § 11-1.1 (b)(17) does not state this; rather, it states: 

(b) In the absence of contrary or limiting provisions in the court order or decree appointing a fiduciary, or in a subsequent order or decree, or in the will, deed or other instrument, every fiduciary is authorized: 

(17) To execute and deliver agreements, assignments, bills of sale, contracts, deeds, notes, receipts and any other instrument necessary or appropriate for the administration of the estate or trust. 

This provision simply says what a fiduciary is permitted to do in the absence of a contrary provision. It does nothing to advance defendants' argument that only a trustee may bind a trust, 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

16 of 35 

Page 16 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

particularly since defendants fail to cite to any provision of the DJT Revocable Trust restricting who can bind it, as § 11-1.1(b)(17) anticipates. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Moreover, Korn v Korn, 206 AD3d 529, 530 (1st Dept 2022), upon which defendants 

inexplicably rely, is irrelevant to the instant analysis, as that case involved an examination by the court as to whether a fiduciary had a right or duty to negotiate on behalf of an estate pursuant to § 11-1.1(b)(13), not pursuant to § 11-1.1(b)(17), to which defendants cite. 

Finally, ""the Attorney General should not be limited, in [her] duty to protect the public interest, by an... agreement [s]he did not join."" People v Coventry First LLC, 13 NY3d 108, 114 (2009) (holding Attorney General not bound by arbitration agreement when pursuing Executive Law § 63(12) claim and finding ""[s]uch an arrangement between private parties cannot alter the Attorney General's statutory role or the remedies that [s]he is empowered to seek""). 

The tolling agreement was a mutually beneficial and common arrangement pursuant to which OAG agreed to hold off suing, and Alan Garten, on behalf of the Trump Organization, agreed to toll the statute of limitations. All defendants received the benefit of the bargain; OAG held off suing. OAG is entitled to its benefit of the bargain, the tolling of the statute of limitations, for the limited agreed-upon time, as against anyone it could have sued for the matters at issue at the time at which the agreement was executed. OAG clearly did not intend to permit defendants' principals to evade the tolling agreement based on a technicality contrary to the spirit of the agreement and controlling caselaw. 

Statute of Limitations 

As a general rule, statutes of limitation start running when a claim accrues, that is, when it can be sued upon. In arguing that OAG's causes of action are untimely, defendants incorrectly assert that the statute of limitations starts running on the date the parties entered into the subject agreements, or when the loans closed. However, the First Department did not use the word ""closed,"" it used the word ""completed."" Trump, 217 AD3d at 611. Obviously, the transactions were not ""completed"" while the defendants were still obligated to, and did, annually submit current SFCs to comply with the terms of the loan agreements. 

Defendants further assert that any continuing documentation provided after the agreements were entered into, or when the loans closed, is of no consequence if the proceeds were distributed prior to July 2014. NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 18. This argument is unavailing. As OAG asserts, each submission of an SFC after July 13, 2014, constituted a separate fraudulent act. Indeed, each submission of a financial document to a third-party lender or insurer would ""requir[e] a separate exercise of judgment and authority,"" triggering a new claim. Yin Shin Leung Charitable Found. v Seng, 177 AD3d 463, 464 (1st Dept 2019) (finding continuous series of wrongs each of which gave rise to its own claim). 

Defendants mistakenly assert that if a loan agreement was entered into and its proceeds were dispersed prior to the applicable statute of limitations, then a claim arising out of submitting any subsequent contractually required financial documentation is also untimely, irrespective of when that documentation is submitted. Defendants would have this Court apply a bizarre, invented, inverted form of the ""relation back"" doctrine, pursuant to which if one aspect of fraudulent 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

17 of 35 

Page 17 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

business conduct falls outside the statute of limitations, then all subsequent aspects of fraudulent conduct also fall outside the statute, no matter how inextricably intertwined. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Of course, this is contrary to controlling case law, which holds that a cause of action accrues at the time ""when one misrepresents a material fact."" Graubard Mollen Dannett & Horowitz v Moskovitz, 86 NY2d 112, 12 (1995). Moreover, even the plain language of Executive Law § 63(12) states: ""[t]he term 'repeated' as herein shall include repetition of any separate and distinct fraudulent or illegal act"" (emphasis added). Clearly, the submission of each separate fraudulent SFC is a distinct fraudulent act. 

OAG is not challenging the loans, the closings, or the disbursements; it is challenging defendants' submissions of financial documents containing false and misleading information. Thus, any SFC that was submitted after July 13, 2014, falls within the applicable statute of limitations. CW Capital Cobalt VR Ltd. v CW Capital Invs., LLC, 195 AD3d 12, 19-20 (1st Dept 2021) (each instance of wrongful conduct a ""separate, actionable wrong"" giving ""rise to a new claim""). 

Materiality 

It is settled that a standalone cause of action under Executive Law § 63(12) does not require a demonstration of materiality but merely that an ""act has the capacity or tendency to deceive, or creates an atmosphere conducive to fraud."" People v Gen. Elec. Co., 302 AD2d 314, 314-315 (1st Dept 2003) (holding that, unlike GBL § 349, plaintiff need not prove ""the challenged act or practice 'was misleading in a material way""""). 

Although the Domino's court found that ""evidence regarding falsity, materiality, reliance and causation plainly is relevant to determining whether the Attorney General has established that the challenged conduct has the capacity or tendency to deceive, or creates an atmosphere conducive to fraud"" (Domino's at 11), every Appellate Division and the New York Court of Appeals now hold that materiality and scienter are not requirements for liability under § 63(12). 

However, as discussed infra, although materiality is required under the second through seventh causes of action, it is not required under a standalone cause of action under Executive Law § 63(12), the OAG's first cause of action. 

Defendants argue that the SFCs were not materially misleading, claiming, inter alia that: (1) ""[t]here is no such thing as objective value""; (2) ""a substantial difference between valuation in the SOFCs and appraisal, per se, is not evidence of inflated values""; (3) there is nothing improper about using ""fixed assets"" valuations as opposed to using the current market valuation approach; and (4) it was proper to include ""internally developed intangibles, such as the brand premium used in the valuation of President Trump's golf clubs, in personal financial statements."" NYSCEF Doc No. 1292 at 20-23. 

Thus, defendants essentially argue that value is inherently subjective; that because internal brand valuations are in the eye of the beholder (here, Donald Trump), they cannot be overvalued. Defendants argue that ""[n]o bank or underwriter would have reasonably been materially misled by the alleged misstatements or omissions in the SOFCs and other information the Defendants 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

18 of 35 

Page 18 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

made available to their counterparties because no sophisticated counterparty would have considered the SOFCs and other information provided by the Defendants alone as material to extend credit or set an interest rate, or issue an insurance policy or price a risk, without doing their own due diligence."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 45. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Defendants also argue: ""[i]t follows that if the user [of the SFCs] is in possession of the correct information, then the financial statements are not materially misstated."" Id. at 39. Defendants' stance is, practically speaking, that they may submit false SFCs so long as the recipients know, from their own due diligence, that the information is false. 

Accepting defendants' premise would require ignoring decades of controlling authority holding that financial statements and real property valuations are to be judged objectively, not subjectively. FMC Corp. v Unmack, 92 NY2d 179, 191 (1998) (""objectively reasonable conclusion, drawn by a competent and experience appraiser, was based on credible evidence"" that demonstrated ""property was overvalued"") (emphasis added); Assured Guar. Mun. Corp. v DLJ Mortg. Cap. Inc., 44 Misc 3d 1206(A) (Sup Ct, NY County 2014) (“Credit Suisse is reading this as a subjective standard, dependent on Assured's expectations. Credit Suisse is wrong. It is well settled that this is an objective standard""). 

Moreover, courts have long found that ""generally, it is the 'market value' which provides the most reliable valuation for assessment purposes."" Great Atl. & Pac. Tea Co. v Kiernan, 42 NY2d 236, 239 (1977); Consol. Edison Co. of New York v City of New York, 33 AD3d 915, 916 (2d Dept 2007) (""the standard for assessment remains market value""), affd 8 NY3d 591. Beauty may be in the eye of the beholder, but value is in the eye of the marketplace. 

Further, defendants' assertion that the discrepancies between their valuations and the OAG's are immaterial is nonsense. What OAG has established, in many cases by clear, indisputable documentary evidence (as discussed infra), is not a matter of rounding errors or reasonable experts disagreeing. OAG has submitted conclusive evidence that between 2014 and 2021, defendants overvalued the assets reported in the SFCs between 17.27-38.51%; this amounts to a discrepancy of between $812 million and $2.2 billion dollars. NYSCEF Doc. No. 766 at 70. Even in the world of high finance, this Court cannot endorse a proposition that finds a misstatement of at least $812 million dollars to be ""immaterial."" Defendants have failed to identify any authority for the notion that discrepancies of the magnitude demonstrated here could be considered immaterial. 

The Second through Seventh Causes of Action 

The Second, Third, Fourth, Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh causes of action allege violations of Executive Law § 63(12) based on underlying violations of the New York Penal Law prohibiting falsification of business records, issuance of false financial statements, and insurance fraud. 

Liability under New York Penal Law § 175.05 (falsifying business records in the second degree) requires that a person ""[m]akes or causes a false entry in the business records of an enterprise."" 

Liability under New York Penal Law § 175.45 (issuing a false financial statement) requires that a person ""represents in writing that a written instrument purporting to describe a person's financial 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

19 of 35 

Page 19 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

condition or ability to pay as of a prior date is accurate with respect to such person's current financial condition or ability to pay, whereas [that person] knows it is materially inaccurate in that respect."" 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Liability under New York Penal Law § 176.05 (insurance fraud) requires that a person submitted an application for insurance either: (1) knowing that it ""contain[ed] materially false information concerning any fact material thereto""; or (2) ""conceal[ed], for the purpose of misleading, information concerning any fact material thereto."" 

Accordingly, unlike a standalone cause of action under Executive Law § 63(12). the second through seventh causes of action require demonstrating some component of intent and materiality. People v Alamo Rent A Car, Inc., 174 Misc 2d 501, 505 (Sup Ct, NY County 1997) (""As in all other situations requiring mens rea, however, petitioners may prove, by reference to facts and circumstances surrounding the case, that respondents knew that their conduct was unlawful. Moreover, petitioners need not prove respondents acted with an 'evil motive, bad purpose or corrupt design"") (internal citations omitted). 

OAG has demonstrated that there remain, at the very least, disputed issues of fact as to whether defendants violated these statutes, intentionally and materially. Thus, there are issues of fact as to causes of action two through seven that require a trial. 

The Court has considered defendants' remaining arguments and finds them to be unavailing and/or non-dispositive. 

Accordingly, defendants' motion for summary judgment dismissing every cause of action is denied in its entirety. 

OAG'S MOTION FOR PARTIAL SUMMARY JUDGMENT ON ITS FIRST CAUSE OF ACTION 

Summary Judgment Burden on Standalone Executive Law § 63(12) Cause of Action OAG moves for partial summary judgment, seeking to hold defendants liable under OAG's first cause of action, for fraud under Executive Law § 63(12). 

As this Court has noted ad nauseum, Executive Law § 63(12) ""authorizes the Attorney General to bring a special proceeding against any person or business that engages in repeated or persistent fraudulent or illegal conduct, while broadly construing the definition of fraud so as to include acts characterized as dishonest or misleading and eliminating the necessity for proof of an intent to defraud."" People v Apple Health & Sports Club, Ltd., Inc., 206 AD2d 266-267 (1st Dept 1994). 

As OAG's first cause of action, the only one upon which it moves for summary judgment, alleges a standalone violation of Executive Law § 63(12), OAG need only prove: (1) the SFCs were false and misleading; and (2) the defendants repeatedly or persistently used the SFCs to transact business. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

20 of 35 

Page 20 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

This instant action is essentially a ""documents case."" As detailed infra, the documents here clearly contain fraudulent valuations that defendants used in business, satisfying OAG's burden to establish liability as a matter of law against defendants. Defendants' respond that: the documents do not say what they say; that there is no such thing as ""objective"" value; and that, essentially, the Court should not believe its own eyes. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

The defenses Donald Trump attempts to articulate in his sworn deposition are wholly without basis in law or fact. He claims that if the values of the property have gone up in the years since the SFCs were submitted, then the numbers were not inflated at that time (i.e.; ""But you take the 2014 statement, if something is much more valuable now - or, I guess, we'll have to pick a date which was a little short of now. But if something is much more valuable now, then the number that I have down here is a low number""). NYSCEF Doc. No. 1363 at 69-75). He also seems to imply that the numbers cannot be inflated because he could find a ""buyer from Saudi Arabia"" to pay any price he suggests. ¹0 Id. at 30-33, 60-62, 79-80. 

The Trump Tower Triplex 

This Court takes judicial notice that the Trump Tower apartment in which Donald Trump resided for decades (the ""Triplex"") is 10,996 square feet. NYSCEF Doc. No. 816 at 2. Between 20122016, Donald Trump submitted SFCs falsely claiming that the Triplex was 30,000 square feet, resulting in an overvaluation of between $114-207 million dollars. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 782 at Rows 833-834, 1028, 783 at Rows 799-800, 1199, 784 at Rows 843-844, 785 at Rows 882-883, 789 at Row 913, 817. The misrepresentation continued even after defendants received written notification from Forbes that Donald Trump had been overestimating the square footage of the Triplex by a factor of three.¹¹ 

In opposition, defendants absurdly suggest that ""the calculation of square footage is a subjective process that could lead to differing results or opinions based on the method employed to conduct the calculation. ¹2"" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1293 at 20. Well yes, perhaps, if the area is rounded or oddly shaped, it is possible measurements of square footage could come to slightly differing results due to user error. Good-faith measurements could vary by as much as 10-20%, not 200%. 

As Chico Marx, playing Chicolini, says to Margaret Dumont, playing Mrs. Gloria Teasdale, in ""Duck Soup,"" ""well, who ya gonna believe, me or your own eyes?"" 

10 This statement may suggest influence buying more than savvy investing. 

""Three days after receiving a written inquiry from Forbes, Trump Organization Vice President, Amanda Miller, sent an email to Trump Organization Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer, Alan Garten, indicating that she ""spoke to Allen W[eisselberg] re: [Trump World Tower and Trump Tower] - we are going to leave those alone."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 821. Although OAG need not show intent to deceive under a standalone § 63(12) cause of action, this directive to continue to use a grossly inflated number despite clear knowledge it is false demonstrates the repetitive and ongoing nature of defendants' propensity to engage in fraud. 

12 Despite this assertion in their motion papers, counsel for defendants, Christopher Kise, Esq, conceded during oral argument held on September 22, 2023, that square footage is, in fact, an objective number. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

21 of 35 

Page 21 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

A discrepancy of this order of magnitude, by a real estate developer sizing up his own living space of decades, can only be considered fraud. 13 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

OAG unquestionably satisfies its two-prong burden of demonstrating the SFCs from 2012-2016 calculated the value of the Triplex based on a false and misleading square footage, and that some of the defendants repeatedly and persistently used the SFCs to transact business. 

Seven Springs Estate 

Defendant Seven Springs LLC owns over 200 acres of contiguous land in the towns of Bedford, New Castle and North Castle in Westchester County, New York. 

In 2000, non-party the Royal Bank of Pennsylvania appraised the ""as is"" market value of Seven Springs to be $25 million if converted to residential development. NYSCEF Doc. No. 825. In 2006, the same bank performed a new appraisal, which showed Seven Springs had an ""as is"" market value of $30 million. NYSCEF Doc. No. 826. 

In 2012, Seven Springs LLC received another appraisal that estimated a six-lot subdivision on the New Castle portion of the property to have a fair market value of approximately $700,000 per-lot. NYSCEF Doc. No. 829 at 203-206. 

In July 2014, because the Trump Organization was considering donating a conservation easement, it retained Cushman & Wakefield to provide a ""range of value"" of the Seven Springs property. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 830, 831. Cushman & Wakefield's appraiser, David McArdle, analyzed the sale of eight lots in Bedford, six lots in New Castle, and ten lots in North Castle and determined the fair market value for all 24 lots was approximately $30 million. NYSCEF Doc. No. 831, 832. 

Notwithstanding receiving market values from professional appraisals in 2000, 2006, 2012, and 2014 valuing Seven Springs at or below $30 million, Donald Trump's 2011 SFC reported the value to be $261 million, and his 2012, 2013 and 2014 SFCs reported the value to be $291 million. 14 NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769, 770, 771, 772. 

13 In fact, OAG demonstrates that as of 2012, no apartment sold in New York City had ever approached the price at which defendants valued the Triplex, noting that the highest overall sale at that time was $88 million for a Central Park West penthouse. The SFCs valued the Triplex at a staggering $180,000,000$327,000,000 for the years 2012-2016. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1 at 1276. 

14 The statutes of limitations have run for all claims that accrued before July 13, 2014. However, although not actionable by themselves, evidence of fraud that predates July 13, 2014, may still be used as evidence in evaluating OAG's request for permanent injunctive relief, wherein the Court must determine whether there has been ""a showing of a reasonable likelihood of a continuing violation based upon the totality of the circumstances."" People v Greenberg, 27 NY3d 490, 496-97 (2016) (detailing standard for permanent injunctive relief under Executive Law 63(12) and ""reject[ing] defendants' arguments that the Attorney General must show irreparable harm in order to obtain a permanent injunction""). 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

22 of 35 

Page 22 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

In early 2016, Cushman & Wakefield performed another appraisal of Seven Springs, which included the planned development, and determined that as of December 1, 2015, the entire parcel was worth $56.6 million. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 824 at 9; 875; 876. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 

RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Even giving defendants the benefit of the $56.6 million figure as of December 1, 2015, the value submitted on Donald Trump's 2014 SFC was inflated by over 400%. Accordingly, OAG has demonstrated liability for the false 2014 SFC for fraudulently inflating the value of Seven Springs. 

Trump Park Avenue 

Trump Park Avenue is a residential building included as an asset on Donald Trump's SFCs for the years 2011-2021. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779. In 2011, 12 of the unsold residential condominium units were subject to New York City's rent regulation laws. NYSCEF Doc. No. 948 at 3. By 2014, nine units remained subject to rent restrictions. NYSCEF Doc. No. 966. By 2020, six units remained subject to rent restrictions. NYSCEF Doc. No. 971. 

A 2010 appraisal performed by the Oxford Group valued the 12 rent-stabilized units at $750,000 total, or $62,500 per unit. NYSCEF Doc. No. 952. A 2020 appraisal performed by Newmark Knight Frank valued the six units that remained subject to stabilization at $22,800,090 total, or $3,800,315 per unit. NYSCEF Doc. No. 972. 

Notwithstanding, for the years 2014-2021, the Trump Organization submitted SFCs that valued these rent-restricted units as if they were unencumbered, inflating the value of each unit between as much 700% (in 2014) and 64% (in 2021). NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 772-779. 

In an unsuccessful attempt to rebut OAG's prima facie demonstration, defendants proffer that the units are not overvalued because ""the rent-stabilized units have the potential at some point in the future to be converted into unencumbered (by rent stabilization) units.""15 NYSCEF Doc. No. 1292 at 57. They further concede that ""[t]his is the assumption the owner made when assessing potential asset pricing or value."" Id. 

15 As every New Yorker knows, rent regulated units may be passed on from one generation to the next in perpetuity. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

23 of 35 

Page 23 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

However, the SFCs are required to state ""current"" values, not ""someday, maybe"" values. At the time defendants provided the subject SFCs to third parties they unquestionably falsely inflated the value of the units based on a false premise that they were unrestricted. ¹6 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

40 Wall Street 

The Trump Organization, through defendant 40 Wall Street LLC, owns a ground lease at 40 Wall Street and pays ground rent to the landowner. 

In 2010, Cushman & Wakefield appraised the Trump Organization's interest in 40 Wall Street at $200 million. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 878-79. Cushman & Wakefield appraised again in 2011 and 2012, reaching valuations of between $200 and $220 million. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 881-82. The Trump Organization possessed and was familiar with these appraisals. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 817 at 135-138; 883. 

Despite these appraisals, the 2011 and 2012 SFCs valued the Trump Organization's interest in the property at $524.7 million and $527.2 million, respectively, an overvaluation of more than $300 million each year. 17 NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769, 770. 

In 2015, Cushman & Wakefield once again appraised the property, and valued it at $540 million.¹8 NYSCEF Doc. No. 887. Notwithstanding this appraised value, the 2015 SFC listed the value of 40 Wall Street at $735.4 million.¹9 NYSCEF Doc. No. 773. 

16 Mazars accountant Donald Bender testified that when he asked Jeffrey McConney, ""Do you have any other appraisals?"", Jeffrey McConney stated ""I have nothing else,"" demonstrating an intent to conceal or mislead the accountants. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1262 at 243. 

Further, Patrick Birney, a Trump Organization employee working directly under Jeffrey McConney, conceded that the Trump Organization maintained a spreadsheet for day-to-day operations on the Trump Park Avenue offering plan that included both the offering plan prices and the current market values, but that the Trump Organization concealed its own actual market estimates from Mazars by omitting the market value column in its spreadsheet and providing Mazars with only the offering plan prices. NYSCEF Doc. No. 946. 

17 Although any liability arising out of the submission of the 2011 and 2012 SFCs is time barred; as previously discussed, these submissions may be considered as evidence in support of OAG's request for injunctive relief. 

18 OAG plausibly asserts that this $540 million is also inflated; however, for purposes of this motion, OAG does not dispute the number, and argues that, even if the Court were to accept defendants' number as accurate, the 2015 SFC was still materially false, as it stated the value as nearly $200 million more than the $540 million appraisal. NYSCEF Doc. No. 766 at n 7. 

19 An email exchange dated August 4, 2014, between Allen Weisselberg and his son, Jack Weisselberg, a Ladder Capital employee, discusses the 2015 $540 million Cushman & Wakefield appraisal. NYSCEF Doc. No. 888. Notwithstanding direct knowledge of it, the 2015 SFC valued 40 Wall Street at nearly $200 million more. NYSCEF Doc. No. 773. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

24 of 35 

Page 24 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Defendants assert that overvaluations of two hundred million dollars are immaterial, as the ""NYAG has produced no evidence to suggest... that Ladder Capital would have been uncomfortable allowing President Trump to guarantee the 40 Wall Street Loan if his net worth was only $1.9 billion, as the NYAG contends."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 835 at 48. They further emphasize that ""Ladder Capital has received in excess of $40 million in interest and 40 Wall Street LLC has never defaulted under the Loan.""20 Id. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Defendants' argument misses the mark. As has been explained to defendants many times, in many legal proceedings, and in painstaking detail, ""where, as here, there is a claim based on fraudulent activity [under Executive Law 63(12)], disgorgement may be available as an equitable remedy, notwithstanding the absence of loss to individuals or independent claims for restitution."" Ernst & Young at 569 (emphasis added). Accordingly, it is not significant that the banks made money (or did not lose money)2¹, or that they would have done business with the Trump Organization notwithstanding. The law is clear that the only requirements for liability to attach under a standalone Executive Law § 63(12) cause of action are (1) a finding that the SFCs were false and misleading; and (2) that defendants repeatedly or persistently used the SFCs to conduct business. 

Accordingly, OAG has demonstrated liability for the false valuation of 40 Wall Street in the 2015 SFC. 

Mar-a-Lago 

Donald Trump purchased Mar-a-Lago in 1985. In 1993, he sought, and obtained, permission from the Town of Palm Beach to turn the property into a social club (NYSCEF Doc. No. 900), and on August 10, 1993, he entered into a “Declaration of Use Agreement"" by which he agreed ""the use of Land shall be for a private social club"" and that ""[a]ny additional uses of the Land shall be subject to approval by the applicable governmental authority including but not limited to the Town Council of the Town, the Landmarks Preservation Commission of the Town, the Architectural Review Commission of the Town, Palm Beach County, the State of Florida, the United States Government, and/or any agencies under the foregoing governmental authorities."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 915. 

In 1995, Donald Trump signed a ""Deed of Conservation and Preservation Easement"" in which he gave up his right to use Mar-a-Lago for any purpose other than as a social club (the ""1995 Deed""). NYSCEF Doc. No. 901. In 2002, Donald Trump signed a ""Deed of Development Rights."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 902. As part of granting a conversation easement to the National 

20 The defendant borrowers did not default on any loans; but we only know that with hindsight. Markets are volatile, and borrowers come in all shapes and sizes. The next borrower, or the one after that, might default, and if its SFCs are false, the lender might unfairly be left holding the bag. This will distort the lending marketplace and deprive other potential borrowers of the opportunity to obtain loans and create wealth. 

21 The subject loans made the banks lots of money; but the fraudulent SFCs cost the banks lots of money. The less collateral for a loan, the riskier it is, and a first principal of loan accounting is that as risk rises, so do interest rates. Thus, accurate SFCs would have allowed the lenders to make even more money than they did. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

25 of 35 

Page 25 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Trust for Historic Preservation, Donald Trump agreed that ""Trump intend[s] to forever extinguish [his] right to develop or use the Property for any purpose other than club use"" (the ""2002 Deed""). The 2002 Deed also specifically ""limits changes to the Property including, without limitation, the division or subdivision of the Property for any purpose, including use as single family homes, the interior renovation of the mansion, which may be necessary and desirable for the sale of the Property as a single family residential estate, the construction of new buildings and the obstruction of open vistas."" Id. In exchange for granting the easement, Mar-aLago was taxed at a significantly lower rate (the club rate) than it otherwise would have been (the private home rate). NYSCEF Doc. No. 903. 

From 2011-2021, the Palm Beach County Assessor appraised the market value of Mar-a-Lago at between $18 million and $27.6 million. NYSCEF Doc. No. 905. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Notwithstanding, the SFCs' values do not reflect these land use restrictions. Donald Trump's SFCs for 2011-2021 value Mar-a-Lago at between $426,529,614 million and $612,110,496, an overvaluation of at least 2,300%, compared to the assessor's appraisal. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779. 

In an attempt to rebut the OAG's demonstration, defendants rely on the opinion affidavit of Lawrence Moens, who they purport is ""the most accomplished and knowledgeable ultra-high net worth real estate broker in Palm Beach, Florida."" 22 Moens claims that ""the SOFC were and are appropriate and indeed conservative."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1292 at 35-36 (emphasis added). The Moens' affidavit states in a conclusory fashion that because he believes ""this unique property offers to an elite purchaser the unparalleled opportunity to own an exclusive and extensive family compound in the most desirable sections of Palm Beach... the valuations in the SOFC were reasonable and below my estimate for the market value of the property each year."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1435. Moreover, Moens opines that ""[i]f Mar-A-Lago was available for sale, I am confident that in short order, I would be in a position to produce a ready, willing and able buyer who would have interest in securing the property for their personal use as a residence, or even, their own club."" Id. at 29. Critically, Moens does not opine at what price he is ""confident"" he could find a buyer (although he opines separately, without relying on any objective evidence, that he believes that as of 2023 the property is worth $1.51 billion 23). 

It is well-settled that: ""[w]here the expert's ultimate assertions are speculative or unsupported by any evidentiary foundation, however, the opinion should be given no probative force and is insufficient to withstand summary judgment."" Diaz v New York Downtown Hosp., 99 NY2d 542, 544 (2002); see also Gardner v Ethier, 173 AD2d 1002, 1003-4 (3d Dept 1991) (""the expert 

22 

At oral argument, his domain of expertise was enlarged to nationwide status. 

23 In his sworn deposition, when asked ""[w]ho were the dozen or so [qualified] buyers that you were referencing in your report, Lawrence Moens replied: ""I could dream up anyone from Elon Musk to Bill Gates and everyone in between. Kings, emperors, heads of state. But with net worths in the multiple billions. I don't know how many people in the world have a net worth of more than $10 billion, but I think it's quite a number. There are a lot."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1428 at 184-185. Obviously, this Court cannot consider an ""expert affidavit"" that is based on unexplained and unsubstantiated ""dream[s]."" 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

26 of 35 

Page 26 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

affidavit is also inadmissible because it is conclusory and the views are apparently based to a great extent on hearsay statements from unspecified witnesses as well as upon speculations on the part of the expert""). Accordingly, defendants' reliance on the Moens affidavit is unpersuasive and certainly insufficient to rebut OAG's prima face case. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Defendants further imply that they may ignore the plain language of the 2002 Deed restrictions because they would likely be able to use the Florida judicial system to get out of their contractual requirements; they further assert that because they may successfully breach their contract in the future, they were not required to consider the restrictions of the 2002 Deed when valuing the property. NYSCEF Doc. 1292 at 48-51. This argument is wholly without merit. At the time in which the defendants submitted the SFCs, the restrictions were in effect, and any valuations represented to third-parties must have incorporated those restrictions; failure to do so is fraud. Assets values that disregard applicable legal restrictions are by definition materially false and misleading. 

Accordingly, OAG has demonstrated liability for the false valuation of Mar-a-Lago as appears in the SFCs from 2014-2021. 

Aberdeen 

The Trump Organization owns a golf course located in Aberdeen, Scotland (""Aberdeen""). The value assigned to Aberdeen was comprised of two parts: a value for the golf course and a value for the development of the non-golf course property, the latter of which is the focus here. Developing any of the non-golf course property required that the local Scottish authorities approve any proposed plans. 

From 2011-2014, Donald Trump's SFC reported that he had ""received outline planning permission [from local Scottish authorities] in December 2008 for... a residential village consisting of 950 holiday homes and 500 single family residences and 36 golf villas."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-776. 

The Trump Organization had ""outline planning permission"" to build a total of 1,486 homes. Notwithstanding, the 2014-2018 SFCs valuations of Aberdeen assumed the Trump Organization had received approval to build 2,500 homes, despite never having received such approval. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 772-776, 907. 

Additionally, the approval of the 950 holiday homes and 36 golf villas came with severe restrictions on their use: they could be used solely as rental properties and could be rented for no more than 12 weeks in any calendar year. NYSCEF Doc. No. 908 at 13. The Trump Organization submitted financial documentation to the local Scottish authorities representing that these short-term rentals would not be profitable and therefore would not add any value to Aberdeen. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 909 at 36, 910 at 7. Consequently, the only profitable development of Aberdeen would have been the 500 single family residences. In July 2017, nonparty Ryden LLP, acting on behalf of the Trump Organization, prepared a development appraisal for Aberdeen wherein it assessed the profit from developing 557 homes and estimated profits in the range of £16,525,000-£18,546,000. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1231 at 10. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

27 of 35 

Page 27 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

In May 2018, the Trump Organization applied to the Aberdeen City Council to reduce the scope of the development project to 550 dwellings, consisting of 500 private residences, 50 leisure/resorts units, and zero holiday homes (having determined they were not profitable). NYSCEF Doc. No. 911. In September 2019, the Aberdeen City Council approved the proposal for a reduction in the proposed development, but restricted the 50 leisure/resort units, as they had the holiday homes, to be ""occupied on a holiday letting or fractional ownership basis only and for no other purposes whatsoever including use as a permanent residential unit...."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 907 at 7. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Notwithstanding, the 2019 SFC, finalized a month after the latest approval, derived a value based on the assumption that 2,035 private residential homes could be developed. Adjusting the values to reflect the permissible 500 private residences reduces the value of the Aberdeen undeveloped property as reflected in the 2019 SFC by £164,196.704. NYSCEF Doc. No. 777 at 16, 789 at Cells G561-619, 912. 

Although defendants wholly fail to address Aberdeen in any of their three memos of law, in their response to OAG's statement of material facts, they state that ""Defendants dispute the veracity of the appraisal because President Trump, as a land developer, took optimistic views of potential future value which is not contemplated in the appraisal, thereby undervaluing Trump Aberdeen.” NYSCEF Doc. No. 1293 at 82-83. For all the reasons discussed supra, this defense fails. 

Accordingly, OAG has demonstrated liability for the false valuation of Aberdeen as appears in the SFCs from 2014-2019. 

US Golf Clubs 

Donald Trump owns or leases a number of golf clubs across the United States and abroad that are included as assets on his SFCs. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779. The value for these golf clubs is provided in the aggregate in the SFCs, although supporting accounting spreadsheets evidence the breakdown of the values assigned to each club. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 781-791. 

The ""Trump Brand Premium"" 

The evidence indicates that for the years 2013-2020, the SFCs relied on values that included a 15% or 30% ""premium"" based on the ""Trump brand"" for the following seven golf clubs: Trump National Golf Course (""TNGC"") Jupiter, TNGC LA, TNGC Colts Neck, TNGC Philadelphia, TNGC DC, TNGC Charlotte, and TNGC Hudson Valley. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 783-790. However, the SFCs for those years (and, indeed, all the years before this Court), also contained express language stating: ""The goodwill attached to the Trump name has significant value that has not been reflected in the preparation of this financial statement."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779 (emphasis added). Accordingly, the SFCs ""double dip,"" both purporting not to include a brand premium while simultaneously including one of 15% or 30%. 

In opposition, defendants submit the affidavit of Eli Bartov, an accounting professor at New York University, who distinguishes between overall brand value and brand value ascribed to individual golf courses. His point, ensconced in numerous lines of academic jargon, seems to be that defendants said that they were eschewing the former and opting only for the latter. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1378 at 14-15. This is a red herring and factually incorrect. The SFCs 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

28 of 35 

Page 28 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

clearly state that they do not include a brand value for any of the properties included in the SFCs; indeed, the SFCs emphatically declare that ""[t]he goodwill attached to the Trump name has significant financial value that has not been reflected in the preparation of this financial statement."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779 (emphasis added). Perhaps Donald Trump could have ascribed a brand value to golf courses that he viewed as ""special,"" but he was obligated to disclose those exceptions when he represented that the SFCs did not reflect his brand value. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

TNGC Briarcliff and TNGC LA 

The valuations of TNGC Briarcliff and TNGC LA were each comprised of a value for the golf course and a value for the undeveloped land. As the Trump Organization was considering donating a conservation easement over both properties, they had both properties appraised. 

An April 2014 appraisal valued the golf club portion of TNGC Briarcliff at $16,500,000; later that same year, Donald Trump valued the golf club portion of TNGC Briarcliff at $73,430,217, an inflation of more than 300%, in his SFC. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 923 at 147; 785 at Row 257. A 2015 appraisal valued the golf club portion of TNGC LA at $16,000,000 as of December 26, 2014; the 2015 SFC valued the golf club portion of TNGC LA at $56,615,895, an inflation of more than 200%. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 924 at 151; 785 at Row 386. 

In an attempt to rebut this strong showing of fraud, defendants argue that they were not obligated to use market value, but, instead, were permitted to use the ""fixed assets"" approach to valuation, pursuant to which defendants may ""value"" a property by aggregating the money spent to acquire and maintain a property. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1292. They further rely on the Bartov affidavit, which states, in wholly conclusory fashion that: ""[t]he assertion that 'Using fixed assets approach does not present the golf clubs at their estimated current value because the approach ignores market conditions and the behavior of informed buyers and sellers' is unsubstantiated and false."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1378 at 29. 

Bartov is incorrect. Each of the corresponding SFCs include representations that ""[a]ssets are stated at their estimated current values..."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779.24 Accordingly, it is false and misleading to use a fixed-assets evaluation, which is completely different. The price for which you purchase property is not necessarily the price for which you can sell it. The latter, not the former, matters to lenders who want adequate collateral. 

The Membership Liabilities 

As part of the purchase of several of the golf club properties, Donald Trump agreed to assume the obligation to pay back refundable non-interest-bearing long-term membership deposits. However, notwithstanding that these liabilities must be satisfied in the future, the SFCs from 2012-2021 value them at $0. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779. This is false; they are a liability in the millions of dollars. 

24 In their response to OAG's statement of material facts, defendants concede that ""GAAP defines Estimated Current Value as 'the amount at which the item could be exchanged between a buyer and seller, each of whom is well informed and willing, and neither of whom is compelled to buy or sell."" NYSCEF Doc No. 1293 at 17. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

29 of 35 

Page 29 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

However, the SFCs all state: ""The fact that Mr. Trump will have the use of these funds for that period without cost and that the source of repayment will most likely be a replacement membership has led him to value this liability at zero."" See e.g., NYCSCEF Doc. No. 772. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Although it was false to report the membership liabilities as $0, it was not, under the circumstances, misleading, as the SFCs state that the reason for so doing. Accordingly, OAG cannot prevail on liability as a result of the failure to report the membership liabilities. 

Yet, as discussed supra, OAG has demonstrated liability for submitting fraudulent SFCs in 20142020 that falsely value the aforementioned US Golf Clubs based on undisclosed brand premiums and failure to report ""current"" values. 

Vornado Partnership Properties 

Donald Trump has a 30% limited partnership interest with non-party Vornado Realty Trust in entities that own office buildings in New York City (at 1290 Avenue of the Americas, hereinafter ""1290 AOA"") and San Francisco at 555 California Street. 

Cash/Liquid Classification 

Donald Trump's 30% limited partnership stake does not permit him to use or withdraw funds held by the partnerships. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 916, 917. Notwithstanding, Donald Trump and his trustees classified his 30% interest in the Vornado partnership as a liquid/cash asset on his SFCs for the years 2013-2021. NYSCEF Doc. No. 771-779. This was even though it is ""undisputed"" by defendants that Donald Trump does not have ""the right to use or withdraw [these] funds."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 1293 at ¶387-388. 

Defendants assert that ""[e]ven if the cash held in the partnership was misclassified and should have been reported elsewhere on the SOFCs as an asset (e.g., in the value of the partnership interest), it would not have inflated the total value of cash or President Trump's net worth reported on the SOFCs."" NYSCEF Doc No. 1292 at 39. 

This argument does not hold any water. Put simply, it was false and misleading for defendants to indicate that it had access to between $14,221,800 and $93,126,589 in liquid assets, sometimes nearly a third of the total cash it claimed, when in fact those assets were completely illiquid. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1293 ¶ 403. 

The Appraisals 

Cushman & Wakefield appraised the value of 1290 AOA at $2 billion as of November 1, 2012, and $2.3 billion as of November 1, 2016. NYSCEF Doc. No. 919 at 5-6. 

However, Donald Trump's 2014 SFC calculated his 30% share based on a purported value of $3,078,338,462; his 2015 SFC was based on a purported value of $2,985,819,936; and his 2016 SFC was based on a purported value of $3,055,000,000. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 784 at Rows 709715, 785 at Rows 748-755, 785 at Rows 779-784. This resulted in overvaluations of Donald Trump's 30% interest in 1290 AOA of between $205-$233 million dollars for those years. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

30 of 35 

Page 30 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

CBRE appraised 1290 AOA and determined its value at $2 billion as of October 7, 2021. NYSCEF Doc. No. 947. Nonetheless, the 2021 SFC was calculated based upon a purported value of $2,574,813,800, an overvaluation of Donald Trump's 30% share by $172 million dollars. NYSCEF Doc. No. 791 at Row 918. 

The instant motions do not task this Court with determining which appraisals are the most accurate, which would present issues of fact.25 Rather, time and time again, the Court is not comparing one appraisal to another; it is comparing an independent professional appraisal to a pie-in-the-sky dream of concocted potential. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Accordingly, OAG has demonstrated liability for submitting fraudulent SFCs overvaluing Donald Trump's interest in the Vornado partnership in 2014-2016 and 2021. 

Licensing Deals 

Each of Donald Trump's SFCs from 2011-2021 has an asset category entitled ""Real Estate Licensing Deals,"" which the SFC represents is value derived from ""associations with others for the purpose of developing and managing properties"" and the ""cash flow that is expected to be derived... from these associations as their potential is realized."" NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 769-779. The SFCs further state that ""[i]n preparing [these] assessment[s], Mr. Trump and his management considered only situations which have evolved to the point where signed arrangements with the other parties exist and fees and other compensation which he will earn are reasonably quantifiable."" Id. 

Despite this express language, the SFCs from 2014-2018 and 2020-2021 include valuations of intra-organization deals, all between entities under the Trump Organization umbrella, in this category of assets. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 1014, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1062, 1063, 1064. It was flatly false and misleading to include values of deals between Trump Organization entities while expressly representing in the SFCs that such assets included only valuations derived from ""association with others."" Improperly including these intra-organization deals resulted in an overvaluation of up to $224 million in 2014, $110 million in 2015, $120 million in 2016, $113 million in 2017, $115 million in 2018, $97 million in 2020, and $106 million in 2021. Id. 

OAG has demonstrated liability for the false and misleading valuation of intra-company licensing deals on the SFCs from 2014-2018 and 2020-2021. 

The Other Loans 

OAG has established that defendants submitted false SFCs after July 13, 2014, pursuant to their other loan commitments. Defendants submitted SFCs to Deutsche Bank as part of their contractual obligations arising out of three different loans: (1) a Chicago Loan, undertaken by 401 North Wabash Venture LLC; (2) a Doral Loan, undertaken by Trump Endeavor LLC; and (3) an Old Post Office Loan, undertaken by Trump Old Post Office LLC. Defendants certified the accuracy of these SFCs to Deutsche Bank for the years 2014-2019 and 202126 as part of their 

25 Nor is this Court asked to determine Donald Trump's total wealth. 

26 The gap for 2020 may have been due to the COVID-19 pandemic. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

31 of 35 

Page 31 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

contractual obligations. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1102, 1104, 1106, 1124, 1126, 1155, 1156, 1157. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

The Individual Defendants 

OAG has demonstrated liability on behalf of all the named individual defendants: (1) Donald Trump, as each and every SFC was issued on behalf of ""Donald J. Trump""; (2) Donald Trump, Jr., who, along with Allen Weisselberg, certified the accuracy of the SFCs for 2016-2020, and who singlehandedly certified the accuracy of the 2021 SFC (NYSCEF Docs. No. 808-813); (3) Eric Trump, who is the listed source for the Seven Springs valuation in 2014,27 and who signed several guarantor compliance certificates in 2020 and 2021 for Donald J. Trump (NYSCEF Doc. No. 802); (4) Allen Weisselberg, who certified the accuracy of the SFCs from 2014-2021 (NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 806-812); (5) and Jeffrey McConney, who led the process of preparing all the SFCs since the 1990s28 (NYSCEF Doc. No. 822 at 52-68). 

The Entity Defendants 

It is settled law that ""[a] parent corporation will not be held liable for the torts or obligations of a subsidiary unless it can be shown that the parent exercised complete dominion and control over the subsidiary."" Potash v Port Auth. of New York & New Jersey, 279 AD2d 562, 562 (2d Dept 2001) (emphasis added). Here, it is undisputed that Donald Trump, through one corporate form or another, exercised complete control over the umbrella of entities operating in furtherance of, or on behalf of, ""the Trump Organization."" 

Defendants do not dispute that DJT Holdings LLC and DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC are entities that sit at the top of the Trump Organization's organizational chart and together own many of the Trump-affiliated entities that comprise the Trump Organization. DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC owns 100% of the Trump Organization and DJT Holdings LLC owns 100% of the Trump Organization LLC. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 4, 819 at ¶1. 

Accordingly, OAG has established liability on behalf of all the named entity defendants: (1) The Trump Organization Inc., the Trump Organization LLC, DJT Holdings LLC, and DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC, as each participated in the preparation, submission and certification of the SFCs after July 13, 2014 through the acts of the individual defendants as described supra; (2) the DJT Revocable Trust, as both Donald Trump Jr. and Allen Weisselberg certified the accuracy of the 2016-2019 SFCs in their capacities as ""Trustee, the Donald J. Trump Revocable Trust dated April 7, 2014, as amended"" (NYSCEF Doc. No. 808); (3) Trump Endeavor LLC, which was the borrower on the Doral Loan, for which SFCs were submitted after July 13, 2014; (4) 401 North Wabash Venture LLC, which was the borrower on a loan for ""Trump Chicago,"" under which SFCs were required to be (and were) submitted 

27 Eric Trump also reaffirmed the SFCs accuracy on July 9, 2019. NYSCEF Doc. Nos. 782 at Row 679, 783 at Rows 638-40, 784 at Row 660, 1183. 

28 Jeffrey McConney acknowledged his personal role in preparing supporting data for Donald Trump's SFCs beginning in 2011, testifying that: ""I assemble the documentation"" and that he would send both supporting data spreadsheets and backup documentation to the accountants. He further conceded that the supporting data spreadsheets were referred to as ""Jeff's supporting data"" or ""Jeff's supporting schedule."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 822 at 40, 67-68, 212, 294. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL 

Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

32 of 35 

Page 32 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

after July 13, 2014; (5) Trump Old Post Office LLC, as it was the borrower on the ""Old Post Office"" loan, under which SFCs were required to be (and were) submitted after July 13, 2014; and Seven Springs LLC, the borrowing entity (as described supra) under which SFCs were required to be (and were) submitted after July 13, 2014. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

Injunctive Relief 

OAG has prevailed on liability on its first cause of action pursuant to Executive Law § 63(12) as against all defendants: Donald J. Trump; Donald Trump, Jr.; Eric Trump; Allen Weisselberg; Jeffrey McConney; the DJT Revocable Trust; the Trump Organization Inc; the Trump Organization LLC; DJT Holdings LLC; DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC; Trump Endeavor 12 LLC; 401 North Wabash Venture LLC; Trump Old Post Office LLC; 40 Wall Street LLC; and Seven Springs LLC. 

If liability is established under Executive Law § 63(12), the statute itself provides that the attorney general may obtain ""an order enjoining the continuance of such business activity or of any fraudulent or illegal acts... and, in an appropriate case, cancelling any certificate filed under and by virtue of the provisions of ... section one hundred thirty of the general business law...."" 

""[T]he Attorney General may obtain permanent injunctive relief under... Executive Law § 63(12) upon a showing of a reasonable likelihood of a continuing violation based upon the totality of the circumstances."" People v Greenberg, 27 NY3d at 496-97 (further stating ""[t]his is not a 'run of the mill' action for an injunction, but rather one authorized by remedial legislation, brought by the Attorney-General on behalf of the People of the State and for the purposes of preventing fraud and defeating exploitation"") (internal citations omitted). 

Having found, at the commencement of the action, that OAG had preliminarily demonstrated defendants' ""propensity to engage in persistent fraud,"" this Court appointed the Hon. Barbara S. Jones (ret.) as an independent monitor ""to ensure there is no further fraud or illegality that violates § 63(12) pending the final disposition of this action."" NYSCEF Doc. No. 194. On August 3, 2023, Judge Jones reported as follows: 

[S]ince my appointment I have reviewed material financial and accounting information submitted by the Trump Organization. As part of my review, I have made preliminary observations regarding certain current financial disclosures with respect to the Trump Organization's reporting of financial information. Specifically, I have observed that information regarding certain material liabilities provided to lenders - such as intercompany loans between or among Trust entities and Donald J. Trump, certain of the Trust's contingent liabilities, as well as refundable golf club membership deposits-has been incomplete. The Trust also has not consistently provided all required annual and quarterly certifications attesting to the accuracy of certain financial statements. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

33 of 35 

Page 33 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

In addition, annual audited financial statements for certain entities, prepared by an external accounting firm, list depreciation expenses. However, interim internally prepared financial statements provided to third parties for these same entities inconsistently report depreciation expenses. 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

NYSCEF Doc. No. 647. Even with a preliminary injunction in place, and with an independent monitor overseeing their compliance, defendants have continued to disseminate false and misleading information while conducting business. This ongoing flouting of this Court's prior order, combined with the persistent nature of the false SFCs year after year, have demonstrated the necessity of canceling the certificates filed under GBL § 130, as the statute provides. People v Northern Leasing, 70 Misc 3d 256, 279-80 (Sup Ct, NY County 2020) (denying a trial on the petition and ordering the LLC respondents to dissolve upon a finding of persistent fraud under Executive Law § 63(12)). 

Having prevailed on liability on a standalone Executive Law § 63(12) cause of action, the Attorney General is entitled to the first two prayers for relief sought in her complaint: (1) canceling any certificate filed under and by virtue of the provisions of New York General Business Law § 130 for all the entity defendants found liable, as well as any other entity controlled or beneficially owned by the individual defendants found liable herein, which and who participated in or benefitted from the foregoing fraudulent schemes; and (2) appointing an independent monitor to oversee compliance, financial reporting, valuations, and disclosures to lenders, insurers, and tax authorities at the Trump Organization. NYSCEF Doc. No. 1 at 213. 

Remaining Issues to be Determined at Trial 

Anything presented in the parties' moving papers that this Court has not ruled upon in this Decision and Order, including determinations on liability for the second through seventh causes of action, the amount of disgorgement of profits to which OAG is entitled, and determinations on the third through ninth prayers for relief sought by OAG in its complaint, presents disputed issues of fact that shall proceed to trial. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

34 of 35 

Page 34 of 35  NYSCEF DOC. NO. 1531 

Conclusion 

For the reasons stated herein, it is hereby 

ORDERED that defendants' motion for summary judgment is denied; and it is further 

ORDERED that plaintiff's motion for sanctions is granted in part, to the extent of sanctioning Michael Madaio, Esq. (Habba Madaio & Associates, LLP), Clifford S. Robert, Esq. (Robert & Robert PLLC), Michael Farina Esq. (Robert & Robert PLLC), Christopher M. Kise, Esq., (admitted pro hac vice) (Continental PLLC), and Armen Morian (Morian Law PLLC) in the amount of $7,500 each, to be paid to the Lawyer's Fund for Client Protection of the State of New York no later than 30 days from the date of this Decision and Order; and it is further 

ORDERED that plaintiff's motion for partial summary judgment on its first cause of action is granted in part, to the extent of finding defendants Donald J. Trump, Donald Trump, Jr., Eric Trump, Allen Weisselberg, Jeffrey McConney, the DJT Revocable Trust, the Trump Organization Inc, the Trump Organization LLC, DJT Holdings LLC, DJT Holdings Managing Member LLC, Trump Endeavor 12 LLC, 401 North Wabash Venture LLC, Trump Old Post Office LLC, 40 Wall Street LLC, and Seven Springs LLC to be liable as a matter of law for persistent violations of Executive Law § 63(12); and it is further 

ORDERED that any certificates filed under and by virtue of GBL § 130 by any of the entity defendants or by any other entity controlled or beneficially owned by Donald J. Trump, Donald Trump, Jr., Eric Trump, Allen Weisselberg, and Jeffrey McConney are canceled; and it is further 

ORDERED that within 10 days of the date of this order, the parties are directed to recommend the names of no more than three potential independent receivers to manage the dissolution of the canceled LLCs; and it is further 

ORDERED that the Hon. Barbara S. Jones (ret.) shall continue to serve as an independent monitor of the Trump Organization until further Court order; and it is further 

ORDERED that the Clerk shall enter judgment accordingly. 

9/26/2023 DATE 

CHECK ONE: 

APPLICATION: 

CHECK IF APPROPRIATE: 

CASE DISPOSED 

INDEX NO. 452564/2022 RECEIVED NYSCEF: 09/26/2023 

DENIED 

GRANTED 

SETTLE ORDER 

INCLUDES TRANSFER/REASSIGN 

X 

35 of 35 

ARTHUR F. ENGORON, J.S.C. 

452564/2022 PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, BY LETITIA JAMES, ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK vs. TRUMP, DONALD J. ET AL Motion Nos. 026, 027, 028 

NON-FINAL DISPOSITION GRANTED IN PART 

SUBMIT ORDER 

FIDUCIARY APPOINTMENT 

X OTHER 

REFERENCE 

Page 35 of 35  "
nyt://interactive/d5431d4a-fa19-516a-8143-8b35c9bde1a1,https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2023/business/college-payment-loans.html,2023-10-06T20:01:47+0000,multimedia,Interactive Feature,0,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Colleges and Universities', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Student Loans', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tuition', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Scholarships and Fellowships', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Admissions Standards', 'rank': 5, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Private and Sectarian Schools', 'rank': 6, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Community Colleges', 'rank': 7, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': '529 Savings Plans', 'rank': 8, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Federal Aid (US)', 'rank': 9, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"Your questions, answered by experts. 
By The New York Times
Illustrations by Sean Dong

            Updated October 25, 2023
        
 
	There are few challenges facing students more daunting than applying and paying for college. We are here to help: The New York Times has been collecting reader questions on the topic and has started answering them here.
 
	Type your question in the search box to see if we’ve covered it yet. If you don’t find an answer, don’t worry: We’ll be adding more as the school year progresses.
 
	Ask your question here or scroll down for answers to common questions:
 
              Thinking about paying for college and planning a career can seem overwhelming, so know that you’re not alone if you feel a bit lost. Take a deep breath. It’s understandable that you may have only a vague idea of what you want to study in college, or what path to follow to achieve your goals (if you even know what they are yet). But sorting all of that out is part of growing up — and you’ll be better prepared to make decisions if you learn about different types of colleges, how much they cost and the process for paying those costs. And the earlier you start, the better.In the United States, high school students are, unfortunately, asked to make decisions about financing college that can affect their lives for years to come. By studying up on how student loans work, for example, you can make an informed choice about whether, and how much, to borrow, which can have a long-term impact on your finances. Here are some books that can help: “The Price You Pay for College,” by Ron Lieber, a New York Times columnist; and “Who Gets In and Why: A Year Inside College Admissions,” by Jeffrey Selingo. More answers to specific questions are below. It’s a lot, but take it a step at a time and you’ll be better prepared for a complicated process.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              This is a tricky question to answer because it requires some projection. But the more you save — and the earlier you start — the less you’ll have to borrow later. And there are some helpful calculators that can help you get started.In an ideal world, parents would open up a 529 college savings account immediately after their children make their debut into the world and set up an automatic savings plan.But how much should you shuttle into such an account each month? Let’s say, for example, a four-year public college in your home state costs $100,000.It may be less stressful to think about covering the cost in a few distinct pieces: For the first chunk, hopefully your parents have saved roughly a third of this amount over the first 18 years of your life. (If they haven’t, you may have to adjust your expectations and more deeply explore the least expensive pathways to a four-year degree.)The next piece can be paid while you’re attending college (ideally by you and your parents), and the final chunk can be covered by borrowing — dependent students can generally borrow up to $31,000 from the federal government.If you haven’t started saving or feel like you don’t have enough time to make a large enough dent, there are also ways to contain your costs, including starting at a community college.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Higher education is costly for a lot of reasons. For starters, professors are highly educated and colleges must pay competitive salaries to attract good ones. Colleges also employ administrators to run career offices and other student services, and to make sure the school complies with laws — such as Title IX, a federal civil rights law that requires colleges to provide equal opportunity to women and men in sports, among other things.At the same time, colleges compete for prospective students with perks such as well-appointed gyms, cafeterias and comfortable dorms. State financial support for public colleges tends to shrink when the economy suffers, so many have had to increase tuition and fees to cover costs (although state support is rebounding).Still, college may not be as outrageously expensive as it appears. Most students don’t actually pay the full cost of attendance — the sticker price — that colleges post on their websites, according to Phillip Levine, an economics professor at Wellesley College who has studied college pricing. The downside? Because the sticker price looks so high, some students may skip applying altogether. Professor Levine has founded a nonprofit that offers an online tuition cost estimator to help families see the true price they may pay at a given college.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              The federal government offers three types of financial help to college students: grants, which are gifts that you don’t have to pay back; student loans, which you must repay; and work-study money, which you earn from part-time jobs while you attend school. Many states also offer their own loans, grants and scholarships, and colleges and private groups offer financial help as well.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Estimating how much aid you might qualify for can be complex, but the two most important factors are your academic track record and the amount you can afford to pay, which is based on your family’s income and other financial resources. Some private colleges also increasingly weigh not only how much families are able to pay, but also how much they are willing to pay.Federal college aid is largely based on financial need, as calculated by a form called the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid). Colleges and private groups may also help based on need, and they may give out merit aid, or financial assistance based on your high school grades or your talent in sports or other activities. Many nonprofit groups also offer scholarships, and they typically set their own rules for choosing recipients.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              The FAFSA has a funny sounding name, but it’s seriously important when it comes to paying for college.The FAFSA, which stands for Free Application for Federal Student Aid, is a form that students must file every year they attend college to qualify for any sort of federal financial aid, including grants (which you don’t have to pay back) and loans (which you do).You may have already heard about the FAFSA because more states are making high school seniors complete it in order to graduate. The reason? Research shows that students who do so are much more likely to immediately enroll in college.The form gathers financial details about you and your family (assuming you’re a dependent who relies on adults for housing and living expenses), including income and assets, like savings accounts and investments. Federal aid experts say most people can fill out the form in less than an hour, including the time it takes to gather bank statements and other documents, but give yourself extra time when you’re doing it for the first time. Most people file the form online because you can transfer income tax information electronically from the Internal Revenue Service.Next, the form runs all your information through a complex formula and spits out a number that, the government says, reflects your family’s “financial strength,” or an estimate of what you and your family might be able to pay for college. Right now the number is called an E.F.C., for expected family contribution, but in future years it will be called the S.A.I., for student aid index. (Somehow, that’s supposed to be less confusing.) The lower the number, the more aid you are likely to qualify for.Colleges and universities that receive your FAFSA (you choose where it is sent) subtract the E.F.C. from the cost of attending the school for a year, including tuition, housing, meals, books and supplies, to see how much financial aid you might need to attend. Then, they send you an aid “package” that shows how much financial help you qualify for, and what the cost would be if you enrolled.If the cost of attendance is $16,000 and your E.F.C. is $12,000, you would be eligible for $4,000 in need-based aid.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              A new version of the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid) comes out each year, and you have to fill it out each year you want to receive federal aid. The updated version is usually available in October, but this year’s version, covering aid for the 2024-25 school year, will be available in December because of a big overhaul of the form.It’s usually best to fill out the FAFSA as soon as you can after it posts online. Many states set priority deadlines for their aid, which is given out based on the FAFSA, early in the new year. You may still receive aid if you file after your state’s deadline, but often it’s “first come first served.”Because of the delayed form for the 2024-25 school year, be sure to check with your high school counseling office or the federal financial aid website for updates.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Maybe. The CSS Profile is a lengthy form that students complete to seek financial help for college, but it’s different from the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid), and whether you have to fill it out depends on where you apply. Not all colleges use the CSS Profile, but several hundred — mostly private colleges and universities — require it to assess whether you qualify for institutional aid, meaning the school’s own money, rather than government help.The College Board, the private group that oversees the SAT, administers the form. Be prepared: It asks even more detailed questions than the FAFSA and it’s not free. It costs $25, plus fees for each additional school you select to receive your form, although you may be able to have the cost waived based on your income.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Colleges face rising costs for paying employees and maintaining buildings, so typically they raise their tuition and fees each year to keep pace. Some institutions, like the University of Illinois system, do offer fixed tuition for four years so that students and their families can better plan for costs; others have tried it, but have abandoned the approach after a few years. (The University of Dayton guarantees “net” tuition over four years; it may increase each year, but entering students know what they’ll pay ahead of time.) Most colleges continue to use the traditional method of setting costs annually, which means the amount you pay may change from year to year.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              A grant is financial aid that doesn’t have to be repaid, and is often given based on a student’s financial need. The federal government offers several types of grants, including Pell Grants — named for Claiborne Pell, the United States senator who sponsored the bill that eventually led to the creation of the Pell Grant program, which provides financial aid to undergraduate students who display exceptional need and have not earned a bachelor’s, graduate or professional degree. More information on other types of grants can be found here. Generally, families with an income of less than $30,000 and limited assets currently qualify for the full Pell Grant. The maximum grant amount can change each year; for the 2023-24 school year, it’s about $7,400.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Like grants, scholarships are also a type of gift aid that doesn’t need to be repaid. But scholarships are often given for classroom achievements; some states, for instance, may make them available based on your high school grades or your scores on the SAT or ACT. Companies and nonprofit groups may also give scholarships based on your success in various activities, your interest in a certain career or your personal background. (Some are given to women, first-generation college students or children of military families, for example.) Some scholarships are national, while others accept applications from certain cities or states, or from students whose parents work at certain employers.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Start by checking with your high school guidance counselor, as well as the financial aid offices of colleges to which you apply. Your local library or state education agency can also help. There are many online scholarship search sites, like CareerOneStop from the Labor Department and the BigFuture from the College Board. Just be sure you’re looking at a legitimate site. Be skeptical if an application has a fee; you shouldn’t have to pay to apply for a scholarship.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Federal work-study aid is based on financial need and allows students to work part-time during the school year to earn cash for college expenses. The government and the college (or other employer) share the cost of paying you. Often, the jobs are on campus so you don’t have to travel far, and they may be related to your major. You apply for the program by filing the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid), and if approved, you usually must find a job yourself; check with the campus employment office to see what’s available. The pay varies and hours are limited to avoid interfering with your school work. You may find a job that is not part of the work-study program and that pays more, but be careful about working too many hours. If you neglect your studies and your grades suffer, it may take you longer to graduate, which will add to your costs.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              A 529 college savings plan is a popular way to save and pay for a child’s higher education, including at eligible vocational schools (and these plans can also now be used for K-12 tuition). There are a lot of misconceptions about how the plan factors into a prospective student’s eligibility for financial aid. The bottom line: Its effect is surprisingly minimal.First, the basics: These accounts are run by states and allow contributions to grow tax-free and be withdrawn free of tax as long as the money is used to pay for qualified expenses. As an added bonus, many states offer tax breaks on contributions.Almost anyone can open a 529 account for a future student — named as the account beneficiary — and the plan is usually invested in a collection of diversified mutual funds. It’s usually wise to look at the plans offered in your state first since there may be state-level tax breaks. But you can generally invest in any state’s plan — that may make sense if your in-state plan doesn’t offer tax breaks, for example, or if it’s a high-cost or otherwise subpar plan. SavingforCollege.com has a map linking to the states’ various options.These plans are most powerful when a parent or guardian starts saving when the prospective student is young — the earlier you start, the more time compound interest has to work its magic, meaning you don’t have to save quite as much and you can let your investment earnings do more of the work.Many people worry that saving in a 529 will hurt their ability to receive federal financial aid, but the effects are pretty limited. In the end, income matters far more than savings when the federal government calculates your aid package, which draws on information from your FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid).Generally speaking, if the 529 is owned by the parent or the dependent student, it is considered the parent’s asset. This means only a small percentage, or up to 5.64 percent of the account’s value, will be counted when calculating your financial aid eligibility (through the FAFSA). For example, if a parent saved $30,000, the prospective student’s eligibility for aid would only be lowered by as much as $1,692. That’s a relatively small change in financial aid for having saved a nice sum — and it’s certainly not worth abandoning your savings strategy to become eligible for a little more aid.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Paying for college on your own requires planning. You’ll probably need a combination of financial aid, including grants and scholarships; student loans; and money you earn or save yourself. Start early to explore scholarships you may be eligible for, and seek out groups that specialize in helping low-income and minority high school students, like uAspire and the National College Attainment Network. Be sure to submit the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid) as soon as you can when applying to college to see what sort of financial help you can get; you may want to consider working for a year before enrolling, to save up money. You could also consider attending a less expensive state school, or starting out at a community college and then transferring to a four-year college to complete your degree.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Financial aid, whether in the form of grants or loans, can generally be used to pay for all college expenses including housing and meals. But in some cases, aid packages may fall short, leaving students to scrimp on basics like food and housing. Depending on where you attend college, you may be able to save money by sharing off-campus housing with roommates. And some colleges, aware of food insecurity among students, have started food banks or pantries offering free groceries, as well as programs to let students donate unused swipes from their meal plan cards to others.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              If you are in high school and your parents or guardians haven’t spoken to you about paying for college, it’s time to bring up the subject with them — ideally, well before you start applying. Knowing if they are able to help financially and whether they expect you to contribute to college costs can help you target your search. If money is tight, perhaps you’ll need to focus on lower-cost state schools or community college. Keep in mind that talking about money is difficult for many people; your parents may feel embarrassed or guilty if they can’t afford to fully fund your education. Or maybe they have the means, but feel it’s your responsibility to help pay.It may feel awkward, so suggest a time to talk when they aren’t busy getting ready for work or making dinner, so everyone is less stressed. Zaneilia Harris, a certified financial planner based in Maryland, suggests impressing your parents by doing research ahead of time and finding out how much it might cost to attend a college that interests you. Then, you can ask if that amount is within your family’s budget. By getting expectations out in the open you can avoid disappointment later if you are accepted at a school that you love — but that your family can’t afford.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Unfortunately, shopping for college isn’t as simple as shopping for clothes or groceries. It’s more like shopping for airline tickets. Prices can vary widely, even for people sitting in the same row — er, students attending the same college. There’s no set price tag that everyone pays because of the effect of financial aid and discounts — sometimes called merit aid — offered by the school to students it wants to attract.College costs — tuition, fees, housing and meals — range from an average published cost of $13,470 a year at a two-year community college, to about $23,000 at a four-year in-state university, to more than $53,000 at a private, four-year college. (Books, supplies and personal items are extra.) Those are “sticker” prices published by colleges for the 2022-23 school year, but many students pay much less because of financial aid.Confused? Don’t despair. You can get an estimate by using a net price calculator, which the federal government requires most colleges to offer on their websites. You enter information about yourself and your family, and the tool estimates what you might have to pay. (Search online for the college and the term “net price calculator.”) Some colleges’ calculators are more accurate than others, however, so you may also want to try other options, such as those suggested by Ron Lieber, a New York Times columnist.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Many high schools allow students to earn credit toward graduation by enrolling in college-level classes — often offered at local community colleges — at a price that is sometimes lower than you would pay for the same class in college. This can potentially allow you to fulfill some college requirements early, and save you money — but check with the colleges you’re interested in attending to confirm that they will accept the credits. Otherwise, you may be paying for courses you will end up retaking in college anyway.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Advanced Placement classes are high school courses that colleges tend to look upon favorably during the admissions process, as evidence that you have taken academically challenging studies. They also may help you earn course credit for college, which could save you money on tuition. To qualify for college credit, you typically must score a 3 or above (on a scale of 1 to 5) on the official A.P. course exam. But not all colleges give credit for A.P. classes, and those that do vary in the criteria used to grant it. Highly selective colleges may only grant credit if a student scores a 4 or a 5. Even if a college does not grant credit, it may allow you to skip introductory classes based on your score and take advanced coursework sooner. Check with your prospective colleges to see what they allow. The College Board, which administers the A.P. program, offers a search tool to help you find college policies.Worth noting: The cost for most A.P. exams during the 2023-24 academic year is $98 per exam, but students with financial need may qualify for a reduced rate. And some states may use state or federal money to defray some or all of the cost for students.
              
                — Ann Carrns and Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              It’s exciting to think about visiting college campuses. But it can get expensive — and overwhelming — to travel to every college you’re considering.A smart alternative: Visit a mix of college “types,” starting with campuses close to home, ideally ones that you can drive to in a couple of hours. Try a big state university, a small liberal arts college, perhaps an urban campus. The details will vary, but you can get a general feel for that sort of school and where you might feel most comfortable. If your family vacations near a college you’re interested in, tack on a visit instead of making a special trip.When you visit, take an official college tour; they’re usually led by students, and they can offer insights you won’t get by walking around on your own. Plus, the school will be formally notified that you’ve been there; some colleges track an applicant’s “demonstrated interest,” and will take note that you took the time to look around. If you just drive through, the school won’t know you were there. Some schools help sponsor visits for low-income students; ask the admissions office.On a really tight budget? Visit virtually. During the pandemic, colleges got a lot better at offering remote options for getting to know a school (and they usually count as a show of interest, too). Virtual visits may even offer you a peek at spots you wouldn’t see during an in-person tour. Search online for “virtual visit” for a specific college, or try a site like YouVisit.com that offers such tours of many campuses.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              If you’re planning on going for a master’s or doctoral degree, it’s smart to factor that in when you’re applying to a college or university for your undergraduate degree. Graduate schools want to know that you are well-prepared for advanced study, and one way they do this is by looking at the “rigor,” or difficulty, of the classes your college offered; they want to see that you took challenging courses. Both smaller private schools and flagship public schools can fit the bill, advisers say — but it’s wise to see if a college you’re interested in has a track record of sending students on to graduate study.Many colleges offer information about the percentage of students who continue their studies after graduation, so check their websites or call the admissions office and ask. If a college is known for turning out well-qualified students, graduate schools tend to look favorably on that when reviewing applications, said Donald Resnick, a higher education consultant based on Long Island. Some graduate programs, such as law school, offer considerable flexibility when considering your undergraduate major. But others — like top-notch business schools — may require you to take specific classes in college, said Joseph Paris, the dean of graduate and professional studies at Delaware Valley University in Pennsylvania. So it’s wise to ask if your prospective college offers a pathway to the degree that interests you.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Not necessarily: It depends on how much the cost of attending the college is covered by its financial aid offer, and how much you and your family can afford to pay out of pocket. If a very expensive college offers you the most financial aid in dollar terms, it still may leave you with a big bill because the cost of attendance is so high. A less pricey college offering a relatively small amount of aid, however, may end up costing less overall, because the help covers more of the cost. So while it’s flattering to get fat financial aid offers, make sure you look at the bottom line, which is what you are left to pay after deducting aid like grants and scholarships (don’t include loans, which have to be repaid).
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Deciding if a private school is worth the money is a personal decision that depends not only on how much aid you’re offered, but also on what kind of a student you are, and what you and your family can afford.There’s no denying the headline numbers are jarring. The average sticker price for a year at a four-year private college — including tuition, fees, housing and meals — was $53,000 for the 2022-23 school year, compared with just over $23,000 for an in-state public college, according to the College Board (books, supplies and other costs are extra). Some sticker prices are much higher — for example, Bowdoin College, a prestigious private college in Maine, has a published price for the current school year of almost $83,000; New York University is up to about $85,000. No wonder students and families are clutching their wallets!Keep in mind, though, that it’s mostly wealthy families paying that sticker price; everyone else typically pays less — sometimes a lot less — because of grants and scholarships. The average net cost of attending private school, including tuition, fees, housing and meals, has actually been declining in recent years when adjusted for inflation (it has for public schools, too), and was projected to be about $29,000 for the 2022-23 school year, according to the College Board.That’s better, although it’s still a challenging price for most families to pay without borrowing. It’s hard to envision saying no to attending an Ivy League college, if you can get in; they have vast resources and a cachet that will serve you well when applying to graduate school or a first job. Smaller liberal arts colleges, while they may lack the instant name recognition of the Ivys, can offer students benefits such as more interaction with professors — but many also come with a steep tab.Given all that, it’s smart to consider whether a good public school may get you where you want to go.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Attending a less-expensive community college for two years before transferring to a four-year college to complete your bachelor’s degree can save money — but this approach requires careful research and strategic planning. College policies vary, so you may not receive full credit for all of your community college classes at every four-year college. You may have to retake some courses, or even transfer as a second-year student, which adds to the cost.The College Board suggests talking to admissions advisers at community colleges, as well as special transfer advisers in the admissions offices at the four-year colleges you’re considering, to ask about choosing classes and navigating the transfer process. Ask the community college how many students at the community college successfully transfer to four-year programs to get an idea of whether you’ll have support in your goal. Some two- and four-year colleges have formal pacts, sometimes called “articulation agreements,” to help transfers go smoothly, so be sure to ask about that, too.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Students attending a two-year college or a vocational program that trains students for a specific career or trade can qualify for federal grants and student loans as long as the school or program is eligible, says Mark Kantrowitz, a student aid expert and the author of “How to Appeal for More College Financial Aid.” Most community colleges are eligible to offer federal aid, he said, but some have voluntarily dropped out of the student loan program out of concern about defaults. Relatively few community college students borrow, but those who do tend to default on their loans at higher rates than students at four-year colleges.Students can use federal aid to attend vocational and trade schools if the schools meet certain federal requirements, such as being accredited — meaning they meet criteria set by a reputable group. Eligible schools can be found on this Education Department website.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Some majors are more likely to land you in a higher-salary career than others, which can make it easier to repay student debt. Top salaries tend to result from majors such as computer science, engineering and pharmacy, according to an analysis by the HEA Group, a consulting firm. The national average salary, four years after graduation, for students majoring in computer science is about $105,000, the HEA Group found; for electrical engineering, about $92,000. A computer science degree has a national average salary, four years after graduation, of about $105,000, the HEA Group found; electrical engineering, about $92,000.Does that mean you shouldn’t borrow anything if you want to major in, say, dance (with an average salary of about $30,000, four years out)? Or that you should major in a STEM (science, technology, engineering and mathematics) field instead? Not necessarily: If you’re passionate about modern dance, you may not be happy studying engineering. But you absolutely should consider whether it’s reasonable to borrow heavily to earn that degree, and how long it will take you to repay your loans on a dancer’s salary. If the earnings outlook for your major is modest, that’s an argument for being cautious with student loans. To get an idea of what salaries are in different fields, you can see more data on the HEA Group website or check out the Labor Department’s website.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              After you apply for financial aid using the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid) form, you may be offered some combination of loans as part of your financial aid package. These loans, unlike grants, for example, must be paid back, with interest (that’s right, we call this “aid” in America). But instead of borrowing from a bank or another financial institution, your lender is the federal government.There are several types of federal loans, and they’re all generally offered through the William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan Program, named for a former representative from Michigan.Undergraduate students are generally eligible for direct subsidized loans (which have slightly better terms and are offered to those with greater financial need) and unsubsidized loans (basically for everyone else because they are not based on financial need).If those loans and other financial aid aren’t enough to cover costs, it may be possible for the parents of a dependent undergraduate borrower to take out what are known as parent PLUS loans. These loans are not based on financial need, but they do require a basic credit check that scans consumer credit files for “adverse events.”Parents should tread carefully here — there are fewer safety nets in place for parental loans, which can quickly spiral out of control.Graduate and professional students are generally eligible for direct unsubsidized loans, as well as grad PLUS loans, to pay for what other aid does not. (These PLUS loans work similarly to parent PLUS loans.)Borrowers also have the ability to consolidate all of their loans into one so-called direct consolidation loan, which uses a single loan servicer. There may be significant advantages, such as having one monthly bill, but there can be costly drawbacks, such as extending your repayment period, which can result in the payment of more interest over the long-term. Be sure to weigh this decision carefully.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Direct student loans, the main type of federal loans used for student borrowers, generally come in two flavors: subsidized and unsubsidized. As the name implies, subsidized loans, which are available to undergraduate students, have slightly better terms. But prospective borrowers must have some financial need — in other words, there’s a gap between what their school costs and what they’re deemed able to pay.Unsubsidized loans are made to eligible undergraduate, graduate and professional students — but eligibility is not determined by financial need.Why are subsidized loans more attractive? The federal government pays the interest while an undergraduate is enrolled in school at least half time and during the six-month grace period after you leave school (and before payments are due). The government also pays interest during any deferments, which are periods when a student is permitted to temporarily pause payments.With unsubsidized loans, interest begins to accumulate the moment the loan is paid out — and you’re fully responsible for it. That means even when you’re not required to make payments — say, while you’re in school, or in a deferment or forbearance — interest is ticking.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Some states have their own student loan programs, and most states also offer other types of aid to eligible residents — including money you don’t have to pay back, like grants and scholarships — so be sure to explore what’s available.The National Association of Student Financial Aid Administrators has a helpful map that links to various state-run aid programs, including the New York State Tuition Assistance Program, known as TAP. It provides up to $5,665 annually to eligible students who fall below certain income requirements. You can also contact your state’s agency for more information on what’s available where you live.Many programs only require you to apply using the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid) form, but others may require additional forms. And because some of this aid is distributed on a first-come-first-served basis, it pays to get those forms in early.Once it comes time to repay your loans, there may be other avenues to explore: Some states offer loan forgiveness programs to residents who work in certain fields, like social work, for example, or teaching.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              There are plenty of reasons to avoid them if you can.First, turning to private loans may be a sign that you’re borrowing too much — particularly if you’ve already taken out the maximum amount of federal loans you qualify for.Second, unlike federal loans, private loans usually require a co-signer, which means that person is on the hook if you can’t make your payments for any reason. Private loans also come with fewer protections than federal ones and may carry higher interest rates, which may be fixed or variable (meaning your payments may fluctuate).Before turning to private lenders, you first want to exhaust all of your federal loan options. Why? If you can’t afford to pay, or if your income suddenly drops, you should be able to slide into an income-driven repayment plan where your monthly bill could be as low as zero dollars a month — yes, zero dollars — which still qualifies as an on-time payment. Private loans are also not eligible for any federal debt forgiveness or protection programs.Private lenders may offer some help for distressed borrowers, but it’s more limited. Sallie Mae will permit some borrowers to make interest-only payments for a year, for example. There may be other options for borrowers experiencing a financial hardship, such as a temporary drop in the interest rate or an extended payment plan.Keep in mind that any unpaid interest will typically continue to pile up — it may be added to your loan balance, which means interest will build upon interest and can quickly cause your debt to spiral.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              It costs money to borrow money, which is why student loans, like most other forms of borrowing, charge interest. In its most basic form, interest is calculated as a percentage of your unpaid balance.So how exactly does it all work? Like many other loans, direct federal student loans are daily interest loans, which means the interest adds up each day. Here’s how it’s calculated (we’ll keep it brief):Let’s say you owe $10,000 on a loan with a 5.5 percent interest rate.First, figure out your daily interest rate. Divide your rate (5.5 percent) by the number of days in the year (365): 0.055 / 365 = 0.000151Next, figure out how much you’re charged each day. $10,000 x 0.000151 = $1.51Now let’s say you have 30 days in your billing cycle. You will be charged that daily rate ($1.51) multiplied by each day (30) for a monthly total of $45.30.Cha-ching! That’s your monthly interest charge. But each month, you pay the interest charges along with a portion of the loan balance. So if you are making timely monthly payments, your interest charges should decline over time (with your declining balance), similar to the way a mortgage works.But since you’re taking out new loans each year, you may be wondering when all of this interest starts accumulating. It varies and depends on what kind of loan you have. The clock on many loans’ interest begins to tick as soon as they are paid out. Borrowers with direct subsidized loans get a bit of a break: Interest doesn’t accumulate while you’re still enrolled in school at least half time — or during a six-month grace period after you leave school. The same goes for any deferments, which are periods when you’re permitted to temporarily hit the pause button on your payments.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              This occurs when you have unpaid interest charges that are added to your loan balance. In other words, borrowers are charged interest on their interest — a noxious little phenomenon known as capitalization.Federal borrowers used to be hit with interest capitalization at several different junctures, causing loan balances to balloon over time. But the White House eliminated several of them last year, so the treatment of interest has become a little less punishing.For example, before the improvement, the interest that accumulated on your loans while you were in school (before you were expected to start paying) was tacked onto your loan balance just before it became time to repay.So if you initially borrowed $10,000, and, say, $1,350 in interest piled up while you were attending, that meant you left school with an $11,350 balance — and your interest charges were calculated off that higher amount. Thanks to the recent change, that no longer happens when you first enter repayment. You just pay back the unpaid interest over time.Interest capitalization has also been eliminated in other situations, including after periods of forbearance, which happens when you temporarily pause your loans. Unpaid interest is also no longer added to your balance after you leave most income-driven repayment plans.There are exceptions. Student loan interest is added to your loan balance after:Deferment. If you start to repay your loans and later return to school — and defer your loan payments while you attend — interest will accrue and be added to your balance once you enter repayment again.Leaving the income-driven repayment plan known as “income-based repayment.”Interest on private student loans may be capitalized more frequently — which can be far more damaging, causing your debt to spiral higher over time — so be sure to read the fine print.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Federal student loans and private student loan rates work a little differently. We’ll start with the type of loans you should take out first: federal.Interest rates on federal loans are fixed for the life of the loan, which means they won’t fluctuate over time.But interest rates are reset each year for new batches of student loans. Those rates are priced each July based on an auction in May for government bonds known as 10-year Treasury bonds — and those rates apply to loans paid out the next year, from July 1 to June 30.Rates are the same for borrowers with the same types of federal loans, though the various types carry different rates. For example, undergraduate borrowers with direct loans pay the lowest rates (5.5 percent for loans paid out from July 1, 2023, to June 30, 2024). Parent loans carry a 8.05 percent rate.Private loans work a bit differently. Their rates may be fixed or variable (meaning they fluctuate over time) — but both types generally track the interest rate levels set by the government’s central bank, the Federal Reserve.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              A co-signer is someone who agrees to take responsibility for a loan if the main borrower cannot repay the loan.Co-signers aren’t required for most federal loans, but they are generally required for a private student loan if you have a low credit score or a limited credit history (meaning you haven’t borrowed before). Some private lenders will release the co-signer after a certain number of on-time payments or if the borrower meets other requirements.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              There are plenty of other ways to minimize debt on your path to a four-year degree. The path might look a little different than you envisioned, but it could serve you well over the long haul.The first step might be to simply acknowledge that this is an emotional decision. Too many students (and their parents) get caught up in what others think, leading them down a path to borrowing far more than intended. There’s nothing wrong with taking a gap year after high school to save some money, for example, or to devise a careful plan.But the most obvious way to minimize student loans is to minimize the cost of attending.Starting at a community college to earn an associate degree or the maximum amount of credits that will transfer to a public university is another option. It’s probably not as easy as you think, however — many people who start at community colleges don’t finish. And you really need to do the legwork and ask what classes will transfer to specific schools, which means it’s helpful to have a four-year school in mind before you enroll.If you can, consider living with parents or guardians and commuting to an in-state, four-year public college, which can save you big bucks on room and board.Besides trying to control costs, you’ll also want to explore what types of grants and scholarships you may be eligible for — since you don’t have to pay those back. Your state and other nonprofits may also offer this type of assistance. And you may want to consider a work-study program at your school.And, of course, fill out the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid), which will determine what type of financial aid you may be eligible for. There’s a cap on how much you can borrow from the federal government for undergraduate studies. Even if you took out the maximum amount of federal direct loans possible, you’d generally be in good shape if you could manage to cover the entire four-year tab without turning to the private loan market.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              You don’t need to start repaying your loans the moment you step off campus — nearly everyone has a little breathing room first.After graduating or leaving school (or dropping below half-time enrollment), most federal borrowers have a six-month grace period to get their finances in order before they need to begin repayment. But keep in mind that interest grows on most federal loans while you’re enrolled in school and during the six-month grace period afterward. (There is one exception: Interest doesn’t accumulate on subsidized loans while students are enrolled in school or during the six-month grace period.)Graduate or professional students who received PLUS loans also get an automatic six-month period where no payments are required, except it’s called a deferment.Parent PLUS loans are a little different: Payments start once the loan is fully paid out, so repayment periods will begin each year for any new batch of loans. Parents can request a deferment — it’s not automatic — as long as their child is enrolled at least half of the time at an eligible school. It also lasts up to six months after the student graduates.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Loan counseling is a mandatory process that all federal borrowers must complete both before their first loan is paid out (this is called entrance counseling) and before repayment begins (known as exit counseling). The idea is to ensure that borrowers understand their obligations and responsibilities.It’s certainly not the kind of comprehensive counseling that might prevent a borrower from getting in over his or her head with debt. Each of these modules takes about 30 minutes and can be completed online, though the Education Department’s website says borrowers should check in with their school’s financial aid office to ensure the modules satisfy the school’s requirements.If you need more thorough advice once your loans are due, try contacting The Institute of Student Loan Advisors, which offers free assistance.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              The Supreme Court may have killed President Biden’s program to wipe out up to $20,000 in federal student debt for millions of borrowers, but there are still plenty of other ways to have your debt canceled. (We’re talking about loans that are made through the federal government, and not private student loans made through banks; private loans aren’t eligible for federal forgiveness programs.)The federal program most closely associated with loan forgiveness is the Public Service Loan Forgiveness program, which is open to government and nonprofit employees such as public schoolteachers, librarians and public defenders. After making payments for 10 years, any remaining balance is wiped out.But during that time, you need to follow (and keep following) certain rules: You must be working full-time in a qualifying job and making on-time payments in an income-driven repayment plan or a standard repayment program. Many borrowers have become ensnared in the P.S.L.F. program’s complex rules and bureaucracy — leaving many ineligible for forgiveness, or without payment credits they thought they had earned — but Congress and the Biden administration have made improvements in recent years.P.S.L.F. isn’t the only path to debt cancellation. Borrowers using income-driven repayment programs — where payments are based on income and family size — will have their debt wiped away after the required period of payments, usually up to 20 years.And if you think you’ve been defrauded by your school, there’s another path to potential cancellation. A relief program called “borrower defense” allows you to apply to have your federal debts erased if you were misled by your school, or if it engaged in other misconduct.Borrowers who have become totally and permanently disabled can also qualify to have their debt wiped away.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Income-driven repayment plans operate as a safety net for borrowers with federal student loans — if you lose your job, experience a steep drop in income or otherwise have difficulty making your payments, these plans can help. Some lower-income borrowers may even qualify to make “payments” of $0.The reason: Monthly payments are based on your income and family size, not your loan balance, and adjust each year. After monthly payments are made for a set period, usually 20 years and sometimes less, any remaining balance is forgiven. (That canceled debt is usually taxable as income, but a temporary tax rules ​​exempts balances forgiven through 2025 from federal income taxes.)The Biden administration recently introduced a better income-driven plan called SAVE — or Saving on a Valuable Education — which, once fully implemented next summer, will cut borrowers’ payments by more than half, to 5 percent of their discretionary income, compared with the plan it replaced, called REPAYE, which was set at 10 percent. For a fuller understanding of how the SAVE plan works, check out our guide here.You can play around with the loan simulator on StudentAid.gov to get a better sense of which repayment plan works best for your circumstances. Don’t assume income-driven repayment plans are always the best bet — you may end up paying less over the life of your loan with another plan, it all depends on your specific situation.Borrowers with Parent PLUS loans have fewer income-driven repayment options — after consolidating into a direct loan, borrowers become eligible for the income-contingent repayment plan, which is generally more expensive than SAVE. It requires borrowers to pay 20 percent of their discretionary income for 25 years; anything remaining is forgiven.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Let’s hope not. But it all depends on some basic facts: how much you borrow, how much you earn after you graduate and how quickly you can afford to pay off the loans.Millions of borrowers with federal loans sign up for programs that require them to make payments for what often amounts to a couple of decades. The average life expectancy for a woman in the United States is 77. If you’re in an income-driven repayment program with a 20-year term, well, then you’ll be making payments for a solid quarter of your lifetime. That feels like a long time.But let’s say you walk away after four years of college with roughly $30,000 in federal loans (the average amount undergraduates borrowed in recent years) that carry a 5.5 percent interest rate. If you can afford to pay roughly $325 a month, you’ll be done in 10 years.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              After a college offers you admission, it sends you a letter or email detailing its financial aid offer, so you can see what it would cost to attend that particular school. But these “award” letters can vary in format and may use confusing terms. The Department of Education designed a proposed template, but many colleges use their own versions that may not make a clear distinction between “gift” aid, like grants and scholarships, and student loans, which must be repaid. Some might not even state the net price that you would pay out of pocket. That can make it a challenge to compare the true cost of attending each college.But don’t worry — you can figure it out yourself with some basic math. Start by adding up the total cost of attending each college, including tuition, fees, housing and meal plans, as well as books, supplies and other expenses. The details may appear in the award letter, but if not, check the college’s website or call its financial aid office. Next, subtract grants and scholarships to arrive at your net cost — what you would need to make up with savings, loans or money earned at a job. If anything is unclear, call the financial aid office for an explanation. Do that for every college that sends you an offer so you can compare the true cost of each.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Need-based aid is financial help that is based on how much income you and your family earn, and things you own of value — like your home and any savings or investments. Typically, the lower your income, the higher your financial need, and the more aid you are likely to qualify for. An example of need-based aid is the federal Pell Grant.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Merit aid is often given to recognize some sort of achievement in school work, sports or other activities. Unlike need-based aid, merit aid typically doesn’t factor in your financial situation. Many private colleges compete with each other for students, and they increasingly use merit aid as a sort of discount, even if those students can afford full tuition.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
Independent students generally qualify for more federal financial aid than their dependent counterparts, but gaining such status isn’t as simple as moving out of your parents’ home or having them no longer claim you when they file their tax returns.There are several qualifying factors, including being at least 24 years old, married or a graduate student, or having dependents of your own.Independent undergraduate students can generally borrow more — up to $57,500 in total, compared with $31,000 for most dependent students — and are more likely to qualify for the maximum amount of Pell Grants.Figuring out the true cost — and how much you’ll ultimately need to borrow — will vary by institution, though most students end up paying less than the sticker price. The best way to get those estimates is to visit a college’s net price calculator and run the numbers yourself.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Bursar is a fancy name for the official who manages a college’s billing, including sending out tuition invoices and collecting the payments. (If you’re a theater fan you may recognize the term from the musical “Hamilton,” when Aaron Burr says incredulously to Alexander Hamilton, “You punched the bursar?”) The bursar’s office typically isn’t involved in the financial aid process, but it’s often where you can ask questions about your bill or set up a tuition payment plan.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              The cost of attending a public university or college can vary, depending on whether you live in the state where the school is. Tuition at state schools for in-state residents is typically much less than that paid by out-of-state students because residents’ tax dollars help support the institution. You may also need to be a resident to qualify for certain state scholarships. Residency requirements, which allow you to pay the lower price, vary by state. Some may mandate that you (or your parents, if they support you financially) have lived in the state for a year or more to qualify, while some require as little as six months; others have no minimum residency period at all. Some states that want to attract more students may offer in-state rates to residents of neighboring states. If you’re interested in attending a college and wondering if you qualify for in-state tuition, be sure to check the rules first; the website SavingforCollege.com has more details. You may need documents that prove you’re a resident, like a high school transcript or diploma, a tax return or a voter registration card.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              The simplest way to study in a foreign country is to arrange it through a domestic college’s study abroad office. Start preparing early — ideally, at least a year before you want to go — to make sure you meet any deadlines. Some colleges organize their own programs or have formal relationships with schools overseas, and some even own international campuses. But many colleges work with affiliate agencies to coordinate foreign study. It’s common for students in the United States to travel abroad as juniors, whether for a single semester or a full academic year. Summer programs are also an option.Typically, your home college must approve your application to study abroad, to make sure that the classes you take overseas count toward your degree back home and that you will be able to graduate on time. Once your college signs off, an affiliate program may take over management of your trip. Details vary, but at some colleges you’ll pay the same tuition and fees for the study abroad semester as you would if you stayed home. Extra costs like airfare, ground transportation and passport and visa fees can add to the price. Federal financial aid can be used for study abroad while enrolled in domestic college and for getting a degree from an international college, but in the case of the latter you need to check with the school’s financial aid office — the federal student aid office has a list that’s updated quarterly.If you want to get a degree directly from an overseas institution — instead of just visiting for a year or a semester — you’ll have more work to do and must be especially motivated. Make sure you can use your financial aid there; the federal Student Aid Office maintains a list of schools that accept U.S. student loans.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
Undocumented students — those born abroad, who are not citizens or legal residents of the United States, including DACA students — are not eligible for financial student aid from the federal government. (DACA stands for Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, a government policy adopted in 2012 that applies to certain undocumented immigrants brought to the United States as children. DACA recipients, sometimes called Dreamers, are protected from deportation and can receive temporary work permits; the policy has been ruled illegal, but remains in effect for current beneficiaries pending appeal.)Undocumented students may qualify for financial aid from some states, colleges and private scholarships, although eligibility varies. In some states, they may qualify for in-state tuition at public colleges in certain circumstances, but others treat them as foreign students and charge higher, out-of-state tuition. Information is available from the College Board and from groups like TheDream.US, a nonprofit that works with colleges and businesses to help Dreamers attend college.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              International students are not eligible for federal student aid — that means no federal loans, no federal grants and no federal work-study programs.There is also limited aid from the colleges. Why? Experts say the institutions often view international students with dollar signs — they expect to profit off them.But some colleges will offer aid, and that’s why it’s smart to do some research before applying. Start by learning about a college’s individual policy on international students — review its statistics on how many it has admitted in the past and whether it provides them with any aid. College websites often have this information. You can also check out resources geared toward international students, including EduPASS and Education USA.There are only nine colleges that do not take into account a student’s ability to pay when deciding whether to admit them, and that also meet the full financial need of international students (this is called need-blind admissions). They are Amherst College, Bowdoin College, Dartmouth College, Georgetown University, Harvard University, the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Princeton University, Thomas Aquinas College and Yale University, according to Mark Kantrowitz, a student aid expert and the author of “How to Appeal for More College Financial Aid.”There are a few dozen other institutions that may offer generous discounts, but these colleges are more likely to take into account your ability to pay when deciding whether to admit you in the first place. Financial aid is more common for international graduate students than undergraduates.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
              Students going to college later in life, instead of as teenagers right after high school, can apply for federal financial aid like anyone else by submitting the FAFSA (Free Application for Federal Student Aid); there’s no age limit, the Education Department says. Have kids? While there’s no federal student aid specifically for parents, federal aid can be used to help pay for costs such as child care while a parent is in school. The department’s website offers a checklist for older students. Some states may offer grants and scholarships for older students, and some have offices dedicated to promoting adult education. Try contacting your state’s higher education office to see what’s available.One possible concern: If you want to return to college but have old student loans that you haven’t paid, you aren’t eligible for financial aid unless you take steps to resolve the default. Now might be a good time to consider doing that, because the federal government is offering a temporary “fresh start” program to help move defaulted loans back into repayment.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Some public and private colleges offer free or reduced-cost tuition for older students, in some cases to adults as young as 50. Typically, if you want to earn credit toward a degree, you may have to wait in line behind traditional students, who get priority when signing up for classes. You usually must apply and be accepted through the college’s admissions process before you can enroll. And while tuition may be free, you may have to cover the cost of fees, labs and books. Some colleges are free only if you audit a course, or attend without earning credit. But it can still be a great way to expand your knowledge, learn a new language or keep your skills fresh. AARP, the advocacy group for older Americans, offers a state-by-state list.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              Yes. The military offers numerous programs to help pay for college, both for service members and for their spouses and children. Those serving in the National Guard or the military reserves may also qualify for help. The menu of options can seem overwhelming, and criteria can vary, so give yourself time to do some research.The armed forces and the Department of Veterans Affairs offer many forms of help for service members and their families through options like the Post-9/11 G.I. Bill, available to people who served after Sept. 10, 2001. The program pays up to 100 percent of tuition and fees for in-state public schools, depending on your length of service, and it can also help with paying for private colleges. Plus, some military members can transfer their unused education benefits to spouses or children if they meet certain requirements.The department also offers help paying for higher education to spouses and children of veterans and service members who have died, or who were captured or missing, or have disabilities. You can compare education benefits on the agency’s website.And for those who aren’t necessarily from a military family, attending competitive military schools like the U.S. Military Academy (known as West Point) and the U.S. Air Force Academy is tuition-free, in exchange for service after graduation. And many colleges participate in the Reserve Officers’ Training Corps, or ROTC, which provides scholarships for students who agree to serve.You can find details about the various programs at TodaysMilitary.com, a website produced by the Department of Defense, and from the Department of Veterans Affairs. The military publication Stars and Stripes also publishes an education guide.
              
                — Ann Carrns
 
              In a word: priorities, at least in part. American students often shoulder a greater portion of the bill than their counterparts in many other countries, which often subsidize costs with lower (or even free) tuition.In fact, public institutions don’t charge any tuition fees to students enrolled in bachelor’s programs in nearly one-third of the countries — including Denmark, Estonia, Finland, Norway, Sweden and Turkey — who are members of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, which includes 38 countries. And it’s often usually free at the master’s or doctoral levels as well.But American students, their families and the federal government also simply spend far more on each student pursuing higher education (about $36,200 annually) than those in most other developed countries, according to research from the O. E.C.D. (There is one country — Luxembourg — whose citizens spend more than Americans.)What’s driving that spending? Well, most of it is for the basic stuff you would expect — the salaries and benefits of the faculty and the staff on campus, along with costs of the academic research and development performed at many institutions. It’s not all driven by the fancy amenities that may lure affluent families to some of these colleges, though that is part of the equation. Even more important, there’s been a decades-long decline in support from state budgets, at least for public colleges.It’s also hard to generalize too much because the college experience in the U.S. is incredibly varied — there are different public colleges systems in each state with different levels of financing, private schools with endowments of varying sizes and for-profit colleges, whose students borrow more heavily than everyone else.“How much does a low-income student in the U.S. pay compared to a low-income student in France?,” said Phillip B. Levine, an economics professor at Wellesley College who has studied college costs. “That’s a hard question to answer. High-income students certainly pay more here.”Many higher education policy experts agree that more federal funding and transparency in college pricing would go a long way to help make college both more affordable and more equitable for students, particularly those who simply cannot afford to cover the tab on their own.
              
                — Tara Siegel Bernard
 
Project Credits
 
	Editing and production by Antonio de Luca, Alice Fang, Marcelle Hopkins, Amelia Pisapia, Nancy Ramsey, Dan Saltzstein and Hannah Wulkan. Research and development contributions by Jack Cook and Mark McKeague. Illustrations by Sean Dong. Reporting contributed by Ann Carrns and Tara Siegel Bernard.
 
Methodology
 
	In 2023 we asked readers what they wanted to know about paying for college. Their responses helped guide this resource, which was written and edited by The New York Times.
 
	The search function at the top of the page uses a combination of machine learning and human editing to understand questions and suggest relevant answers. The underlying technology was developed by The New York Times Research and Development team.
 
	If we don’t have an answer to a question you ask, the system takes note so that we can consider adding it. You can also tell us what you want to know using this good old-fashioned form.
 Produced by Antonio de Luca, Alice Fang, Marcelle Hopkins, Amelia Pisapia, Nancy Ramsey, Dan Saltzstein, Hannah Wulkan, Ann Carrns and Tara Siegel Bernard. "
nyt://article/a0fce067-0a8a-56e9-abbe-6cb63f514f57,https://www.nytimes.com/2022/03/01/podcasts/transcript-ezra-klein-interviews-adam-tooze.html,2022-03-01T20:17:08+0000,article,Op-Ed,16369,"[{'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Tooze, Adam', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'persons', 'value': 'Klein, Ezra', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"For more audio journalism and storytelling, download New York Times Audio, a new iOS app available for news subscribers. The Ezra Klein Show Every Tuesday and Friday, Ezra Klein invites you into a conversation about something that matters, like today’s episode with Adam Tooze. Listen wherever you get your podcasts. Transcripts of our episodes are made available as soon as possible. They are not fully edited for grammar or spelling. transcript I’m Ezra Klein, and this is “The Ezra Klein Show.” [MUSIC PLAYING] The world has been transfixed for the last week by Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and Ukraine’s remarkable, heroic resistance to the same. You can see these amazing, chilling images on social media, on traditional television. And so it’s easy to follow that side of the war, but that is not the only theater of this war. There’s this other battle playing out in the financial markets, and that war — that war is harder to see. But in the past few days, it has escalated from a limited counterstrike into a ferocious counterattack. It is a war that might decide what happens, ultimately, in Ukraine, and it’s a war whose effects are not going to be limited to what happens in Ukraine. We may well be watching the end of one global economic order and the birth of another. The U.S. and Europe were clear from the beginning. They did not intend to get into a shooting war with Russia, not over Ukraine. But they did intend to use their financial might to punish Russia if it invaded Ukraine. They meant to sanction Russia, to cause financial pain to the country, and particularly to its ruling class. But not to crack its economy, not to cause undue harm to their own economies, which are now interwoven with Russia. And so in this way, it looked like the logic of globalization had become inverted. Rather than trade and interdependence restraining Russia from doing something like invading Ukraine, it appeared to be restraining the West’s ability to respond to Russia invading Ukraine. And that was where things stood on Friday. But then social media, television, it filled with images and videos of the remarkable courage of Ukraine’s defenders, the indelible leadership of President Zelensky, the knowledge that Russia was not just storming to the capital, that this was going to be much harder for them than people had thought. And all that together, it shamed Western leaders; it changed the politics of the West. And so by Monday, a limited economic punishment had become something else entirely — a full out financial war. Russia now stands on the precipice of economic collapse. And Putin— Putin knows it. He’s treating this not as an annoyance, but as a mortal threat. In response, he raised Russia’s nuclear threat level. He’s responding to financial war with the threat of nuclear war, implying that if the West broke his economy, he might break the world — which is all to say, you cannot understand the war happening in Ukraine without understanding the war happening around Russia’s economy. And so I wanted to have Adam Tooze on the show to explain it. Tooze is director of the European Institute at Columbia University. He’s an absolutely brilliant economic historian. And he’s the author of the invaluable newsletter, Chartbook, which I subscribe to, and all of you should, too. Not all newsletters are worth it, this one actually is. And he’s been closely tracking the economic dimensions of the conflict here, and so I asked him to join me to analyze them. But this is a bit of an unusual show. We spoke on Friday, February 25th. But by Monday — by Monday, the situation had changed, in ways it demanded the analysis change too. But thinking about this and reading the conversation, I didn’t want to edit it into a false omniscience. The rapid, unpredictable way the conflict evolved — that’s really the point. That’s not some mistake. So what you’re going to hear here are two conversations. First, our Friday discussion, which I think is really important, because Tooze lays out the economics of the conflict as it was understood by both sides at the beginning of the war. You cannot understand how we got here without understanding what both sides predicted, what they thought to be true. But then, on Monday, we talked again to discuss how it had changed so dramatically in just a few short days, what that revealed about the false assumptions of the players, and the way that events are driving a rapid escalation neither side expected and neither side planned for. And I think when you sit with that, when you see how quickly this is changing, then you realize actually what dangerous territory we’re really in. As always, my email, ezrakleinshow@nytimes.com. [MUSIC PLAYING] Adam Tooze, welcome back to the show. Good to be here. Sorry it’s under these circumstances, of course. There’s something you wrote a little while ago now that’s been in my head watching this play out, which is, quote, “The first to expose the fact that global growth might produce not harmony and convergence, but conflict and contradiction, was Putin in 2007 and 2008.” Tell me about that. Yeah, I mean, the comment is framed now very much against our knowledge that — with the clash with China, that has become a much — even bigger question. But I do think that it originates in that moment in 2007, ‘08, between Putin’s now famous speech to the Munich Security Conference in February and then the clash over Georgia. And I think that’s the moment when it becomes clear that not only do — as it were — the old antagonists of the Cold War have resentful legacies, but those will take on a new significance precisely as a result of the success of what was generally thought to be of the antithesis of that old era of division, namely globalization, because globalization was supercharging the development of Russia by way of the huge demand for raw materials, unleashed by China’s growth, from the 1990s onwards. And so Putin, by 2006, ‘07, is presiding over the restoration of a Russian state which has emerged from the disastrous crisis of 1998. By that point, it’s — I think — the third largest holder of foreign exchange reserves, one of the largest owners of American sovereign debt, and he’s paid back the IMF loans and all the financial humiliations in the ‘90s. And precisely on the basis, if you like, of Russia’s raw material strength, is now in a position to actually state — you know, his red lines— which are essentially the same as the ones that he’s prosecuting now — that he doesn’t accept, as it were, the order that emerged from the 1990s. But he was able to do it on the basis of economic strength. And that economic strength is itself the result of our demand, the West’s demand, or the collective global economy’s demand for the raw materials with which Russia is so richly endowed. And that is a huge problem. I mean, that’s a huge wrinkle in the underlying conception of globalization from the 1990s, which was much more Panglossian, much more pollyanna-ish. Right, that fundamentally believed that everything was good in the world, and that more economic growth would produce convergence or harmony, and— do commerce, right, this idea that through exchange, we would grow closer together. I think that was the moment where we really began to get a flavor for the fact, and a sense of the fact, that that might not be the case. Give me a moment of the Panglossian view. Give me a taste of the argument that, as we grow, as we integrate, as our economies intertwine — this is sounding vaguely romantic, I realize— that the economic logic of globalization, that there are gains to trade, we’ll get cheaper things, our economies will grow, also has a geopolitical logic, also has a geostrategic logic. Why did people think these were tastes that went together? Well, I mean I think there is a kind of romantic feel to it. There is wanting to have your cake and eat it kind of liberal logic here, which one shouldn’t deny. I mean, you know, wouldn’t it be good if it were true? And within the legally settled spaces of nation states, this — liberalism is very heavily committed to this idea. And it is analogously leery of any reference to class war. It doesn’t like that either. It doesn’t like the idea that economic growth could generate massive inequality, and not just inequality, but sharp, polarized division at home, either. So it’s a kind of double blind spot. And the idea at the international level is that — yes, in a sense, nation states were kind of excrescence. Right, they shouldn’t be there. Really, fundamentally, humanity is tied together by certain common interests, which are satisfied in this view, and optimally satisfied by peaceful and free exchange, and the common pursuit of innovation and prosperity. And furthermore, when you have a structure like that in place, you would expect it to cement powerful interests on all sides that would then resist war. It’s what Palardy called the peace interest. So powerful, heavy hitting groups — not just, as it were, sentimental attitudes — resist the onset of conflict because it ruptures those trade relations. It has a romantic side, but there is also a kind of realist version of this, which says, well, if in the end, money talks, you’d expect money to talk peace quite a lot of the time. And that, I think, is the idea. And there are moments in the ‘90s, there are moments beyond the ‘90s, when this doesn’t seem like an implausible idea. In fact, all the way down to the present day, one has to really pinch oneself to believe this is happening, given the losses that are being inflicted on, no doubt, powerful and influential people in Russia at this moment. I mean, the oligarchs are not doing well out of this. And if you think about analogous conflicts around Taiwan or something like that, the global semiconductor industry isn’t just the supply chain. It’s one of humanity’s great technological scientific achievements. Our ability to do this stuff at nanoscale is us up against the face of God in a sense. And it happens to be in Taiwan, and are we seriously going to talk about D-Day style amphibious operations — you know, and dig trenches, and attach explosive devices to fabs, which are the human spirit incarnate. Like, there’s something totally incongruous about this, right? They are also capitalism, and they also have geopolitical consequences. That’s the fly in the ointment. But anyway, if you wanted to tie down that liberal vision and give it meat, I don’t think we should deny it and cast it off as, you know, childish stuff. There’s a profound rationality there. And historically, there are moments when it’s clearly vindicated. And in the right space, with the right framing, it can be very generative. And indeed, these logics work themselves out. And the Europeans, of course, insist that they are the very paradigm of that logic. So Russia, for the past decade, maybe more, has been inflicting, exposing, the problems of this logic on the world. But before that, the problems of the logic are inflicted upon Russia. And I want to go back to that history for a couple of minutes here, because I think it’s important that the Soviet Union falls. American investors and economists and advisors flood into the country as it opens up. There’s this idea that Russia will become this economic miracle — this shock therapy. It will become this economic miracle, as all these Western economic ideas meet all this productive might and untapped genius and potential. And then it doesn’t. So what happens? What goes wrong in the immediate post-Soviet Union effort to turn the Russian economy into a westernized success story? Well, I think the first thing to say is that it was always a gamble at, like, extremely long odds, right? I think you have to go back to the late Soviet period to see just how blocked the political economy of Russia, of the Soviet Union, had become, how the Communist Party— unlike in China— had essentially become a kind of bracket around a pre-oligarchic configuration of interest groups in agriculture, in heavy industry, and the military industrial complex. And that’s essentially what, as it were, creates the impasse which produces then a very serious — what will be a hyperinflationary problem in the end, to which anyone in charge of Russia at that moment would probably have had to have responded with the shock therapy element, which is the price of liberalization, because there’s really not a whole hell of a lot of other options there. The bad politics really begins — and it’s largely outside the influence of foreign experts — at the moment of privatization. And it’s the extraordinarily corrupt process through which the assets of the Soviet Union were disposed in the mid ‘90s, really, that produces the move in the wrong — what I think many people would regard as the move in the wrong direction. I mean, Russia is not after all an economic basket case. This is another important point to make. The story now ends with disappointment rather than disaster, but the possibility of a kind of a liberal, democratic model was probably obviated at that time. And furthermore, of course, the West has a limited degree of influence over this, but we back, after all, Yeltsin, who presides over this, who navigates his way through this oligarchic division, including in his violent stand off with his opponents in the Russian parliament, including in the manipulation of the ‘96 election that he wins, but it’s quite clearly a manipulated outcome. And then nothing we do from the outside, none of the aid we provide, can stave off the disaster into which Russia slides in 1998, which is crippling. And this is a moment where a nuclear armed ex superpower is — basically, most of its economy as dollarized. People are paying their taxes in dollars. It’s really showing all of the signs of a disintegrating, dysfunctional, failed state by that point. And the story of Putin is not understandable, except against that backdrop. I mean, the basic claim to legitimacy on his part, and it’s not easy to just sort of wipe away, is that he has rescued Russia from that. Now obviously, a critical political analysis would say— yeah, there are a variety of contributing factors beyond Putin’s iron determination. But that backdrop is critical. But how does he — or the variety of contributing factors — rescue Russia from that? What is the capsule story of the foundation upon which the Russian economy is rebuilt from disaster into disappointment? The fundamental distinction, I think — even, like, supporters of Putin would make — is that it went from being a kleptocratic, crony capitalist regime to being a state capitalist regime. And the fundamental story here is the reconstruction of the apparatus of the Russian state. It’s very complex, and the criminologists of the modern day have five, six, seven, eight different groups now that they see operating around Putin. But the trend is, take advantage as best you can of the resources, the oil and gas and other metallurgical exports — and also now, increasing the ag exports for delivering to you — but don’t be the failed petrostate of the 1990s. Be a high functioning, authoritarian regime, more like, I don’t know, one of the Gulf States or an authoritarian version of Norway, if you’d like to put it really provocatively, with a fairly considerable welfare state by emerging market standards, and a huge foreign exchange reserve. So one of the indices of this restoration of the state is the fiscal balance. And Russia — one of the reasons why Russian sovereign debt was beloved of foreign investors until last week is that Russia runs a very tight ship, fiscally. One of their commitments is not to allow runaway inflation anymore. And they set their budget target — I think the latest round was set at — they index it on the dollar price of oil. And I think they had set the budget to balance at an oil price of $45 a barrel, which by the standard of petrostates is really austere, right? I mean, the Gulf States set their budgets to balance at 70, 80, 90. So all of these are indicators of this consolidation of state power. But so, crucially there, I want to draw something out that you said, which is Russia becomes a major, export driven economy. Absolutely. And it’s exporting commodities, exporting energy, agriculture, but to the point that we’re beginning to draw on here, on globalization, what is happening is that Russia rebuilds by selling things it mines, it grows, and that to some degree, it produces to the rest of the world, and very particularly to Europe. I was looking at a breakdown of Russian exports, and I think we’re something like 3.5 percent of them. America is actually not huge in this. But I mean, Europe is a lot of Russia. And of course, China has become much, much bigger too. And so, I mean, Russia really does participate in the globalized economy and begin early and selling what it can pull out of its own ground to the rest of the world. Yeah, always has. I mean, this is a long, long tradition. Russia has always been — I mean, companies like Royal Dutch Shell, a large part of that business was originally the Rothschild Caucasus oil interest that was incorporated. It’s always been a bread basket. It’s always been a metallurgical sector for certain key metals. So yeah, it’s a Eurasian powerhouse of raw material supply. And that’s the knock on Putin, right? I mean, any half decent administration with this pile of raw materials, given Chinese demand, should have delivered 7, 8, 9 percent growth. That’s the liberal knock, and that’s where the disappointment comes in, which is — it’s all very well to crow about this huge resurrection of the Russian state, but you’re setting a relatively low bar here. You know, a well administered rule of law regime could conceivably have attracted even more foreign capital than Russia did, and it attracted considerable amounts, and could have produced even more welfare. Ukraine is caught between the powerhouse state type model of Russia and the powerhouse, E.U. driven, market driven assimilation model on the other hand in the West. And unsurprisingly, this creates a kind of — given Ukraine’s lamentable economic performance, it creates this kind of — not schizophrenic exactly, but this hugely oscillating self positioning of Ukraine. I mean, do they associate themselves with the more oligarchic Russian model, or do they — unsurprisingly, many of their citizens would prefer to align themselves with the Polish experience. But those are the benchmarks against which this is the kind of triangle of different experiences that help to locate what’s going on here. So Russia’s buildup of a large foreign exchange reserve has come up glancingly a couple of times. You write, “If you want a single variable that sums up Russia’s position as a strategic petrostate, it is Russia’s foreign exchange reserve.” You go on to say, “This is what gives Putin his freedom of strategic maneuver.” So tell me two things here. One is that foreign exchange reserve may not be the most familiar term to people, so what is it? And then why is it the core of Putin’s ability to invade Ukraine, to survive this, to strategically maneuver on the world stage? Yeah, I mean, a foreign exchange reserve on the scale the Russians have it is — if you start from the premises of a liberal, private sector based economy, a kind of anomalous thing, because what it is is a hoarding by some public agency. It could be the central bank, it could be the treasury, it could be a sovereign wealth fund, of the foreign currency proceeds of an export surplus. It’s difficult to accumulate one of these if you’re not running a trade surplus. But the trade surplus is, in a private sector economy, generally earned by private firms. It’s been a long time since America’s run one, so it’s hard to kind of invoke examples. But say— Germany does, right? And Germany doesn’t have a giant trade foreign exchange reserve, because the companies that earn the foreign exchange are Porsche and BMW, whatever. They don’t have any direct relationship, although VW is actually state owned. But it doesn’t feed into a state coffer. Whereas in states like Russia or China, there is, as it were, a systematic process of accumulating foreign claims, claims on foreign economies, in public hands. That requires abstention on the part of the state, right, you have to it commit to not spending this, because you could be spending this on goodies. You could be importing from abroad, but you’re not. You’re deliberately using — it’s like a blend of trade policy and fiscal policy — to constitute a cash reserve. Why would you do that? Because you want to be invulnerable against shocks from the outside. You don’t want to be in a position where your currency is devaluing in an uncontrollable way, your import bill, because that’s denominated in foreign currency, is surging, making the cost of living go crazy for ordinary folks who have to buy the foreign goods. You don’t want your debtors who’ve borrowed money in foreign currencies to suddenly be made bankrupt by the fact that their debts are now worth vastly more in local currency than they used to be, because your currency is devalued. All of this is what happened to Russia in 1998. And if you’ve got half a trillion dollars in foreign exchange reserve, you can do a whole variety of things in that kind of situation. You don’t need to worry about being able to import stuff, because you can cover your import bill for years, in the Russian case. You can, if necessary, sell those dollars into the market for rubles, which helps you prop up the value of the ruble. And that will then allow your debtors to buy time to pay off their debts, settle their debts, by hook or by crook, so that by some point then they can survive the devaluation which may in due course be inevitable. And what Russia has not just done — it’s not just run up this public foreign exchange fund. It has also, since 2013, ‘14 — the last Ukraine crisis — systematically squeezed down on the counter part of that, which often shows up in national balance sheets, which is private debts in foreign currency. So that’s, as it were, that’s the next level element of their hardening of the Russian economy. It’s not just first step, build up a big dollar reserve. But the second step is, look around every other aspect of Russian society and economy and shrink any outstanding liabilities in dollars. And they’ve done both bits. And that means that they are not exactly sanctions proof, but they are not going to panic when, as we saw, in the last couple of days, the ruble plunges, foreign debtors will no longer run — basically, the Russian government can’t borrow from creditors anymore, certainly not in the last week. So it doesn’t need to. So that’s the resilience that you get there. So I really want to hold on this for a minute, because it’s probably some unfamiliar territory. But I think this is so important for understanding the logic of the situation. We are so used to thinking of wars in terms of, how many troops do you have? How many missiles? What kinds of technologies do you have? And what you’re saying here is that Russia has spent years building up, on the one hand, a storehouse, of dollars— to some degree, euros — such that if they get cut off from being able to get lots of dollars and euros, it doesn’t really matter. They can survive that. And then on the other hand, bringing down the debts and thus leverage that their private sector players absorb, such that Western actors would have leverage over them. And so they have actually spent years using the tools of globalization to harden their economy against the weaponry of globalization. That if you think of one of the ideas in — globalization will create a kind of economic harmony. If you think of the stick next to that carrot, it’s — well, if you’re deeply entangled in the global economy and you become a bad actor, then you can be cut off. And if you’re cut off from that trade, if you’re cut off from that ability to participate in the financial system, if you’re cut off from the ability to get the currencies in which a lot of your transactions are denominated, then your suffering will be immense. But what they’ve kind of been doing is playing one side but not the other. They’ve been participating the global economy and building up their reserves and hardening in that way, but at the same time, purposefully reducing their vulnerability to the sticks of sanctions, and so on, which we’re about to talk about in detail. Yeah, I mean, the buzzword here is weaponized interdependence, and there’s a whole bunch of scholars, colleagues have been working on that issue. And I think it’s important to recognize — I mean, and in the first instance this was not part, I think, of an expansive, revisionist, geopolitical vision. I think in the first instance, it was a recovery from the 1998 trauma, which was severe. And I think it’s difficult for us, sitting in comfortable and affluent, or relatively stable societies, to really understand quite how severe that shock was. I mean, Russia in ‘98 at one point I think appeals for food aid. I mean, like, we’re really talking about an existential crisis. But yes, undoubtedly, this is true that Russia — you know, it’s a typical medium strategy, medium power strategy, or an insurgent type strategy. It has to take a comprehensive view of the exercise of power globally because it doesn’t have the privilege of economic dominance. So it knows that it’s vulnerable. It knows if it wants to have autonomy. And with that, if he wants to realize what sovereignty actually means, in other words, your ability to take action on your own terms, not indefinitely without any constraint, but buy yourself a degree of room for maneuver, then you need to think across the bandwidth of options. And you can’t treat economics as separate from the other dimensions of power, which is the conceit of liberalism. But I think they understand that it’s also the hypocrisy of liberalism because they don’t think that we, the Americans, or the West really do either. It’s just that the game has gone so far away that we can proclaim the endless future of economic prosperity, a joint economic prosperity. And what that really just means is an endless future of ally power and our dominance. And if you’re coming at it from their angle, they do indeed always need to see the other side. And we cannot ignore the history of the ‘90s and the early 2000s without getting into kind of moral equivalence and whataboutism and just causally to understand what the Russians are doing. You have to see the way in which they make sense of Iran, Iraq, Kosovo, that entire realm of essentially discretionary action by major Western powers on their own terms. And Russia has indeed been preparing for that. So during the Cold War, one of the definitional features of the Cold War is a willingness on the part of the West to commit or at least threaten force. We commit force in Vietnam. There’s the standoff in Cuba. And the fear is this will go all the way up to nuclear war. Over the past months, the Biden administration, to their credit, has been saying Russia is going to invade Ukraine. They have been raising the alarm. They have been called alarmist for it. A lot of people doubted the intelligence. They were right. But they have also made perfectly clear that if Russia invades Ukraine, they are not going to commit troops. For all that we knew this was coming or the administration knew it was coming, there was not a decision made to say line up American or NATO troops on the Ukrainian border. And the signal is if Russia does this, they will be punished economically with sanctions. So before we get into specifically what the sanctions are, what are sanctions? What is the intention of this kind of weapon? What do they do? And what do they not do? Well, I mean, it’s a hugely contested field. And there’s a brilliant new book out by Nick Mulder on the economic weapon that addresses the history of sanctions. And they have a really kind of complex and twisted history, as he shows, that they’re kind of liberalism’s favorite weapon. I mean, they’re on a spectrum, which is an ugly spectrum that starts with blockades, huge warfare, economic sanctions, and then goes to things like strategic bombing and ultimately, various types of deterrent strategy. And they’re all forms of the exercise of power and indeed coercion and violence— I think we should be clear— short of the classic battlefield entanglement or naval warfare or aerial combat. They may, in fact, entail— certainly, regularly, do entail naval combat and/or at least naval interdiction and/or aerial interdiction. But they fit in that kind of space. I mean, the sanctions that we think about now are peculiarly legalized product of a century of experimentation, which all starts really in its modern form with the League of Nations, or you could say it starts with the British, French, and ultimately American blockade of Germany in World War I and then is adopted by the League of Nations in the 1920s, the forerunner to the U.N., as the world community’s ultimate weapon nonviolent, quote, unquote, “against somebody who transgress the laws of peace.” And so rather than yourself having to go to war against an aggressor, what you do is impose economic sanctions, which are either supposed to be a deterrent to prevent action. And that will work best against small actors for whom the prospect of sanctions is crushing. Or it could be a form of siege. In other words, you punish the bad actor and hope that attritionly, this will affect their choices. It could be as a result of a domestic uprising or it could be as a result of elites simply saying, look, boss, we’ve got to change course, this isn’t going well. Or it could be functional. And it was, they just can’t carry on. That’s the risk which any potential challenger in the global system now knows that they could face, I mean, after the experience of Iran or Venezuela or North Korea, whatever. [MUSIC PLAYING] So Joe Biden, when he lays down the second and harsher tranche of sanctions here, he says, quote, “No one expected the sanctions to prevent anything from happening.” So explicitly he says, these are not deterrents, which is to say, in the typology you just offered, their siege. But you’ve looked at these pretty closely. What did we do in the sanctions? And what didn’t we do? Yeah. I mean, the president was actually— I mean, given his delivery, it’s always quite difficult to discern what his main point is. And this isn’t to say he isn’t coherent. It’s just something about his delivery that is strangely unfocused. But he was, in fact, quite frank about what the sanctions are doing. And what I think the model here is on both the European and the American part is that they are going to surgically strike at the bits that hurt inside Putin’s regime. I mean, he’s literally said it. He kind of mumbled it out, but it’s right there in what Biden said. These sanctions are carefully calibrated not to interrupt payment for energy deliveries. Now, at that point, really the game should stop because if we’re not interrupting the payment for energy deliveries, we are not hitting the bit of the Russian economy, which generates the juice, which sustains Putin’s regime. Now, they could then say, well, that isn’t the point. Our point is this targeted attack on the political elite and the targeted attack on key financial institutions, they are being cut out of the entire dollar correspondence system, which means it really won’t be able to do international banking very easily. And I think the idea must be, if you strike at those two elements, the financial infrastructure and the elites, that you’re going to produce an effect. And I think reporting suggests from inside that there was a somewhat, I mean, understandably multi-sided debate in the Biden administration about whether or not this would work as a deterrent. You can’t but hope that it will. But now, I think given the worst has happened, clearly, they’ll say, no, that was never the plan. And in fact, always this is about this kind of change. But having exempted the energy sector, they are not— and again, they’re very clear about the motives for that because, I mean, they’ll hurt the Europeans and it’ll hurt American consumers too badly. I mean, in the American consumer case, it’s, I think, a more— I mean, it’s a more of a stretch. But in any case, that’s the logic, it’s quite explicit. And so they’re trying this more targeted smarter sanctions kind of model. I want to get it something important there because we are talking— we’re speaking, we’re in America, despite your lovely accent. And we are talking about the Biden administration as the actor. But the sanctions are not simply a Biden administration operation. They’re in consultation with Europe. And talking about Biden’s lines and the places where he’s a little bit unexpectedly honest, two things here. One is we understand— this has been said pretty clearly. It has been reported quite clearly, actually, going back months now— that Germany has lobbied and pushed for the sanction exemption on energy. And we can talk about more of the specifics there, but there’s a real European fear about cutting off Russian, particularly natural gas is my understanding. And then secondarily, there was a possibility being floated to cut Russia out of the SWIFT system, which is international financial machinery that I will let you explain its function. They did not do that at least yet. And it’s possible that they will in the coming days. They did not do that yet. And Biden, somewhat to my surprise, says in his comments, that that is because the Europeans would not agree to do it. So can you talk a bit here about these decisions and the role that Europe’s integration with Russia is playing? Because it’s funny, it really inverts the logic of globalization creating harmony. You’re seeing here that it also creates leverage of the bad actor on those who would like to maintain harmony. No, absolutely. I mean, there are three separate issues. So one is whether or not it’s illegal to conduct transactions with Russian actors through the right kind of intermediary around things like energy. And the Europeans and the Americans seem determined to green light that. Then, there are the sanctions which Biden did announce, which as he insisted — and I think quite rightly and expert opinion seems to concur — are really massive, which are to block the assets of Russian banks in the United States for some of them, and for others, just excise them from the dollar-based interbank relationships. So this is this correspondence banking which Biden announced. He was then asked by journalists, Mr. President, what about SWIFT? And SWIFT is the thing that everyone’s been talking about, and it’s become this sort of standard of whether you are hardcore on sanctions is, do you favor cutting the Russians out of SWIFT? And I think the smart money says, well, actually, the correspondence banking thing does that to a considerable extent. And in any case, the real issue is energy. And if you’re exempting that, it doesn’t matter what you do. But SWIFT is, it’s kind of like, as far as I understand it, it’s like an email system for banks. It’s a form of secure, rapid, efficient digital communication between international banks. It’s not government to government. Those central banks may have SWIFT numbers. It’s a club essentially, and it’s not based in America. It’s based in Brussels. And it’s a private entity. And the idea is that as it were if America threatens actors on the Russian side, then people who do business with them through SWIFT will become liable. SWIFT itself could become liable for one of those really nasty American lawsuits with which they have hounded both European and Asian bankers and business people. And so SWIFT will then, as it were, just choose to exclude Russian members from its system, and that would hamper their ability to do conventional international banking. I think the consensus now is that if you push the correspondence banking measures which Biden imposed yesterday or announced the imposition of, then that actually does the work. But yes, both with regards to the energy carve-out and with regard to SWIFT and forceful action on SWIFT, which would be stigmatizing because the previous countries that have been cut out are Iran, Venezuela. So it would put Russia in that box. Europe pushed back and pushed back quite hard, and they pushed back for existential reasons, right, because 50 percent of the natural gas on which a large part of German power generation, domestic heating and cooking fuel, and industrial feedstock depends would be cut off. And the German government doesn’t want to contemplate that any more than Biden in a midterm election year wants to contemplate a dramatic spike in gas prices. So we’re going to get at this explicitly later, but I just want to note as we go through this part of the conversation that if China is in your head here, I don’t think you’re wrong to have that as subtext. And I say that in part for this question, which is, I think we’re seeing that on energy almost no matter what they do because a direct invasion of Ukraine is about the single largest violation of international law norm you can possibly imagine. It just doesn’t get bigger. Russia is just too big to fail. They are too big to sanction. They have just attained a centrality to the global market where no matter what they do within imagination, Germany and the UK and so on are just going to say, well, that was bad but not so bad that we are going to absorb the cost of cutting you out. I, broadly speaking, agree. That’s exactly. But it depends a little bit on the conjuncture in the sense that the oil and gas markets at this particular moment are as tight as they’ve been in living memory, right? So that makes things even worse. And it’s just not obvious, for instance, that if you take three million barrels of Russian oil exports a day out of the market that Saudi Arabia can step up to match that missing supply. I think, in fact, we know for a fact, they can’t. Oh, they probably cannot. They absolutely can’t. And likewise, gas is even more complicated because it requires either pipelines or liquefaction, LNG terminals. And that’s a 5 to 10-year time horizon, massive investment, and we just don’t have the capacity for that. So it’s those particular constraints. I mean, people talk about this as a completely irrational move on Russia’s part. They’ve been timing this. This was certainly the year to do it and not 2020 when oil prices went negative briefly. So they are indeed really hard to sanction at this particular moment. And in the grain market, they’re an even bigger deal, right? So between them, Ukraine and Russia supply 23 percent of the global stock of wheat exports, global flow of wheat exports. So they’re staggeringly large in that space. And if I’m not wrong, though, agricultural, and in fact, commodity and ag experts in general are also exempted under the sanctions. Surprise, surprise, they are. Yeah, under a rubric which also includes medicines and — but yes, they are. Yes, that’s General License 6 maybe. The energy one is General License 8. And so apparently, there was panic buying. And we aren’t the first people to learn this. There was a panic buying of loaves of bread across the Middle East, which are heavily dependent on Ukraine and Russian grain until somebody informed the bakery shops in Lebanon that, in fact, General License 6 applied. And they literally put up posters in their store window saying, no, American sanctions will not apply to agricultural goods. So where people are actually sensitively dependent on this rather than it just being a kind of abstract discussion like the one that we’re having, the knowledge of the limits of these sanctions is fairly widespread. Although I’m still quite worried about this piece of it. I mean, we’ve been talking really about Russia here, but Ukraine itself is a massive wheat provider. Lebanon imports 50 percent of its wheat from Ukraine, Libya 43 percent, Yemen 22 percent — I mean, Yemen is in a disastrous state right now — Bangladesh 21 percent. So you can exempt Russian wheat production, which will presumably continue relatively unchanged, but Ukraine is being invaded by Russia. Their wheat production is probably not going to continue unchanged. And it does seem that the downstream consequences for fragile countries and their food supply could be severe. Especially against the backdrop, again, in food markets as well of very elevated prices. It’s one of the untold neglected stories of the inflation surge is that food price spike, which hits low-income countries hardest. So I mean, global stocks are quite large. So I think there shouldn’t be absolute shortages, but the price squeeze, especially for lower-income countries, could be very severe. And Ukraine is a low-cost — it’s a kind of bargain basement wheat provider. So its clients do tend to be lower income. So we’ve been — as you said, there’s a strategic economic logic here. We’ve been trying to lay out what Russia’s is. I think the way that the American and European sanction exemptions has been reported, has been discussed is as a kind of moral failure, an absence of the kind of backbone and commitment Putin himself is showing here. I think that you can read it the opposite way, too, given the history of very large countries invading smaller countries that do not want to be invaded, which is, if you really loathe Russia, you can say Putin is doing something probably completely disastrous for the Russian economy here, probably disastrous for Russia. The financial system is about to get somewhat strangled. They are about to be putting a tremendous amount of treasure and blood into trying to conquer and then pacify and then maintain Ukraine. America has had its own misadventures of this kind over the past few decades. We’re a richer country. We’re a bigger country. We have more allies in those ventures. And they have been, I would say, disastrous for America. Again, from the realpolitik approach, could you look at this and say, Vladimir Putin has made an insane calculation here, and the West’s interest is in letting him destroy his power on the shoals of this imperialist nostalgic fantasy? That’s definitely, as it were, the big liberal counter. In other words, that liberal harmony vision of economic growth as a compelling historical force will in the end come back to bite you. And it’ll bite you this way if it doesn’t get you the other. I mean, if that is correct, then, of course, you have to reckon with the fact that Putin already made his choice. I mean, he made his choice in ‘14 with the annexation of Crimea and with the backing of the separatists in Donbas. The Russians have been living under sanctions of various types since then. And the regime has shown a considerable ability to harden itself. And I think probably Putin would shrug and say, well, that’s a small price to pay for the crowning of my legacy. Putin made a strategic move people reckon, I think, around 2013, ‘14 to rebase the legitimacy of his regime from the economic growth, the more conventional economic growth welfare model that had prevailed from the late ‘90s through to that moment, 2013, ‘14, to one that was emphatically based on nationalism and appeals to history and to grandeur and so on. So I don’t think — we may want to characterize it as mad, but it has its own logic. And the economic costs have been considerable but tolerable from the point of view of the Russian regime so far and indeed of Russian society so far. That isn’t to say — so when you talk to Russian liberals who are highly critical of this direction, some of them closely associated with the previous regime, the regime that prevailed up to 2013, ‘14, their scenarios for Russia admittedly before the current crisis were dismal over the 20 to 30-year time horizon. It has bad demographics. Productivity growth is lame. Becoming the privileged raw material supplier to China is no one’s idea necessarily in Russia of a high road to national prosperity and success. But they’re not of immediate collapse, and I think that’s what’s going to be tested in the next months and two years to three years. But the regime has already made that choice. It made that choice back in 2013, ‘14. And what it discovers, of course, is that when the dust settles, the customers come back. Germany’s dependence, Europe’s dependence on Russian gas has risen since the first Ukrainian crisis up to this week. It rose quite considerably. So that, I think, is something they also know. In other words, they have something other people want, and given time, those customers and those clients will come back. Could Russia do this without Chinese support? China is now Russia’s major trading partner. And so if it didn’t have China there, that would cause considerable problems. It doesn’t currently sell a huge amount of gas to China. It does sell a lot of oil. It certainly helps. If China was vigorously opposed and aligned with the United States in opposing this, I think the calculus would look very different from Russia’s point of view. But China isn’t India. It’s kind of ambiguous as well. It’s very much the outlines, if you like, of the coalitions of 2003. Again, not to bring up old history, but if you want to see a map of our current situation, look at the way opinion was divided in the United Nations in 2003. And I think many of those states essentially share Russia’s perspective that the existing order, as we like to describe it, is fundamentally illegitimate and inconsistent and hypocritical. And so if any one of them has a beef sufficiently large that they want to pursue it, and America is — as indicating as clearly as it is that it is — not going to escalate this beyond sanctions of a limited type, then they weigh the cost of distancing themselves and aligning themselves. I don’t think Beijing necessarily wanted this problem here right now, but if this is what Putin wants to do, they’re not going to — so this then alliance, I think, is quite conditional, quite pragmatic, but it is rooted in a fundamental alignment on this issue of the legitimacy of the existing order. If you’re Beijing, you’re watching the European response. You’re watching the American response. What are you learning? I think what you already knew. I mean, I think they’re very smart, and there’s nothing very surprising about what we’re seeing. You’re learning that America is refocusing. I would have thought from Beijing’s point of view there’s very little comfort in this because America is not taking the bait, right? I mean, America is not deeply engaging on this issue. They’re drawing lines. And I think the flip side of that is that America is serious about 10 years on from the Obama pivot now really actually performing that shift. That will be my read. I mean, you could read it just simply as weakness, but I don’t think that’s terribly convincing to be honest. And you already knew that the Europeans don’t have an independent military capacity and are hugely exposed to Russia for a crucial input. China’s not in that same position with regard to the Europeans. I mean, Europe is a huge market. It’s a larger market for Chinese exports than the United States, even. So there the exposure is more the other way around. But I don’t think that Beijing will be suddenly changing the parameters of its calculus in any significant way. If you’re Taiwan right now, what are you learning from this situation? I mean, exactly. I think the Japanese also are looking at this very hard and thinking thoughts. I mean, and you do have to wonder, don’t you, because one way— I mean, I’m going to talk about Europe just a second more because it’s where I’m more comfortable. But clearly in Europe, already the conversation has started about— in Germany, amongst serious people, I mean, we really actually do have to have some military capacity. It’s an extraordinary moment for a German historian of seeing the head of the German Army on LinkedIn, of all places, announcing his profound professional and personal humiliation of the fact that as a German soldier, he has nothing, quote, “nothing to contribute to this situation.” So if you’re Japanese or your Taiwanese at this moment and you’re watching this, you must be wondering as to whether or not you do not need to stand by for a big surge in defense spending to consolidate as it were themselves as harder nuts. And certainly, the Japanese in that case, we’ve seen a tendency that’s very strongly in that direction. And it’s not been disapproved of in any way by the — well, the Biden administration is complicated as we know, but there’s certainly one group around Kurt Campbell and folks like that that clearly have no problem with seeing a more militarized, more robust, local deterrent capacity on Japan’s part. Whether that goes to the level of nuclearization, which might ultimately be the final last-ditch defensive mechanism, I don’t know to be honest. Taiwan’s options are just so much more difficult. I mean, it’s difficult as a historian, and you step back and you go to kind of aestheticizing modes, right? But it’s difficult not to think of it as a somewhat tragic situation fundamentally because I don’t think there’s anything here that — my read is the one that we’ve been offering here after all — shouldn’t cause them to panic. I think they might be checking with Washington is like, is this read the appropriate one? Is the read here that Washington is doubling down, committing as hard as it possibly can to the Eurasian arena? If I was on their side, that would be the question I would be insistently posing. And I would imagine the Biden people would be reassuring them on that score. I want to ask then about how this reshapes also the economic world order. And there’s a paragraph from an Economist piece that I’ve been thinking about a lot, and I’m going to take a moment here and read it: “The longer-term impact will be to accelerate the division of the world into economic blocks. Russia will be forced to tilt East, relying more on trade and financial links with China. In the West, more politicians and firms will ask if the key tenet of globalization, that you should trade with everyone, not just your geopolitical allies, is still valid, not just for Russia but other autocracies. China will look at Western sanctions on Russia and conclude that it needs to intensify its campaign of self-sufficiency. The invasion of Ukraine might not cause a global economic crisis today, but it will change how the world economy operates for decades to come.” What do you think of that? I mean, broadly speaking, it seems like a plausible interpretation. I would wonder perhaps about, as it were, the core attributing this to Ukraine, per se. I think Ukraine probably intensifies pre-existing trends. The history here is interesting in the sense that the WTO round, the Doha Round, which was, as it were, the first to really embrace global development, collapsed between 2008 and 2009. So that emerges in retrospect, I think, as really quite a pivotal moment because since then it’s become clear that that’s really the direction that we’re traveling in anyway, right? So all of the big trade deals of the last decade or so have been regional blocks of different types. It gets interesting when you ask whether or not those regional blocks, which have been the logic of trade policy like NAFTA, like the EU in its extension, like TPP as was and now RCEP in Asia, now do they align with geopolitical divisions? And that I think is the less obvious questions to answer. And all of the information coming out of Asia as I understand it that the Biden administration is receiving is that none of America’s significant security strategy partners in Asia want an economic relationship with the United States that is exclusive with China. So in a sense, they want to mesh relationships like those which are now proving so complex for the E.U. with Russia. And they can’t go any other way because the dynamic. China is not Russia, right? China has been the main driver of economic growth for the last two decades. And we’re not just talking any old economic growth. We’re talking epic, historically transformative, world historic shift. And America is saying, well, opt out of that or opt against it or position yourself in a way which could be taken that way by Beijing, which is enough right now to cause almost incredible problems. And all of them say, no, even the Thailands of this world and the states which are most closely associated with the U.S. in security policy terms, South Korea. So that I think is a really fundamental problem going forward for American policy because it can commit credibly on the security policy side, but we know it is completely hamstrung not to say paralyzed on trade policy. So much so that I gather the American diplomats have very clear marching instructions when they’re in Asia whenever trade comes up. Market deepening or market opening is not up for discussion. Don’t misunderstand what I’m saying to you just so we’re clear because the domestic politics of it are so toxic in the U.S. So then you end up in a very lopsided world. So the economist vision rings true up to a point, but it’s not clear that the blocks will line up in a way that’s terribly favorable to the U.S., ultimately, I think, in Asia in particular. That seems right to me. But the thing I would add that I find interesting in that vision and that to your point feels to me like Ukraine crystallizing a pre-existing trend is a move toward supply chain self-sufficiency. I think Covid was a big part of this move as countries realized they didn’t have the mask capacity, the rapid testing production capacity, the vaccine production capacity, and then out of Covid, the economic disruptions. People want semiconductor capacity. That’s true for both America and China currently. They both want to be independent on semiconductors. It had felt to me already just watching what Congress was doing with the COMPETES Act and the other versions of that bill that they were trying to develop an almost supply chain self-sufficiency on the technologies they understood to be critical. I think now you look at what’s happening with Russia and whatever decisions people have to make today because they’re that dependent on them for energy or whatever it might be, they probably don’t love making that decision. For instance, I think that it is hard to imagine Germany signing the kind of natural gas pipeline deal with Russia in the next 10 years that they signed and now have frozen going backwards. And so the idea that we may be moving towards a period of time where there is much more national interest, pressure on the supply chain where the economic logic of globalization and the national interest logic of self-sufficiency diverge and people stop pretending that or believing that they’re twinned, that feels like a very big change that is, as you say, has multiple contributors but that Ukraine is really going to put a fine point on. I think when we come to supply chains, the term itself is so anodyne and so baggy, and it encompasses everything from face masks to microchips. And I don’t mean that in a trivial sense. It’s more complicated. It just doesn’t capture the existential significance of some rather than others, and energy is one of them. And I agree that the energy nexus between the West and its major suppliers will be once again put in question. And the answer after all is now very evident. In other words, we need to do a renewal, but we need to do an energy transition anyway. And one hopes that that logic now takes on a really dramatic dynamic in Europe. And that’s where the logic of that energy transition has already prevailed. Unfortunately, in the U.S., if you’ve been following Bloomberg or something, the frackers have just been having a fantastic 48 hours. It’s all about unleashing the fossil fuel regime. And we’re canceling Nord Stream and canceling Keystone. This is crazy. I mean, it’s a really toxic alliance. I think microchips are sui generis. I really think they’re in this special category all of their own like oil and gas. And because they are not just— I mean, they are the future, right? They are the — it’s not just iconic. It’s not a matter of symbolism. They’re literally the raw material out of which the new generations of technology have to be made. And the technologies required to do them in their current levels are so extreme that America doesn’t have a complete command of the whole set that telling in and of its own, in its own right. America doesn’t have the big fabs for the very latest chips. And that is a historic product. There’s a weird coincidence between, as it were, the liberal vision of globalization and this breakthrough in technology, which meant that this hugely strategic technology was inextricable it seems, interwoven with an East Asian post-Cold War myth, it turns out. And untangling that is a hugely complex problem. And what’s really remarkable in the current moment is that what we’ve seen is this unadulterated, straightforward, in-your-face hooking of the Industrial policy microchip logic to the national security logic. And it began under Obama but really took on an incredible momentum in the Trump administration in 2019 and 2020. And targeting Huawei was the beginning of that. But the Biden administration right now, I believe, is weighing the option of more intense sanctions on SMIC, China’s designated microchip champion. And that’s where we’re really going to see how serious this gets. But I think it’s sui generis but absolutely crucial. You’re completely right. And the scale of spending globally on national industrial policies in Europe as well, which has normally really drunk the neoliberal Kool-Aid and does not do that kind of thing, has been remarkable. I mean, it’s produced a huge row within European institutions about whether they’re really just going to toss out all of their competition regulations, incredibly restrictive rules on state aid. So yeah, it’s a turning point, absolutely. And that’s fascinating because not only does it bust, as it were, the general presumption that trade leads to peace. It kind of busts the general presumption that trade is just trade. It turns out that trade in different things, the economic categories, the economic statistics convey a false sense of homogeneity whereas what we’re really dealing with are the sinews of power, like the essentials, the material ingredients of life and power. And that’s even more corrosive of economics in a sense because then all our conventional calculuses just start going out the window. And that’s part of the reason why this has become so unfettered because in the name of microchips and sovereignty and independence, there’s virtually no amount of money you can’t justify spending. If we are entering what we feel to me to be entering, which is a renewed era of great power conflict, and whether or not you actually include Russia as one of the great powers is, I think, interesting, but you could call it a bloc with China as a great power, one of the really scary things about that is that climate change and decarbonization certainly strike me as things where you need very high levels of international cooperation or at least where it would be speeded along with fairly high levels of international cooperation. And I think a lot of the thinking has remained around pretty liquid energy markets, pretty easy cross-border shipments. The hotter conflict gets, the harder cooperation gets. And so one of the first casualties, it looks to me, from more great power conflict is less climate cooperation. And in terms of the way I think we all immediately move to, well, what if we have a nuclear war, and that’s terrifying. But also, one of the ways it seems very, very worrying for humanity as a whole is, what if our already quite fragile levels of international cooperation on this continue to deteriorate because it becomes issue 7 on agenda where issues 1 to 4 are more pressing to people? That, I think, is the crucial issue. I’m not sure I actually agree that right now the climate problem presents itself pre-eminently as a problem of global cooperation. There are certain aspects of the climate problem which do have that feature. But if you take the climate problem as seriously as I think we have to at this point and as seriously as I think big parts of the leadership in China increasingly are, it’s a national interest issue. You do it because you’ve got to do it. And furthermore, they increasingly see it as a zone of industrial policy competition. So you do it because you want to profit from the energy transition. I understand that’s a construction of this problem. That is the construction that I think is an optimistic construction of the problem in some respects, because it minimizes the amount of cooperation that’s actually necessary. There are certain domains within the climate space where cooperation, say, notably around development spending, development investment and in certain key technologies could be helpful. But we could be in a space now where it gets productively incorporated into competition between great powers in a way that it will be novel. We shouldn’t rule that out as an option. But I do absolutely agree, and it’s been very striking that, as it were, since now the climate problem is really a matter of urgency. We need to achieve major steps this year. We need to reduce emissions by 7 percent in 2022. And we are not focused on that problem right now. We’ve got other things on our mind. And furthermore, with this opening up and energy prices going berserk and this question of sufficiency being posed, as it were, it opens the door for the creeping influence of the rear-guard action of fossil fuel. It not just opens. It bursts it wide open and gives them the stage. And even though their logics are all terrible and even though their arguments are all bad and they should really be rejected, it becomes really difficult to fight them. And furthermore, in these moments where the President of the United States at a moment of crisis goes onto the rostrum and says, yes, American citizens, I promise to defend your right to cheap gasoline at all costs, including sacrificing this thing you might think is important, that doesn’t send a good signal either. And the Biden administration has been caught in that cleft stick really since the fall of last year when prices began to surge. And there’s a whole new space opening up for us right now of, as it were, as and when we get serious about the climate adjustment of how you maintain focus. I mean that, in and of itself, is going to be a hugely difficult issue. How do you articulate other things around climate rather than treating climate as number seven on the list of six other more important stuff? And in that respect, this is devastating. In a sense, Covid showed us another example where I think the logic worked the other way around where Covid in a sense supercharged an immediate crisis, mugged by reality kind of a crisis, in fact, drove the climate agenda in interesting ways. It’ll be interesting to see how this plays out. But the politics of climate no longer can be thought of a single issue. They clearly have to be articulated with everything else if they’re going to have any kind of chance of gaining the momentum that we need, which is I think, fingers crossed, is going to happen in Europe this coming year. If they go any other way, they really have — why don’t you give up hope? But there’s no reason why you shouldn’t read this crisis as a huge invitation to just go big on renewables and flexible reserve capacity. [MUSIC PLAYING] So here I’m jumping in to take a moment to say that was where we left part one on Friday. Then, over the weekend, Adam emailed me and said the new sanctions were a difference in kind, not just degree. We were now seeing a financial war against Russia that was beyond what anyone had expected and what anyone had forecast. And so we spoke again on Monday morning to talk about what had changed and why and what it meant. So here’s part two of our conversation. Adam Tooze, welcome right back to the show. Good to be here. OK, so we taped the first part of this episode Friday that was meant to just be the episode. It’s now Monday. What changed over the weekend? Well, first and foremost, I think most people’s expectations about how the war was going to go and the heroic resistance being mounted by the Ukrainians and the apparent incompetence and decisiveness of the Russian military have created this extraordinary drama. And into that then has come the escalation of financial sanctions from a kind of dim outline of what was going to happen last week to, by Saturday afternoon East Coast time, this dramatic declaration by the Europeans and the Americans together of all of the redlines crossing. I mean, they blew the Overton window right open, and I think did so very deliberately. They said, SWIFT, the payment system, this notorious interbank communication system, is on the agenda. We’re going to cut strategic Russian banks out of that system, and the Central Bank is not untouchable either. And then as the days have gone on and as the escalation has ramped up with Putin’s nuclear threats, by Sunday afternoon, we really had the concretization of this with the Europeans and now this morning the U.S. Treasury basically making it clear that they intend to freeze the assets of the Russian Central Bank. And that now has come to dominate everything else because that has unleashed a full-on financial crisis in Russia on Monday as the markets opened — or rather didn’t open because they couldn’t open them safely. So the Ruble has collapsed. And we’re moving into a situation tantamount to economic and financial warfare while the war is actually continuing. So sanctions that I think were originally designed as ex-post punitive of Russia’s behavior and abuse of international law are now becoming entangled with an actual ongoing conflict in which we are essentially in the position, say, of Roosevelt with the British in 1941, and it’s all measures short of war essentially, including the delivery of lethal weapons into an ongoing conflict. When I look back on our conversation on Friday, we talked a fair amount about SWIFT, which they’re doing at least a partial cutting out of some of these Russian banks from SWIFT. We did not talk about Central Bank sanctions. That was not understood to be on the agenda. But then you emailed over the weekend when that began moving up, and you said this would change everything in the response here. So why do the Central Bank sanctions matter so much? What does it mean to sanction a central bank, and how does it change the economic situation Russia is now facing? It totally changes the game because one of the things it totally changes is the status of those national foreign exchange reserves that we spoke about on Friday. And by any conventional metric are if you’re talking about financial crises or targeted sanctions of the type that Russia saw in the Ukraine — over the Ukraine and Crimea — after 2014, they are your bulwark. But that presumes that you can access them. And if the other parties in the state system of the world are willing to go as far as to declare your central bank — I’m not even sure whether to call it outlaw so much as criminal really, to declare it, as it were, ineligible for any kind of transactions, then those currency reserves that you’ve got are no longer really accessible to you. And now there’s an absolutely explicit mandate on the part of the Europeans in particular to stop any transactions. And the Americans have declared it prohibited for any American national. So at that point, the calculus tips, and it, for me, exposes, yet again, the way in which this conflict is really ripping up the playbook, changing the parameters because it made perfect sense to describe them as a source of stability before we went to this place because they had been. In ‘08 and ‘14, ‘15, they manifestly were. They were a way in which Russia could stabilize its exchange rate and just like other emerging markets have. And they do it certainly not assuming that the world is, as it were, friendly to them. They are supposed to be defensive potentially even against various degrees of aggression. But what the current moment exposes is that in an all-out war situation, essentially, this property of the state becomes forfeit insofar as it remains within the control. So Russia moves to the position of an Iran or an Afghanistan. After all, Afghanistan’s exchange reserves have been impounded, and half of them are going to be apparently given over to providing compensation to 9/11 victims. So that’s the kind of terrain that we could be in here. And this has never ever happened on this scale. I mean, the minimum estimate of how many reserves are within the Western orbit is in the order of $300 billion. So this is serious money with serious ramifications for the Russian financial system. Concretely, what it immediately means is they don’t have any firepower to stabilize their currency with. So they’ve been doing things like drafting the foreign exchange earnings of private corporations in Russia and banning foreign companies like BP that suddenly wants to sell its stake in Rosneft from doing so. So they’re freezing Western money in Russia, and if you like, drafting the foreign exchange reserves of Russian businesses. So this really is a foreign exchange regime. It’s the sort of thing you do in extremist or under war circumstances. If this is such a potent weapon, why was this not discussed, threatened, shown beforehand? Why was this not used as a deterrent possibility so Russia knew this would come? Why was it not imposed right after they invaded Ukraine? Why does this begin coming up Sunday, Monday after they invade, as opposed to weeks before so it can be in their calculus or immediately so it’s part of the punishment? I think this is a good question. I asked myself that question because it should have been obvious that this could be a move that they make. But it simply wasn’t. I mean, no one was discussing this as an option seriously. And I hate to use the analogy — because it’s become explosive — is that this is the nuclear option. So you don’t go there. Like, it’s the question you don’t pose. It’s the bad thought that everyone might be having somewhere buried deep down, but it’s a hugely dangerous thought. And you can see this in the analogies, right, because out there in the world, all of a sudden when this came on the radar, people started saying it’s the Iran option. But the problem with that analogy is that it’s far too close for comfort because the Iran sanctions obviously targeted Iran to prevent it from getting nuclear weapons. But we are now applying Iran-style treatment to not just a nuclear power, the number two nuclear power in the world, the old Cold War antagonist, in the middle of an active shooting war in which we are taking sides in which they are not making the progress they expect. And we are threatening by this means to deliver a devastating blow to their home front. I mean, panic in the streets, total disruption of the ordinary lives of tens of millions of Russians. So it’s a huge step. That’s, I think, why if we had of had it in our conscious minds, there would have been a no-no about talking about it. But the honest truth is it just wasn’t on people’s radar because we hadn’t placed Russia in the Iran, Venezuela, North Korea box. One oddity of all of it is that energy is still exempted from everything we’re talking about. Energy is exempted from the SWIFT cutoff. Energy is exempted as I understand it from the central bank sanctions. Energy as we discussed on Friday is the big Russian export where they get a lot of their money. They could presumably do some amount of currency stabilization hidden in their energy flows. It is strange to hear people talk about this as the nuclear option, and meanwhile have Russia begin to talk about literal nuclear options. And in the background, everybody is saying, but of course, we’re still going to do a lot of trade in liquid natural gas. Literally today, the gas pipelines are fully full apparently. Today, they’re fully absolutely Gazprom and the Ukrainian pipeline are thought to report they’re at full capacity. Nord Stream 1, as far as I know, is also fully operative. It’s happening right now, and money is flowing the other way. They have a hardened fiscal military apparatus in Russia. They’ll be fine. They will find ways to cope, but it’s very dramatic. I mean, the energy is going on because the biggest revenue flow for Russia is all about oil. And the Biden administration has flat out said — again, it doubled down on this on Friday last week — that it was not going to touch the oil markets. Whether they can really stick to that, the press secretary I think in conversations in the last 24 hours has begun to pull back from that. And I think the Europeans are now concertedly looking for alternatives, mapping out the options. Everyone realizes now this is going to be a more prolonged confrontation than anyone imagined. The shift in German opinion has been staggering and clearly is reciprocal. In other words, the liberals, the more right-wing members of the coalition government, have declared renewable energy is freedom energy. It’s kind of an ironic echo of the free to famous freedom molecules quote about American gas. And on the other hand, demonstratively, Green Economics Minister Harbeck has gone on television to say that they’re seriously weighing out the possibility of extending the lives of the nuclear reactors, though evidence seems to suggest it’s not actually a viable option and won’t make much difference in the critical period. But these are solidaristic moves on both sides to show that everyone is rethinking their parameters. Meanwhile, Schultz has gone to the Bundestag and asked for a staggering increase in German military expenditure. So there is a huge rearrangement going on. I want to hold on that piece for a minute because it seems profound to me. When you look at how this entire conflict was being framed even just a couple of days ago, it was Russia is considering invading Ukraine, and the West is going to treat this as an economic war. They’re not going to get involved in a shooting war in Ukraine. They’re not doing that much to — they were doing a little bit to give Ukraine defensive capabilities but not at any level that people thought would really make a difference. And now that feels like it is changing. The E.U. announced $500 million in direct military aid to Ukraine. It’s the first time the E.U. is giving direct provision of weaponry to a country under attack. Germany is proposing this $110 billion investment in the military. That is almost twice the country’s entire defense budget last year. That is wild. This is being talked about as a watershed moment in Europe’s defense posture. It is moving from an economic war to something that is being treated as a new paradigm for the E.U.‘s capability to get into and defend itself in shooting wars. How do you understand those changes? Is that overstating them, or is this something really new? Small as it is, the 500 million directly from the EU for weapons is really, that’s, as it were, a big taboo break. Sweden, neutral Sweden delivering lethal weapons? I mean, it’s staggering stuff, and it’s very, I think, on the one hand dramatic, and I’m die in the world to my dying death E.U.-adherent. And at that level, you celebrate these kind of moves as the way in which Europe makes itself through crisis. And the steps are in the right direction. And the promise from Germany is overdue. And I mean, as a historian, amongst other things German military history, it is staggering to have the chief of the German army declaring his embarrassment on LinkedIn of his inability to react. And these are amazing moments. But the alarming thing about this is, as it were, the shift, which is exactly as you said, from a position which was really ex-post — in other words, the invasion of Ukraine was not thought in itself to be historically meaningful because it was going to be so swift, and it was going to be annihilatory, and then the embarrassment of Ukrainian politics and Ukrainian sovereignty would go away, and we could move on — to a position where the heroism of the Ukrainians has made that impossible. And so we’re now in these incredibly fraught exchanges between Zelensky, who is acting out of his skin and really demonstrating an extraordinary capacity to do the Jupiterian thing essentially for real, I mean, under the threat of combat. And he’s basically pointing the finger at the E.U. and saying, here is the question. Will you have us or not? And that is extraordinary, because if one of Russia’s red lines is NATO, the other Russian red line, spoken or unspoken, is Ukrainian E.U. membership because that in some senses is a more profound challenge to Russia’s own model and its control over Eastern Europe and its hegemony. And that this is being opened up in the midst of combat, in the midst of an existential struggle where we may see these people killed more or less live on television as they refuse to surrender in Kyiv, and it has roused European public opinion to an astonishing extent, giant demonstrations in Berlin. So it’s very dynamic. I mean, I spend a lot of time thinking about Clausewitz, and this is the Clausewitzian triangle of battlefield military, grand diplomacy, and popular passion acting out in an extraordinarily dynamic way before our eyes with very, I think, unpredictable consequences and with huge potential for disaster on the part of the Ukrainians. Well, this to me is, it’s so important to understanding. The reason I wanted to do the show this way adding this on is because I think it’s important to watch the equilibrium here change. You’re watching war change the underlying structure of the conflict in real time. You mentioned Zelensky. I don’t think I’ve ever seen a more remarkable performance of a wartime leader, certainly in my lifetime. What he is doing in a completely new media environment, I mean, it is built, what he is doing, in many ways for social media. It is extraordinary. And if you go back even a couple of days and think about that triangle, I think that there was a calculation, a solving for the equilibrium where people were looking at Russia’s military or presumed military superiority over Ukraine. Then we were looking at the economic consequences both for Russia and for the West on various levels of sanctions. And we were solving for what looked like a stable output there. And into the middle of that comes Zelensky and this remarkably fierce and effective actually Ukrainian resistance. And social media, it blasts it into everybody’s home. You are watching this happen in real time. Zelensky is calling in with other ministers and saying, this may be the last time you hear me alive. Tell me a bit about how that changed the situation because on some level, the calculations around sanctions were calculations of domestic public opinion. They were calculations about what level of disruption European and American and U.K. citizens would absorb for Ukraine, which, in theory, they didn’t care that much about. But then, it happens. Then this immediacy of Zelensky, the images emerges, and the amount of caring, the passion on the part of a lot of these publics and even a lot of the elites in these governments changes. And the sanctions begin to change, and the conflict begins to change. So as a historian, can you talk a bit about the passion dimension of this because that’s what people were not predicting well? Well, they’re two things, right? And it’s exactly as you say the interaction between the dogged, ferocious, apparently successful resistance. I think we have to reserve judgment on the battlefield. I’m convinced that this is not done yet in two different dimensions, A, the siege of Kyiv and the big cities, and on the other hand, which could be apocalyptic and Syrian-like, and on the other hand, the pincer that is closing from the south that may in a sense destroy Ukraine’s ability to resist in the Donbas and will deliver to Russia one of their strategic goals, which is to secure the full territory of the Donbas. But nevertheless, this week in which the Ukrainian resistance has held up has changed the game exactly as you describe it. And another hugely significant thing is that Zelensky is not, as it were, just mobilizing his own population and the Ukrainian resistance. He’s not just mobilizing. But he is then posing the geoeconomic, geopolitical question and saying, and I want to talk about E.U. membership from the middle of this. Like, it’s as though from the middle of the Battle of Britain, Keynes and Churchill had said, we want to do Bretton Woods now. Can we talk about Bretton Woods? We want to talk about the future currency union because we’re going down in flames, and we’re going to dare you to tell us that dollar is going to rule here. I mean, it’s an extraordinary power play, hugely high stakes. And I think it reflects the fact that he knows perfectly well that under any other circumstances, the answer is no, nor do we want to talk about it, and we’ve told you this before. We don’t want to talk about this. One thing about the way Zelensky has not just mobilized opinion but mobilized the values of the E.U. in this moment — we were talking the other day about the way that Putin perhaps understood the dark side of the globalizing vision, that he understood that economic interdependence and growth maybe don’t create harmony, maybe creates leverage for conflict. Maybe he can do more because it actually will hurt Europe. It will hurt America more to cut Russia off. At the same time, Zelensky is showing that he understands the bright side of it, the value side of it. He is using this war and saying, well, you promised all of this. You said that if we were democratic, that if we defended ourselves and if you are country worthy of the international order, the international order will be there for you. And so one thing that really feels like it is changing is that Putin’s cynicism is all of a sudden being matched by Zelensky’s call to international optimism. And I am not — I want to be very careful. I’m not saying that is going to be enough for Ukraine to repel Russia. But it has really changed, it seems to me, the calculus for a lot of Western leaders, because they kind of switched into realpolitik mode with Putin. And they expected, it again looked to me, that everybody would follow them there. Then, when Zelensky and the Ukrainians didn’t follow, it transformed. And so maybe we underestimated, or maybe the power of this was underestimated going in. He seems to have understood that there was more leverage here than the West actually thought or planned for. I mean, how much premeditation there is here, I simply don’t know. And I think it’s going to be just, I mean, to speak about it in these terms sounds academic and coldblooded, but it’s going to be fascinating to see what the E.U. does with this, because, sure, clearly, the Ukrainians are demonstrating their resilient refusal to be subordinated by the force of Russian arms. And it’s extraordinary to see. And they are clearly willing to sacrifice their lives, their families. One is just humbled by it. But at what point is the E.U. going to say something along the lines of, but we also need to know that you’re really down with the rule of law because this patriotic rally is not the same thing as the rule of law. This is a patriotic rally. It’s absolutely bona fide. We have not seen the likes of this in Europe maybe since Prague ‘68 or Solidarnosc in the 1980s. Those are the examples. But that’s not the same thing as what we are asking for or have asked for and asked of you, and you, Ukraine, have failed to show even any signs of being able to move in that direction. That has been the European position all along, right? So it’s going to be an extraordinarily almost impossible problem, I think, for the European political class to resolve this issue. I find it hard to imagine at this point that they are not going to put Ukraine on some sort of long-term accession track. And maybe they can sidestep what von der Leyen apparently already said. Poland is arguing vociferously for them to be given this status. There are ways of fudging that. After all, they put Turkey on an accession track in the early 2000s. And that’s a non-trivial part of the entire story of Erdogan’s frustration, disillusion with the West, and so on because he was supposed to be the driver of that project, and in the end, it came to nothing. So there are ways in which they might be able to, as it were, fudge this or postpone the decision. But it has absolutely changed the game because the thing that made everyone’s positions cohere was, as it were, the weakness of Ukrainian nation statehood and nationalism would fold in front of the force of Russian arms. And then the problem could be handled as an ex-post problem of punishing Russia and not as a problem of dealing with a vibrant, vigorous Ukrainian sovereignty. Last time we spoke a lot about the way China would interpret this situation. Do you think that has changed since Friday? If you’re China looking at this, you’re thinking a little bit about Taiwan, what have you learned in the past four or five days? I think it’s very, very early days, and that story is unfolding, too. I think structurally, they’re coupled together in ways — I mean, over the weekend, I was trying to make sense of this question and started digging back. And when you do that, what you discover is that this alignment of Russia and China against a unipolar American order, of course, is not new, and it’s not a matter of Xi and Putin. It goes back to the 1990s. It was already in view. In a sense, what happened to them is that in 1997, they made this joint declaration on a multipolar world, which they were going to support. And at that point, perhaps, it seemed plausible or at least something they could assert. And then basically, Kosovo, the late ‘90s interventions of NATO in the former Yugoslavia and then 9/11, and then, of course, the wars of choice of the 2000s intervened. And that, I think that phase between ‘97 and 2007, becomes more and more obvious in its significance. But what that means is we agree this is hard-wired. There’s no way back. But they must, on the other hand, be thinking quite hard about what they’ve let themselves in for here. Matt Klein put it to me the other day kind of usefully in the sense that, is Russia actually North Korea? In other words, an ally you can’t really disown, but on the other hand, also one that’s really quite difficult and dangerous potentially. And it’s easy, I think, to say, well, the Russians are going to be desperately dependent on the Chinese, which I think is true if these sanctions really begin to bite because they will be able to transact with the Chinese in renminbi, and that will help. But on the other hand, the Chinese must also be feeling that they have attached themselves to a kind of rogue elephant of militarism and blundering, frankly. And again, I think if the Chinese had seen what most of us expected, which is a short, sharp shop and a rapid overtake of the Ukraine by Russia, that would have been one thing. But I don’t think they thought they were letting themselves in for this mess and this P.R. disaster and this debacle in some senses so far. But maybe by the end of the week, this will look really different. Let me end on this. We know that the Russian people are hearing about this war differently than we are. We know that Russian state media, which controls the media there, is on a very, very tight leash with what they’re reporting. So Russia is not on Twitter following the war that a lot of us are following at the moment. What they are feeling is the impact of these sanctions, and that is the place where the reality of this war, whatever the narrative that is attached to it is, is going to come for them. What do these sanctions at this point mean for them? What do you think it is going to be like to be an ordinary Russian citizen for whom things were pretty normal two weeks ago? What is it going to be like to be them over the next weeks, months? Yeah, this is the parallel that scared me witless at the weekend. So if we recognize that the battlefield has become, as it were, the generator of a huge contingency, huge unpredictable contingency that we didn’t reckon with that’s overturned all our prior expectations, what with these sanctions, which are now massive, we’ve decided to do is to unleash another incredibly unpredictable dynamic force into this equation, which as of Sunday morning includes nuclear threats. And it’s playing out day by day, hour by hour now, and it will affect the vast majority of Russians in one way or another. I’m not a sufficiently expert in Russian public opinion. They were not prepared for this. Sam Green at the King’s College London made a very good comment about this that he didn’t know whether he should be harmed by the fact that the Russian public was not panicking or alarmed that they weren’t because if they weren’t panicking ahead of what was about to hit them, that meant they were truly naïve and this was going to come as a huge shock, and that would make their reaction even more unpredictable. What we haven’t seen so far is crowds in the streets celebrating the great victories of our dear leader. That hasn’t happened. We have seen the patriarch of the Russian Orthodox Church come out and denounce the opponents of Russia in Ukraine, which is horrendous, a huge failure of spiritual leadership when we’ve seen the Pope doing the reverse. But I think this is a really — this is a worrying further element in this whole drama, and one that we unleashed, as it were, on the premise that this would be a done deal, grim as that was, into a situation that is so much more dynamic than that. Again, a bunch of really interesting economic analysis coming up around this question as it happens shows really that there is serious reason to worry about lower middle class Russian households. They’ve been squeezed hard over the last five, six, seven years. Their incomes have not been going up. They’ve been piling up debt. One of the first things that happened today is the interest rates went to 20 percent. So that’s going to immediately bite into your income. So there is a serious risk here of major economic and social fallout. The regime has ways of responding to this. But if Iran is anything to go by as a model, which is the only country remotely similar to which these kind of sanctions have been applied, you would expect this to be a bit of a slow burn. So you would expect the pain to build up over time and the political consequences to follow potentially. So right now, I think the main thing to emphasize is just the sheer unpredictability of the shock that we’ve delivered and the consequences it will have. Let’s end there. Always our final question, what are three books you would recommend to the audience? So I would recommend by Nick Mulder, Yale University Press, “The Economic Weapon,” which is a fascinating pathbreaking history of sanctions and couldn’t really be more urgent in the current moment. It’s a brilliant history of the early history of sanctions. As my second book, I would recommend a really fun polemical read by a combo of authors, “The End of the End of History: Politics in the 21st Century” by Alex Hochuli, George Hoare, and Philip Cunliffe. And my third is a book I stumbled on when I was trying to make sense of the whole crypto craze boom-bust thing that we’ve been going through. And I found it extraordinarily helpful in understanding the technical issues in the background. And it is Eswar S. Prasad’s “The Future of Money” on the digital future of money in the world, a really great book if you need a guide to understanding a little bit about the crypto in crypto. Adam Tooze, it’s always unbelievably clarifying to talk to you. Thank you very much. Great pleasure to be here. [MUSIC PLAYING] That’s the show. If you enjoyed it, there are a few ways you can help us out or shape the next episode. You can rate the podcast on whatever player you’re listening on now or send this episode to a friend, family member, if you didn’t like it, an enemy who you think deserves it. Or you can tell us who you think we should have on the show next by emailing me at ezrakleinshow@nytimes.com. We really do get suggestions for guests we have on from the email, and though we can’t respond to every message, we really do read every single one. “The Ezra Klein Show” is a production of New York Times Opinion. It is produced by Rogé Karma, Annie Galvin, and Jeff Geld, fact-checking by Michelle Harris, original music by Isaac Jones and mixing by Jeff Geld. Our executive producer is Irene Noguchi. Special thanks to Shannon Busta, Kristin Lin and Kristina Samulewski. [MUSIC PLAYING] EZRA KLEIN: I’m Ezra Klein, and this is “The Ezra Klein Show.” [MUSIC PLAYING] The world has been transfixed for the last week by Russia’s invasion of Ukraine and Ukraine’s remarkable, heroic resistance to the same. You can see these amazing, chilling images on social media, on traditional television. And so it’s easy to follow that side of the war, but that is not the only theater of this war. There’s this other battle playing out in the financial markets, and that war — that war is harder to see. But in the past few days, it has escalated from a limited counterstrike into a ferocious counterattack. It is a war that might decide what happens, ultimately, in Ukraine, and it’s a war whose effects are not going to be limited to what happens in Ukraine. We may well be watching the end of one global economic order and the birth of another. The U.S. and Europe were clear from the beginning. They did not intend to get into a shooting war with Russia, not over Ukraine. But they did intend to use their financial might to punish Russia if it invaded Ukraine. They meant to sanction Russia, to cause financial pain to the country, and particularly to its ruling class. But not to crack its economy, not to cause undue harm to their own economies, which are now interwoven with Russia. And so in this way, it looked like the logic of globalization had become inverted. Rather than trade and interdependence restraining Russia from doing something like invading Ukraine, it appeared to be restraining the West’s ability to respond to Russia invading Ukraine. And that was where things stood on Friday. But then social media, television, it filled with images and videos of the remarkable courage of Ukraine’s defenders, the indelible leadership of President Zelensky, the knowledge that Russia was not just storming to the capital, that this was going to be much harder for them than people had thought. And all that together, it shamed Western leaders; it changed the politics of the West. And so by Monday, a limited economic punishment had become something else entirely — a full out financial war. Russia now stands on the precipice of economic collapse. And Putin— Putin knows it. He’s treating this not as an annoyance, but as a mortal threat. In response, he raised Russia’s nuclear threat level. He’s responding to financial war with the threat of nuclear war, implying that if the West broke his economy, he might break the world — which is all to say, you cannot understand the war happening in Ukraine without understanding the war happening around Russia’s economy. And so I wanted to have Adam Tooze on the show to explain it. Tooze is director of the European Institute at Columbia University. He’s an absolutely brilliant economic historian. And he’s the author of the invaluable newsletter, Chartbook, which I subscribe to, and all of you should, too. Not all newsletters are worth it, this one actually is. And he’s been closely tracking the economic dimensions of the conflict here, and so I asked him to join me to analyze them. But this is a bit of an unusual show. We spoke on Friday, Feb. 25. But by Monday — by Monday, the situation had changed, in ways it demanded the analysis change too. But thinking about this and reading the conversation, I didn’t want to edit it into a false omniscience. The rapid, unpredictable way the conflict evolved — that’s really the point. That’s not some mistake. So what you’re going to hear here are two conversations. First, our Friday discussion, which I think is really important, because Tooze lays out the economics of the conflict as it was understood by both sides at the beginning of the war. You cannot understand how we got here without understanding what both sides predicted, what they thought to be true. But then, on Monday, we talked again to discuss how it had changed so dramatically in just a few short days, what that revealed about the false assumptions of the players, and the way that events are driving a rapid escalation neither side expected and neither side planned for. And I think when you sit with that, when you see how quickly this is changing, then you realize actually what dangerous territory we’re really in. As always, my email, ezrakleinshow@nytimes.com. [MUSIC PLAYING] Adam Tooze, welcome back to the show. ADAM TOOZE: Good to be here. EZRA KLEIN: Sorry it’s under these circumstances, of course. There’s something you wrote a little while ago now that’s been in my head watching this play out, which is, quote, “The first to expose the fact that global growth might produce not harmony and convergence, but conflict and contradiction, was Putin in 2007 and 2008.” Tell me about that. ADAM TOOZE: Yeah, I mean, the comment is framed now very much against our knowledge that — with the clash with China, that has become a much — even bigger question. But I do think that it originates in that moment in 2007, ’08, between Putin’s now famous speech to the Munich Security Conference in February and then the clash over Georgia. And I think that’s the moment when it becomes clear that not only do — as it were — the old antagonists of the Cold War have resentful legacies, but those will take on a new significance precisely as a result of the success of what was generally thought to be of the antithesis of that old era of division, namely globalization, because globalization was supercharging the development of Russia by way of the huge demand for raw materials, unleashed by China’s growth, from the 1990s onwards. And so Putin, by 2006, ’07, is presiding over the restoration of a Russian state which has emerged from the disastrous crisis of 1998. By that point, it’s — I think — the third largest holder of foreign exchange reserves, one of the largest owners of American sovereign debt, and he’s paid back the IMF loans and all the financial humiliations in the ’90s. And precisely on the basis, if you like, of Russia’s raw material strength, is now in a position to actually state — you know, his red lines— which are essentially the same as the ones that he’s prosecuting now — that he doesn’t accept, as it were, the order that emerged from the 1990s. But he was able to do it on the basis of economic strength. And that economic strength is itself the result of our demand, the West’s demand, or the collective global economy’s demand for the raw materials with which Russia is so richly endowed. And that is a huge problem. I mean, that’s a huge wrinkle in the underlying conception of globalization from the 1990s, which was much more Panglossian, much more pollyanna-ish. Right, that fundamentally believed that everything was good in the world, and that more economic growth would produce convergence or harmony, and— do commerce, right, this idea that through exchange, we would grow closer together. I think that was the moment where we really began to get a flavor for the fact, and a sense of the fact, that that might not be the case. EZRA KLEIN: Give me a moment of the Panglossian view. Give me a taste of the argument that, as we grow, as we integrate, as our economies intertwine — this is sounding vaguely romantic, I realize— that the economic logic of globalization, that there are gains to trade, we’ll get cheaper things, our economies will grow, also has a geopolitical logic, also has a geostrategic logic. Why did people think these were tastes that went together? ADAM TOOZE: Well, I mean I think there is a kind of romantic feel to it. There is wanting to have your cake and eat it kind of liberal logic here, which one shouldn’t deny. I mean, you know, wouldn’t it be good if it were true? And within the legally settled spaces of nation states, this — liberalism is very heavily committed to this idea. And it is analogously leery of any reference to class war. It doesn’t like that either. It doesn’t like the idea that economic growth could generate massive inequality, and not just inequality, but sharp, polarized division at home, either. So it’s a kind of double blind spot. And the idea at the international level is that — yes, in a sense, nation states were kind of excrescence. Right, they shouldn’t be there. Really, fundamentally, humanity is tied together by certain common interests, which are satisfied in this view, and optimally satisfied by peaceful and free exchange, and the common pursuit of innovation and prosperity. And furthermore, when you have a structure like that in place, you would expect it to cement powerful interests on all sides that would then resist war. It’s what Palardy called the peace interest. So powerful, heavy hitting groups — not just, as it were, sentimental attitudes — resist the onset of conflict because it ruptures those trade relations. It has a romantic side, but there is also a kind of realist version of this, which says, well, if in the end, money talks, you’d expect money to talk peace quite a lot of the time. And that, I think, is the idea. And there are moments in the ’90s, there are moments beyond the ’90s, when this doesn’t seem like an implausible idea. In fact, all the way down to the present day, one has to really pinch oneself to believe this is happening, given the losses that are being inflicted on, no doubt, powerful and influential people in Russia at this moment. I mean, the oligarchs are not doing well out of this. And if you think about analogous conflicts around Taiwan or something like that, the global semiconductor industry isn’t just the supply chain. It’s one of humanity’s great technological scientific achievements. Our ability to do this stuff at nanoscale is us up against the face of God in a sense. And it happens to be in Taiwan, and are we seriously going to talk about D-Day style amphibious operations — you know, and dig trenches, and attach explosive devices to fabs, which are the human spirit incarnate. Like, there’s something totally incongruous about this, right? They are also capitalism, and they also have geopolitical consequences. That’s the fly in the ointment. But anyway, if you wanted to tie down that liberal vision and give it meat, I don’t think we should deny it and cast it off as, you know, childish stuff. There’s a profound rationality there. And historically, there are moments when it’s clearly vindicated. And in the right space, with the right framing, it can be very generative. And indeed, these logics work themselves out. And the Europeans, of course, insist that they are the very paradigm of that logic. EZRA KLEIN: So Russia, for the past decade, maybe more, has been inflicting, exposing, the problems of this logic on the world. But before that, the problems of the logic are inflicted upon Russia. And I want to go back to that history for a couple of minutes here, because I think it’s important that the Soviet Union falls. American investors and economists and advisors flood into the country as it opens up. There’s this idea that Russia will become this economic miracle — this shock therapy. It will become this economic miracle, as all these Western economic ideas meet all this productive might and untapped genius and potential. And then it doesn’t. So what happens? What goes wrong in the immediate post-Soviet Union effort to turn the Russian economy into a westernized success story? ADAM TOOZE: Well, I think the first thing to say is that it was always a gamble at, like, extremely long odds, right? I think you have to go back to the late Soviet period to see just how blocked the political economy of Russia, of the Soviet Union, had become, how the Communist Party— unlike in China— had essentially become a kind of bracket around a pre-oligarchic configuration of interest groups in agriculture, in heavy industry, and the military industrial complex. And that’s essentially what, as it were, creates the impasse which produces then a very serious — what will be a hyperinflationary problem in the end, to which anyone in charge of Russia at that moment would probably have had to have responded with the shock therapy element, which is the price of liberalization, because there’s really not a whole hell of a lot of other options there. The bad politics really begins — and it’s largely outside the influence of foreign experts — at the moment of privatization. And it’s the extraordinarily corrupt process through which the assets of the Soviet Union were disposed in the mid ’90s, really, that produces the move in the wrong — what I think many people would regard as the move in the wrong direction. I mean, Russia is not after all an economic basket case. This is another important point to make. The story now ends with disappointment rather than disaster, but the possibility of a kind of a liberal, democratic model was probably obviated at that time. And furthermore, of course, the West has a limited degree of influence over this, but we back, after all, Yeltsin, who presides over this, who navigates his way through this oligarchic division, including in his violent stand off with his opponents in the Russian parliament, including in the manipulation of the ’96 election that he wins, but it’s quite clearly a manipulated outcome. And then nothing we do from the outside, none of the aid we provide, can stave off the disaster into which Russia slides in 1998, which is crippling. And this is a moment where a nuclear armed ex superpower is — basically, most of its economy as dollarized. People are paying their taxes in dollars. It’s really showing all of the signs of a disintegrating, dysfunctional, failed state by that point. And the story of Putin is not understandable, except against that backdrop. I mean, the basic claim to legitimacy on his part, and it’s not easy to just sort of wipe away, is that he has rescued Russia from that. Now obviously, a critical political analysis would say— yeah, there are a variety of contributing factors beyond Putin’s iron determination. But that backdrop is critical. EZRA KLEIN: But how does he — or the variety of contributing factors — rescue Russia from that? What is the capsule story of the foundation upon which the Russian economy is rebuilt from disaster into disappointment? ADAM TOOZE: The fundamental distinction, I think — even, like, supporters of Putin would make — is that it went from being a kleptocratic, crony capitalist regime to being a state capitalist regime. And the fundamental story here is the reconstruction of the apparatus of the Russian state. It’s very complex, and the criminologists of the modern day have five, six, seven, eight different groups now that they see operating around Putin. But the trend is, take advantage as best you can of the resources, the oil and gas and other metallurgical exports — and also now, increasing the ag exports for delivering to you — but don’t be the failed petrostate of the 1990s. Be a high functioning, authoritarian regime, more like, I don’t know, one of the Gulf States or an authoritarian version of Norway, if you’d like to put it really provocatively, with a fairly considerable welfare state by emerging market standards, and a huge foreign exchange reserve. So one of the indices of this restoration of the state is the fiscal balance. And Russia — one of the reasons why Russian sovereign debt was beloved of foreign investors until last week is that Russia runs a very tight ship, fiscally. One of their commitments is not to allow runaway inflation anymore. And they set their budget target — I think the latest round was set at — they index it on the dollar price of oil. And I think they had set the budget to balance at an oil price of $45 a barrel, which by the standard of petrostates is really austere, right? I mean, the Gulf States set their budgets to balance at 70, 80, 90. So all of these are indicators of this consolidation of state power. EZRA KLEIN: But so, crucially there, I want to draw something out that you said, which is Russia becomes a major, export driven economy. ADAM TOOZE: Absolutely. EZRA KLEIN: And it’s exporting commodities, exporting energy, agriculture, but to the point that we’re beginning to draw on here, on globalization, what is happening is that Russia rebuilds by selling things it mines, it grows, and that to some degree, it produces to the rest of the world, and very particularly to Europe. I was looking at a breakdown of Russian exports, and I think we’re something like 3.5 percent of them. America is actually not huge in this. But I mean, Europe is a lot of Russia. And of course, China has become much, much bigger too. And so, I mean, Russia really does participate in the globalized economy and begin early and selling what it can pull out of its own ground to the rest of the world. ADAM TOOZE: Yeah, always has. I mean, this is a long, long tradition. Russia has always been — I mean, companies like Royal Dutch Shell, a large part of that business was originally the Rothschild Caucasus oil interest that was incorporated. It’s always been a bread basket. It’s always been a metallurgical sector for certain key metals. So yeah, it’s a Eurasian powerhouse of raw material supply. And that’s the knock on Putin, right? I mean, any half decent administration with this pile of raw materials, given Chinese demand, should have delivered 7, 8, 9 percent growth. That’s the liberal knock, and that’s where the disappointment comes in, which is — it’s all very well to crow about this huge resurrection of the Russian state, but you’re setting a relatively low bar here. You know, a well administered rule of law regime could conceivably have attracted even more foreign capital than Russia did, and it attracted considerable amounts, and could have produced even more welfare. Ukraine is caught between the powerhouse state type model of Russia and the powerhouse, E.U. driven, market driven assimilation model on the other hand in the West. And unsurprisingly, this creates a kind of — given Ukraine’s lamentable economic performance, it creates this kind of — not schizophrenic exactly, but this hugely oscillating self positioning of Ukraine. I mean, do they associate themselves with the more oligarchic Russian model, or do they — unsurprisingly, many of their citizens would prefer to align themselves with the Polish experience. But those are the benchmarks against which this is the kind of triangle of different experiences that help to locate what’s going on here. EZRA KLEIN: So Russia’s buildup of a large foreign exchange reserve has come up glancingly a couple of times. You write, “If you want a single variable that sums up Russia’s position as a strategic petrostate, it is Russia’s foreign exchange reserve.” You go on to say, “This is what gives Putin his freedom of strategic maneuver.” So tell me two things here. One is that foreign exchange reserve may not be the most familiar term to people, so what is it? And then why is it the core of Putin’s ability to invade Ukraine, to survive this, to strategically maneuver on the world stage? ADAM TOOZE: Yeah, I mean, a foreign exchange reserve on the scale the Russians have it is — if you start from the premises of a liberal, private sector based economy, a kind of anomalous thing, because what it is is a hoarding by some public agency. It could be the central bank, it could be the treasury, it could be a sovereign wealth fund, of the foreign currency proceeds of an export surplus. It’s difficult to accumulate one of these if you’re not running a trade surplus. But the trade surplus is, in a private sector economy, generally earned by private firms. It’s been a long time since America’s run one, so it’s hard to kind of invoke examples. But say— Germany does, right? And Germany doesn’t have a giant trade foreign exchange reserve, because the companies that earn the foreign exchange are Porsche and BMW, whatever. They don’t have any direct relationship, although VW is actually state owned. But it doesn’t feed into a state coffer. Whereas in states like Russia or China, there is, as it were, a systematic process of accumulating foreign claims, claims on foreign economies, in public hands. That requires abstention on the part of the state, right, you have to it commit to not spending this, because you could be spending this on goodies. You could be importing from abroad, but you’re not. You’re deliberately using — it’s like a blend of trade policy and fiscal policy — to constitute a cash reserve. Why would you do that? Because you want to be invulnerable against shocks from the outside. You don’t want to be in a position where your currency is devaluing in an uncontrollable way, your import bill, because that’s denominated in foreign currency, is surging, making the cost of living go crazy for ordinary folks who have to buy the foreign goods. You don’t want your debtors who’ve borrowed money in foreign currencies to suddenly be made bankrupt by the fact that their debts are now worth vastly more in local currency than they used to be, because your currency is devalued. All of this is what happened to Russia in 1998. And if you’ve got half a trillion dollars in foreign exchange reserve, you can do a whole variety of things in that kind of situation. You don’t need to worry about being able to import stuff, because you can cover your import bill for years, in the Russian case. You can, if necessary, sell those dollars into the market for rubles, which helps you prop up the value of the ruble. And that will then allow your debtors to buy time to pay off their debts, settle their debts, by hook or by crook, so that by some point then they can survive the devaluation which may in due course be inevitable. And what Russia has not just done — it’s not just run up this public foreign exchange fund. It has also, since 2013, ’14 — the last Ukraine crisis — systematically squeezed down on the counter part of that, which often shows up in national balance sheets, which is private debts in foreign currency. So that’s, as it were, that’s the next level element of their hardening of the Russian economy. It’s not just first step, build up a big dollar reserve. But the second step is, look around every other aspect of Russian society and economy and shrink any outstanding liabilities in dollars. And they’ve done both bits. And that means that they are not exactly sanctions proof, but they are not going to panic when, as we saw, in the last couple of days, the ruble plunges, foreign debtors will no longer run — basically, the Russian government can’t borrow from creditors anymore, certainly not in the last week. So it doesn’t need to. So that’s the resilience that you get there. EZRA KLEIN: So I really want to hold on this for a minute, because it’s probably some unfamiliar territory. But I think this is so important for understanding the logic of the situation. We are so used to thinking of wars in terms of, how many troops do you have? How many missiles? What kinds of technologies do you have? And what you’re saying here is that Russia has spent years building up, on the one hand, a storehouse, of dollars— to some degree, euros — such that if they get cut off from being able to get lots of dollars and euros, it doesn’t really matter. They can survive that. And then on the other hand, bringing down the debts and thus leverage that their private sector players absorb, such that Western actors would have leverage over them. And so they have actually spent years using the tools of globalization to harden their economy against the weaponry of globalization. That if you think of one of the ideas in — globalization will create a kind of economic harmony. If you think of the stick next to that carrot, it’s — well, if you’re deeply entangled in the global economy and you become a bad actor, then you can be cut off. And if you’re cut off from that trade, if you’re cut off from that ability to participate in the financial system, if you’re cut off from the ability to get the currencies in which a lot of your transactions are denominated, then your suffering will be immense. But what they’ve kind of been doing is playing one side but not the other. They’ve been participating the global economy and building up their reserves and hardening in that way, but at the same time, purposefully reducing their vulnerability to the sticks of sanctions, and so on, which we’re about to talk about in detail. ADAM TOOZE: Yeah, I mean, the buzzword here is weaponized interdependence, and there’s a whole bunch of scholars, colleagues have been working on that issue. And I think it’s important to recognize — I mean, and in the first instance this was not part, I think, of an expansive, revisionist, geopolitical vision. I think in the first instance, it was a recovery from the 1998 trauma, which was severe. And I think it’s difficult for us, sitting in comfortable and affluent, or relatively stable societies, to really understand quite how severe that shock was. I mean, Russia in ’98 at one point I think appeals for food aid. I mean, like, we’re really talking about an existential crisis. But yes, undoubtedly, this is true that Russia — you know, it’s a typical medium strategy, medium power strategy, or an insurgent type strategy. It has to take a comprehensive view of the exercise of power globally because it doesn’t have the privilege of economic dominance. So it knows that it’s vulnerable. It knows if it wants to have autonomy. And with that, if he wants to realize what sovereignty actually means, in other words, your ability to take action on your own terms, not indefinitely without any constraint, but buy yourself a degree of room for maneuver, then you need to think across the bandwidth of options. And you can’t treat economics as separate from the other dimensions of power, which is the conceit of liberalism. But I think they understand that it’s also the hypocrisy of liberalism because they don’t think that we, the Americans, or the West really do either. It’s just that the game has gone so far away that we can proclaim the endless future of economic prosperity, a joint economic prosperity. And what that really just means is an endless future of ally power and our dominance. And if you’re coming at it from their angle, they do indeed always need to see the other side. And we cannot ignore the history of the ’90s and the early 2000s without getting into kind of moral equivalence and whataboutism and just causally to understand what the Russians are doing. You have to see the way in which they make sense of Iran, Iraq, Kosovo, that entire realm of essentially discretionary action by major Western powers on their own terms. And Russia has indeed been preparing for that. EZRA KLEIN: So during the Cold War, one of the definitional features of the Cold War is a willingness on the part of the West to commit or at least threaten force. We commit force in Vietnam. There’s the standoff in Cuba. And the fear is this will go all the way up to nuclear war. Over the past months, the Biden administration, to their credit, has been saying Russia is going to invade Ukraine. They have been raising the alarm. They have been called alarmist for it. A lot of people doubted the intelligence. They were right. But they have also made perfectly clear that if Russia invades Ukraine, they are not going to commit troops. For all that we knew this was coming or the administration knew it was coming, there was not a decision made to say line up American or NATO troops on the Ukrainian border. And the signal is if Russia does this, they will be punished economically with sanctions. So before we get into specifically what the sanctions are, what are sanctions? What is the intention of this kind of weapon? What do they do? And what do they not do? ADAM TOOZE: Well, I mean, it’s a hugely contested field. And there’s a brilliant new book out by Nick Mulder on the economic weapon that addresses the history of sanctions. And they have a really kind of complex and twisted history, as he shows, that they’re kind of liberalism’s favorite weapon. I mean, they’re on a spectrum, which is an ugly spectrum that starts with blockades, huge warfare, economic sanctions, and then goes to things like strategic bombing and ultimately, various types of deterrent strategy. And they’re all forms of the exercise of power and indeed coercion and violence— I think we should be clear— short of the classic battlefield entanglement or naval warfare or aerial combat. They may, in fact, entail— certainly, regularly, do entail naval combat and/or at least naval interdiction and/or aerial interdiction. But they fit in that kind of space. I mean, the sanctions that we think about now are peculiarly legalized product of a century of experimentation, which all starts really in its modern form with the League of Nations, or you could say it starts with the British, French, and ultimately American blockade of Germany in World War I and then is adopted by the League of Nations in the 1920s, the forerunner to the U.N., as the world community’s ultimate weapon nonviolent, quote, unquote, “against somebody who transgress the laws of peace.” And so rather than yourself having to go to war against an aggressor, what you do is impose economic sanctions, which are either supposed to be a deterrent to prevent action. And that will work best against small actors for whom the prospect of sanctions is crushing. Or it could be a form of siege. In other words, you punish the bad actor and hope that attritionly, this will affect their choices. It could be as a result of a domestic uprising or it could be as a result of elites simply saying, look, boss, we’ve got to change course, this isn’t going well. Or it could be functional. And it was, they just can’t carry on. That’s the risk which any potential challenger in the global system now knows that they could face, I mean, after the experience of Iran or Venezuela or North Korea, whatever. [MUSIC PLAYING] EZRA KLEIN: So Joe Biden, when he lays down the second and harsher tranche of sanctions here, he says, quote, “No one expected the sanctions to prevent anything from happening.” So explicitly he says, these are not deterrents, which is to say, in the typology you just offered, their siege. But you’ve looked at these pretty closely. What did we do in the sanctions? And what didn’t we do? ADAM TOOZE: Yeah. I mean, the president was actually— I mean, given his delivery, it’s always quite difficult to discern what his main point is. And this isn’t to say he isn’t coherent. It’s just something about his delivery that is strangely unfocused. But he was, in fact, quite frank about what the sanctions are doing. And what I think the model here is on both the European and the American part is that they are going to surgically strike at the bits that hurt inside Putin’s regime. I mean, he’s literally said it. He kind of mumbled it out, but it’s right there in what Biden said. These sanctions are carefully calibrated not to interrupt payment for energy deliveries. Now, at that point, really the game should stop because if we’re not interrupting the payment for energy deliveries, we are not hitting the bit of the Russian economy, which generates the juice, which sustains Putin’s regime. Now, they could then say, well, that isn’t the point. Our point is this targeted attack on the political elite and the targeted attack on key financial institutions, they are being cut out of the entire dollar correspondence system, which means it really won’t be able to do international banking very easily. And I think the idea must be, if you strike at those two elements, the financial infrastructure and the elites, that you’re going to produce an effect. And I think reporting suggests from inside that there was a somewhat, I mean, understandably multi-sided debate in the Biden administration about whether or not this would work as a deterrent. You can’t but hope that it will. But now, I think given the worst has happened, clearly, they’ll say, no, that was never the plan. And in fact, always this is about this kind of change. But having exempted the energy sector, they are not— and again, they’re very clear about the motives for that because, I mean, they’ll hurt the Europeans and it’ll hurt American consumers too badly. I mean, in the American consumer case, it’s, I think, a more— I mean, it’s a more of a stretch. But in any case, that’s the logic, it’s quite explicit. And so they’re trying this more targeted smarter sanctions kind of model. EZRA KLEIN: I want to get it something important there because we are talking— we’re speaking, we’re in America, despite your lovely accent. And we are talking about the Biden administration as the actor. But the sanctions are not simply a Biden administration operation. They’re in consultation with Europe. And talking about Biden’s lines and the places where he’s a little bit unexpectedly honest, two things here. One is we understand— this has been said pretty clearly. It has been reported quite clearly, actually, going back months now— that Germany has lobbied and pushed for the sanction exemption on energy. And we can talk about more of the specifics there, but there’s a real European fear about cutting off Russian, particularly natural gas is my understanding. And then secondarily, there was a possibility being floated to cut Russia out of the SWIFT system, which is international financial machinery that I will let you explain its function. They did not do that at least yet. And it’s possible that they will in the coming days. They did not do that yet. And Biden, somewhat to my surprise, says in his comments, that that is because the Europeans would not agree to do it. So can you talk a bit here about these decisions and the role that Europe’s integration with Russia is playing? Because it’s funny, it really inverts the logic of globalization creating harmony. You’re seeing here that it also creates leverage of the bad actor on those who would like to maintain harmony. ADAM TOOZE: No, absolutely. I mean, there are three separate issues. So one is whether or not it’s illegal to conduct transactions with Russian actors through the right kind of intermediary around things like energy. And the Europeans and the Americans seem determined to green light that. Then, there are the sanctions which Biden did announce, which as he insisted — and I think quite rightly and expert opinion seems to concur — are really massive, which are to block the assets of Russian banks in the United States for some of them, and for others, just excise them from the dollar-based interbank relationships. So this is this correspondence banking which Biden announced. He was then asked by journalists, Mr. President, what about SWIFT? And SWIFT is the thing that everyone’s been talking about, and it’s become this sort of standard of whether you are hardcore on sanctions is, do you favor cutting the Russians out of SWIFT? And I think the smart money says, well, actually, the correspondence banking thing does that to a considerable extent. And in any case, the real issue is energy. And if you’re exempting that, it doesn’t matter what you do. But SWIFT is, it’s kind of like, as far as I understand it, it’s like an email system for banks. It’s a form of secure, rapid, efficient digital communication between international banks. It’s not government to government. Those central banks may have SWIFT numbers. It’s a club essentially, and it’s not based in America. It’s based in Brussels. And it’s a private entity. And the idea is that as it were if America threatens actors on the Russian side, then people who do business with them through SWIFT will become liable. SWIFT itself could become liable for one of those really nasty American lawsuits with which they have hounded both European and Asian bankers and business people. And so SWIFT will then, as it were, just choose to exclude Russian members from its system, and that would hamper their ability to do conventional international banking. I think the consensus now is that if you push the correspondence banking measures which Biden imposed yesterday or announced the imposition of, then that actually does the work. But yes, both with regards to the energy carve-out and with regard to SWIFT and forceful action on SWIFT, which would be stigmatizing because the previous countries that have been cut out are Iran, Venezuela. So it would put Russia in that box. Europe pushed back and pushed back quite hard, and they pushed back for existential reasons, right, because 50 percent of the natural gas on which a large part of German power generation, domestic heating and cooking fuel, and industrial feedstock depends would be cut off. And the German government doesn’t want to contemplate that any more than Biden in a midterm election year wants to contemplate a dramatic spike in gas prices. EZRA KLEIN: So we’re going to get at this explicitly later, but I just want to note as we go through this part of the conversation that if China is in your head here, I don’t think you’re wrong to have that as subtext. And I say that in part for this question, which is, I think we’re seeing that on energy almost no matter what they do because a direct invasion of Ukraine is about the single largest violation of international law norm you can possibly imagine. It just doesn’t get bigger. Russia is just too big to fail. They are too big to sanction. They have just attained a centrality to the global market where no matter what they do within imagination, Germany and the UK and so on are just going to say, well, that was bad but not so bad that we are going to absorb the cost of cutting you out. ADAM TOOZE: I, broadly speaking, agree. That’s exactly. But it depends a little bit on the conjuncture in the sense that the oil and gas markets at this particular moment are as tight as they’ve been in living memory, right? So that makes things even worse. And it’s just not obvious, for instance, that if you take three million barrels of Russian oil exports a day out of the market that Saudi Arabia can step up to match that missing supply. I think, in fact, we know for a fact, they can’t. EZRA KLEIN: Oh, they probably cannot. ADAM TOOZE: They absolutely can’t. And likewise, gas is even more complicated because it requires either pipelines or liquefaction, LNG terminals. And that’s a 5 to 10-year time horizon, massive investment, and we just don’t have the capacity for that. So it’s those particular constraints. I mean, people talk about this as a completely irrational move on Russia’s part. They’ve been timing this. This was certainly the year to do it and not 2020 when oil prices went negative briefly. So they are indeed really hard to sanction at this particular moment. And in the grain market, they’re an even bigger deal, right? So between them, Ukraine and Russia supply 23 percent of the global stock of wheat exports, global flow of wheat exports. So they’re staggeringly large in that space. EZRA KLEIN: And if I’m not wrong, though, agricultural, and in fact, commodity and ag experts in general are also exempted under the sanctions. ADAM TOOZE: Surprise, surprise, they are. Yeah, under a rubric which also includes medicines and — but yes, they are. Yes, that’s General License 6 maybe. The energy one is General License 8. And so apparently, there was panic buying. And we aren’t the first people to learn this. There was a panic buying of loaves of bread across the Middle East, which are heavily dependent on Ukraine and Russian grain until somebody informed the bakery shops in Lebanon that, in fact, General License 6 applied. And they literally put up posters in their store window saying, no, American sanctions will not apply to agricultural goods. So where people are actually sensitively dependent on this rather than it just being a kind of abstract discussion like the one that we’re having, the knowledge of the limits of these sanctions is fairly widespread. EZRA KLEIN: Although I’m still quite worried about this piece of it. I mean, we’ve been talking really about Russia here, but Ukraine itself is a massive wheat provider. Lebanon imports 50 percent of its wheat from Ukraine, Libya 43 percent, Yemen 22 percent — I mean, Yemen is in a disastrous state right now — Bangladesh 21 percent. So you can exempt Russian wheat production, which will presumably continue relatively unchanged, but Ukraine is being invaded by Russia. Their wheat production is probably not going to continue unchanged. And it does seem that the downstream consequences for fragile countries and their food supply could be severe. ADAM TOOZE: Especially against the backdrop, again, in food markets as well of very elevated prices. It’s one of the untold neglected stories of the inflation surge is that food price spike, which hits low-income countries hardest. So I mean, global stocks are quite large. So I think there shouldn’t be absolute shortages, but the price squeeze, especially for lower-income countries, could be very severe. And Ukraine is a low-cost — it’s a kind of bargain basement wheat provider. So its clients do tend to be lower income. EZRA KLEIN: So we’ve been — as you said, there’s a strategic economic logic here. We’ve been trying to lay out what Russia’s is. I think the way that the American and European sanction exemptions has been reported, has been discussed is as a kind of moral failure, an absence of the kind of backbone and commitment Putin himself is showing here. I think that you can read it the opposite way, too, given the history of very large countries invading smaller countries that do not want to be invaded, which is, if you really loathe Russia, you can say Putin is doing something probably completely disastrous for the Russian economy here, probably disastrous for Russia. The financial system is about to get somewhat strangled. They are about to be putting a tremendous amount of treasure and blood into trying to conquer and then pacify and then maintain Ukraine. America has had its own misadventures of this kind over the past few decades. We’re a richer country. We’re a bigger country. We have more allies in those ventures. And they have been, I would say, disastrous for America. Again, from the realpolitik approach, could you look at this and say, Vladimir Putin has made an insane calculation here, and the West’s interest is in letting him destroy his power on the shoals of this imperialist nostalgic fantasy? ADAM TOOZE: That’s definitely, as it were, the big liberal counter. In other words, that liberal harmony vision of economic growth as a compelling historical force will in the end come back to bite you. And it’ll bite you this way if it doesn’t get you the other. I mean, if that is correct, then, of course, you have to reckon with the fact that Putin already made his choice. I mean, he made his choice in ’14 with the annexation of Crimea and with the backing of the separatists in Donbas. The Russians have been living under sanctions of various types since then. And the regime has shown a considerable ability to harden itself. And I think probably Putin would shrug and say, well, that’s a small price to pay for the crowning of my legacy. Putin made a strategic move people reckon, I think, around 2013, ’14 to rebase the legitimacy of his regime from the economic growth, the more conventional economic growth welfare model that had prevailed from the late ’90s through to that moment, 2013, ’14, to one that was emphatically based on nationalism and appeals to history and to grandeur and so on. So I don’t think — we may want to characterize it as mad, but it has its own logic. And the economic costs have been considerable but tolerable from the point of view of the Russian regime so far and indeed of Russian society so far. That isn’t to say — so when you talk to Russian liberals who are highly critical of this direction, some of them closely associated with the previous regime, the regime that prevailed up to 2013, ’14, their scenarios for Russia admittedly before the current crisis were dismal over the 20 to 30-year time horizon. It has bad demographics. Productivity growth is lame. Becoming the privileged raw material supplier to China is no one’s idea necessarily in Russia of a high road to national prosperity and success. But they’re not of immediate collapse, and I think that’s what’s going to be tested in the next months and two years to three years. But the regime has already made that choice. It made that choice back in 2013, ’14. And what it discovers, of course, is that when the dust settles, the customers come back. Germany’s dependence, Europe’s dependence on Russian gas has risen since the first Ukrainian crisis up to this week. It rose quite considerably. So that, I think, is something they also know. In other words, they have something other people want, and given time, those customers and those clients will come back. EZRA KLEIN: Could Russia do this without Chinese support? ADAM TOOZE: China is now Russia’s major trading partner. And so if it didn’t have China there, that would cause considerable problems. It doesn’t currently sell a huge amount of gas to China. It does sell a lot of oil. It certainly helps. If China was vigorously opposed and aligned with the United States in opposing this, I think the calculus would look very different from Russia’s point of view. But China isn’t India. It’s kind of ambiguous as well. It’s very much the outlines, if you like, of the coalitions of 2003. Again, not to bring up old history, but if you want to see a map of our current situation, look at the way opinion was divided in the United Nations in 2003. And I think many of those states essentially share Russia’s perspective that the existing order, as we like to describe it, is fundamentally illegitimate and inconsistent and hypocritical. And so if any one of them has a beef sufficiently large that they want to pursue it, and America is — as indicating as clearly as it is that it is — not going to escalate this beyond sanctions of a limited type, then they weigh the cost of distancing themselves and aligning themselves. I don’t think Beijing necessarily wanted this problem here right now, but if this is what Putin wants to do, they’re not going to — so this then alliance, I think, is quite conditional, quite pragmatic, but it is rooted in a fundamental alignment on this issue of the legitimacy of the existing order. EZRA KLEIN: If you’re Beijing, you’re watching the European response. You’re watching the American response. What are you learning? ADAM TOOZE: I think what you already knew. I mean, I think they’re very smart, and there’s nothing very surprising about what we’re seeing. You’re learning that America is refocusing. I would have thought from Beijing’s point of view there’s very little comfort in this because America is not taking the bait, right? I mean, America is not deeply engaging on this issue. They’re drawing lines. And I think the flip side of that is that America is serious about 10 years on from the Obama pivot now really actually performing that shift. That will be my read. I mean, you could read it just simply as weakness, but I don’t think that’s terribly convincing to be honest. And you already knew that the Europeans don’t have an independent military capacity and are hugely exposed to Russia for a crucial input. China’s not in that same position with regard to the Europeans. I mean, Europe is a huge market. It’s a larger market for Chinese exports than the United States, even. So there the exposure is more the other way around. But I don’t think that Beijing will be suddenly changing the parameters of its calculus in any significant way. EZRA KLEIN: If you’re Taiwan right now, what are you learning from this situation? ADAM TOOZE: I mean, exactly. I think the Japanese also are looking at this very hard and thinking thoughts. I mean, and you do have to wonder, don’t you, because one way— I mean, I’m going to talk about Europe just a second more because it’s where I’m more comfortable. But clearly in Europe, already the conversation has started about— in Germany, amongst serious people, I mean, we really actually do have to have some military capacity. It’s an extraordinary moment for a German historian of seeing the head of the German Army on LinkedIn, of all places, announcing his profound professional and personal humiliation of the fact that as a German soldier, he has nothing, quote, “nothing to contribute to this situation.” So if you’re Japanese or your Taiwanese at this moment and you’re watching this, you must be wondering as to whether or not you do not need to stand by for a big surge in defense spending to consolidate as it were themselves as harder nuts. And certainly, the Japanese in that case, we’ve seen a tendency that’s very strongly in that direction. And it’s not been disapproved of in any way by the — well, the Biden administration is complicated as we know, but there’s certainly one group around Kurt Campbell and folks like that that clearly have no problem with seeing a more militarized, more robust, local deterrent capacity on Japan’s part. Whether that goes to the level of nuclearization, which might ultimately be the final last-ditch defensive mechanism, I don’t know to be honest. Taiwan’s options are just so much more difficult. I mean, it’s difficult as a historian, and you step back and you go to kind of aestheticizing modes, right? But it’s difficult not to think of it as a somewhat tragic situation fundamentally because I don’t think there’s anything here that — my read is the one that we’ve been offering here after all — shouldn’t cause them to panic. I think they might be checking with Washington is like, is this read the appropriate one? Is the read here that Washington is doubling down, committing as hard as it possibly can to the Eurasian arena? If I was on their side, that would be the question I would be insistently posing. And I would imagine the Biden people would be reassuring them on that score. EZRA KLEIN: I want to ask then about how this reshapes also the economic world order. And there’s a paragraph from an Economist piece that I’ve been thinking about a lot, and I’m going to take a moment here and read it: “The longer-term impact will be to accelerate the division of the world into economic blocks. Russia will be forced to tilt East, relying more on trade and financial links with China. In the West, more politicians and firms will ask if the key tenet of globalization, that you should trade with everyone, not just your geopolitical allies, is still valid, not just for Russia but other autocracies. China will look at Western sanctions on Russia and conclude that it needs to intensify its campaign of self-sufficiency. The invasion of Ukraine might not cause a global economic crisis today, but it will change how the world economy operates for decades to come.” What do you think of that? ADAM TOOZE: I mean, broadly speaking, it seems like a plausible interpretation. I would wonder perhaps about, as it were, the core attributing this to Ukraine, per se. I think Ukraine probably intensifies pre-existing trends. The history here is interesting in the sense that the WTO round, the Doha Round, which was, as it were, the first to really embrace global development, collapsed between 2008 and 2009. So that emerges in retrospect, I think, as really quite a pivotal moment because since then it’s become clear that that’s really the direction that we’re traveling in anyway, right? So all of the big trade deals of the last decade or so have been regional blocks of different types. It gets interesting when you ask whether or not those regional blocks, which have been the logic of trade policy like NAFTA, like the EU in its extension, like TPP as was and now RCEP in Asia, now do they align with geopolitical divisions? And that I think is the less obvious questions to answer. And all of the information coming out of Asia as I understand it that the Biden administration is receiving is that none of America’s significant security strategy partners in Asia want an economic relationship with the United States that is exclusive with China. So in a sense, they want to mesh relationships like those which are now proving so complex for the E.U. with Russia. And they can’t go any other way because the dynamic. China is not Russia, right? China has been the main driver of economic growth for the last two decades. And we’re not just talking any old economic growth. We’re talking epic, historically transformative, world historic shift. And America is saying, well, opt out of that or opt against it or position yourself in a way which could be taken that way by Beijing, which is enough right now to cause almost incredible problems. And all of them say, no, even the Thailands of this world and the states which are most closely associated with the U.S. in security policy terms, South Korea. So that I think is a really fundamental problem going forward for American policy because it can commit credibly on the security policy side, but we know it is completely hamstrung not to say paralyzed on trade policy. So much so that I gather the American diplomats have very clear marching instructions when they’re in Asia whenever trade comes up. Market deepening or market opening is not up for discussion. Don’t misunderstand what I’m saying to you just so we’re clear because the domestic politics of it are so toxic in the U.S. So then you end up in a very lopsided world. So the economist vision rings true up to a point, but it’s not clear that the blocks will line up in a way that’s terribly favorable to the U.S., ultimately, I think, in Asia in particular. EZRA KLEIN: That seems right to me. But the thing I would add that I find interesting in that vision and that to your point feels to me like Ukraine crystallizing a pre-existing trend is a move toward supply chain self-sufficiency. I think Covid was a big part of this move as countries realized they didn’t have the mask capacity, the rapid testing production capacity, the vaccine production capacity, and then out of Covid, the economic disruptions. People want semiconductor capacity. That’s true for both America and China currently. They both want to be independent on semiconductors. It had felt to me already just watching what Congress was doing with the COMPETES Act and the other versions of that bill that they were trying to develop an almost supply chain self-sufficiency on the technologies they understood to be critical. I think now you look at what’s happening with Russia and whatever decisions people have to make today because they’re that dependent on them for energy or whatever it might be, they probably don’t love making that decision. For instance, I think that it is hard to imagine Germany signing the kind of natural gas pipeline deal with Russia in the next 10 years that they signed and now have frozen going backwards. And so the idea that we may be moving towards a period of time where there is much more national interest, pressure on the supply chain where the economic logic of globalization and the national interest logic of self-sufficiency diverge and people stop pretending that or believing that they’re twinned, that feels like a very big change that is, as you say, has multiple contributors but that Ukraine is really going to put a fine point on. ADAM TOOZE: I think when we come to supply chains, the term itself is so anodyne and so baggy, and it encompasses everything from face masks to microchips. And I don’t mean that in a trivial sense. It’s more complicated. It just doesn’t capture the existential significance of some rather than others, and energy is one of them. And I agree that the energy nexus between the West and its major suppliers will be once again put in question. And the answer after all is now very evident. In other words, we need to do a renewal, but we need to do an energy transition anyway. And one hopes that that logic now takes on a really dramatic dynamic in Europe. And that’s where the logic of that energy transition has already prevailed. Unfortunately, in the U.S., if you’ve been following Bloomberg or something, the frackers have just been having a fantastic 48 hours. It’s all about unleashing the fossil fuel regime. And we’re canceling Nord Stream and canceling Keystone. This is crazy. I mean, it’s a really toxic alliance. I think microchips are sui generis. I really think they’re in this special category all of their own like oil and gas. And because they are not just— I mean, they are the future, right? They are the — it’s not just iconic. It’s not a matter of symbolism. They’re literally the raw material out of which the new generations of technology have to be made. And the technologies required to do them in their current levels are so extreme that America doesn’t have a complete command of the whole set that telling in and of its own, in its own right. America doesn’t have the big fabs for the very latest chips. And that is a historic product. There’s a weird coincidence between, as it were, the liberal vision of globalization and this breakthrough in technology, which meant that this hugely strategic technology was inextricable it seems, interwoven with an East Asian post-Cold War myth, it turns out. And untangling that is a hugely complex problem. And what’s really remarkable in the current moment is that what we’ve seen is this unadulterated, straightforward, in-your-face hooking of the Industrial policy microchip logic to the national security logic. And it began under Obama but really took on an incredible momentum in the Trump administration in 2019 and 2020. And targeting Huawei was the beginning of that. But the Biden administration right now, I believe, is weighing the option of more intense sanctions on SMIC, China’s designated microchip champion. And that’s where we’re really going to see how serious this gets. But I think it’s sui generis but absolutely crucial. You’re completely right. And the scale of spending globally on national industrial policies in Europe as well, which has normally really drunk the neoliberal Kool-Aid and does not do that kind of thing, has been remarkable. I mean, it’s produced a huge row within European institutions about whether they’re really just going to toss out all of their competition regulations, incredibly restrictive rules on state aid. So yeah, it’s a turning point, absolutely. And that’s fascinating because not only does it bust, as it were, the general presumption that trade leads to peace. It kind of busts the general presumption that trade is just trade. It turns out that trade in different things, the economic categories, the economic statistics convey a false sense of homogeneity whereas what we’re really dealing with are the sinews of power, like the essentials, the material ingredients of life and power. And that’s even more corrosive of economics in a sense because then all our conventional calculuses just start going out the window. And that’s part of the reason why this has become so unfettered because in the name of microchips and sovereignty and independence, there’s virtually no amount of money you can’t justify spending. EZRA KLEIN: If we are entering what we feel to me to be entering, which is a renewed era of great power conflict, and whether or not you actually include Russia as one of the great powers is, I think, interesting, but you could call it a bloc with China as a great power, one of the really scary things about that is that climate change and decarbonization certainly strike me as things where you need very high levels of international cooperation or at least where it would be speeded along with fairly high levels of international cooperation. And I think a lot of the thinking has remained around pretty liquid energy markets, pretty easy cross-border shipments. The hotter conflict gets, the harder cooperation gets. And so one of the first casualties, it looks to me, from more great power conflict is less climate cooperation. And in terms of the way I think we all immediately move to, well, what if we have a nuclear war, and that’s terrifying. But also, one of the ways it seems very, very worrying for humanity as a whole is, what if our already quite fragile levels of international cooperation on this continue to deteriorate because it becomes issue 7 on agenda where issues 1 to 4 are more pressing to people? ADAM TOOZE: That, I think, is the crucial issue. I’m not sure I actually agree that right now the climate problem presents itself pre-eminently as a problem of global cooperation. There are certain aspects of the climate problem which do have that feature. But if you take the climate problem as seriously as I think we have to at this point and as seriously as I think big parts of the leadership in China increasingly are, it’s a national interest issue. You do it because you’ve got to do it. And furthermore, they increasingly see it as a zone of industrial policy competition. So you do it because you want to profit from the energy transition. I understand that’s a construction of this problem. That is the construction that I think is an optimistic construction of the problem in some respects, because it minimizes the amount of cooperation that’s actually necessary. There are certain domains within the climate space where cooperation, say, notably around development spending, development investment and in certain key technologies could be helpful. But we could be in a space now where it gets productively incorporated into competition between great powers in a way that it will be novel. We shouldn’t rule that out as an option. But I do absolutely agree, and it’s been very striking that, as it were, since now the climate problem is really a matter of urgency. We need to achieve major steps this year. We need to reduce emissions by 7 percent in 2022. And we are not focused on that problem right now. We’ve got other things on our mind. And furthermore, with this opening up and energy prices going berserk and this question of sufficiency being posed, as it were, it opens the door for the creeping influence of the rear-guard action of fossil fuel. It not just opens. It bursts it wide open and gives them the stage. And even though their logics are all terrible and even though their arguments are all bad and they should really be rejected, it becomes really difficult to fight them. And furthermore, in these moments where the President of the United States at a moment of crisis goes onto the rostrum and says, yes, American citizens, I promise to defend your right to cheap gasoline at all costs, including sacrificing this thing you might think is important, that doesn’t send a good signal either. And the Biden administration has been caught in that cleft stick really since the fall of last year when prices began to surge. And there’s a whole new space opening up for us right now of, as it were, as and when we get serious about the climate adjustment of how you maintain focus. I mean that, in and of itself, is going to be a hugely difficult issue. How do you articulate other things around climate rather than treating climate as number seven on the list of six other more important stuff? And in that respect, this is devastating. In a sense, Covid showed us another example where I think the logic worked the other way around where Covid in a sense supercharged an immediate crisis, mugged by reality kind of a crisis, in fact, drove the climate agenda in interesting ways. It’ll be interesting to see how this plays out. But the politics of climate no longer can be thought of a single issue. They clearly have to be articulated with everything else if they’re going to have any kind of chance of gaining the momentum that we need, which is I think, fingers crossed, is going to happen in Europe this coming year. If they go any other way, they really have — why don’t you give up hope? But there’s no reason why you shouldn’t read this crisis as a huge invitation to just go big on renewables and flexible reserve capacity. [MUSIC PLAYING] EZRA KLEIN: So here I’m jumping in to take a moment to say that was where we left part one on Friday. Then, over the weekend, Adam emailed me and said the new sanctions were a difference in kind, not just degree. We were now seeing a financial war against Russia that was beyond what anyone had expected and what anyone had forecast. And so we spoke again on Monday morning to talk about what had changed and why and what it meant. So here’s part two of our conversation. Adam Tooze, welcome right back to the show. ADAM TOOZE: Good to be here. EZRA KLEIN: OK, so we taped the first part of this episode Friday that was meant to just be the episode. It’s now Monday. What changed over the weekend? ADAM TOOZE: Well, first and foremost, I think most people’s expectations about how the war was going to go and the heroic resistance being mounted by the Ukrainians and the apparent incompetence and decisiveness of the Russian military have created this extraordinary drama. And into that then has come the escalation of financial sanctions from a kind of dim outline of what was going to happen last week to, by Saturday afternoon East Coast time, this dramatic declaration by the Europeans and the Americans together of all of the redlines crossing. I mean, they blew the Overton window right open, and I think did so very deliberately. They said, SWIFT, the payment system, this notorious interbank communication system, is on the agenda. We’re going to cut strategic Russian banks out of that system, and the Central Bank is not untouchable either. And then as the days have gone on and as the escalation has ramped up with Putin’s nuclear threats, by Sunday afternoon, we really had the concretization of this with the Europeans and now this morning the U.S. Treasury basically making it clear that they intend to freeze the assets of the Russian Central Bank. And that now has come to dominate everything else because that has unleashed a full-on financial crisis in Russia on Monday as the markets opened — or rather didn’t open because they couldn’t open them safely. So the Ruble has collapsed. And we’re moving into a situation tantamount to economic and financial warfare while the war is actually continuing. So sanctions that I think were originally designed as ex-post punitive of Russia’s behavior and abuse of international law are now becoming entangled with an actual ongoing conflict in which we are essentially in the position, say, of Roosevelt with the British in 1941, and it’s all measures short of war essentially, including the delivery of lethal weapons into an ongoing conflict. EZRA KLEIN: When I look back on our conversation on Friday, we talked a fair amount about SWIFT, which they’re doing at least a partial cutting out of some of these Russian banks from SWIFT. We did not talk about Central Bank sanctions. That was not understood to be on the agenda. But then you emailed over the weekend when that began moving up, and you said this would change everything in the response here. So why do the Central Bank sanctions matter so much? What does it mean to sanction a central bank, and how does it change the economic situation Russia is now facing? ADAM TOOZE: It totally changes the game because one of the things it totally changes is the status of those national foreign exchange reserves that we spoke about on Friday. And by any conventional metric are if you’re talking about financial crises or targeted sanctions of the type that Russia saw in the Ukraine — over the Ukraine and Crimea — after 2014, they are your bulwark. But that presumes that you can access them. And if the other parties in the state system of the world are willing to go as far as to declare your central bank — I’m not even sure whether to call it outlaw so much as criminal really, to declare it, as it were, ineligible for any kind of transactions, then those currency reserves that you’ve got are no longer really accessible to you. And now there’s an absolutely explicit mandate on the part of the Europeans in particular to stop any transactions. And the Americans have declared it prohibited for any American national. So at that point, the calculus tips, and it, for me, exposes, yet again, the way in which this conflict is really ripping up the playbook, changing the parameters because it made perfect sense to describe them as a source of stability before we went to this place because they had been. In ’08 and ’14, ’15, they manifestly were. They were a way in which Russia could stabilize its exchange rate and just like other emerging markets have. And they do it certainly not assuming that the world is, as it were, friendly to them. They are supposed to be defensive potentially even against various degrees of aggression. But what the current moment exposes is that in an all-out war situation, essentially, this property of the state becomes forfeit insofar as it remains within the control. So Russia moves to the position of an Iran or an Afghanistan. After all, Afghanistan’s exchange reserves have been impounded, and half of them are going to be apparently given over to providing compensation to 9/11 victims. So that’s the kind of terrain that we could be in here. And this has never ever happened on this scale. I mean, the minimum estimate of how many reserves are within the Western orbit is in the order of $300 billion. So this is serious money with serious ramifications for the Russian financial system. Concretely, what it immediately means is they don’t have any firepower to stabilize their currency with. So they’ve been doing things like drafting the foreign exchange earnings of private corporations in Russia and banning foreign companies like BP that suddenly wants to sell its stake in Rosneft from doing so. So they’re freezing Western money in Russia, and if you like, drafting the foreign exchange reserves of Russian businesses. So this really is a foreign exchange regime. It’s the sort of thing you do in extremist or under war circumstances. EZRA KLEIN: If this is such a potent weapon, why was this not discussed, threatened, shown beforehand? Why was this not used as a deterrent possibility so Russia knew this would come? Why was it not imposed right after they invaded Ukraine? Why does this begin coming up Sunday, Monday after they invade, as opposed to weeks before so it can be in their calculus or immediately so it’s part of the punishment? ADAM TOOZE: I think this is a good question. I asked myself that question because it should have been obvious that this could be a move that they make. But it simply wasn’t. I mean, no one was discussing this as an option seriously. And I hate to use the analogy — because it’s become explosive — is that this is the nuclear option. So you don’t go there. Like, it’s the question you don’t pose. It’s the bad thought that everyone might be having somewhere buried deep down, but it’s a hugely dangerous thought. And you can see this in the analogies, right, because out there in the world, all of a sudden when this came on the radar, people started saying it’s the Iran option. But the problem with that analogy is that it’s far too close for comfort because the Iran sanctions obviously targeted Iran to prevent it from getting nuclear weapons. But we are now applying Iran-style treatment to not just a nuclear power, the number two nuclear power in the world, the old Cold War antagonist, in the middle of an active shooting war in which we are taking sides in which they are not making the progress they expect. And we are threatening by this means to deliver a devastating blow to their home front. I mean, panic in the streets, total disruption of the ordinary lives of tens of millions of Russians. So it’s a huge step. That’s, I think, why if we had of had it in our conscious minds, there would have been a no-no about talking about it. But the honest truth is it just wasn’t on people’s radar because we hadn’t placed Russia in the Iran, Venezuela, North Korea box. EZRA KLEIN: One oddity of all of it is that energy is still exempted from everything we’re talking about. Energy is exempted from the SWIFT cutoff. Energy is exempted as I understand it from the central bank sanctions. Energy as we discussed on Friday is the big Russian export where they get a lot of their money. They could presumably do some amount of currency stabilization hidden in their energy flows. It is strange to hear people talk about this as the nuclear option, and meanwhile have Russia begin to talk about literal nuclear options. And in the background, everybody is saying, but of course, we’re still going to do a lot of trade in liquid natural gas. ADAM TOOZE: Literally today, the gas pipelines are fully full apparently. Today, they’re fully absolutely Gazprom and the Ukrainian pipeline are thought to report they’re at full capacity. Nord Stream 1, as far as I know, is also fully operative. It’s happening right now, and money is flowing the other way. They have a hardened fiscal military apparatus in Russia. They’ll be fine. They will find ways to cope, but it’s very dramatic. I mean, the energy is going on because the biggest revenue flow for Russia is all about oil. And the Biden administration has flat out said — again, it doubled down on this on Friday last week — that it was not going to touch the oil markets. Whether they can really stick to that, the press secretary I think in conversations in the last 24 hours has begun to pull back from that. And I think the Europeans are now concertedly looking for alternatives, mapping out the options. Everyone realizes now this is going to be a more prolonged confrontation than anyone imagined. The shift in German opinion has been staggering and clearly is reciprocal. In other words, the liberals, the more right-wing members of the coalition government, have declared renewable energy is freedom energy. It’s kind of an ironic echo of the free to famous freedom molecules quote about American gas. And on the other hand, demonstratively, Green Economics Minister Harbeck has gone on television to say that they’re seriously weighing out the possibility of extending the lives of the nuclear reactors, though evidence seems to suggest it’s not actually a viable option and won’t make much difference in the critical period. But these are solidaristic moves on both sides to show that everyone is rethinking their parameters. Meanwhile, Schultz has gone to the Bundestag and asked for a staggering increase in German military expenditure. So there is a huge rearrangement going on. EZRA KLEIN: I want to hold on that piece for a minute because it seems profound to me. When you look at how this entire conflict was being framed even just a couple of days ago, it was Russia is considering invading Ukraine, and the West is going to treat this as an economic war. They’re not going to get involved in a shooting war in Ukraine. They’re not doing that much to — they were doing a little bit to give Ukraine defensive capabilities but not at any level that people thought would really make a difference. And now that feels like it is changing. The E.U. announced $500 million in direct military aid to Ukraine. It’s the first time the E.U. is giving direct provision of weaponry to a country under attack. Germany is proposing this $110 billion investment in the military. That is almost twice the country’s entire defense budget last year. That is wild. This is being talked about as a watershed moment in Europe’s defense posture. It is moving from an economic war to something that is being treated as a new paradigm for the E.U.’s capability to get into and defend itself in shooting wars. How do you understand those changes? Is that overstating them, or is this something really new? ADAM TOOZE: Small as it is, the 500 million directly from the E.U. for weapons is really, that’s, as it were, a big taboo break. Sweden, neutral Sweden delivering lethal weapons? I mean, it’s staggering stuff, and it’s very, I think, on the one hand dramatic, and I’m die in the world to my dying death E.U.-adherent. And at that level, you celebrate these kind of moves as the way in which Europe makes itself through crisis. And the steps are in the right direction. And the promise from Germany is overdue. And I mean, as a historian, amongst other things German military history, it is staggering to have the chief of the German army declaring his embarrassment on LinkedIn of his inability to react. And these are amazing moments. But the alarming thing about this is, as it were, the shift, which is exactly as you said, from a position which was really ex-post — in other words, the invasion of Ukraine was not thought in itself to be historically meaningful because it was going to be so swift, and it was going to be annihilatory, and then the embarrassment of Ukrainian politics and Ukrainian sovereignty would go away, and we could move on — to a position where the heroism of the Ukrainians has made that impossible. And so we’re now in these incredibly fraught exchanges between Zelensky, who is acting out of his skin and really demonstrating an extraordinary capacity to do the Jupiterian thing essentially for real, I mean, under the threat of combat. And he’s basically pointing the finger at the E.U. and saying, here is the question. Will you have us or not? And that is extraordinary, because if one of Russia’s red lines is NATO, the other Russian red line, spoken or unspoken, is Ukrainian E.U. membership because that in some senses is a more profound challenge to Russia’s own model and its control over Eastern Europe and its hegemony. And that this is being opened up in the midst of combat, in the midst of an existential struggle where we may see these people killed more or less live on television as they refuse to surrender in Kyiv, and it has roused European public opinion to an astonishing extent, giant demonstrations in Berlin. So it’s very dynamic. I mean, I spend a lot of time thinking about Clausewitz, and this is the Clausewitzian triangle of battlefield military, grand diplomacy, and popular passion acting out in an extraordinarily dynamic way before our eyes with very, I think, unpredictable consequences and with huge potential for disaster on the part of the Ukrainians. EZRA KLEIN: Well, this to me is, it’s so important to understanding. The reason I wanted to do the show this way adding this on is because I think it’s important to watch the equilibrium here change. You’re watching war change the underlying structure of the conflict in real time. You mentioned Zelensky. I don’t think I’ve ever seen a more remarkable performance of a wartime leader, certainly in my lifetime. What he is doing in a completely new media environment, I mean, it is built, what he is doing, in many ways for social media. It is extraordinary. And if you go back even a couple of days and think about that triangle, I think that there was a calculation, a solving for the equilibrium where people were looking at Russia’s military or presumed military superiority over Ukraine. Then we were looking at the economic consequences both for Russia and for the West on various levels of sanctions. And we were solving for what looked like a stable output there. And into the middle of that comes Zelensky and this remarkably fierce and effective actually Ukrainian resistance. And social media, it blasts it into everybody’s home. You are watching this happen in real time. Zelensky is calling in with other ministers and saying, this may be the last time you hear me alive. Tell me a bit about how that changed the situation because on some level, the calculations around sanctions were calculations of domestic public opinion. They were calculations about what level of disruption European and American and U.K. citizens would absorb for Ukraine, which, in theory, they didn’t care that much about. But then, it happens. Then this immediacy of Zelensky, the images emerges, and the amount of caring, the passion on the part of a lot of these publics and even a lot of the elites in these governments changes. And the sanctions begin to change, and the conflict begins to change. So as a historian, can you talk a bit about the passion dimension of this because that’s what people were not predicting well? ADAM TOOZE: Well, they’re two things, right? And it’s exactly as you say the interaction between the dogged, ferocious, apparently successful resistance. I think we have to reserve judgment on the battlefield. I’m convinced that this is not done yet in two different dimensions, A, the siege of Kyiv and the big cities, and on the other hand, which could be apocalyptic and Syrian-like, and on the other hand, the pincer that is closing from the south that may in a sense destroy Ukraine’s ability to resist in the Donbas and will deliver to Russia one of their strategic goals, which is to secure the full territory of the Donbas. But nevertheless, this week in which the Ukrainian resistance has held up has changed the game exactly as you describe it. And another hugely significant thing is that Zelensky is not, as it were, just mobilizing his own population and the Ukrainian resistance. He’s not just mobilizing. But he is then posing the geoeconomic, geopolitical question and saying, and I want to talk about E.U. membership from the middle of this. Like, it’s as though from the middle of the Battle of Britain, Keynes and Churchill had said, we want to do Bretton Woods now. Can we talk about Bretton Woods? We want to talk about the future currency union because we’re going down in flames, and we’re going to dare you to tell us that dollar is going to rule here. I mean, it’s an extraordinary power play, hugely high stakes. And I think it reflects the fact that he knows perfectly well that under any other circumstances, the answer is no, nor do we want to talk about it, and we’ve told you this before. We don’t want to talk about this. EZRA KLEIN: One thing about the way Zelensky has not just mobilized opinion but mobilized the values of the E.U. in this moment — we were talking the other day about the way that Putin perhaps understood the dark side of the globalizing vision, that he understood that economic interdependence and growth maybe don’t create harmony, maybe creates leverage for conflict. Maybe he can do more because it actually will hurt Europe. It will hurt America more to cut Russia off. At the same time, Zelensky is showing that he understands the bright side of it, the value side of it. He is using this war and saying, well, you promised all of this. You said that if we were democratic, that if we defended ourselves and if you are country worthy of the international order, the international order will be there for you. And so one thing that really feels like it is changing is that Putin’s cynicism is all of a sudden being matched by Zelensky’s call to international optimism. And I am not — I want to be very careful. I’m not saying that is going to be enough for Ukraine to repel Russia. But it has really changed, it seems to me, the calculus for a lot of Western leaders, because they kind of switched into realpolitik mode with Putin. And they expected, it again looked to me, that everybody would follow them there. Then, when Zelensky and the Ukrainians didn’t follow, it transformed. And so maybe we underestimated, or maybe the power of this was underestimated going in. He seems to have understood that there was more leverage here than the West actually thought or planned for. ADAM TOOZE: I mean, how much premeditation there is here, I simply don’t know. And I think it’s going to be just, I mean, to speak about it in these terms sounds academic and coldblooded, but it’s going to be fascinating to see what the E.U. does with this, because, sure, clearly, the Ukrainians are demonstrating their resilient refusal to be subordinated by the force of Russian arms. And it’s extraordinary to see. And they are clearly willing to sacrifice their lives, their families. One is just humbled by it. But at what point is the E.U. going to say something along the lines of, but we also need to know that you’re really down with the rule of law because this patriotic rally is not the same thing as the rule of law. This is a patriotic rally. It’s absolutely bona fide. We have not seen the likes of this in Europe maybe since Prague ’68 or Solidarnosc in the 1980s. Those are the examples. But that’s not the same thing as what we are asking for or have asked for and asked of you, and you, Ukraine, have failed to show even any signs of being able to move in that direction. That has been the European position all along, right? So it’s going to be an extraordinarily almost impossible problem, I think, for the European political class to resolve this issue. I find it hard to imagine at this point that they are not going to put Ukraine on some sort of long-term accession track. And maybe they can sidestep what von der Leyen apparently already said. Poland is arguing vociferously for them to be given this status. There are ways of fudging that. After all, they put Turkey on an accession track in the early 2000s. And that’s a non-trivial part of the entire story of Erdogan’s frustration, disillusion with the West, and so on because he was supposed to be the driver of that project, and in the end, it came to nothing. So there are ways in which they might be able to, as it were, fudge this or postpone the decision. But it has absolutely changed the game because the thing that made everyone’s positions cohere was, as it were, the weakness of Ukrainian nation statehood and nationalism would fold in front of the force of Russian arms. And then the problem could be handled as an ex-post problem of punishing Russia and not as a problem of dealing with a vibrant, vigorous Ukrainian sovereignty. EZRA KLEIN: Last time we spoke a lot about the way China would interpret this situation. Do you think that has changed since Friday? If you’re China looking at this, you’re thinking a little bit about Taiwan, what have you learned in the past four or five days? ADAM TOOZE: I think it’s very, very early days, and that story is unfolding, too. I think structurally, they’re coupled together in ways — I mean, over the weekend, I was trying to make sense of this question and started digging back. And when you do that, what you discover is that this alignment of Russia and China against a unipolar American order, of course, is not new, and it’s not a matter of Xi and Putin. It goes back to the 1990s. It was already in view. In a sense, what happened to them is that in 1997, they made this joint declaration on a multipolar world, which they were going to support. And at that point, perhaps, it seemed plausible or at least something they could assert. And then basically, Kosovo, the late ’90s interventions of NATO in the former Yugoslavia and then 9/11, and then, of course, the wars of choice of the 2000s intervened. And that, I think that phase between ’97 and 2007, becomes more and more obvious in its significance. But what that means is we agree this is hard-wired. There’s no way back. But they must, on the other hand, be thinking quite hard about what they’ve let themselves in for here. Matt Klein put it to me the other day kind of usefully in the sense that, is Russia actually North Korea? In other words, an ally you can’t really disown, but on the other hand, also one that’s really quite difficult and dangerous potentially. And it’s easy, I think, to say, well, the Russians are going to be desperately dependent on the Chinese, which I think is true if these sanctions really begin to bite because they will be able to transact with the Chinese in renminbi, and that will help. But on the other hand, the Chinese must also be feeling that they have attached themselves to a kind of rogue elephant of militarism and blundering, frankly. And again, I think if the Chinese had seen what most of us expected, which is a short, sharp shop and a rapid overtake of the Ukraine by Russia, that would have been one thing. But I don’t think they thought they were letting themselves in for this mess and this P.R. disaster and this debacle in some senses so far. But maybe by the end of the week, this will look really different. EZRA KLEIN: Let me end on this. We know that the Russian people are hearing about this war differently than we are. We know that Russian state media, which controls the media there, is on a very, very tight leash with what they’re reporting. So Russia is not on Twitter following the war that a lot of us are following at the moment. What they are feeling is the impact of these sanctions, and that is the place where the reality of this war, whatever the narrative that is attached to it is, is going to come for them. What do these sanctions at this point mean for them? What do you think it is going to be like to be an ordinary Russian citizen for whom things were pretty normal two weeks ago? What is it going to be like to be them over the next weeks, months? ADAM TOOZE: Yeah, this is the parallel that scared me witless at the weekend. So if we recognize that the battlefield has become, as it were, the generator of a huge contingency, huge unpredictable contingency that we didn’t reckon with that’s overturned all our prior expectations, what with these sanctions, which are now massive, we’ve decided to do is to unleash another incredibly unpredictable dynamic force into this equation, which as of Sunday morning includes nuclear threats. And it’s playing out day by day, hour by hour now, and it will affect the vast majority of Russians in one way or another. I’m not a sufficiently expert in Russian public opinion. They were not prepared for this. Sam Green at the King’s College London made a very good comment about this that he didn’t know whether he should be harmed by the fact that the Russian public was not panicking or alarmed that they weren’t because if they weren’t panicking ahead of what was about to hit them, that meant they were truly naïve and this was going to come as a huge shock, and that would make their reaction even more unpredictable. What we haven’t seen so far is crowds in the streets celebrating the great victories of our dear leader. That hasn’t happened. We have seen the patriarch of the Russian Orthodox Church come out and denounce the opponents of Russia in Ukraine, which is horrendous, a huge failure of spiritual leadership when we’ve seen the Pope doing the reverse. But I think this is a really — this is a worrying further element in this whole drama, and one that we unleashed, as it were, on the premise that this would be a done deal, grim as that was, into a situation that is so much more dynamic than that. Again, a bunch of really interesting economic analysis coming up around this question as it happens shows really that there is serious reason to worry about lower middle class Russian households. They’ve been squeezed hard over the last five, six, seven years. Their incomes have not been going up. They’ve been piling up debt. One of the first things that happened today is the interest rates went to 20 percent. So that’s going to immediately bite into your income. So there is a serious risk here of major economic and social fallout. The regime has ways of responding to this. But if Iran is anything to go by as a model, which is the only country remotely similar to which these kind of sanctions have been applied, you would expect this to be a bit of a slow burn. So you would expect the pain to build up over time and the political consequences to follow potentially. So right now, I think the main thing to emphasize is just the sheer unpredictability of the shock that we’ve delivered and the consequences it will have. EZRA KLEIN: Let’s end there. Always our final question, what are three books you would recommend to the audience? ADAM TOOZE: So I would recommend by Nick Mulder, Yale University Press, “The Economic Weapon,” which is a fascinating pathbreaking history of sanctions and couldn’t really be more urgent in the current moment. It’s a brilliant history of the early history of sanctions. As my second book, I would recommend a really fun polemical read by a combo of authors, “The End of the End of History: Politics in the 21st Century” by Alex Hochuli, George Hoare, and Philip Cunliffe. And my third is a book I stumbled on when I was trying to make sense of the whole crypto craze boom-bust thing that we’ve been going through. And I found it extraordinarily helpful in understanding the technical issues in the background. And it is Eswar S. Prasad’s “The Future of Money” on the digital future of money in the world, a really great book if you need a guide to understanding a little bit about the crypto in crypto. EZRA KLEIN: Adam Tooze, it’s always unbelievably clarifying to talk to you. Thank you very much. ADAM TOOZE: Great pleasure to be here. [MUSIC PLAYING] EZRA KLEIN: That’s the show. If you enjoyed it, there are a few ways you can help us out or shape the next episode. You can rate the podcast on whatever player you’re listening on now or send this episode to a friend, family member, if you didn’t like it, an enemy who you think deserves it. Or you can tell us who you think we should have on the show next by emailing me at ezrakleinshow@nytimes.com. We really do get suggestions for guests we have on from the email, and though we can’t respond to every message, we really do read every single one. “The Ezra Klein Show” is a production of New York Times Opinion. It is produced by Rogé Karma, Annie Galvin, and Jeff Geld, fact-checking by Michelle Harris, original music by Isaac Jones and mixing by Jeff Geld. Our executive producer is Irene Noguchi. Special thanks to Shannon Busta, Kristin Lin and Kristina Samulewski. [MUSIC PLAYING] nyregion world podcasts podcasts nyregion world opinion business magazine "
nyt://article/05cc4a4a-150f-50c1-b00c-8b13be41edc1,https://www.nytimes.com/2021/03/14/opinion/letters/consumer-choice.html,2021-03-14T15:00:06+0000,article,Letter,558,"[{'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Health Insurance and Managed Care', 'rank': 1, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Tennis', 'rank': 2, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'organizations', 'value': 'Pacific Legal Foundation', 'rank': 3, 'major': 'N'}, {'name': 'subject', 'value': 'Consumer Behavior', 'rank': 4, 'major': 'N'}]",consumer discretionary,"letters Readers mostly agree with Paul Krugman that it’s an unwanted feature of modern life. To the Editor: Re “Too Much Choice Is Hurting America,” by Paul Krugman (column, March 2): While our digital world was expected to simplify our lives and leave us freer for discretionary activities, it has led instead to ubiquitous frustration and paralysis. What was once simple now involves 15 steps with uncertain success (think phone answering menus). What was once routine now requires study and perseverance (think “smart TV”). Requests for assistance typically demand arduous computer “chat” sessions or long waits to speak in person to a different expert whose perfect but tone-deaf English and scripted courtesy unsuccessfully camouflage an inability to truly assist. While the complexity may be unavoidable in light of our goals, much of it can be made more navigable by more thoughtful programming and greater respect for human limitations, both intellectual and emotional. Michael SchubertTeaneck, N.J.The writer is a psychologist. To the Editor: What Paul Krugman leaves unsaid is who actually gets to choose given our “limited ability to process information.” Answer: the well-educated, well-positioned elites like Mr. Krugman himself. This conceit has been the essential component of collectivist movements from the beginning. We’re incapable of knowing what’s best for us, so our intellectual betters should decide. I’ll cast my lot instead with those who have to live with the consequences of their decisions, not the so-called experts who are insulated when making the wrong call. Freedom to choose means more freedom, not less, regardless of what people with the right degrees and awards might tell you. Steven D. AndersonSacramentoThe writer is president and chief executive of the Pacific Legal Foundation. To the Editor: I agree with Paul Krugman that sometimes we have too many choices. It is certainly true in health insurance. The only reason to have more than one plan to choose from is that you can’t afford the good one. But where we really want a choice in health care is of doctor and hospital. This is what you would get with Medicare for All or, in New York, with the NY Health Act. And both of these would give everyone the same guaranteed, very comprehensive, lifelong “platinum plan.” Elizabeth R. RosenthalLarchmont, N.Y.The writer is a retired dermatologist. To the Editor: A good metaphor for too much choice is an email ad I recently received about tennis rackets. Wilson is among several other companies that make more than 30 models each. Besides never being able to try all of them, unless your last name is Federer or Nadal, you would lack the expertise to tell the difference between them. Michael MarekFort Lauderdale, Fla. To the Editor: Kudos to Paul Krugman for highlighting the dizzying aspect of a surfeit of choice in modern American consumer mania. But it should be pointed out that much of modern American business thrives on precisely this advantage of possessing information not readily available to the ordinary consumer. To protect this advantage, businesses often resist government-mandated disclosure and press for increased deregulation. Aside from government resistance to this pressure, help sometimes arrives in the form of a no-nonsense, transparent, comprehensible alternative. One example is the simplified fare structure Southwest Airlines introduced some years ago for its low-cost, full-size carriers. But it seems that sooner or later, the complexity merry-go-round takes over, and the mind-boggling bundling resumes, along with cottage industries of interpreters and advisers to deconstruct and compare the bundles in plain English. Too much choice is just flimflam. Is it really a necessary part of broad-based consumerism? Michael DeLaurentisElkins Park, Pa. nyregion world opinion opinion nyregion world opinion business magazine "
